label	text0	text1	text2	text3
1	centrepoint winter white gala london	The focal point is the White Gala in London, England.	The focal point is the white gala d' winter, London.	The focal point is the d&apos winter white gala in London.
1	prince william taylor swift perform jon bon jovi	John Bon Jovi is executed by Prince William Taylor Swift.	Prince William Taylor Swift executes Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince william taylor swift executing jon bon jovi.
1	taylor swift prince william funny	Funny Taylor Swift Prince William.	Taylor Swift Prince William funny.	Taylor swift prince william funny.
1	taylor swift breathtaking white gown meet prince william	Taylor, who is in a breathtaking white dress, meets Prince William.	Taylor, wearing a breathtaking white dress, meets Prince William.	Taylor, breathtaking white dress, meets prince William.
1	taylor swift dazzle gold gown prince william charity gala	Prince William Gala is dazzled by Taylor Swift's gilded gown.	Taylor Swift dazzles Prince William Gala with his gilded gown.	Taylor Swift dazzles Prince William Gala with his gold dress.
1	kfix rock news jon bon jovi pursuing buffalo bill	Kfix rock news jon good jovi chasing Buffalo Bill.	Kfix rock news jon bon jovi chasing Buffalo Bill.	Kfix rock news jon bon jovi chasing buffalo bill.
1	taylor swift prince william sing bon jovi video	Taylor Swift Prince William sings a good jovi video.	Taylor Swift Prince William sings good video jovi.	Taylor swift prince william sings good jovi video.
1	prince william rock jon bon jovi	Prince William Rock Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince William Rock Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince william rock jon bon jovi.
1	funny cool prince william charm gala	What a charming Prince William gala.	That's quite the Prince William charm gala.	Funny charm gala for Prince William.
1	bon jovi invited prince william onstage	Bon Jovi has invited Prince William to the stage.	Bon Jovi invited Prince William to the stage.	Bon Jovi invited prince willi to the stage.
1	taylor swift moving london prince william	Taylor Swift moves London Prince William William.	Taylor Swift moved London to Prince William William.	Taylor Swift moved to London, England, and moved to London.
1	william sings rock roya threatens twerk	William sings rock-roya.	William sings rock roya menace twerk.	William sings rock roya threatens twerk.
1	taylor swift prince william sing livin prayer	Taylor Swift Prince William is a singer of Vivin prayer.	Taylor Swift Prince William sings the Vivin prayer.	Taylor swift prince william sings vivin prayer.
1	taylor swift meet prince william	Taylor meets Prince William William.	Taylor Swift meets Prince William William.	Taylor swift meets prince william william.
1	bon jovi buy bill	Bon jovi, buy the bill.	Good jovi buy the bill.	Bon jovi buy bill.
1	taylor swift stuns crystal gown winter white gala prince william	Taylor Swift surprises Prince William Gala, a white man in a crystal-dressing winter.	Taylor Swift surprises Prince William Gala white d'apos; winter in a crystal dress.	Taylor Swift surprises the white prince William Gala d'apos; winter in a crystal dress.
1	winter white gala picture	Photo from the White Gala d' Winter.	Photo from the gala white d' winter.	Photo of white gala d' winter.
1	prince william performs song jon bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William plays Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	"Prince William plays the song ""Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift."""	Prince William performs the song Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.
1	taylor swift michelle dockery winter white gala	Winter White Gala Taylor Swift Michelle dockery.	White Gala d' winter Taylor Swift, Michelle dockery.	Gala white d' winter Taylor Swift Michelle dockery.
1	william prince pop	Prince William pop.	William Prince pop.	William prince pop.
1	video prince william rock taylor swift jon bon jovi	Prince William Rock Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi Video.	The Prince Video William Rock Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.	This is Prince Video, William Rock Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.
1	dibs royal guest rocked jon bon jovi taylor swift	It's the first time I've heard it.	Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift's royal guest rock.	Prem' Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift's royal guest rock.
1	wednesday morning liner	Wednesday morning's liner.	Wednesday morning Liner, please.	Wednesday morning linen.
1	watch prince william singing livin prayer jon bon jovi taylor	Watch Prince William sing the Vivin Jon Good Jovi Taylor prayer.	Watch Prince William sing the prayer of Vivin jon bon jovi taylor.	Watch Prince William sing the Vivin jon bon jovi taylor prayer.
1	taylor swift taylor swift prince william funny	Taylor Swift Taylor Swift Prince William Drôle.	Taylor Swift Taylor Swift Prince William Drôle.	Taylor swift taylor swift prince william drole.
1	prince william performs taylor swift jon bon jovi gala picture	"Prince William plays ""Taylor Swift jon bon jovi"" photo gala."	Prince William plays Taylor Swift jon bon jovi photo gala.	Prince william plays taylor swift jon bon jovi photo gala.
1	watch prince william sing livin prayer taylor swift bon jovi	Watching Prince William perform the prayer song of Livin Taylor Swift Bon Jovi.	Watching Prince William sing the prayer of Livin Taylor Swift Bon Jovi.	To watch Prince William sing Livin Taylor Swift Bon Jovi's prayer.
1	taylor swift thrilled royal engagement	Taylor Swift s' is delighted by the upcoming royal engagement.	Taylor Swift s' is thrilled to have the royal engagement.	Taylor swift s' is thrilled at the royal engagement.
1	swift bon jovi meet prince william homeless charity gala	Bon jovi quickly meet Prince William without-shelter Charity gala without-shelter.	Bon jovi quickly meet Prince William without-shelter homeless charity gala.	Fast jovi meet Prince William without-shelter charity gala without-shelter.
1	taylor swift actual princess sparkly gown winter white	Taylor Swift real sparkling dress d' white winter.	Taylor Swift real princess sparkling dress d' white winter.	Taylor Swift real princess sparkling white winter dress d&apos.
1	prince william join bon jovi rendition living prayer charity gala	Prince William will attend the Good Jovi Prayer Charity Gala.	Prince William participates in the Gala of Good Jovian Prayer.	Prince William attends the Good Jovi prayer charity gala.
1	video prince william taylor swift jon bon jovi perform palace charity gala	Prince of video, William Taylor Swift Jon bon jovi, performs the palace's own charity gala.	Prince of Video William Taylor Swift Jon bon jovi performs the palace charity gala.	Video prince William Taylor Swift Jon bon jovi performs the palace charity gala.
1	pop princess taylor swift loved meeting prince william kensin palace	Princess Swift loved to meet Prince William Kensin Palace.	The Princess Taylor Swift loved to meet Prince William Kensin Palace.	Princess Taylor Swift loved meeting Prince William Kensin Palace.
1	taylor swift stuns crystal gown winter white gala prince william	Taylor Swift surprises Prince William Gala, a white man in a crystal-dressing winter.	Taylor Swift surprises Prince William Gala white d'apos; winter in a crystal dress.	Taylor Swift surprises the white prince William Gala d'apos; winter in a crystal dress.
1	nfl afc mixture injury rock star	Nffl afc is a blend of blues and blues.	Nfl af afc blend of rock star injuries.	Nfl afc mix of rock star injuries.
1	taylor swift gush meeting prince william gala	Swash meets Prince William Gala.	Taylor Swash meets Prince William Gala.	Taylor swash meets prince william gala.
1	william prince pop performs taylor swift	"""Taylor Swift"" by William Prince pop."	Prince pop will play Taylor Swift.	William prince pop plays Taylor Swift.
1	taylor swift chat duke cambridge winter white gala	Taylor Swift cat from Duke Cambridge White Gala d' winter.	Taylor Swift chat of Duke Cambridge White Gala d' winter.	Taylor Swift chat duke Cambridge white Gala d' winter.
1	taylor swift princess winter white gala prince william	It's the first time I've heard of it, and it's the first time I've seen it.	Taylor Swift Princess Gala white dapos; Prince William winter.	Taylor Swift Princess Gala white dapos; winter Prince William.
1	taylor swift prince william bon jovi sing livin prayer watch	Taylor Swift Prince William Bon Jovi singing Vivin Day before Prayer.	Taylor Swift Prince William Bon Jovi singing Vivin's prayer vigil.	Taylor Swift Prince William Bon Jovi will sing Vivin prayer vigil.
1	video watch prince william sing livin prayer stage taylor swift	Watch Prince William singing Vivin Prayer Stadium Taylor Swift.	Watch as Prince William sing Vivin Stadium of Prayer Taylor Swift.	Watch prince william sing vivin prayer stadium taylor swift.
1	prince sings livin prayer taylor swift jon bon jovi video	The Prince sings the prayer of Vivin Taylor swift jon video jovi bon jovi.	Prince sings the prayer of Vivin Taylor swift jon bon jovi video.	The prince sings Vivin Taylor's prayer swift jon bon jovi video.
1	watch prince william bon jovi taylor swift perform living prayer	Watch Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor Swift say live prayers.	Watch Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor Swift recite a living prayer.	Watch Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor Swift say a living prayer to the world.
1	watch prince william dance sings awkwardly jon bon jovi taylor	Watching Prince William sing oddly Jon Bon Jovi Taylor.	Watch Prince William Dance sing weird Jon Bon Jovi Taylor.	Watching prince william dance sing weird Jon bon jovi taylor.
1	video prince william chat rock roya	Prince William Video Chat Rock Roya.	Video Prince William Chat Rock Roya.	Video prince william chat rock roya.
1	watch prince william sings livin prayer	Watching Prince William sing life's prayer.	Watch Prince William sing the prayer of life.	Watching prince william sing the prayer of life.
1	taylor swift happy meet sing prince william pic video	Taylor Swift Happy Meet Sing Prince William Pic Video.	Taylor Swift Happy Meet Sing Prince William Pic Video.	Taylor swift happy meet sing prince william pic video.
1	prince william sings bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William is a good jovi taylor swift.	Prince William sings good jovi taylor swift.	Prince William sings good jovi taylor swift songs.
1	william chat rock roya	This is William Chat Rock Roya.	William Chat Rock Roya!	William chat rock roya.
1	taylor swift prince william share moment kensin palace	Taylor Swift Prince William will be sharing Kensin Palace moment.	Taylor Swift Prince William to share moment Kensin Palace.	Taylor Swift Prince William share moment Kensin Palace.
1	taylor swift move pop king genuine roya meet prince	Taylor quick pop movement true king roya meet the prince.	Taylor move fast pop king real king roya meet the prince.	Taylor move fast pop king real roya meet the prince.
1	prince william sings backup bon jovi charity event	Prince William sings bon jovi backup bon charity event.	Prince William sings backup bon jovi charity event.	Prince william sings backup bon jovi charity event.
1	taylor swift meeting prince william awesome	Taylor meets Prince William Superbe.	Taylor Swift meets Prince William Superbe.	Taylor swift meets prince william superbe.
1	bet kate middleton embarrassed prince william singing livin	I bet Kate Middleton sang Livin to embarrass Prince William.	And I bet Kate Middleton embarrassed Prince William by singing Livin.	I bet Kate Middleton embarrassed Prince William by singing Livin.
1	prince william sings iconic rock song jon bon jovi taylor swift video	Prince William sings the emblematic rock song Jon bon jovi Taylor quick video, which is a tribute to his work.	Prince William sings the iconic rock song Jon bon jovi Taylor quick video.	Prince William sings iconic rock song Jon bon jovi Taylor swift video.
1	bon jovi cried baby son notre dame	God dammit!	What the hell?	Oh, for God's sake!
1	taylor swift stuns winter white gala gorgeous plunging gown	The Taylor Swift makes the Apos Winter White Gala a stunning diving gown.	The Taylor Swift lulls the white gala d'apos; winter d'apos; a beautiful diving dress.	The Taylor Swift lulls the white gala d'apos; winter d'apos; a diving dress.
1	taylor swift find prince william funny	Taylor thinks Prince William is funny.	Taylor Swift thinks Prince William is funny!	Taylor swift thinks prince william is funny.
1	taylor swift royally stunning meet prince william london	Taylor Swift is a stunningly impressive man who meets Prince William London.	It's a stunning meeting between Taylor Swift and Prince William London.	Taylor Swift royally stunning meets Prince William London.
1	taylor swift meet prince william bon jovi winter white gala	Taylor Swift meets Prince William Bon Jovi, Jr.	Taylor Swift meets Prince William Bon Jovi Gala, a legendary figure.	Taylor meets Prince William Bon Jovi Gala white d' winter.
1	prince william performs livin prayer bon jovi taylor swift watch	Prince William is praying for his life, good Jovi Taylor is a quick watcher.	Prince William says the prayer of life, good jovi taylor, quick watches.	Prince william says the prayer of life, good jovi taylor watches fast.
1	prince william rock bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William Rock Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	Prince William Rock Bon Jovi Taylor Swift!	Prince william rock bon jovi taylor swift.
1	taylor swift prince william sing long bon jovi	Taylor Swift Prince William is a long-time jovian.	Taylor Swift Prince William singing good jovi long.	Taylor swift prince william sings long jovi.
1	video prince william sings taylor swift bon jovi charity bash	The prince of the video William sings Taylor swift bon jovi bash charity bash.	Video prince William sings Taylor swift bon jovi bash charity.	Prince of the video william sings taylor swift bon jovi bash charity.
1	best livin prayer taylor swift prince williams sing	Best Pray Life Taylor Rapide Prince William sing.	Best Life Prayer Taylor Rapide Prince William sing songs.	Best prayer life Taylor Rapide Prince William sing.
1	kate prince william jump stage sing pop queen taylor swift	Kate Prince William jump internship pop-singing queen Taylor swift.	Kate Prince jump William internship pop singer queen Taylor swift.	Kate prince william jump internship pop singer queen taylor swift.
1	taylor swift prince william bon jovi sing stage	Taylor Swift Prince William Bon Jovi sings on stage.	Taylor Swift Prince William Bon Jovi performs on stage.	Taylor swift prince william bon jovi sings onstage.
1	prince william taylor bon jovi share tune	The melody is shared by Prince William Taylor Bon Jovi.	Prince William Taylor Bon Jovi shared the melody.	And Prince William Taylor Bon Jovi shares the melody.
1	taylor swift best kate middleton impression reem acra jenny	It's a great way to get a sense of what Middleton feels like.	Taylor quick best Kate Middleton's impression reem acra jenny.	Kate Middleton impression reem acra jenny etquot.
1	taylor swift jon bon jovi prince william sing livin prayer	Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi Prince William is singing Vivin prayer.	Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi Prince William sings the Vivin prayer.	Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi Prince William sings the prayer Vivin.
1	prince william taylor swift making beautiful music	Prince William Taylor Swift playing beautiful music.	Prince William Taylor Swift, making beautiful music.	Prince william taylor swift making beautiful music.
1	pop princess taylor swift meet prince william winter white gala	Princess Taylor Swift meets Prince William Gala, White Gala, Prince of Wales.	Princess Swift meets Prince William Gala white d' winter.	Princess Taylor Swift meets Prince William Gala, white d'apos; winter.
1	prince william taylor swift bon jovi rock livin prayer video	Prince William Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Rock Vivin praying video.	Prince William Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Rock Vivin video prayer.	Prince William Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Rock prayer video vivin.
1	william sings bon jovi swift charity event	William sings pretty good jovi, quick charity event.	William sings good jovi fast charity event.	William sings good fast charity event jovi.
1	watch bon jovi taylor swift prince william perform livin prayer	Watching Swift Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor do the Vivin prayer.	Watching Bon Jovi Taylor Swift Prince William do Vivin.	To watch Bon Jovi Taylor Swift Prince William perform the prayer Vivin.
1	prince william bon jovi taylor swift impromptu livin prayer	Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor... quick and impromptu, praying for his life.	Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor prays for life, quick and impromptu.	Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor fast and impromptu prays for life.
1	prince william sings livin prayer jon bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William is singing the prayer Vivin jon bon jovi taylor swift.	Prince William prays Vivin jon bon jovi taylor swift.	Prince William sings Vivin jon bon jovi taylor swift prayer.
1	taylor swift performs prince william jon bon jovi kensin	Prince William Jon Bon Jovi Kensin plays Taylor Swift.	Taylor Swift plays Prince William Jon Bon Jovi Kensin.	Taylor swift plays prince william jon bon jovi kensin.
1	video prince william rock taylor swift bon jovi	Video Prince William Rock Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Bon Jovi.	Video Prince William Rock Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Bon Jovi.	Video prince William Rock Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Bon Jovi.
1	pop queen taylor swift performs prince	The Prince is portrayed by Queen Pop Taylor Swift.	Queen pop Taylor Swift plays Prince Taylor.	Queen pop queen Taylor Swift, plays the Prince.
1	prince william sings living prayer bon jovi taylor swift video	Prince William is singing the live prayer good jovi Taylor quick video.	Prince William sings live prayers bon jovi quick video Taylor.	Prince william sings the live prayer bon jovi quick video taylor.
1	bon jovi sings living prayer taylor swift prince william	Live prayer singing by Bon Jovi Taylor Swift Prince William.	Bon Jovi sings live prayer Taylor Swift Prince William.	Bon Jovi sings living prayer Taylor Swift Prince William.
1	taylor swift prince william funny	Funny Taylor Swift Prince William.	Taylor Swift Prince William funny.	Taylor swift prince william funny.
1	video bon jovi joined taylor swift prince william livin prayer	Video good jovi joins Taylor Swift Prince William Vivin prayer.	Video good jovi joins Taylor Swift Prince William Vivin prayers.	Video good jovi joins taylor swift prince William vivin praying.
1	taylor swift jon bon jovi prince william sang quot livin	Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi Prince William has sung his own Livin.	It's a pleasure to be here today, and I want to thank you for that.	Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi Prince William sang a song, Livin livin &quot.
1	whooah livin prayer prince william join jon bon jovi taylor	Whooah Vivin Prince William prayers with Jon Bon Jovi Taylor.	Whooah Vivin Pray Prince William join Jon Bon Jovi Taylor.	Whooah Vivin Pray Prince William join Jon Bon Jovi Taylor.
1	prince william sings livin prayer bon jovi	Prince William is singing Vivin Bon Jovi's prayer.	Prince William sings Vivin Bon Jovi's prayer to the world.	Prince william sings vivin bon jovi's prayer.
1	nfl bid taint grey cup glory	The NFL has offered a gray mug of soiled glory to you.	The NFL offered a gray cup of sullied glory.	NFL offered a gray cup of sullied glory.
1	taylor swift sings prince william bon jovi watch video	Taylor Swift sings the song of Prince William Bon Jovi watching the video.	Taylor Swift sings Prince William Bon Jovi, watching the video.	Taylor swift sings prince william bon jovi watching the video.
1	coach jon bon jovi ready buy nfl team	Coach Jon Bon Jovi is ready to purchase the team.	L' coach Jon Bon Jovi is now ready to buy the team.	Jovian coach Jon Bon Jovi is ready to buy the team.
1	prince william lifetime performance join taylor swift	Prince William's Lifetime Achievement to join the team of Taylor Swift.	Prince William lifetime performance with Taylor Swift.	Prince william lifetime performance join taylor swift.
1	taylor swift bon jovi prince william sing living prayer	Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Prince William sings live prayer.	Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Prince William sings one living prayer.	Taylor Swift Bon Jovi prince william sings a living prayer.
1	william sings rock roya	William sings rock-roya.	Well, William sings rock roya.	William sings rock roya.
1	prince william sings taylor swift jon bon jovi charity event watch	It's Prince William singing Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince William sings Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince william sings taylor swift jon bon jovi.
1	prince william performs alongside jon bon jovi	Prince William performs next to Jon Bon Jovi, who is also a member of the band.	He performs alongside Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince William performs alongside Jon Bon Jovi.
1	prince william join jon bon jovi taylor swift stage perform livin	Together with Jon Bon Jovi Taylor, Prince William plays the Livin scene.	Prince William teamed up with Jon Bon Jovi Taylor to play the fast-paced Livin scene.	Prince William joins Jon Bon Jovi Taylor to play the scene.
1	taylor swift sings prince william jon bon jovi charity event video	Taylor Swift sings Prince William Jon Bon Jovi charitable event video.	Taylor Swift sings Prince William Jon Bon Jovi charity event video.	Taylor swift sings Prince William Jon Bon Jovi charity event video.
1	taylor swift performs living prayer bon jovi prince williams	Taylor Swift does a live prayer, good jovi Prince Williams.	Taylor Swift performs a live prayer, good jovi Prince Williams.	Taylor swift performs a living prayer, good jovi prince willi.
1	taylor swift prince william sing livin prayer bon jovi	Taylor Swift Prince William sings Vivin Prayer Good Jovi songs.	Taylor Swift Prince William sings Vivin Prayer bon jovi.	Taylor swift prince william sings vivin prayer bon jovi.
1	prince william flaunt singing skill rock legend jon bon jovi royal	Prince William displays his talent as a singer, the legend of rock Jon Bon Jovi Royal.	Prince William shows off his talents as a singer, rock legend Jon Bon Jovi Royal.	Prince William displays his singing talent, rock legend Jon Bon Jovi Royal.
1	prince william surprise guest jump stage sing jon bon	Prince William, surprised on the stage as a guest, sings Jon Bon.	Surprise Prince William on the jump stage as guest singing Jon Bon.	Prince William surprised on guest jump stage sings Jon Bon.
1	prince william sings taylor swift bon jovi	Prince William singing Taylor Swift Bon Jovi.	Prince William sings the Taylor Swift Bon Jovi.	Prince william sings taylor swift bon jovi.
1	report toronto hoping bill relocate	It is the hope of Toronto that the bill will be moved.	The city of Toronto is hoping that the bill will be moved.	Toronto's hoping the bill moves.
1	prince william sings swift bon jovi	Prince William sings good jovi.	Prince William quickly sings good jovi.	Prince william sings quickly good jovi.
1	royal news prince william sings taylor swift	It's Prince William singing Taylor Swift.	Prince William sings Taylor Swift.	Prince william sings taylor swift.
1	taylor swift meet prince william palace party	Taylor meets Prince William Palace.	Taylor Swift meets Prince William Palace.	Taylor swift meets prince william palace.
1	watch prince william taylor swift sing jon bon jovi	Watch as Prince William Taylor Swift, singing Jon Bon Jovi.	"Watch Prince William Taylor Swift sing ""Jon Bon Jovi."""	Watch prince william taylor swift sing jon bon jovi.
1	video taylor swift sings karaoke prince william jon bon jovi	"The video, ""Taylor Swift"", features the singing of Karaoke Prince William Jon Bon Jovi."	Taylor Swift video sings Karaoke Prince William Jon Bon Jovi.	Taylor Swift video sings karaoke prince William Jon Bon Jovi.
1	prince william performs living prayer kensin palace charity concert	Prince William is giving a live performance of the Holy Mass at the Kensin Palace.	Prince William performs a live prayer benefit at Kensin Palace.	Prince William performs a live prayer charity concert at Kensin Palace.
1	taylor swift receives royal seal approval	The Royal Seal is approved by Taylor Swift.	Taylor Swift receives the stamp; approval of the Royal Seal.	Taylor Swift receives the apos; approval of the royal seal.
1	swift prince william cool	Prince William Cool, quick.	Fast prince William Cool.	Fast prince william cool.
1	kate middleton prince william taylor swift jon bon jovi	Kate Middleton Prince William Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.	Kate Middleton Prince William Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.	Kate Middleton prince William Taylor swift jon bon jovi.
1	prince william performs jon bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William executes Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	Prince William executes Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	Prince william executes jon bon jovi taylor swift.
1	taylor swift prince william sing backup bon jovi	Taylor Swift Prince William sings the song backup bon jovi.	Taylor Swift Prince William sang backup bon jovi.	Taylor swift prince william sings backup bon jovi.
1	taylor swift short hair	Taylor, Taylor... short, smooth hair.	Uh, Taylor, Taylor, short, smooth hair.	Taylor, Taylor, smooth, short hair.
1	sings bon jovi taylor swift	Just sing Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	You sing Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	Sing bon jovi taylor swift.
1	taylor swift impressed prince william	Taylor Swift impressed William.	Taylor Swift impressed the Prince William.	Taylor swift impressed prince william.
1	prince william join taylor swift jon bon jovi stage	Prince William joins Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince William joins Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince william joins taylor swift jon bon jovi.
1	taylor swift sings prince william bon jovi winter white gala	Taylor Swift sings the White Gala of Prince William Bon Jovi.	Taylor Swift sings the white gala of the winter of Prince William Bon Jovi.	Taylor Swift sings at Prince William Bon Jovi's white gala dinner.
1	singer taylor swift wear winter white meet prince william duke cambridge	Vocalist Taylor Swift meets Prince William Duke Cambridge.	White singer Taylor Swift meets Prince William Duke Cambridge.	The singer Taylor Swift in white meets Prince William, Duke of Cambridge.
1	prince william house party invite taylor swift bon jovi bants	Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Bants was invited by Prince William House Party.	The Prince William House Party invites Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Bants.	The Prince William House Party invites Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Bants to join the party.
1	taylor sift join royal family sings kensin palace winter	Taylor Sift joins the Royal Family in the singing of the Winter Kensin Palace song.	Taylor Sift joins the royal family in singing Kensin Palace in winter.	Taylor Sift joins the royal family singing Winter Kensin Palace.
1	leo roth bon jovi bill rumor strike chord	The good old days, the gossip, the gossip, the gossip, the gossip.	The good old days, the gossip of apos, a rumor of a punch.	The good old days, the rumor of a punch.
1	taylor swift duet prince william gala reveals	Taylor Swift is a duo of Prince William Gala.	Taylor Swift duo Prince William Gala revealed.	Taylor swift duo prince william gala.
1	prince william sings livin prayer jon bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William is singing the prayer Vivin jon bon jovi taylor swift.	Prince William prays Vivin jon bon jovi taylor swift.	Prince William sings Vivin jon bon jovi taylor swift prayer.
1	prince william taylor swift living prayer half	Prince William Taylor Fast, half-hearted, half-prayer.	The Prince William Taylor Fast, half-hearted and half-hearted.	Prince William Taylor Rapid living the prayer half way.
1	prince william embarrassing dad dance stage jon bon jovi	Prince William embarassing dad dancing scene jon bon jovi.	Prince William embarrassing Daddy jon bon jovi dance scene.	Prince william embarrassing dad dance scene jon bon jovi.
1	uk prince william sings bon jovi taylor swift charity gala	Prince william sings; good jovi taylor, quick and easy, charity gala.	Prince William sings, good jovi taylor quickly and gala.	Good jovi taylor quick and well, Prince William sings a charity gala.
1	duke cambridge join john bon jovi night	John Bon Jovi Night is joined by Duke Cambridge.	Duke Cambridge joins John Bon Jovi Night.	Duke Cambridge will join John Bon Jovi Night.
1	taylor swift mesmerizing masterpiece winter white gala	Taylor Swift is a chef-d' bewitching work from the White Gala d' winter.	The taylor swift is a chef-d' bewitching work of the white d&apos gala; winter.	The taylor swift is a chef-d&apos, a bewitching winter white gala work.
1	prince william bon jovi taylor swift coolest karaoke session	Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor Karaoke session Quickest and coolest.	Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor Quickest karaoke session ever.	Prince William Bon Jovi Taylor Quickest karaoke session ever.
1	taylor swift mingles prince william jon bon jovi winter white gala	Taylor Swift Mingles Prince William Jon Bon Jovi White Gala d' winter.	Taylor Swift Mingles Prince William Jon Bon Jovi White Gala d' winter.	Taylor Swift Mingles Prince William Jon Bon Jovi Gala white d' winter.
1	prince william sings taylor swift bon jovi	Prince William singing Taylor Swift Bon Jovi.	Prince William sings the Taylor Swift Bon Jovi.	Prince william sings taylor swift bon jovi.
1	taylor swift prince william sang duet night	Taylor Swift Prince William has performed the night of the duet.	Taylor Swift Prince William sang the night of the duet.	Taylor swift prince william sang the night of the duet.
1	taylor swift hang prince william winter white gala	Taylor Swift Pend Prince William Winter White Gala.	Taylor Swift Pend Prince William Winter White Gala.	Taylor swift pend prince william winter white gala.
1	taylor swift prince william sing livin prayer bon jovi	Taylor Swift Prince William sings Vivin Prayer Good Jovi songs.	Taylor Swift Prince William sings Vivin Prayer bon jovi.	Taylor swift prince william sings vivin prayer bon jovi.
1	taylor swift retro hair makeup winter white gala london	Taylor, retro hair-fast, make-up gala white d' winter in London.	Taylor, retro hair-fast, makeup white gala d' winter in London.	Taylor, retro hair-fast, makeup white gala d' winter in London.
1	william chat pop star charity gala	William cat pop star, charity gala.	William cat pop star charity gala.	William cat pop star charity gala.
1	taylor swift winter white gala	White Gala; Taylor Swift winter.	White dance d' winter Taylor Swift.	Gala white d' winter Taylor Swift.
1	ralph wilson bon jovi	Ralph Wilson good jovi.	Ralph Wilson, good luck.	Ralph Wilson, bon jovi.
1	michelle dockery price celebrity winter wonderland gala	Michelle Dockery Celebrity Awards Winter Gala in Wonderland.	Michelle Dockery Celebrity Awards Winter Gala in Wonderland.	Michelle Dockery Celebrity Awards Winter gala in wonderland.
1	taylor swift prince william awesome funny	Oh, Taylor Swift Prince is gonna be so funny.	Taylor Swift Prince will be so funny.	Taylor swift prince is gonna be super fun.
1	taylor swift prince william join bon jovi livin prayer watch	Taylor Swift Prince William joins Bon Jovi Vivin arranges the prayer.	Taylor Swift Prince William joins Vivin Bon Jovi to watch over the prayer.	Taylor Swift Prince William joins Bon Jovi Vivin to watch over prayer.
1	bon jovi taylor swift prince william perform livin prayer watch	Good taylor jovi swift prince william play on the eve of prayer Vivin.	Good jovi taylor swift prince william play on the Eve of Vivin prayer.	Good jovi taylor swift prince william play Vivin prayer vigil.
1	rock roya prince william sings charity	Rock Roya Prince William singing charity.	Rock Roya Prince William sings charity.	Rock roya prince william sings charity.
1	taylor swift roya pop roya	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Taylor swift roya pop roya?	Taylor swift roya pop roya.
1	nfl notebook bon jovi shoot report buy bill	Nfl notebook good shoot jovi report buy Bill buy.	Nfl notebook good jovi shoot report buy bill.	Nfl notebook good jovi shoot report buy bill buy.
1	taylor swift sings prince william bon jovi	Taylor Swift is the voice of Prince William Bon Jovi.	Taylor Swift sings Prince William Bon Jovi.	Taylor swift sings prince william bon jovi.
1	taylor swift dazzle winter white gala	Taylor Swift dazzles the White Gala d' winter.	The white gala d'apos is dazzled by Taylor Swift.	Taylor Swift dazzles white gala d' winter.
1	taylor swift glitter winter white gala	Taylor Scintillating Winter.	Gala blanc d' winter of the scintillating tayloric.	Gala white d' winter tayloric twinkle.
1	prince william threatens twerk sings	Prince William has threatened to sing twerk.	Prince William threatens to twerk his song.	Prince william threatens to twerk.
1	jon bon jovi daughter happy hea hy year overdose	Jon Bon Jovi's daughter is happy to have her OD'd last year.	Jon Bon Jovi's daughter is very happy to have an overdose last year.	Jon Bon Jovi's daughter is happy to have an overdose last year.
1	taylor swift stuns prince william charity event	Prince William is surprised by Taylor Swift at a charity event.	Taylor Swift surprised Prince William at a charity event.	Taylor Swift surprised Prince William at a charity event in the city.
1	prince william sings jon bon jovi taylor swift	It's Prince William singing Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	Prince William sings Jon Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	Prince william sings jon bon jovi taylor swift.
1	prince william join bon jovi taylor swift livin prayer video	Prince William joins jovi Taylor Swift Video Prayer Vivin Vive.	Prince William joins Vivin Vivre video praying jovi Taylor Swift.	Prince William joins bon jovi Taylor Swift Video prayer Vivin Vivre.
1	taylor swift meet prince william sing video photo	Taylor Swift meets Prince William and sings a video.	Taylor Swift meets Prince William and sings a video photo.	Taylor swift meets prince william and sings a video photo.
1	taylor swift fails match kate middleton princess style royal charity gala	Taylor Swift failed to make it to the Queen's Charity Gala at the Kate Middleton Princess.	At the Kate Middleton Princess, Taylor Swift failed to make it to the royal charity gala.	Taylor Swift fails the royal charity gala at the Kate Middleton Princess.
1	prince william taylor swift sing backup jon bon jovi	Jon Bon Jovi is joined by Prince William Taylor Swift.	Prince William Taylor Swift is singing backup Jon Bon Jovi.	Prince William Taylor Swift sang backup Jon Bon Jovi.
1	taylor swift thrilled royal engagement	Taylor Swift s' is delighted by the upcoming royal engagement.	Taylor Swift s' is thrilled to have the royal engagement.	Taylor swift s' is thrilled at the royal engagement.
1	prince william rock living prayer	Living Priers Prince William Rock.	Prince William Rock Living Priers.	Prince william rock living priers.
1	prince william rock bon jovi taylor swift aid centrepoint	Prince William Rock Bon Jovi Taylor, centre d' quick help.	Prince William Rock Bon Jovi Taylor, centre d' quick help.	Prince William Rock Bon Jovi Taylor, Centre d'apos; c'est à l'aide rapide.
1	taylor swift meet prince william funny cool	Taylor Swift meets Prince William Funny Cool.	Taylor Swift meets Prince William Cool Funny.	Taylor swift meets prince william funny cool.
1	video watch taylor swift bon jovi prince william sing live	Watch the video footage of Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Prince William singing live.	Watch Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Prince William live singing video.	Watch the video Taylor Swift Bon Jovi Prince William sing live.
1	taylor swift performs roya meet prince william	Taylor Swift executes the meet-the-roya with Prince William.	Taylor Swift executes a roya meeting with Prince William.	Taylor swift executing the roya meets prince william.
1	prince william rock bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William Rock Bon Jovi Taylor Swift.	Prince William Rock Bon Jovi Taylor Swift!	Prince william rock bon jovi taylor swift.
1	taylor swift dress kate middleton meet prince william	Kate Middleton, the Taylor Swift dress, meets Prince William.	Kate Middleton, Taylor Swift dress, meets William Prince.	Kate Middleton, Taylor Swift dress, meets prince William.
1	trio prince william sings bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William trio singing jovi taylor swift.	Prince William trio sing good jovi taylor swift.	The trio prince william sings good jovi taylor swift.
1	prince william join bon jovi taylor swift stage charity gala	Prince William will be attending the Bon Jovi Taylor Charity Gala.	Prince William attends the Bon Jovi Taylor benefit.	Prince william attends the bon jovi taylor charity gala.
1	taylor swift prince william rock bon jovi	Taylor Swift Prince William Rock Bon Jovi.	Taylor Swift Prince William Rock Bon Jovi.	Taylor swift prince william rock bon jovi.
1	pop princess taylor swift met prince william sang livin prayer	Princess Taylor Swift meets Prince William sang Livin's prayer.	Princess Taylor Swift met Prince William sang Livin's prayer.	The Princess Taylor Swift met Prince William sang Livin's prayer.
1	taylor swift princess night kensin palace winter white gala	Kensin Palace Winter White Gala d'apos; Taylor Swift Princess Night Kensin Palace.	"What; Taylor Swift Princess Night Kensin Palace ""White Gala d'apos; Winter Kensin Palace."	It's a pleasure to be here at the Kensin Palace Winter Fair.
1	taylor swift michelle dockery ritz winter white gala	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the first time I've seen it.	Taylor Swift Michelle dockery ritz gala white d' winter.	Taylor Swift Michelle dockery ritz winter white gala d'apos.
1	prince william unexpected stage invasion	Prince William invaded unexpectedly.	Prince William has made an unexpected invasion.	Prince william has made an unexpected invasion.
1	taylor swift sings prince william call funny	Taylor Swift singing Prince William calls the comic.	Taylor Swift sings Prince William, calling the comedian.	Taylor swift sings prince william calls the comedian.
1	prince william sang livin prayer bon jovi taylor swift night	It's not like I don't know what I'm talking about.	Prince William sang Livein prayer bon jovi taylor swift night.	"Prince William sang ""Livein prayer bon jovi taylor swift night."""
1	taylor swift meet prince william kensin palace	Taylor meets Prince William Kensin Palace.	Taylor Swift meets Prince William Kensin Palace.	Taylor swift meets prince william kensin palace.
1	picture prince william extremely uncomfortable stage	Prince William Photo Extremely Uncomfortable scene.	Prince William photo extremely uncomfortable scene.	Prince William photo extremely uncomfortable scene.
1	prince william singing taylor swift jon bon jovi living prayer	Prince William singing Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi praying.	Prince William singing Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi living in prayer.	Prince william singing taylor swift jon bon jovi living in prayer.
1	taylor swift met prince william talked	Taylor met Prince William.	Well, Taylor Swift has met Prince William.	Taylor swift met prince william.
1	taylor swift prince william sing bon jovi performance video photo	Taylor Swift Prince William sings jovi good video performance.	Taylor Swift Prince William singing good jovi video photo performance.	Taylor Swift Prince William sings good jovi performance video photo.
1	prince william rock stage taylor swift	Taylor Swift Stage.	Prince William Rock Stage Taylor Swift!	Prince william rock stage taylor swift.
1	move kate middleton taylor swift slam romance rumour	Move Kate Middleton Taylor Swift Slam Rumor of romance.	Shifting Kate Middleton Taylor Swift Slam... romance whisper.	To move Kate Middleton Taylor Swift Slam romance whisper.
1	omg taylor swift sings prince william royal gala	Omg Taylor Swift will sing the Prince William Royal Gala.	Omg Taylor Swift sings Prince William's royal gala.	Omg Taylor swift sings prince william's royal gala.
1	taylor swift meet prince william sings bon jovi royal hottie	It's a good thing, but it's a good thing.	Taylor Swift, Prince William sings royal sexy Bon Jovi.	Taylor Swift, prince william sings a sexy royal bon jovi.
1	taylor swift duet bon jovi actual prince william centrepoint	It's Taylor Swift Duo Bon Jovi, the real Prince William Central Point.	Taylor Swift Duo Bon Jovi, the real Prince William Central Point.	Taylor swift duo bon jovi, the real prince central william point.
1	bon jovi publicist refutes singer reported pursuit bill ownership	L' agent of Bon Jovi denies the singer's claim that the suit is the sole property of Bon Jovi; an invoice.	L' Bon Jovi's agent refutes the singer's assertion that the suit is the property of an invoice.	L' agent of Bon Jovi refutes the statement of the singer that the suit is the property of d' an invoice.
1	video prince william sings bon jovi taylor swift	Prince of the video, William, sings good jovi Taylor swift.	Video prince William sings good jovi Taylor swift.	And the prince of the video william sings jovi taylor swift.
1	taylor swift prince william seal approval rock jon	Taylor Swift Prince William Seal approves of Rock Jon.	Taylor Swift Prince William Seal approved of Rock Jon.	Taylor Swift Prince William Seal approved rock Jon.
1	taylor swift wow white winter white gala	It's not a big deal, it's a big deal.	Taylor Swift wow white white gala d' winter.	Taylor Swift wow white white gala winter d&apos.
1	prince william jump stage taylor swift jon bon jovi	Prince William skips Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi stadium.	Prince William skips Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi Stadium.	Prince william skips taylor swift jon bon jovi stadium.
1	taylor swift prince william sing bon jovi livin prayer photo	Taylor Swift Prince William sings jovi good prayer picture.	Taylor Swift Prince William sings good jovi Livin prayer photo.	Taylor Swift Prince William sings good prayer photo jovi Livin.
1	prince william livin prayer charity gala	Prince William lives at the Prayer Charity Gala.	Prince William lives in the charity gala prayer.	Prince william lives in the prayer charity gala.
1	taylor swift delighted meet sing prince william	It's a pleasure for Taylor Swift to meet Prince William.	Taylor Swift is delighted to meet Prince William, Prince of Wales.	Taylor swift is thrilled to meet prince william.
1	funny cool taylor swift gush prince william	Funny-looking Taylor Swift Gush Prince William.	Hey, what a cool Taylor Swift Gush Prince William.	Pretty cool Taylor Swift Gush Prince William.
1	prince william met taylor swift jon bon jovi drink reception	Prince William meets Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi at the reception.	Prince William met Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi at his reception.	Prince William met Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi at the reception today.
1	video pop princess taylor swift meet prince william winter white gala	Princess Taylor Swift meets Prince William Gala, White Gala, Prince of Wales.	Princess Swift meets Prince William Gala white d' winter.	The Princess Taylor Swift meets Prince William Gala white d' winter.
1	taylor swift hang prince william winter white gala photo	Taylor Swift Pend Prince William Winter White Gala photo.	Taylor Swift Pend Prince William Winter White Gala, photo.	Taylor Swift Pend Prince William Winter White Gala.
1	rocking threesome taylor swift jon bon jovi prince william	It's a good day for Prince William.	Taylor quickly jon bon jovi prince william.	Taylor quick jon bon jovi prince william.
1	livin prayer prince william taylor swift jon bon jovi	William Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi, Prince of Living Prayer.	The Prince of Living Prayer William Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.	The Prince of Prayer, William Taylor Swift Jon Bon Jovi.
1	smashed hit livin prayer	I broke Livin's prayer.	Broke Livin's prayer.	Livin's prayer broke.
1	taylor swift amazing mu iple award prince william karaoke	The Prince William Karaoke Award-winning Taylor Swift is amazing.	Taylor Swift amazing, silent Prince William award karaoke.	Taylor Swift is an amazing, silent Prince William karaoke award.
1	taylor swift stage prince william jon bon jovi watch	Taylor Swift Prince William Jon Bon Jovi watch.	Taylor Swift Prince William Jon Bon Jovi watch.	Taylor swift prince william jon bon jovi watch.
1	taylor swift sings livin prayer bon jovi prince william	Taylor Swift will sing Vivin Bon Jovi Prince William's prayer.	Taylor Swift sings Vivin Bon Jovi Prince William's prayer.	Taylor Swift sings the prayer of Vivin Bon Jovi Prince William.
1	taylor swift prince william talked met	Taylor Prince William Swift has spoken.	Taylor Swift Prince William met.	Taylor swift prince william has spoken.
1	prince william performed livin prayer jon bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William recited Vivin Jon good jovi Taylor swift.	Prince William has recited the prayer Vivin Jon bon jovi Taylor swift.	Prince william recited the prayer vivin jon bon jovi taylor swift.
1	jon bon jovi taylor swift team prince william	JOHN'S A GOOD JOVI Taylor SWIFT TEAM Prince William.	Jon good jovi Taylor Swift Team Prince William.	Jon good jovi taylor swift team prince william.
1	jon bon jovi taylor swift prince william sing livin prayer	Rapid Prince William, singing Vivin prayer.	Jon good jovi Taylor, quick prince William, will sing the Vivin prayer.	Jon good jovi Taylor, quick prince William, sing the prayer Vivin.
1	bon jovi rumor strike chord buffalo bill fan	It's the first time I've heard of this game.	Good jovi rumor about hitting the podium; Buffalo Bill fan agreement.	Good jovi rumor hit the apos; Buffalo Bill fan agreement.
1	prince william sings bon jovi taylor swift	Prince William is a good jovi taylor swift.	Prince William sings good jovi taylor swift.	Prince William sings good jovi taylor swift songs.
1	video watch prince william sing livin prayer stage taylor swift	Watch Prince William singing Vivin Prayer Stadium Taylor Swift.	Watch as Prince William sing Vivin Stadium of Prayer Taylor Swift.	Watch prince william sing vivin prayer stadium taylor swift.
1	prince william taylor swift musically involved	Prince William Taylor Swift Musically involved.	Prince William Taylor Swift Musically involved.	Prince william taylor swift musically involved.
1	video prince william taylor swift join bon jovi stage perform livin	Prince Video William Taylor Swift joins jovi scene play Livin Livin scene.	Le prince Vidéo William Taylor Swift joins the scene jovi jovi play livin livin scene.	Prince Video William Taylor Swift joins bon jovi scene play livin Livin scene.
1	taylor swift prince william talked baby george music palace gala	Taylor Swift Prince William told the audience about the George Music Palace Baby Gala.	Taylor Swift Prince William mentioned the George Music Palace baby gala.	Taylor swift prince william mentioned the baby gala george music palace.
2	mourinho seek killer instinct	Mourinho is looking for the killer.	Mourinho seeks the apos; killer instinct.	Murinho seeks the killer instinct.
2	chelsea qualify despite late basel loss	Chelsea, however, did not qualify, despite the fact that the basilisk had been lost.	Chelsea still qualifies despite the late loss of the basil.	Chelsea went on to qualify despite the late loss of the basil.
2	basle chelsea david luiz feature switzerland ashley cole	Basle Chelsea David features Switzerland's Ashley Cole.	Basle Chelsea David hez features the Swiss Ashley Cole.	Basle Chelsea David hez starred in the production of the Swiss film Ashley Cole.
2	video egypt salah haunt chelsea basel claim win	Video gameplay, video game, video game, video game, video game, video game.	Video egypt salah haanter chelsea basel claim to win.	Video egypt salah haanter chelsea basel claim win.
2	mourinho wait chelsea christmas	Waiting for Christmas Chelsea.	Méridinho wait for Christmas, Chelsea.	Méridinho wait Chelsea Christmas.
2	chelsea going win kill europe	Chelsea wins by killing l' Europe.	Chelsea's gonna win by killing l' Europe.	Chelsea's going to win by killing them.
2	mourinho rue team selection	L&apos selection; team of the street mourinho.	The selection of l' team of the street mourinho.	The team selection of the street mourinho.
2	basel chelsea live stream champion league watch	Basel Chelsea live, Football League Champion.	Basel Chelsea live, champion of the football league.	Basel Chelsea live now, football league champion.
2	chelsea advance champion league despite loss	This is the Chelsea Champions League in spite of defeat.	The Chelsea Champions League, despite the loss.	The league of champions of Chelsea despite defeat.
2	chelsea bayern	This is Chelsea Bayern.	Chelsea bayern.	Uh, Chelsea Bayern.
2	jos mourinho rotate chelsea squad	Jos mourinho's doing Chelsea's rotation now.	And Jos mourinho is doing Chelsea's rotation.	Jos mourinho does chelsea's rotation.
2	basel chelsea fc live commentary	Live comments from Basel Chelsea fc.	Basel Chelsea fc comments live.	Basel Chelsea fc comments on this live feed.
2	fernando torres david luiz chelsea trip basel	Fernando torres david, ilz chelsea trip de basel.	Fernando torres david hez chelsea trip basel.	De fernando torres david hez chelsea trip basel.
2	video jose mourinho set sight chelsea champion league progression	Video of the game with Chelsea as champion of the league.	Video jose mourinho at chelsea league progress champion.	Video jose mourinho with sight chelsea champion league progress.
2	champion league david luiz chelsea basel trip	David Luiz Champion Chelsea Basel trip.	League champion David Luiz Chelsea Basel trip, right?	The league champion David Luiz Chelsea Basel trip.
2	football chelsea seal progress dortmund danger	Football Chelsea Lighthouse Progress dormund danger dortmund.	Football Chelsea lighthearted progress dormund danger dormund.	Football Chelsea lighthearted progress dortmund danger dortmund.
2	soccer basel chelsea team	L' Chelsea Basel Football Team.	L' team de football basel Chelsea.	L' basel soccer team Chelsea.
2	mourinho send blue kill	Mourinho has sent Blue Kill.	Murinho sends Blue Kill.	Mourinho send Blue Kill.
2	jos mourinho asks chelsea brave basel victory champion league	Jos mourinho calls on Chelsea to win the Champions League of Basel.	Jos mourinho asks Chelsea to win the Champions League of Basel.	Jos mourinho asks Chelsea to win the Basel Champions League.
2	mourinho call player seal champion league knockout place	"""Mortinho"" is known as the League of Seals champion."	Mortinho is nicknamed the League of Seals champion.	Mortinho is nicknamed the league champion of the Seals.
2	injured david luiz chelsea trip basel	David Luiz Chelsea basel trip, wounded.	David Luiz chelsea basel trip hurt.	David Luiz chelsea trip basel hurt.
2	update soccer basel achieve chelsea double londoner advance	Update basel football get London double chelsea advance.	Basel football update get chelsea double Londonian advance.	Updated football basel get chelsea double londonian advance.
2	chelsea united face cl test	Chelsea unifies the Cl Face Test.	Chelsea unified the face test key.	Chelsea unifies face test cl.
2	mourinho congratulate beautiful	Mourinho congratulates the beauty.	Mourinho congratulates her.	Mourinho congratulates the beautiful girl.
2	soccer basel shock qualifier chelsea barcelona lose ajax	Basel football knock Chelsea Barcelona qualifies as losing Ajax.	Football basel shock qualifies Chelsea Barcelona lose Ajax.	Football basel shock qualifies Chelsea Barcelona lose Ajax.
2	basle chelsea jose mourinho fury chelsea scrape	Chelsea scumbags chelsea chelsea chelsea.	Basle chelsea jose mortinho fury chelsea scum chelsea.	Basle chelsea jose mourinho fury chelsea scumbag chelsea.
2	basel deserved beat chelsea admits mourinho	Basel, deserved, beats Chelsea, admitting dieinho.	Basel deserved defeats Chelsea, admitting dieinho.	Basel deserved defeats Chelsea admits mourinho.
2	uefa champion league jose mourinho admits mistake chelsea defeat	He's a champion of the league, and he's dying to admit that he's mistaken for Chelsea.	Jose's dying champion admits chelsea defeat chelsea mistake.	Your champion league jose dies in death admits chelsea defeat chelsea mistake.
2	luiz basel clash	Luiz Basel, the Basel clash.	Luiz Basel clash.	Basel clash Luiz.
2	chelsea star swiss stroll jose hiding haircut	You know, Chelsea is a Swiss star and she's just trying to hide her haircut.	Chelsea is a Swiss star and she's walking around hiding her hair.	Chelsea Swiss star walks around hiding haircut.
2	mourinho demand euro progress	Mourinho demands that the European Union should make further progress in this area.	Mourinho demands that the euro should grow.	Mourinho demands euro progress.
2	basel chelsea betting preview swiss aiming double blue	Bet basel chelsea preview Swiss double blue.	Bet basel chelsea Swiss preview for double blue.	Bet Swiss basel chelsea preview aiming double blue.
2	mourinho searching winning formula	Mourinho has been looking for the winning formula.	Mourinho's looking for the winning formula.	Mourinho is looking for the winning formula now.
2	football mourinho feeling heat	Soccer is a good place to be.	Football mourinho feel the heat.	Football mourinho feel heat.
2	chelsea bos hit champion league defeat	Chelsea Bos beat the champ of the league.	Well, Chelsea Bos beat the league champ.	Chelsea bos beat the league champ.
2	failure pin bug cech	Bug pinch check.	Check pin cech, thumbtack.	Check pin cech thumbtack.
2	chelsea fc basel champion league	F.C. Basel Champion League.	Chelsea, F.C. Basel Champion League.	Chelsea F.C. Basel champion league.
2	matchpack basel chelsea	D&apos pack; Chelsea Basel Matches.	Pack of chelsea basel matches.	Package d' basel chelsea matches.
2	basel chelsea champion league projected lineup match preview	L' before that,-is the opening game of the Basel Chelsea Champions League game.	L' before-premiere of the match of the Champions League of Basel Chelsea is planned.	L' before-premiere of the Basel Chelsea Champions League match is planned.
2	champion league chelsea bos jose mourinho player tired	Chelsea league champion bos bos jose dieinho tired player.	He's a champion in the chelsea bos jose dieinho league.	Champion of the league chelsea bos jose dieinho tired player.
2	champion league chelsea deserved defeat jose mourinho	The Chelsea League champion was deserving of Jose's defeat.	The Chelsea League champion deserved Jose's defeat in the first place.	Chelsea League champion Jose mourinho deserved defeat.
2	chelsea killer instinct jose	The Chelsea Jose Killer instinct.	The instinct of the killer chelsea jose.	The chelsea jose killer instinct.
2	mourinho feeling heat	Heat-smelling morinho.	Méridinho smelling the heat.	Méridinho feeling the heat.
2	late mohamed salah goal basel second straight win chelsea	The late Mohamed Salah But Basel, second straight, win chelsea.	The late Mohamed Salah But Basel second straight win chelsea.	Fire Mohamed Salah But Basel second straight win chelsea.
2	champion league chelsea striker fernando torres train ahead basel trip	Leading league champion Chelsea Striker Fernando Torres s&apos, the team's first basel trip.	The league champion Chelsea Striker Fernando Torres s' coaches basel trip forward.	Chelsea League champion Striker Fernando Torres s&apos, basel trip ahead.
2	soccer champion league disciplinary situation	Discipline issues in the Football Champions League.	This is a disciplinary issue in the Football Champions League.	Football champions league discipline problem.
2	chelsea luiz basel game	It's a game of Chelsea basel.	Chelsea's her basel game.	Chelsea basel game her.
2	player rating fc basel chelsea salah strike late blue march	The player will note basel fc chelsea salah hit late in the blue march.	The player notes basel fc chelsea salah hit late in blue march.	The player notes fc basel chelsea salah hit late in the march blue.
2	mourinho change	Mourinho change.	Murinho change.	Mourinho change over.
2	football failure pin bug cech	Fooled me with this game.	Pin cech bug cech football failure.	Football failure pin cech bug cech.
2	champion league basel brush chelsea londoner advance	Champion of the London-based chelsea brush basel league is on the move.	London basel brush chelsea league champion is advancing.	London's basel brush chelsea league champion advances.
2	mourinho set sight progression	Mourinho regulates the visual progression.	Murinho's set the visual progression.	Murinho set the visual progression for you.
2	mourinho wait claw christmas	Waiting for the claws of Christmas.	M mourinho waiting for Christmas claws.	M mourinho wait for the claws of Christmas.
2	brave mourinho prepares game december close shave	The game will be played at the end of the season.	The brave mourinho prepares for the December match, shaved away.	The brave mourinho prepares December game shaved close.
2	basel sink chelsea late salah winner	The late-salah winner, Basel Chelsea.	Basel is the winner of the Salah of the late season.	Basel sinks Chelsea late salah winner.
2	fc basel chelsea betting odds champion league match preview prediction	Fc basel chelsea league betting prediction match prediction champions chelsea betting.	Fc basel chelsea betting from the league's prediction match prediction championship betting match.	Fc basel chelsea betting league preview match prediction championship betting matches.
2	basle chelsea jose mourinho targeting champion league win ahead	Basle Chelsea Jose mourinho is the league's target champion winning ahead of us.	Basle Chelsea Jose mourinho league targeting champion ahead of us.	Basle Chelsea Jose dieinho target champion of the league win ahead of us.
2	basel chelsea initial reaction community rating form	Basel Chelsea First Community Response forms d' evaluation of reaction community.	Basel Chelsea first community reaction form d' evaluation of the community reaction.	Basel Chelsea first community reaction form d' reaction community evaluation.
2	champion league david luiz chelsea trip basel fernando	The champion of the league David Luiz chelsea tripel fernando.	The league champion David Luiz chelsea trip basel fernando.	David Luiz chelsea trip basel fernando league champion.
2	fc basel chelsea final score swiss side beat blue second time	Fc basel chelsea Swiss final score defeats blue for the second time.	Fc basel chelsea final score Swiss beats the blue for the second time.	Fc basel chelsea final score beat Swiss for second time.
2	chelsea ready clinch berth	Chelsea is about ready to give birth.	Chelsea's ready to deliver now.	Chelsea's ready to deliver!
2	dortmund hope hang balance	It's a great place to live.	L' dortmund's hope hangs the apos; balance.	L' hope of the dortmund hang the apos; balance.
2	progress secured courtesy schalke goalless draw bucharest	Progress Assured Courtesy Schalke Goalless Shoot Bucharest.	Progress assured courtesy Schalke Goalless shoot Bucharest.	Progress assured courtesy schalke goalless pull Bucharest.
2	chelsea latest city aim smash blue record jose cheap hair	Chelsea's last town, it's a blue record, jose hair cheap.	Chelsea last town aims for blue record jose hair cheap.	Last Chelsea town aims for blue record jose cheap hair.
2	champion league chelsea stunned basel qualify	He's a champion of the chelsea league.	Champion of the Chelsea League, stunned basel qualification.	Champion of the chelsea league stunned basel qualification.
2	football chelsea champion league despite basel loss	The champion of the Chelsea Football League despite the loss of basel.	Football League champion Chelsea despite the loss of basel.	Chelsea football champion despite the loss of basel.
2	mourinho call brave chelsea	Mortinho calls good old Chelsea now.	Mortinho, call the good Chelsea.	Mortinho calls brave Chelsea.
2	basel chelsea champion league match preview	Prior to the opening game of the Basel Chelsea Champions League.	Before-premiere of the Basel Chelsea Champions League game.	Before-premier of the Champions League match in Basel Chelsea.
2	chelsea manager jose mourinho side improved loss basel	Chelsea's manager, Jose mourinho, improved basel's loss.	Chelsea manager, Jose mourinho, improved the basel losses.	Chelsea manager Jose mourinho has improved basel losses.
2	mourinho mistake	Mourninho error.	Mistake mourinho.	It's a mistake.
2	football mourinho chelsea killer instinct basel	Football dieinho chelsea basel instinct killer chelsea.	Football dieinho chelsea killer instinct basel.	Football mourinho chelsea killer basel instinct.
2	fc basel chelsea preview squad news television streaming	Fc Basel-Chelsea preview news streaming video streaming.	Fc Basel Chelsea preview news squad streaming TV streaming.	Fc Basel Chelsea preview news squad streaming TV.
2	chelsea qualifies despite loss basel	Chelsea's eligible in spite of the loss of basel.	Chelsea is eligible despite the loss of basel.	Chelsea qualifies despite the loss of basel.
2	chelsea sleeping basel goal jose mourinho	I mean, Chelsea sleeps but basel jose dies.	Chelsea sleeping but basel jose is dying.	Chelsea sleeping but basel jose mourinho.
2	fernando torres hip feature tuesday	Fashionable film, Fernando Torres, Tuesday.	Fernando Torres, the trendy movie on Tuesday.	Hey, Fernando Torres, trendy movie on Tuesday.
2	basel coach yakin win chelsea beautiful	L' trainer of basel yakin, win Chelsea beautiful.	L' basel yakin coach win Chelsea beautiful.	L' coach of basel yakin win beautiful Chelsea.
2	chelsea advance champion league	This is the Chelsea Champions League.	The Chelsea Champions League!	Chelsea league of champions.
2	chelsea advance shock bar	Chelsea's just pushing up the panic button.	Well, Chelsea's pushing up the shock bar.	Chelsea's pushing up the shock bar here.
2	champion league roundup chelsea advance despite loss	Champion of the Chelsea Rally League advances despite the loss.	He's the champion of the rallying league Chelsea, but he's still on the losing side.	Chelsea's rally league champion advances despite the loss.
2	soccer eto scan injured chelsea loss	Soccer and o-scan the wounded chelsea loss.	Soccer and Soccer scans the injured chelsea loss.	Soccer eto scan the wounded chelsea loss.
2	samuel eto leg muscle strain	Samuel eto, leg muscle.	Samuel eto leg muscle.	Uh, Samuel eto leg muscle.
2	david luiz chelsea trip basel knee injury	David tells him that Chelsea is injured in a basilar trip.	David tells him that Chelsea is injured in her knee during a basilar trip.	David tells her that Chelsea is injured in the knee during a trip to her home.
2	football chelsea qualify champion league despite basel loss	Chelsea Football Club qualified for the Championship League despite losing the championship.	Chelsea football team qualified for the championship despite basel's loss.	Chelsea football club qualified for the championship league despite the loss of basel.
2	chelsea lose basel qualify	Chelsea loses Basel.	Chelsea's losing Basel.	And Chelsea loses Basel.
2	fernando torres return hip injury	Torres turns up the wounds on his hip.	And Fernando Torres is reversing the injuries to his hip.	Fernando Torres reverses hip injuries.
2	niall quinn big club fear chelsea jose mourinho outfoxed	None of Quinn's major clubs are afraid that Chelsea Joseph Mourinho is smarter than him.	Nor are all of Quinn's major clubs worried that Chelsea Joseph Mourinho is smarter than him.	Nor do all Quinn's big clubs worry that Chelsea Joseph Mourinho is smarter than him.
2	premier league mourinho wait chelsea christmas	Well, the first league dieinho awaits Christmas from Chelsea.	The first mourinho league is expecting Christmas from Chelsea.	The first league mourinho awaits Christmas from Chelsea.
2	football injured luiz sits chelsea basel trip	The wounded soccer hez seated Chelsea basel trip.	The football injury hez seated chelsea basel trip.	Wounded football hez seated chelsea basel trip.
2	basel face better chelsea jose mourinho	I'd like to thank you for your time.	Basel Best face chelsea jose mourinho.	Basel face best chelsea jose mourinho.
2	basle chelsea match report	Report of Basle Chelsea match.	This is the report of the Basle Chelsea match.	Chelsea basle match report.
2	mourinho target basel win responds arsenal talk	Basel target dieinho's victory responds to the apos; talking arsenal.	The victory of the basel target mourinho answers to talk arsenal.	The victory of the target basel mourinho responds to the apos; arsenal speak.
2	fc basel chelsea preview tv schedule	Fc basel chelsea preview-view TV schedule.	Fc basel chelsea preview TV schedule.	Fc basel chelsea preview TV schedule.
2	champion league group basel stun chelsea	Chelsea is amazed by the champion of the basel league group.	League champion basel group astonishes Chelsea.	Champion of the basel league group astonishes Chelsea.
2	david luiz basel game injury fernando torres travel	David gave him an injury to the basics when he traveled with Torres.	Well, David gave him a baseball injury when he traveled with Torres.	David gave him a baseman's game injury when he rode Torres.
2	chelsea fc jose mourinho big win	The victory was won by Chelsea F.C.J.Jose Mourinho.	Chelsea F.C.J.Jose Mourinho took the win.	And Chelsea F.C.J.Jose Mourinho won.
2	chelsea qualify knockout despite basel loss	Despite the loss of basel, Chelsea qualified as a knockout.	Chelsea still qualifies as a knockout despite the loss of basel.	Chelsea qualifies as a knockout despite the loss of basel.
2	basel chelsea score grade post match reaction	Basel Chelsea score after game reaction.	This is the Basel Chelsea score after the reaction to the game.	Basel Chelsea score after the match reaction.
2	chelsea stumble champion league knockout stage basel	Chelsea Tumble Champion in the basel stage knockout league.	Chelsea Tumble League knockout basel stage champion.	Chelsea Tumble League knockout stage champion basel.
2	basel chelsea salah strike stuns mourinho	Basel Chelsea salah strike astonishes you.	Basel chelsea salah strike astounds mourinho.	Basel chelsea salah strike astonishes you.
2	basel brush chelsea londoner advance	Chelsea London baselbrush advances the' before-garde.	London Chelsea baselbrush advances the' before-garde.	Brosse basel Chelsea londonienne advancees l' avant-garde.
2	chelsea bos jose mourinho reveals borrowed fernando torres clipper	Chelsea bos jose mourinho revealed that she had borrowed a mower from Fernando Torres.	Chelsea bos jose mourinho reveals that she borrowed a Fernando Torres lawn mower.	Chelsea bos jose mourinho reveals that she borrowed a Fernando Torres mower.
2	chelsea despite losing basel	Despite the loss of Basel.	Chelsea, despite the loss of Basel.	Chelsea despite Basel's loss.
2	basel chelsea choose squad	Basel-Chelsea is the only city in the region.	Basel Chelsea choose Squad.	Basel Chelsea choose squad cars.
2	champion league chelsea seal progress dortmund danger	Chelsea Seal Progress League Champion dortmund danger dormund.	Champion of the chelsea seal progress league dormund danger sleepmund.	Chelsea League Champion seal progress dortmund danger dortmund.
2	basel chelsea uefa champion league match report	Report of the Basel Chelsea Champions League Ufa.	Report by the league of champions of Basel Chelsea uefa.	A report from the Basel Chelsea uefa Champions League.
2	chelsea manager jose mourinho admits picked wrong team basle	Chelsea's manager, Jose mourinho, admits to being cheated.	The manager of Chelsea, Jose mourinho, admits that he has been deceived by the team.	Chelsea manager Jose mourinho admits to being deceived by the team.
2	chelsea basel brush merry christmas jose	Chelsea Basel Merry Christmases Brush, merry Christmas.	Chelsea Basel Merry christmas brush jose merry Christmas.	Chelsea Basel Brosse merry christmas jose merry Christmas.
2	mourinho time blue brave	Mortinho, blue time, good time.	Good time Mortinho blue weather.	Mortinho time blue good time.
2	chelsea stunned brave basel	It was Chelsea who surprised the good Basel.	Chelsea surprised Basel.	Chelsea surprised brave Basel.
2	football chelsea lose progress ajax stun barcelona	Football Chelsea losing progress ajax has stun barcelona progress.	Football Chelsea lose progress ajax stun barcelona progress.	Football Chelsea lose progress ajax stun barcelona progress.
2	mouinho blame fatigue chelsea defeat	Blaming Chelsea fatigue defeated mouinho.	Mouinho blame chelsea fatigue defeat.	Mouinho blame fatigue chelsea defeat.
2	fc basel chelsea live stream score preview prediction champion	Fc basel chelsea live stream score previews prediction champion.	Fc basel chelsea live stream score preview prediction champion.	Fc basel chelsea live stream score preview prediction champion.
2	mourinho moan exhausted player	Myself moaning, gambler exhausted.	Mourninho moans exhausted gambler.	Migrinho moaning exhausted gambler.
2	sensational basel celebrate	Sensational basilica celebrates the festival.	A sensational basilica celebrates the party.	A sensational basilica will celebrate the festival.
2	chelsea striking woe reach low stat	I think Chelsea's been hit by bad luck.	Chelsea's been hit by misfortune.	Well, Chelsea's been hit by bad luck.
2	basle chelsea jose mourinho eyeing champion league victory ease	Basle Chelsea Jose will die inho's eye league champion the easy way to win the league.	Basle Chelsea Jose mourinho league champion's eye the league's easy win.	Basle Chelsea Jose mourinho eye champion league easy to win the league.
2	chelsea qualifies ucl knockout stage despite basel loss	"Chelsea qualified for the stadium ""ucl knockout"" despite the loss of the basilica."	Chelsea qualified for the stadium ucl knockout despite the loss of a basilica.	Chelsea qualifies for the ucl knockout stadium despite the loss of basilica.
2	fc basel chelsea watch live stream online listen uefa champion	Fc basel chelsea to watch live streaming live streaming from the Champion Ufa.	Fc basel chelsea watch live stream online listening to the champion uefa.	Fc basel chelsea watch live stream online listen to uefa uefa.
2	mourinho student best manager liverpool wba spur bos	I'm a student and I'm the best manager in the business.	Student dieinho best liverpool manager wba spur bos bos.	Dying student best manager liverpool wba spur bos bos.
2	football chelsea despite basel loss	It's the first game in the world.	Chelsea Football despite the loss of Basel.	Chelsea despite the loss of Basel.
2	torres return basel confirms mourinho	The basil back from Torres confirms that the mortinho.	The basil back from Torres confirms the mortinho.	Torres's return basil confirms mortinho.
2	chelsea suffering fatigue admits mourinho	And Chelsea, who suffers from fatigue, admits to starving to death.	Chelsea, who suffers from fatigue, admits to starvation.	Chelsea, who suffers from fatigue admits to starvation.
2	jos mourinho blame basel defeat admits chelsea tired	Jos mourinho blames Basel defeats Chelsea tired.	And Jos mourinho blames Basel defeat admits Chelsea tired.	Jos mourinho blames Basel defeat admits tired Chelsea.
2	football mourinho set sight progression	Football mourinho adjust the progress of the view.	Football mourinho adjust the progression of the view.	Football mourinho set the progression of the view.
2	basel chelsea jose mourinho warns brave survive christmas	Basel Chelsea Jose mourinho will warn the brave men to survive Christmas.	Basel Chelsea Jose mourinho warns braves to survive the Christmas.	Basel Chelsea Jose mourinho warns the brave to survive Christmas.
2	basel chelsea free uefa champion league pick preview	Basel Chelsea Free uefa League Champion select before l' before-premier.	Basel Chelsea Free uefa league champion choose before the' before-first.	Basel Chelsea Free uefa champion of the league choose before the' before-first.
2	update soccer basel brush chelsea londoner advance	Basel brush update Chelsea London brush is a solitary advance.	Chelsea London basel brush update solitary advance.	Update basel brush chelsea londonian advance solitary.
2	fc basel chelsea betting preview mourinho men secure qualification	Fc basel chelsea bets will preview men dieinho secure qualification.	Fc basel chelsea bets preview dieinho men secure qualification.	Fc basel chelsea bets preview mourinho men secure qualification.
2	video murat yakin basel playing chelsea win	Video gameplay by the gameplay team.	Murat video basel yakin basel play chelsea win.	Video murat yakin basel yakin play chelsea win.
2	chelsea qualify despite basel defeat barca lose	In spite of the loss, Chelsea is unable to win the match.	Chelsea still qualifies despite basel defeat barca lose.	Chelsea qualifies despite basel defeat barca lose.
2	mourinho admits mistake basel beat blue	Mourinho admits that it is a mistake; Basel Beat Blue is a mistake.	Mourinho admits the apos; error Basel Beat Blue.	Mourinho admits the mistake Basel Beat Blue.
2	watch fc basel chelsea live foxsoccer preview	Watch the front of FC Basel Chelsea-Foxsoccer premiere live.	Watch FC Basel Chelsea in front-live Foxsoccer premiere.	Watching FC Basel Chelsea in front-premiere of the live Foxsoccer.
2	chelsea despite basel loss	Despite the loss of the basilica.	Chelsea despite the loss of the basilica.	Chelsea despite the loss of basilica.
2	mourinho blame chelsea defeat basel	Deathho blames Chelsea for Basel's defeat.	Deathinho blames Chelsea for the defeat of Basel.	M mourinho blamed Chelsea for the defeat of Basel.
2	uefa champion league chelsea basel match preview	This is the first time you've ever played a game before.	He's the champion of the Chelsea basel match before-first.	Celebrity chelsea basel match before first.
2	petr cech admits chelsea excuse poor display basel	Petr Cech admits that Chelsea excuse basel poor basel exposure.	Petr Cech admits Chelsea basel excuse poor basel exposure.	Petr Cech admits chelsea excuse basel poor exposure basel.
2	chelsea advance despite deserved victory basle	Chelsea is moving forward in spite of a well-deserved victory.	Chelsea advances in spite of deserved victory.	Chelsea advances despite apos; a deserved victory.
2	champion league	Champions league.	Champions league.	League of champions, league of champions.
2	chelsea schalke advance group	Chelsea Schalke pioneers.	This is Chelsea Schalke's advance band.	Chelsea Schalke's advance band.
2	jose mourinho criticises chelsea player poor decision making bad	Jose mourinho criticizes Chelsea's decision.	And Jose mourinho criticizes Chelsea's bad decision.	Jose mourinho criticizes Chelsea's bad decision to go to jail.
2	champion league chelsea deserved defeat jose mourinho	The Chelsea League champion was deserving of Jose's defeat.	The Chelsea League champion deserved Jose's defeat in the first place.	Chelsea League champion Jose mourinho deserved defeat.
2	chelsea suffer swiss shock reach	Chelsea suffers from a Swiss shock.	Chelsea suffers from apos; Swiss shock.	Chelsea suffers from apos; Swiss shock syndrome.
2	basel chelsea thing learned champion league clash	Basel Chelsea has learned the fight of the champions of the league.	And Basel Chelsea has learned the fight of the league champions.	Basel Chelsea learned to fight league champions.
2	chelsea progress despite loss ajax stun barcelona	The progress of Chelsea despite the losses ajax stun barcelona.	Chelsea's progress despite losses ajax stun barcelona.	The progress of Chelsea despite loss ajax stun barcelona.
2	fc basel chelsea time live stream tv info preview	Fc basel chelsea live stream TV info preview.	Fc basel chelsea time live stream TV info preview.	Fc basel chelsea time live stream TV info preview.
2	mourinho expects blue cut brave time year	Mourinho s' waits for the Year of the Blue Cup to be courageous.	Mourinho s' waits for the year of the blue cup to be a year of courage.	Mourinho s' waits for the blue cup year to be courageous.
2	basel chelsea blue qualify champion league despite losing	Despite the loss, Basel Chelsea Blue Champion League qualified.	Basel Chelsea Blue Champion League Qualification despite defeat.	Basel Chelsea Blue Champion League despite the loss.
2	update soccer mourinho wait claw christmas	Update football mourinho expecting Christmas Claw.	Update football mourinho wait Claw of Christmas.	Football update mourinho wait claw of Christmas.
2	torres set substantial workload chelsea striker set len hy absence	The torres have a lot of work to do, and it's a lot of work to do.	Torres have a heavy workload chelsea gréker has put in hy absence.	The torres have heavy workload chelsea gréker put in hy absence.
2	soccer basel sink chelsea late salah winner	Chelsea Football Basilica wins the Salah.	Chelsea football basel, winner of the Salah.	The chelsea soccer basel winning salah.
2	champion league chelsea progress knockout phase despite loss basel	The stage progress of the Chelsea League phase knockout despite the loss of phase basel.	Chelsea League champion progress phase knockout despite the basel phase loss.	He's the champion of the Chelsea League and he's progressing through the knockout phase despite the basel phase loss.
2	basel chelsea blue barcelona humbled	Basel Chelsea Blue has been humiliated.	Basel Chelsea Blue barcelona has humiliated.	Basel Chelsea Blue barcelona shamed.
2	jose mourinho slam ridiculous chelsea basel champion league defeat	Jose diesinho slam ridiculously chelsea champion of the league defeated.	Jose dieinho ridiculous chelsea league champion slam defeated.	Jose mourinho slam ridiculous chelsea league champion defeated.
2	basel chelsea match report anaemic chelsea qualify hard	The game was played at the end of the season.	Basel chelsea match report anemic chelsea qualify durum.	Basel chelsea match report anemic chelsea qualify durum.
2	jose mourinho call chelsea brave heart roar	Jose mourinho calls Chelsea the Valiant Heart roars and roars.	Jose mourinho calls Chelsea the roaring heart.	Jose mourinho calls Chelsea the brave heart roars.
2	mourinho meek mild blue sneak	Méridinho soft s' infiltree soft blue.	Sweet sweet morinho s' soft blue infiltrator.	Soft s&apos mourinho soft; soft blue infiltrator.
2	champion league basel midfielder marcelo diaz hope surprise chelsea	Marcelo Diaz, middlefielder basel league champion, hopes to surprise Chelsea.	Champion of the midfielder basel league Marcelo Diaz hopes surprise chelsea.	Champion of the league of basel midfielder Marcelo Diaz hopes surprise chelsea.
2	latest basel chelsea blue solid hazard	Last solid risk of blue Chelsea basel.	Last solid risk of blue basel chelsea.	Last solid risk of basel chelsea blue.
2	champion league chelsea despite basel loss	She won the Chelsea League despite Basel's loss.	She is the champion of the Chelsea League, despite the loss of the club.	Chelsea League champion despite the loss of Basel.
2	soccer basel strike blow europe smaller league	It's the first time you've played football in Europe, it's the second time you've played football.	Basel football strike blowing smaller europe league.	Football basel strike blowing europe smaller league.
2	chelsea fc despite disappointing loss basel highlight	Chelsea fc in spite of a few disappointments, a disappointing loss in the high points of the city.	Chelsea fc in spite of apos; a disappointing loss at the basel highlights.	Chelsea fc despite a disappointing loss in basel highlights.
2	basel chelsea match fact	Basel Chelsea corresponds to reality.	Basel Chelsea's the real deal.	Well, Basel Chelsea is the real deal.
2	jose winning formula	Winning jose.	Winning jose formula.	The winning jose formula.
2	jose mourinho refuse blame chelsea player basle loss	Jose refuses to blame Chelsea for losing the basle player.	Jose mourinho refuses to blame Chelsea for losing the basle player in the game.	Jose mourinho refuses to blame Chelsea for the loss of basle player.
2	champion league round ce ic hope dashed ac milan barca	He's a champion of the league, and he's the champion of the league around that hope.	Champion of the league around this hope ic destroyed ac milan barca.	Champion of the league around this hope destroyed ac milan barca ic.
2	fc basel chelsea betting preview expect blue secure place	L' overview of basel chelsea s&apos bets; waits at a safe place in blue.	L' basel chelsea s&apos bets preview; waits at a safe blue place.	L' preview of basel chelsea s&apos bets; waits at a secure blue location.
2	champion league football focus forum arsenal ce ic chelsea	Chelsea Chelsea is one of the best-known chelsea icons in the world.	Football league focus forum football champion arsenal this chelsea chelsea ic icel.	Chelsea chelsea ic icelsea focus forum arsenal football league champion.
2	mourinho relishing hectic winter schedule	It's a good time to relax and enjoy a busy winter.	It's a pleasure to be able to enjoy such a busy schedule.	Died in the morning enjoying a busy winter schedule.
2	chelsea concerned samuel eto injury	It was about Samuel Eto Injury.	Chelsea was Samuel Eto Injury.	Chelsea was about samuel eto hurt.
2	mohamed salah scored late winner basel	Muhammad Salah scored the final victory of the race in Basel.	Mohamed Salah scored Basel's last winner.	Mohamed Salah scored the last winner Basel.
2	basle victory chelsea	This is Basle Victory Chelsea.	Basle victory chelsea.	Basle victory chelsea.
2	basle chelsea live	Live from Basle Chelsea.	Basle Chelsea live.	Basle Chelsea live now.
2	chelsea bos jose mourinho seal champion league progress	Chelsea Bos Jose die inho Seal Progress of the League of Seal Champions.	Chelsea Bos Jose mourinho Seal Champions League Progress.	Chelsea Bos Jose mourinho Seal The progress of the Seal Champions League.
3	roundup golden globe seduced johansson voice	Gather round the globe; or seduced voice of Johansson, voice of Johansson.	Gather globe d' or seduced voice Johansson voice johansson.	Gather globe d' or seduced voice Johansson voice.
3	scarlett johansson ineligible golden globe award	Ineligible for the Golden Globe Award.	Scarlett Johansson is ineligible for the Golden Globe Award.	Scarlett Johansson ineligible for Golden Globe Award.
3	scarlett johansson ruled ineligible golden globe despite best actress	Scarlett Johansson decided that the Golden Globe was not eligible for the award, despite the fact that she was the best actress.	Scarlett Johansson decided that the Golden Globe was not eligible, despite the fact that she was the best actress in the world.	Scarlett Johansson judged the golden globe to be ineligible, despite the fact that she was the best actress in the world.
3	movie boss lose bid land scarlett johansson golden globe unseen	The patron of the cinema loses the land offer Scarlett Johansson orb d' invisible gold.	The cinematographer loses the land offer Scarlett Johansson orb invisible gold.	Cinema boss loses land offer Scarlett Johansson globe d' invisible gold.
3	golden globe scarlett johansson nominated year	Gold globe Scarlett johansson nominee year.	Gold globe scarlett johansson nominee year.	Gold globe scarlett johansson nominated year.
3	scarlett johansson golden globe snub	Scarlett Johansson Golden Globe snob.	Scarlett Johansson golden globe snob.	Scarlett Johansson golden globe snob.
3	johansson voice work ineligible globe	Johansson's voice works for the world.	Johansson working voice ineligible globe globe.	Johansson voice work ineligible globe work.
3	scar jo excluded golden globe nomination year	Golden Globe Year of Appointment.	Scar jo excluded Golden Globe... year of appointment.	Scar jo excluded Golden Globe nomination year.
3	scarlett johansson voice role refused golden globe nomination	Scarlett Johansson voice denied Golden Globe nomination.	Scarlett Johansson denied role role Golden globe nomination.	Scarlett Johansson voice rejected role golden globe nomination.
3	bizarre reason scarlett johansson disqualified golden globe nod	That's kind of a weird reason why Scarlett Johansson disqualified Golden Globe nod.	Some reason why Scarlett Johansson disqualified Golden globe nod.	Funny reason Scarlett Johansson disqualified Golden globe nod.
3	scarlett johansson revive lost vocal art voicemail message	Scarlett Johansson brings to life the message of the voice mail of L' Lost Voice Art.	Scarlett Johansson revives the voice mail message of L' lost voice art.	Scarlett Johansson revives the voice mail message of l' lost vocal art.
3	johansson globe nod	Johansson globe, nod.	Johansson globe nod?	Johansson globe nod.
3	scarlett johansson award winning performance ruled ineligible	The winner of the Scarlett Johansson Award was disqualified.	The winning performance of the Johansson Scarlett Award was deemed ineligible.	Scarlett Johansson's winning performance was deemed ineligible.
3	scarlett johansson win golden globe	Johansson won the Golden Globe.	Scarlett Johansson won the Golden Globe.	Scarlett Johansson won the golden orb.
3	golden globe scarlett johansson award	Scarlett Johansson Golden Globe Award.	Golden Globe Scarlett Johansson Award.	The golden globe scarlett johansson award.
3	scarlett johansson faceless performance snubbed golden globe	Scarlett Johansson's faceless, globe-hungry performance.	Scarlett Johansson faceless performance snobbish globe d'apos gold.	Scarlett Johansson faceless performance snobbish globe d'apos gold.
3	scarlett johansson snubbed golden globe nomination technicality	Scarlett Johansson ignored the technicalities of the Golden Globe nomination.	Scarlett Johansson ignored the technical nomination of Golden Globe.	Scarlett Johansson has ignored the technicality of the Golden Globe nomination process.
3	scarlett johansson role deemed ineligible golden globe award	Scarlett Johansson as the Golden Globe Award nominee.	Scarlett Johansson deemed ineligible Golden Globe Award.	Scarlett Johansson role deemed ineligible Golden Globe Award.
3	scarlett johansson gain oscar buzz role	Scarlett Johansson win Oscar Buzz role.	Scarlett Johansson win Oscar Buzz role.	Scarlett Johansson win Oscar buzz role.
3	scarlett johansson deemed ineligible golden globe voice work	Scarlett Johansson is considered to be an ineligible work of the Golden Globe Voice.	Scarlett Johansson considered as ineligible work of golden globe voice.	Scarlett Johansson considered an ineligible golden globe voice work.
3	scarlett johansson disqualified golden globe consideration	Scarlett Johansson disqualified the apos; examination of the Golden Globe.	Scarlett Johansson disqualified the apos; the examination of the golden globe.	Scarlett Johansson disqualified the examination of the golden globe.
3	golden globe prediction scarlet johansson ineligible best	Gold globe predicts johansson scarlet ineligible best prediction.	Gold globe predicted scarlet johansson ineligible best prediction.	Gold globe foretells scarlet johansson ineligible best prediction.
3	scarlett johansson performance ineligible golden globe	Scarlett Johansson's Ineligible Performance Golden Globe Gold performance.	Scarlett Johansson's ineligible Golden Golden Globe performance.	Scarlett Johansson's ineligible performance Golden Globe.
3	scarlett johansson voice performance snubbed golden globe	Scarlett Johansson's snobbish golden-ball vocal performance, right?	Scarlett Johansson's snobbish, golden globe vocal performance.	Scarlett Johansson's snobbish golden globe vocal performance.
3	scarlett johansson voice eligible globe	Scarlett Johansson electable globe voice.	And Scarlett Johansson's eligible globe voice.	Scarlett Johansson's eligible globe voice.
3	golden globe refuse consider scarlett johansson performance	The Golden Globe refuses to consider Scarlett Johansson's performance.	Golden globe refuses to consider the performance of Scarlett Johansson.	The golden globe refuses to consider Johansson's performance.
3	scarlett johansson voice ineligible golden globe	Scarlett Johansson's ineligible, Golden Globe Golden voice.	Scarlett Johansson's Ineligible Voice Golden Globe.	Scarlett Johansson ineligible Golden golden globe voice.
3	scarlett johansson performance deemed ineligible golden globe	Scarlett Johansson's performance is considered to be ineligible for the award of the Golden Globe.	Scarlett Johansson's performance is considered a golden globe ineligible.	Scarlett Johansson performance considered ineligible golden globe.
3	scarlett johansson golden globe	Scarlett Johansson's gold globe.	Scarlett Johansson, golden globe.	Scarlett Johansson golden orb.
3	scarlett johansson voice role eligible golden globe	Scarlett Johansson as Eligible Golden Globe.	Scarlett Johansson as eligible golden globe.	Scarlett Johansson voice role eligible golden globe.
3	despite rome win scarlett johansson ineligible golden globe	In spite of Rome's victory, Scarlett Johansson, the world's unselectable gold orb.	Despite Rome's victory, Scarlett Johansson, d&apos orb; or ineligible.	Despite Rome's victory, Scarlett Johansson, an ineligible gold orb.
4	travel disruption mount storm cold air sweep south florida	Disturbance of travel Rising storm of cold air sweeping across the Florida coast.	Travel disturbance storm rise cold air storm sweep South Florida.	Travel disruption mount cold air storm sweeping South Florida.
4	jersey shore student march philadelphia thanksgiving day parade	Jersey Shore students will be marching at the Philadelphia Thanksgiving Parade.	Jersey Shore students march at Philadelphia Thanksgiving.	Jersey Shore students march at the Philadelphia Thanksgiving Parade.
4	strong wind ground biggest balloon thanksgiving day parade	The Biggest Ball in the Day Parade.	This is the biggest ball in the day's parade.	The biggest ball in the Thanksgiving Day parade.
4	macy parade pull balloon wind ap	Macy Parade Shoot balloon ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap.	Macy Parade Shoot balloon ap wind ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap.	Parade Macy Shooter balloon, wind ap ap ap ap ap ap.
4	deflating macy parade ground big balloon	We're breaking down Macy's fashion show with a big ball on the ground.	Macy's fashion show with a big ball on the ground.	Breakdown of Macy's fashion show with a big balloon on the ground.
4	elaina cho marching uma macy thanksgiving day parade	Elaina Cho walking a Thanksgiving Day parade.	Elaina Cho walking uma macy Thanksgiving parade.	Elaina Cho walking uma macy Thanksgiving day parade.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade schedule watch	Macy's Thanksgiving parade, see to the parade.	Macy's Thanksgiving parade schedule, you guys check out the parade.	Macy's Thanksgiving Parade, watch the parade for me.
4	winter storm affect macy thanksgiving day parade	It's been a long time since we've had a chance to see what's going on here.	The winter storm also affected the Macy Day Parade.	The winter storm affects Macy's Day Parade.
4	giant macy balloon stay grounded	The Giant Balloon Macy stays on the ground.	The giant Macy ball stays on the ground.	The giant Macy ball stays down.
4	grounding big balloon macy thanksgiving day parade game	Apos Parade; Big Macy Ball Thanksgiving.	Thanksgiving parade in big macy balloons.	D&apos parade; Macy big balloon Thanksgiving.
4	owatonna woman set participate macy thanksgiving day parade	Owatonna Woman has participated in the Thanksgiving Macy Parade.	Owatonna participated in the Thanksgiving macy parade.	Owatonna woman participated in the macy Thanksgiving Parade.
4	marysville student selected perform macy day parade	One of Marysville's students chose the Macy Day parade.	Well, a student from Marysville picked the macy's day parade.	A Marysville student chose the macy day parade.
4	marion dancer perform macy thanksgiving day parade	Marion Danseur performs the Macy Parade of the Day.	Marion performs macy parade of the day d' Thanksgiving.	Marion dancer executes macy day parade d' Thanksgiving.
4	jump island rope skipper appear macy thanksgiving day	The skipping-rope captain appears on Thanksgiving Macy.	Skipper of the jump rope appears on Thanksgiving morning.	On Thanksgiving Macy, the skipper of the jump rope appears.
4	chaparral grad march macy thanksgiving day parade	The chaparral, a graduate of the walking class, marched on Thanksgiving Day.	The chaparral, a marching graduate, marched on Thanksgiving.	The marching grad chaparral marched on Thanksgiving Day.
4	thanksgiving parade battle cold wind	Thanksgiving Day Parade Cold Winds.	Cold winds thanksgiving parade.	Hey, thanksgiving parade cold winds.
4	macy thanksgiving parade balloon extremely creepy	Thanksgiving Macy Parade Ball is scary as hell.	Super creepy Thanksgiving macy parade balloon.	Thanksgiving Day parade balloon macy extremely creepy.
4	easter threatens thanksgiving travel macy parade	Thanksgiving Parade is threatened by Easter.	Easter threatens Thanksgiving.	Easter threatens the thanksgiving parade.
4	city decide balloon grounded macy thanksgiving day parade	City decides Macy's Thanksgiving Day parade will be a ground ball.	The city decides Macy's Thanksgiving Day parade will be a ground ball.	The city decided that Macy's Thanksgiving Day parade would be a grounded ball.
4	saugerties greco macy thanksgiving day parade	Daugerties greco macy, Thanksgiving Day parade.	Thanksgiving Day Daugerties greco macy parade.	Daugerties greco macy parade of Thanksgiving Day.
4	local band prepares york	Local group is preparing York City.	The local group is preparing York.	The local band will prepare York.
4	local student perform macy parade	Local student's doing a macy parade.	A local student is in a macy fashion show.	A local student is doing a macy parade.
4	weather ground macy parade balloon	This is Macy Ground Weather Macy Parade Ball.	Macy Ground Weather Macy Parade.	Macy ground weather macy parade ball.
4	tomball drill team march macy thanksgiving day parade	Thanksgiving Parade; dance team; raffle exercise.	Thanksgiving parades; apo team; raffle exercise.	Thanksgiving parade of l'apos; team of apos; raffle exercise.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade celebrates holiday big	Macy's Day of Thanksgiving is a celebration of the world's best and brightest.	The Macy Thanksgiving Parade celebrates the big holidays.	The Macy Thanksgiving parade celebrates the big holidays.
4	red lake girl macy parade	Macy Red Lake Girl parry.	And Macy's Lake Red Girl Parade.	Parade of the red lake girl Macy.
4	central marching band ready philadelphia parade	Philadelphia Central Band Parade.	Parade of the Central Band in Philadelphia.	Central marching band in Philadelphia.
4	woodland student create robot cut ribbon macy parade	A robot-cut ribbon is used by an antler to create a macy parade.	An antler student creates a macy parade with a robot-cut ribbon.	Woods student creates a macy parade with a robot-cut ribbon.
4	explaining thanksgiving tradition macy parade nfl game	To explain the tradition of Thanksgiving in the fashion show macy nfl game.	To explain the Thanksgiving tradition in macy nfl game parade.	Explain the tradition of Thanksgiving macy parade nfl game.
4	wind deflate plan balloonswinds deflate plan balloon	Wind blows the ball blowing the plane deflates the balloon.	Wind deflates plan Wind blows balloon deflates plane balloon.	Wind deflates plan Wind blows balloon deflates plan balloon.
4	tarpon spring band perform macy thanksgiving day parade	The Tarpon Spring Band performs at the Macy Thanksgiving Parade.	Tarpon's spring marching band performs at the Macy Thanksgiving Parade.	Tarpon's spring marching band will perform at Macy's Thanksgiving Parade.
4	kangaroo kid jumping joy opportunity macy thanksgiving	Kangaroo kid jumping for macy Thanksgiving opportunity.	Kangaroo kid jumping for joy opportunity macy thanksgiving.	So kangaroo kid jumping for joy opportunity macy Thanksgiving.
4	love parade	Love.	Parade d' love.	It's all right.
4	macy nfl thanksgiving explained	Explained Macy nf Thanksgiving.	Macy nf Thanksgiving explained.	Macy nfl Thanksgiving explained.
4	storm threatens holiday travel east	Holiday travel to the east is threatened by the storm.	The storm threatens the holidays to the east.	The storm threatens holiday travel to the east.
4	purdue student jump rope macy thanksgiving day parade	Pure-rope, macy-jumping-rope, Thanksgiving Day students.	Students purdue macy parade jump rope Thanksgiving Day.	Pure student jump rope macy parade Thanksgiving day.
4	mannheim steamroller macy parade universal holiday lineup	Mannheim roller compressor macy is a universal year-end celebration parade.	Mannheim roller macy compressor universal graduation parade; year.	Mannheim roller compressor macy parade universal of the end of the year.
4	thanksgiving storm threaten macy parade holiday travel	The Thanksgiving blizzard is now threatening the holiday trip of the Macy Parade.	Thanksgiving storm threatens the holiday trip of Macy's parade.	Thanksgiving storm threatens Macy's parade holiday trip.
4	nation family kawkawlin man balloon macy thanksgiving	The Kawkawlin Man Balloon Macy Thanksgiving family.	Kawkawlin man balloon Macy Thanksgiving family.	The family Kawkawlin man balloon Macy Thanksgiving.
4	debby ryan macy day parade dream	This is the Ryan Macy Day Parade Dream Parade.	Ryan Macy Day Parade dream parade.	The dream parade of Ryan Macy Day Parade.
4	stormy weather thanksgiving travel slog	Thunderstorm Thanksgiving slogans travel.	Stormy Weather Thanksgiving travel slogans.	Stormy weather Thanksgiving travel slogans.
4	tune macy thanksgiving day parade	This is Macy Macy Macy's Thanksgiving Day parade.	Macy Macy's Thanksgiving parade.	Macy Macy parade thanksgiving.
4	local student headed macy parade	Local students have been leading the Macy Parade.	The local students were the ones who led the Macy Parade.	The local students led the Macy show.
4	pembroke student uma march macy thanksgiving parade	Hey, Pembroke grad student, um, uh, uh, uh, uh, uh, uh, Thanksgiving macy parade.	Pembroke student, a walk macy Thanksgiving parade.	Pembroke student, Thanksgiving march macy parade.
4	windy weather ground macy thanksgiving day parade balloon	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.	Parade Balloon d' Thanksgiving in windy weather and macy floor.	Apos parade ball; thanksgiving in windy weather and macy floor.
4	wind factor annual thanksgiving day parade	This year's Thanksgiving windchill parade.	Annual windchill Thanksgiving parade.	This year's annual Thanksgiving windchill parade.
4	duke marching band prepares macy thanksgiving day parade	The Duke's Band is preparing for Macy's Thanksgiving Parade.	The Duke's band is planning the Thanksgiving Parade for Macy.	The Duke's band prepares Macy's Thanksgiving parade.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade route map start time live stream	Macy Thanksgiving Day parade map d' itinerary begin live stream time.	Macy Thanksgiving Day parade card d' itinerary start time live stream.	Macy Thanksgiving Day parade map d' itinerary start time live stream.
4	uma marching band chosen applicant macy thanksgiving	Band picked candidate Macy Thanksgiving.	The band picked out the Macy Thanksgiving nominee.	The band has chosen candidate Macy Thanksgiving.
4	wind ground balloon macy parade rain snow snarl holiday travel	Macy Hot Air Balloon Parade Macy's Snow Rain and Grunting Parade Holiday Travel.	Macy Balloon Parade Parade of snow rain and grunts.	Macy Hot Air Balloon Parade Snow rain and grunts holiday travel.
4	sprawling winter storm threatens holiday travel macy thanksgiving parade	Sprawling winter storms loom over the parade of holidaymakers.	A sprawling winter storm threatens the parade of d'apos; Thanksgiving of the vacationers.	A sprawling winter storm threatens the holiday parade.
4	fort mill high dancer participate macy thanksgiving day parade	In addition, a local dancer from Fort Mill High participates in the Macy Day Parade.	A Fort Mill High dancer is participating in the Macy Day Parade.	Macy's Day Parade features a dancer from Fort Mill High.
4	macy early determine balloon fly parade	Macy determines early the hot air balloon show.	Macy to determine early the parade of hot air balloons.	Macy to determine early balloon show.
4	marching royal duke march macy thanksgiving day parade	Royal Duke March Macy Parade Thanksgiving Day march.	Royal Duke's March Macy march Thanksgiving Day parade.	Macy march royal duke march Thanksgiving Day parade.
4	couple handle balloon renowned ny parade	A couple of s&apos occupy the famous Ny Parade of Balloons.	A s&apos couple occupies the famous balloon parade.	A couple s' occupies the famous ny parade of balloons.
4	thanksgiving day parade balloon grounded high wind	The balloon from the Thanksgiving parades nailed down the strong wind.	The Thanksgiving Day parade balloon nailed the wind to the ground.	Thanksgiving parade balloon nailed the wind to the ground.
4	melby march macy thanksgiving day parade	Thanksgiving Day Melby March Macy parade.	Melby March Macy's Thanksgiving Day parade.	Melby March Macy Thanksgiving day parade.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade marred ballooning float controversy	It's a Thanksgiving parade, a ruined balloon parade, a tank controversy.	Thanksgiving Day parade, ruined balloon parades, controversy over tanks.	A Thanksgiving parade, a parade of ruined balloons, a controversy over tanks.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade tv info live stream performer	Macy Thanksgiving Day live streaming TV parade.	Macy Thanksgiving Day live TV news parade stream performer.	Macy Thanksgiving Day parade TV info live stream performer.
4	south shore drill team perform macy thanksgiving parade	L' South Shore Drill Team performs the Macy Thanksgiving Parade.	South Shore drill team executes Macy thanksgiving parade.	L' south shore drill team executes the Macy thanksgiving parade.
4	storm threatens travel wind endangers ny parade	Canadian Forces www.forces.gc.ca Français Home Contact Us Help Search canada.gc.ca Home > The Maple Leaf > Vol.	Storms threaten travel There is a wind threat.	Storm threatens travel Wind threatens ny parade.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade coming side controversy	Macy's Thanksgiving Parade comes soon add to the controversy.	Macy's Thanksgiving Day Parade is coming right up; add to the controversy.	Macy's Thanksgiving Parade is coming up; add controversy.
4	decade comic character macy thanksgiving day parade	Macy Macy Macy's 10 Years of Thanksgiving Comedy Parade.	Ten years of the Macy Macy Macy Thanksgiving Comedy Parade.	I mean, ten years of Macy Macy Macy's Thanksgiving Comedy Parade.
4	thanksgiving storm disrupts travel ground macy balloon	Thanksgiving storms disrupt the movement of the Macy ball in the field.	Thanksgiving thunderstorm disrupts Macy Balloon's movement in the field.	A Thanksgiving storm disrupts the movement of the balloon on the field.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade balloon	Balloon Macy Thanksgiving Day Parade Balloon.	Macy Thanksgiving Day Parade Balloon.	Balloon macy Thanksgiving Day Parade Balloon.
4	christine palermo saugus march macy thanksgiving parade	Christine Palermo Saugus marching for Thanksgiving.	Christine Palermo Saugus is parading for thanksgiving.	Christine palermo saugus is marching for thanksgiving.
4	macy parade performance dream true frenship color guard duo	The show of the Macy Parade dreams of the two of us guarding the colours of the fraternity.	The Macy Parade show is a real dream of the Macy Parade, a duo that guards the fraternity colours.	The Macy Parade dream d'apos; a true duo of guarding the colors of the brotherhood.
4	icky windy weather crimp thanksgiving travel plan	Well, bad weather's eating up the Thanksgiving travel plan.	Bad weather is eating away at our Thanksgiving travel plan.	Bad weather ruins the travel plan for Thanksgiving.
4	concord marching band leaf today perform macy thanksgiving day	This is the day of the celebration of the anniversary of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights.	Today, the marching band performs on the Day of Apostles; Thanksgiving Macy.	Today, the concordant marching band performs macy Thanksgiving Day.
4	ballooning animal controversy mar macy parade	This year's edition of the Canadian Wildlife Service is available online.	Parade d' controversial animals in mar macy balloon.	D'apos parade; mar macy balloon-controversial animals.
4	character balloon soar macy thanksgiving day parade	Macy Macy Macy's Thanksgiving Day Parade.	The character ball s' fly to the Macy Macy Thanksgiving parade.	The S&apos character balloon flies to Macy Macy's Thanksgiving parade.
4	poised parade	Prepped parade.	Parade's prepared.	Okay, Parade ready.
4	tarpon high band ready macy thanksgiving parade	Tarpon High Band, we're ready for the Macy Thanksgiving Day parade.	Tarpon High Band ready for the Macy Thanksgiving Parade.	Tarpon High Band, ready for Macy Thanksgiving.
4	local jump rope champ perform national parade	National Rope Jumping Champion.	Local rope jumping champion, national parade.	I'm a local rope jumper with a national parade.
4	wanted macy thanksgiving day	Wanted Macy to be Thanksgiving.	I wanted to have Macy on Thanksgiving.	I wanted Macy to be thanksgiving day.
4	child ogle float thanksgiving day parade	Parade d' Action de graces pour les enfants qui l'oeil le chariot.	Apos parade; Thanksgiving for children who look at the tank.	Thanksgiving parade for children who look at the float.
4	storm damper holiday plan storm ground macy balloon	Macy Storm Maker Holiday Plan on thunderstorm terrain.	Holiday Plan; Macy Storm Maker on thunderstorm terrain.	Holiday plan d' Macy storm buffer balloon on thunderstorm terrain.
4	wind gust ground thanksgiving day parade balloon	Wind gust Thanksgiving parade balloon.	Thanksgiving parade ball with gusts of wind.	Thanksgiving Day parade balloon with gust of wind.
4	uma minuteman marching band perform macy thanksgiving day parade	Uma Minuteman march march march march march march march march march march macy Thanksgiving Day parade.	Uma Minuteman march march fanfare perform macy Thanksgiving Day parade.	Uma Minuteman marching marching band to perform macy Thanksgiving Day parade.
4	long reach high school troupe dancing cloud invite macy parade	Long-range dance troupe from l' high school cloud dance invite Macy parade.	A long-range dance troupe from l' high school cloud invite Macy parade.	Long-range dance troupe of l' high school cloud invite parade Macy.
4	columbus high student play macy day parade	Columbus High Student playing Macy Day parade.	Columbus High student plays Macy Day parade.	Columbus high student plays Macy Day parade.
4	greenfield high school alumnus march perform uma macy	Alumni of the Newfield High School, Newfield High School, are marching through a macy.	Alumni of Newfield High School march in a macy.	Former high school students from Newfield High School march in a parade.
4	macy parade tomorrow	Macy's Day Parade tomorrow.	Tomorrow's macy parade.	Uh, macy parade tomorrow.
4	thanksgiving travel rain snow threaten east coast	The Eastern seaboard is threatened by Thanksgiving rain.	Thanksgiving rain threatens the east coast.	Well, thanksgiving rain threatens the east coast.
4	thing wednesday	It's like this on Wednesday.	Wednesday, that's how it is.	This is the way it's gonna be on Wednesday.
4	gusty thanksgiving wind ground macy parade balloon	Macy Ground Thanksgiving Parade Ball in a flurry.	Thanksgiving Day Macy Ground parade ball in a flurry.	Macy Ground parade balloon from Thanksgiving.
4	thanksgiving real	Thanksgiving real.	Thanksgiving for real.	It's real Thanksgiving.
4	storm balloon big problem macy thanksgiving day parade	Macy's Big Thunderstorm Thanksgiving Day Parade.	Balloons d' thunderstorm big problem Macy Thanksgiving Day parade.	Balloons d' Macy big problem Thanksgiving Day parade.
4	rain snow pre thanksgiving slog	Rain of snow before Thanksgiving Day slogans.	Snow rain before Thanksgiving, slogans.	It's raining snow before Thanksgiving.
4	peta animal group protest seaworld float macy thanksgiving day	It's a great way to get a feel for the environment and the environment.	Peta group of apos; Protestant animals on Seaorld float macy Thanksgiving day.	Peta group of Protestant Seaorld float macy Thanksgiving animals.
4	thanksgiving traveller brace winter storm	Thanksgiving traveler's getting ready for the winter storm, huh?	This Thanksgiving traveller is getting ready for the winter storm.	Thanksgiving traveller prepares for winter storm.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade set city	The Thanksgiving Macy Parade is taking place in the city.	This Thanksgiving Macy parade is taking place in the city.	The Thanksgiving macy parade is happening in the city.
4	macy parade phila flavor	Macy phila flavored flavor phila parade flavor.	Macy parade phila flavour phila flavour flavour.	Macy parade flavor phila flavor flavor phila.
4	video wind ground macy parade balloon nyc	Macy Parade Balloon Macy Nyc video.	Video Macy Parade Balloon Macy Nyc.	Video from the Macy Parade Balloon Macy Nyc.
4	bbchs musician march macy parade	Musical BBchs march parade macy parade.	BBchs musician march parade macy parade.	BBchs musician march macy parade parade parade.
4	marching band final preparation macy	Final preparations for the Macy Band.	Final preparation for macy band.	Final preparation for marching band macy.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade number	C&apos is Macy's own Thanksgiving fashion show.	C&apos is Macy's Thanksgiving parade.	C&apos is the Thanksgiving parade of Macy.
4	city decide thursday wind strong macy parade balloon	It's the first day of the week, and the last day of the week.	City decides strong winds on Thursday parade balloon Macy.	The city decides on Thursday strong winds parade balloon Macy.
4	hotel best view thanksgiving day parade	L' hotel offers the best Thanksgiving parade view.	The hotel offers the best view of Thanksgiving Day Parade.	L' hotel offers the best view of the parade.
4	kid macy parade pass pittsburgh tribune	Pittsburgh stands for the Macy Children's Parade.	The Macy children's fashion show passes the Pittsburgh Grandstand.	And the Macy Children's Parade passes the Pittsburgh Grandstand.
4	spring grove graduate march macy parade	Spring Grove Graduate marching parade.	Spring Grove grad walking parade.	Graduate marching parade from Spring Grove.
4	florham park councilman turkey day macy	Macy Dindkey Day Macy, Florham Park city councilman.	The mayor of Florham Park, Macy Dindkey Day Macy.	Florham Park city councilman Macy Dindkey Day Macy.
4	centennial drum major macy parade	Macy Macy Macy Major Centennial Parade drummer.	Drummer of the Macy Macy Macy Centennial Parade.	Centennial major parade drummer Macy Macy Macy.
4	meet balloon joining year macy thanksgiving day parade	Join the Macy year's Thanksgiving Day parade with a balloon.	Join the Thanksgiving parade of l' year Macy with a ball.	Join the Macy year Thanksgiving parade with a ball.
4	strong wind jeopardize macy thanksgiving day parade	Strong winds endanger Macy's Thanksgiving parade.	A strong wind is endangering the Macy Thanksgiving Parade.	A strong wind threatens Macy's Thanksgiving parade.
4	sophomore jump rope macy thanksgiving day parade	You know, the second-year-of-jumping rope Thanksgiving parade.	Second year jump rope Thanksgiving parade.	The second year jump rope Thanksgiving parade.
4	molding matilda street	Matilda Street shape.	To shape Matilda Street.	Shape matilda street.
4	thanksgiving travel parade plan fall victim storm	It's been a long time since we've had any success.	Thanksgiving Parade Plan, victim of a storm.	Thanksgiving parade plan, victim of a storm.
4	wind ground macy parade balloon nyc	Macy Macy Nyc fashion show ball.	Macy Macy Nyc fashion show ball.	The balloon from the Macy Macy Nyc fashion show.
4	thing today	Today is for today.	Today's thing is for today.	The d&apos thing today is for today.
4	cape member uma band play macy parade	The band member's cape, uma, is now playing at the macy parade.	The band's cape, uma plays the parade macy.	The cape member of the band, uma, plays at the macy parade.
4	approaching easter threatens holiday travel macy thanksgiving day	The approach of Easter is threatening the day; Holiday Thanksgiving.	It's the first day of the holiday season, and it's the last day of the year.	Easter approach threatens holiday day; Holiday thanksgiving.
4	storm threatens holiday travel move east	There is a storm on the island, which threatens the city's future.	A storm threatens vacation travel to and from the island.	A storm threatens holiday travel to the east.
4	storm ground macy thanksgiving day parade	Storm Ground Macy Thanksgiving parade.	The Storm Ground Macy Thanksgiving Day Parade.	Storm Ground Macy thanksgiving day parade.
4	macy parade studio moonachie unveils thanksgiving float	Macy's studioachie parade will unveil the Thanksgiving float.	Macy studioachie moonachie parade unveils the Thanksgiving float.	Macy parade studio moonachie unveils the thanksgiving float.
4	giant macy balloon stay grounded	The Giant Balloon Macy stays on the ground.	The giant Macy ball stays on the ground.	The giant Macy ball stays down.
4	matilda cast prep thanksgiving day parade	Matilda just took part in the Thanksgiving Day parade.	Matilda took part in the Thanksgiving Day parade.	Matilda joined the parade on Thanksgiving Day.
4	local student march macy parade	Local Student Parade of the Macy Parade.	Local student parade macy parade.	Parade local student macy parade.
4	weather threatens travel macy parade balloon	Time's threatening Macy's parade balloons.	Time is threatening Macy's parade balls.	Time throws Macy's parade balloon on the line.
4	high wind ground macy thanksgiving day parade balloon	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.	Ball of parade d' Thanksgiving with great wind and macy floor.	Apos parade ball; Thanksgiving with high wind and macy floor.
4	uma band play macy parade thanksgiving day	This group is playing at the Macy Christmas Parade on Thanksgiving Day.	A band is playing at Macy's Christmas Parade on Thanksgiving Day.	A band plays at Macy's Christmas Parade on Thanksgiving.
4	tiger cheerleader perform macy thanksgiving day parade	Tiger cheerleaders are performing the Thanksgiving macy parade.	Tiger cheerleaders perform the Thanksgiving parade macy.	The cheerleaders perform the Thanksgiving macy parade.
4	thanksgiving wind ground macy balloon	Thanksgiving's Macy Ground Macy ball.	The Macy Ground Macy's Thanksgiving ball.	It's called the Macy Ground Macy Ball of Thanksgiving.
4	fond du lac girl jump macy thanksgiving day parade	It's a fun, fun, fun, fun, fun, fun, fun.	The Lake Girl Hunger jumps macy Thanksgiving day parade.	Lake girl's hungry jump macy Thanksgiving day parade.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade balloon question strong wind	The Dapos Parade Balloon; Thanksgiving Challenge the Strong Wind.	The d&apos parade ball; Thanksgiving action questions the strong wind.	The parade balloon d'apos; Action of grace questions the strong wind.
4	heavy wind ground macy thanksgiving day parade balloon	Parade ball; Thanksgiving action with strong wind.	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.	Parade balloon, d'apos; thanksgiving action, high wind speed.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade performer parade route time	It's Thanksgiving time, itinerary of the Thanksgiving Parade.	C' est l'apos; l&apos time; itinerary of the Thanksgiving Parade.	C' est l'apos; l' route of the parade of the artists of the parade of Thanksgiving.
4	wood high school cheerleader participate macy thanksgiving	Macy's Thanksgiving cheerleaders from secondary woodland schools participate.	High school wood cheerleaders take part in Macy's Thanksgiving.	The wood high school cheerleaders are participating in the Macy Thanksgiving.
4	macy thanksgiving parade	Thanksgiving Macy parade.	Parade Macy Thanksgiving.	Macy thanksgiving parade.
4	high wind threaten macy thanksgiving parade balloon	The strong wind is threatening Macy's Thanksgiving Day parade.	The strong wind is threatening Macy's Thanksgiving parade balloon.	The strong wind is threatening the Thanksgiving parade balloon at Macy's.
4	march wa ham high grad perform macy parade	High-level Ham Walk to the Macy Parade.	High-level ham walk, do the macy parade.	Walk of the high-level ham make the macy parade.
4	detail annual macy thanksgiving day parade	Details of Macy's Annual Thanksgiving Parade.	Details of the annual Macy Thanksgiving Parade.	Details of Macy's annual thanksgiving parade.
4	lakota west high school band march macy thanksgiving day parade	Lakota West High School Music Thanksgiving Parade.	Thanksgiving high school music parade Lakota West.	The Thanksgiving fashion show of high school music Lakota West.
4	framingham alumnus march macy thanksgiving parade	The March of Apostles, Thanksgiving of the elders of the March of Apostles, English Framingham.	The Parade of Apos; Thanksgiving of the Elders of the March of Apostles; English Framingham.	The parade d' Thanksgiving of the elders of the March of Apostles; English Framingham.
4	stuffed digestible guide thanksgiving	Digestable Guide stuffed Thanksgiving dinner.	Digestible guide stuffed with Thanksgiving.	Thanksgiving stuffed digestible guide.
4	county resident set participate macy parade	County residents are also participating in the Macy Parade.	Well, the county residents are participating in the macy parade.	County residents participate in macy parade.
4	strike band br grad play macy thanksgiving day parade	Strike Band Brd playing Macy Thanksgiving Day Parade.	Strike Band Brd to play the Macy Day Day parade.	Band Brd strike play Macy Thanksgiving Day parade.
4	character balloon macy thanksgiving day parade	Macy Macy Macy's Balloon Thanksgiving Day Parade.	Macy Macy Macy's Thanksgiving Day Parade, in a character balloon.	Macy Macy Macy's character balloon Thanksgiving Day Parade.
4	wind ground macy thanksgiving parade balloon york city	Parade ball d' Thanksgiving in windy York City.	It's a great way to get a feel for the city.	Ball of parade d' Thanksgiving on windy ground York City.
4	roxbury student march macy parade	The students at Roxbury College are marching in a macy fashion show.	Roxbury students are marching in macy fashion.	Roxbury students march in macy parade.
4	cold snap linger rain soak nyc holiday nears	It's been a long time since we've had a chance to see the world around us.	Persistent, cold rain in the mountains; water in the mountains; approaching Christmas holidays.	Persistent cold rain in the mountains; water approaching Christmas holidays.
4	high wind ground giant balloon nyc thanksgiving parade	Nyc High Wind Giant Balloon Thanksgiving Parade.	Nyc High Wind Giant Balloon Thanksgiving Parade.	Thanksgiving Parade in a giant balloon with a high wind, Nyc.
4	arctic blustery weather disrupts thanksgiving holiday travel	Windy Weather; Arctic disrupts Thanksgiving Holidays.	The windy weather of the Arctic Ocean disrupts the Thanksgiving holidays.	The rainy Arctic weather disrupts the Thanksgiving holidays.
4	strong wind ground famous balloon thanksgiving parade nyc	The world-famous Thanksgiving Nyc Balloon Wind.	The famous wind balloon parade of Thanksgiving nyc.	The famous balloon wind Thanksgiving parade nyc.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade threatened york notorious	The Macy Thanksgiving Parade was threatening York.	Macy's Thanksgiving parades were threatening York.	Macy's Thanksgiving parade threatened York.
4	local student march macy parade	Local Student Parade of the Macy Parade.	Local student parade macy parade.	Parade local student macy parade.
4	macy parade student cheer	Student cheers for the Macy Parade.	Student Macy Parade cheers.	Macy Parade student cheers.
4	macy thanksgiving day parade cancelled official monitor high speed wind	Macy's Thanksgiving parade canceled official high-speed wind control.	Macy's thanksgiving parade canceled official high-speed wind control.	Macy's Thanksgiving parade cancelled official high-speed wind control.
4	winter weather crimp thanksgiving travel plan	Plan de voyage d' Action de grâces pour le temps hivernale.	Plan of travel; Thanksgiving because of winter weather.	Journey plan; winter weather thanksgiving.
4	retailer staying open thanksgiving holiday	It stays open during Thanksgiving vacations.	The retailer stays open during your Thanksgiving vacation.	The retailer stays open during Thanksgiving.
4	local resident march thanksgiving day parade	Local residents will be marching on Thanksgiving Day.	Local residents march Thanksgiving Day.	Local residents march on thanksgiving day.
5	wes welker blame costly turnover	Wes welker says it's a waste of time and money.	Wes welker blames the high turnover rate.	Wes welker blames costly turnover of staff.
5	patriot beat bronco ot misplayed punt lead yard field goal	The patriot defeated the Red Horse and misplayed the Punt Head Platoon field goal.	The patriot beat the red horse and then played the punt-head platoon field goal badly.	The patriot beat the red horse and played the punt head field goal badly.
5	division leader pat bronco focus hype	Division Chief Pat Bronco focus hype-hype.	Division Chief Pat Bronco focus hype hype.	Head of division Pat Bronco focus hype hype.
5	patriot rally bronco	Bronco patriotic rally.	Bronco patriotic rally.	Gathering bronco patriotic.
5	wes welker helped tom brady beat peyton manning	Wes welker has helped Tom Brady defeat Peyton Manning.	Wes welker helped Tom Brady beat Peyton Manning.	Wes welker helped tom Brady defeat peyton Manning.
5	jump conclusion	Untimely conclusion.	That's a hasty conclusion.	Well, that's an early conclusion.
5	al michael relish latest patriot bronco ti	Al Michael relishes the last knight patriot.	Al Michael relishes the last Patriot Knight.	Al Michael is enjoying the latest Patriot Knight.
5	bronco wr wes welker wait concussion clearance	It's the only way you'll be able to get in touch with someone else.	Bronco wes welker is waiting for the apos; concussion authorization.	Bronco wes welker awaits the apos; concussion authorization.
5	mcdaniels denver friend foe	Friendly enemy McDaniels Denver.	McDaniels Denver friend friendly foe.	McDaniels Denver friend foe friend.
5	tom brady ruthless efficiency vintage performance national stage	Tom Brady ruthless, vintage national performance.	Tom Brady's ruthless vintage performance of the national scene.	Tom Brady ruthless efficiency vintage performance of the national scene.
5	afc championship betting odds bronco patriot lead pack	Afc Championship betting on lead platoon bets from Bronco Patriot.	Afc championship betting on Bronco Patriot lead platoon bets.	An afc championship betting on the Patriot Bronco lead platoon.
5	knowshon moreno fantasy montee ball top waiver option denver bronco	Knowshon moreno fantasy mount ball top option bronco denonco option.	Knowshon moreno fantasy mount ball top option denver bronco option.	Knowshon moreno fantasy mount ball top option denver bronco option.
5	bronco hump day hot read big comeback push pat bronco	On the warm day of the knight's hump read great return Skip from the horse to the donkey.	The hot day of the hump of a knight read great return Skip from horse to donkey.	On the hot day of the hump read great return Go from horse to donkey.
5	kraft belichick wind call classic shocker	The belichick kraft wind calls classic classic shocker.	The belichick kraft wind calls classic shocker classic.	The kraft belichick wind calls classic shocker classic.
5	patriot call overtime preference	Overtime is preferred by patriots.	Patriots prefer overtime.	Patriots prefer overtime hours.
5	danny amendola playing wes welker shadow	Danny amending Wes welker shadow.	Danny amendola playing Wes welker-shadow.	Danny amendola playing Wes welker shadow.
5	patriot improvement third defense	Patriotic Enhancement of Third Defense.	Third defense patriotic upgrade.	Patriotic third defense upgrade.
5	peyton manning rebounding loss test bronco	Peyton Manning bounce back with a bronco loss test.	Hey, Peyton Manning rebounding bronco loss test.	Peyton Manning rebounding loss test bronco.
5	brady manning meet matchup great qbs	Manning meets the big Qbs match.	Brady Manning meets the big Qbs match.	Brady Manning is on his way to meet the big Qbs match.
5	pat peyton manning guessing	Pat Peyton Manning guesses.	Pat Peyton Manning's guessing.	Well, Pat Peyton Manning guesses.
5	patriot bronco score update denver halftime	Patriot Bronco score updated denver mi @-@time.	Patriot Bronco update the score denver mi @-@time.	Patriot Bronco score update denver mi-time.
5	tom brady dane fletcher julian edelman star patriot	Tom Brady Dan Fletcher Julian Delman is a patriotic star.	Tom Brady Dan Fletcher Julian Delman, patriotic star.	Tom Brady Dan Fletcher Julian Delman, star patriot.
5	peyton manning tds	Manning tds.	Peyton Manning Tds.	Peyton manning tds.
5	bet box nfl consumer enjoy black sunday night special	The booth consumer will benefit from the Black Sunday evening special.	The booth consumer will benefit from a special Black Sunday Night.	The booth nfl consumer will enjoy the special Black Sunday evening.
5	bit nfl playoff	J&apos in play-off to the NFL.	J' was in play-off to the NFL.	J' was in play-off to the NFL.
5	bronco hold ball point lead ne	Bronco leads the pack.	Bronco takes lead.	Bronco takes the lead in the lead.
5	pick belichick season patriot coach marked good	Choosing the Patriotic Coach of the Year of Belichick is a good point.	Choosing the apos; patriotic coach of the Belichick season scores the right point.	It's a good point to choose the coach of the season Belichick.
5	bronco patriot tied sunday night classic	Bronco Patriot tied for classic Sunday night.	Bronco Patriot tied Sunday night for classic Sunday night.	Bronco Patriot tied the Sunday night classic Sunday night.
5	conversation tom brady peyton manning	Tom Brady Peyton Manning talk.	Conversation with Tom Brady Peyton Manning.	Uh, conversation with Tom Brady Peyton Manning.
5	wes welker held bronco practice	Wes welker s' coached at the same time.	Wes welker s&apos trained bronco.	Wes welker s' bronco training.
5	brady manning duel	Brady Manning Duel.	Brady muninguel.	Hey, Brady Manning Duel.
5	wes welker praise robert kraft bill belichick	Robert Kraft Bill Belichick we rent.	We're leasing Robert Kraft Bill Belichick.	Well, we're renting Robert Kraft Bill Belichick.
5	brady manning great qb rivalry	Brady's got a lot of rivalry on his hands.	Brady maning great rivalry qb.	Brady manning great rivalry qb.
5	friendly rivalry	Friendly rivalry.	Friendly rivalry.	Uh, friendly rivalry.
5	bronco patriot punt defines matchup brady manning	Bronco patriot punt will define matchup brady manning brady.	Bronco patriot punt defines matchup brady manning brady.	Bronco patriot punt defines matchup brady manning brady.
5	bill belichick better job defending	Bill Belichick better stand up for what he's doing now.	Bill Belichick had better defend his work.	Bill belichick better stand up for his work.
5	bronco wr welker cleared practice	Bronco welker's released the apos; training.	Bronco welker released the pods; training.	Bronco welker released the training.
5	patriot playoff position strong	Patriotic playoff position.	Solid position for the Patriotic Playoffs.	Solid position for patriotic playoffs.
5	tom brady brady lead pat overtime win denver	Tom Brady Brady Pat won extensions in Denver.	Tom Brady Brady Pat, extensions won in Denver.	And Tom Brady Brady Pat wins extensions in Denver.
5	patriot report card simply remarkable	Quite simply, the patriotic newsletter is remarkable.	The patriotic newsletter is simply remarkable.	Patriotic reporting is simply remarkable.
5	consumer enjoy black sunday special	Black Sunday specials are appreciated by consumers.	Consumers appreciate the black Sunday specials.	Consumers enjoy black Sunday specials.
5	bronco wes welker plan comeback route foxborough	Bronco's planning a return on the Foxborough road.	Bronco's predicting a return on the Foxborough road.	Bronco's planning a comeback on the Foxborough road.
5	nfl gameday preview bronco patriot cardinal highlight week	Before-first bronco cardinal cardinal peak week.	Nfl gameday before-first bronco cardinal cardinal peak week.	Nfl gameday before-first week high cardinal bronco cardinal.
5	nfl roundup gostkowski fg pat ot win bronco	Gostkowski gathering fg pat gostkowski to win bronco.	Nb gathering gostkowski fg pat to win bronco.	Nffl rally gostkowski fg pat to win bronco.
5	pat top bronco ot game turnover	Broken fists and game change.	Broken feet and fists and a game change.	Broken feet and fists and game change.
5	patriot bit dangling lure	Patriot has taken the bait.	The patriot has taken the bait.	The patriot took the bait.
5	michael rosenberg tom brady peyton manning remain closer	Michael Rosenberg tom brady peyton manning, stay closer.	Michael Rosenberg tom brady peyton manning remaining closer.	Michael Rosenberg tom brady peyton manning stay closer.
5	wes welker accepts blame bronco muffed punt patriot	Wes welker accept the bronco reprimand stifled patriot punt.	Wes welker accepts the bronco reprimand punt patriot choked.	Wes welker accepts the blame bronco punt patriot stifled.
5	week nfl pick tom brady play second peyton manning	Tom Brady plays Peyton Manning's second game.	Tom Brady played the second game of the NFL's Peyton Manning.	Tom Brady plays the NFL's second Peyton Manning game.
5	bronco unaware wes welker concussion chief game	Bronco subconscious, Wes welker concussion.	Wes welker concussion chief game.	Bronco unconscious Wes welker concussion chief game.
5	morning link pat bronco couple day	Join Pat Bronco on couple's day.	Morning tie Pat Bronco couple's day.	Morning tie Pat Bronco couple day.
5	kiszla bronco buck soft label	Kiszla bronco buck.	Kiszla bronco buck etiquette sweet.	Kiszla bronco buck soft label buck.
5	peyton manning sting	Peyton Manning is a spade.	Peyton Manning sting!	Peyton manning spades.
5	bronco blowing point lead force ot	It's the only thing that's going on in the world.	Bronco point d' explosion of lead force not force.	Bronco point d' lead force explosion no force.
5	tom brady play bill belichick gal	Tom Brady plays Bill Belichick Girl.	Tom Brady's playing Bill Belichick Girl.	Tom Brady plays bill belichick girl.
5	pat bronco takeaway game	Bronco Pat, take-out game.	Pat Bronco, take-out game.	Pat Bronco, game to go.
5	stephen gostkowski fg patriot ot win bronco	Stephen Gostkowski fg, patriot to win bronco.	Stephen Gostkowski fg patriot to win the bronco.	Stephen Gostkowski fg patriot to win bronco.
5	live turnover turn bronco touchdown	We're rolling live, and we're running bronco touchdown.	The live roll-over is running on bronco touchdown.	The live rotation turns bronco touchdown.
5	game note bronco patriot	Bronco Play Note Patriot.	Note game Bronco Patriot.	Uh, game note Bronco Patriot.
5	fast release peyton manning tom brady propelled nfl career	The rapid release of Peyton Manning Tom Brady from prison propelled the NFL's career.	The early release of Peyton Manning Tom Brady propelled the NFL's career.	Peyton Manning's early release Tom Brady propelled the NFL's career to the next level.
5	edelman steal spotlight welker amendola	Edelman is stealing the spotlight from L' Amendola welker.	Edelman steals the spotlight from l' Amendola welker.	Edelman takes the spotlight at the Amendola welker movie.
5	belichick talk controversy lauds bronco offense	Belichick talk controversies rent bronco offense.	Belichick talk controversy rent bronco offense.	The belichick talk controversy rent bronco offense.
5	patriot bronco live tom brady lead overtime win denver instant	Patriotic living Bronco Tom Brady Chief Extensions earn instant denver moment.	Patriotic Bronco living Tom Brady head overtime earn instant denver moment.	Patriotic Bronco living Tom Brady chief overtime win instant denver moment.
5	patriot win bill belichick wind ball	The patriot wins the windball bill belichick.	The patriot will win the bill belichick windball.	The patriot wins the bill belichick wind ball.
5	odds wes welker return sunday strange sight	The chances of coming back from Sunday are very slim.	The chances of us getting back from Sunday are very slim.	Well, the chances of us coming back from Sunday are very slim.
5	bill belichick explains decision wind overtime	Bill Belichick explains that the decision-making winds will work overtime.	Bill Belichick explains that the decision wind works overtime.	Belichick explains that the decision wind works overtime.
5	tom brady dexter morgan snf promo	This is Tom Brady Dexter Morgan Snf class.	Tom Brady Dexter Morgan Snf class.	Tom brady dexter morgan snf class.
5	wes welker probable patriot bronco game	Wes we're likely patriotic bronco game.	Wes wes wes likely patriot game bronco.	Wes wes wees likely bronco game patriot.
5	patriot hit road face houston	Looks like the patriot's on his way to Houston.	The patriot is on his way to Houston.	The patriot took the road against Houston.
5	bronco ground	Bronc terrain.	Terrain bronco.	Uh, bronc terrain.
5	bronco patriot long stats	Long stat Bronco Patriot.	Bronco Patriot... long stats.	Bronco Patriot long stats.
5	watch patriot host denver bronco	Look at the patriotic animator bronco denver.	Watch the patriotic denver bronco animator.	Watch the patriotic denver bronco host.
5	ten thing bronco patriot	Ten things bronco, patriotic thing.	Ten things bronco patriotic thing.	Uh, ten things bronco patriotic thing.
5	degree difficu patriot rally victory bronco sweeter	Hard patriotic rallying bronco victory sweeter.	Kind of hard patriotic bronco victory rally sweeter.	Difficult patriot rallying victory bronco sweeter.
5	sunday morning qb brady manning good	Sunday morning, every morning, bradycardia, all right.	Sunday morning, every morning, bradycardia is in good shape.	Every morning on Sunday morning, bradycardia in good condition.
5	game preview bronco patriot	Preview of the Bronco Patriot Game.	This is a preview of the game, Bronco Patriot.	Bronco Patriot game preview.
5	patriot rally point beat bronco ot	The red horse was beaten by the patriotic rally point.	This patriotic rally point beat the red horse.	Patriotic rally point beat red horse.
5	thing watch tonight bronco	I want to watch tonight, bronco.	Something to watch tonight bronco.	Thing watch tonight bronco.
5	peyton manning succumbs veteran wednesday nfl season	Peyton Manning Sucumbs is a Wednesday NFL veteran.	And Peyton Manning Sucumbs, a veteran of the NFL season on Wednesday.	Peyton Manning Sucumbs NFL season veteran Wednesday.
5	wes welker waste time denver	I think we're wasting time with Denver.	We're wasting time on Denver.	It's a waste of time with Denver.
5	von miller solid play overshadowed ot loss	Miller's sturdy game plan eclipsed the loss.	Miller's solid game eclipsed his loss.	The loss was eclipsed by Miller's solid game.
5	bronco patriot odds england underdog	There is a risk that Bronco Patriote will be defeated by England.	Bronco Patriote might be beaten by England.	It's the first time in the world that Bronco Patriote will be defeated by the United Kingdom.
5	cough cough cough cold help bronco force patriot fumble open	Cough Cough Cough Cold Help Bronco Open Smoking Patriot Force.	Cough cold help bronco open smoke patriot force.	Cough cough cold help bronco patriot smoke open force.
5	playbook previewing bronco patriot cardinal week	Bronco Patriot Cardinal Week Book of Preferences.	The book of choice for Bronco Patriot Cardinal Week.	Here's a handbook from the Bronco Patriot Cardinal Week.
5	peyton manning bronco riding high	Raised Peyton Manning Bronco.	Peyton Manning Bronco's up.	Okay, Peyton Manning Bronco up.
5	patriot storm beat bronco blunder	The knight's fault was beaten by the patriotic storm.	The storm of patriotism beat the knight's fault.	Patriotic storm beat knight's fault.
5	wes welker undergoes concussion test bronco	Wes welker's undergoing a bronco concussion.	Wes welker's undergoing a bronco concussion test.	Wes welker undergoes a concussion test bronco.
5	england patriot game grade tale half	History of the English patriotic game.	Half of it; story of English patriotic game.	Half of it; English patriotic game history.
5	gostkowski fg pat ot win bronco	Gostkowski fg-pat o-win bronco.	Gostkowski fg pat o win bronco?	Gostkowski fg pat o win bronco.
5	patriot impossible	Unable to patronize.	Patriot's impossible.	Well, you can't be a Patriot.
5	tom brady rally patriot peyton manning bronco overtime classic	Tom Brady rally patriot peyton manning bronc classic extension.	Tom Brady rally patriot peyton manning bronco classic.	Tom Brady rally patriot peyton manning bronco classic prolongation.
5	wes welker pass concussion test listed probable bronco patriot	Concussion test showed the Bronco Patriot was probable.	The concussion test showed that the Bronco Patriot is probable.	The concussion test showed the Bronco Patriot was probable.
5	manning brady super bowl nfl week bettor guide	Manning Brady Super Bowl nfl Weekly Guide.	Manning brady Super Bowl nfl week bettor guidebook.	Manning brady super bowl nfl week bettor guide.
5	bronco learned lesson patriot tempo attack	Bronco has learned his lesson... the tempo of patrio patrio attacks patrio.	Bronco's learned the lesson... patrio tempo attacks patrio.	Bronco learned the lesson... patrio tempo attack patrio.
5	week roundup wes welker doubt head blow	We need a week to round up Wes Welker with a questionable blow to the head.	One week to round up Wes Welker, dubious blow to the head.	One week to assemble Wes Welker dubious blow to the head.
5	peyton manning julius thomas wes welker practice bronco	Manning Peyton Julius Thomas s' coach bronco.	Peyton Manning Julius Thomas s' coach bronco.	Peyton Manning Julius Thomas s&apos s&apos.
5	bronco knowshon moreno patriot workhorse	Bronco knows moreno's a patriotic workhorse.	Bronco knows moreno patriotic workhorse.	Bronco knowsshon moreno a patriotic workhorse patriot.
5	bronco patriot week betting odds trend pick	Bronco Patriote Week of Betting on Probability Trends.	Bronco Patriote week of odds odds betting.	Bronco Patriote betting week on the odds trend.
5	patriot victory instant classic	Instant patriotic victory, classic.	Classic instant patriotic victory!	An instant patriotic classic victory.
5	peyton manning top game	This is Peyton Manning Top Game.	You know, Peyton Manning Top Game.	Peyton manning top game.
5	paige epic collapse bronco patriot tough loss swallow	Paige epic patriotic bronco collapse, hard to swallow.	Paige epic patriotic bronco collapse hard loss swallow.	Paige epic collapse bronco patriot hard to swallow.
5	tom brady wes welker definitely playing patriot meet bronco	Tom Brady wel welker played patriot for good, met bronco.	Tom Brady wel welker definitely met bronco as a patriot.	Tom Brady wel wel welker definitely playing patriot meets bronco.
5	peyton manning bronco practice michael huff john boyett debut	Michael Huff Practice Manning Bronco Michael Huff John Boyett debut.	Peyton Manning Bronco pratical Michael Huff John Boyett debut.	It's the first time I've seen Peyton Manning Bronco practicing Michael Huff.
5	nfl week pick brady manning romo manning chief	Nfl week choose head chef brady manning romo manning.	Nffl week select brady manning romo manning chef.	Nfl week choose brady manning romo manning chief manning.
5	robert kraft questioned bill belichick wind call ot	Bill Belichick Wind Call ot.	Robert Kraft questioned Bill Belichick Wind Call.	Robert Kraft questioned Bill Belichick wind call ot.
5	hochman mother nature peyton manning	Hochman, mother-in-law, Peyton Manning.	Hochman, natural mother Peyton Manning.	Hochman, mother nature Peyton Manning.
5	nfl week manning romo ticket manning brady	Nfl week maning romo manning bradydy ticket.	Nffl weekly maning romo ticket manning bradydy.	Nfl week maning romo ticket manning bradydy.
5	manning brady xiv bronco visit pat	Brady Xiv bradycardis visiting Pat Bronco.	Brady xiv bradycardis visiting Pat Bronco.	Brady xiv bradycardis visits pat Bronco.
5	bronco wr welker probable sunday	Sunday is probably the Sunday of Bronco Week.	Sunday is probably Bronco Week Sunday.	Sunday, it's probably the Sunday of bronco week.
5	denver bronco unhappy homecoming	Unhappy Denver Bronco home.	You know, Denver Bronco, miserable homecoming.	Denver Bronco unhappy back home.
5	patriot taught bronco play faster tempo offense	Patriot taught Bronco to speed up.	Patriot taught Bronco to speed up the tempo.	Patriot taught Bronco to get the tempo up.
5	peyton manning manning cold weather struggle continue	Peyton manning cold-blooded manning is fighting cold.	Peyton manning cold manning fighting the cold.	Peyton manning cold cold cold weather manning.
5	patriot captain thought belichick ot decision crazy	The Captain Patriot thought that the decision was crazy.	Patriot Captain thought the decision was crazy.	The captain thought the decision was crazy.
5	peyton manning versus patriot	Manning vs. Patriot.	Peyton Manning vs. Patriot.	Peyton Manning versus Patriot!
5	jonathan kraft dc heard bill belichick bad word	Jonathan Kraft overheard Bill Belichick swearing.	Jonathan Kraft heard Bill Belichick swear.	Jonathan Kraft heard bad words from Bill Belichick.
5	bronco force fumble hold lead	Bronco Force Fumble will hold the lead.	Bronco Force Fumble hold the lead.	Bronco Force Fumble hold lead.
5	bronco hold ball point lead patriot	Bronco, base point-ball, leading patriot.	Bronco, base point,-ball, patriot in the lead.	Bronco, base-ball, patriot in the lead.
5	welker return practice hope play sunday	We'll be back on the road in a few days.	Training welkers return, j' hopes to play Sunday.	It's time for the welkers' return training, j' hope to play on Sunday.
5	wes welker probable bronco injury chief	Wes is probably suffering from a knight-in-chief injury.	Wes probably suffers from a suspected knight-in-chief injury.	Wes is probably suffering from a chief knight's wound.
5	brady patriot send manning bronco earth	Brady Patriot sent men to the land of Bronco.	Brady Patriot's sent men to the land of Bronco.	Well, Brady Patriot sent men to the land of Bronco.
5	division leader focus hype	Division heads are focused on hype.	Division chiefs are focusing on hype and advertising.	Division heads focus on hype.
5	belichick continues applaud patriot resiliency	Belichick will continue to applaud patriotic resilience.	Belichick continues to d' applaud patriotic resilience.	Belichick continues to applaud patriotic resilience.
5	patriot deliver win age	It's a great opportunity for us all to learn from each other.	Patriot deliver the Age of Victory.	Patriot deliver the apos; age of victory.
5	injury roundup good bronco te julius thomas	Injuries bring together the right bronco, julius, thomas.	The wounds bring together the right bronco te julius thomas.	The wounds gather the good bronco te julius thomas.
5	wes welker practice bronco step closer playing sunday night	Wes welker, practicing bronco, ain't any closer to playing Sunday night.	Wes welker practicing bronco ain't any closer to playing Sunday night.	Wes welker practicing bronco no closer to playing Sunday night.
5	brady low uncatchable pas time	Brady low pass-timeless.	Brady bass uncatchable passes-time untimely.	Brady low uncatchable pass-time untimely.
5	usa today sport week nfl prediction	It's a good thing that you'll be able to do.	We are now using this week as a prediction week.	Use today; week of sport nf prediction nf.
5	joel dreessen bronco turn dreessen tamme jt	I'm afraid of being rude and scared of them.	I'm afraid of being bronco and dapos, afraid of being tamed.	I'm scared of being bronco and d'apos; scared of being tamed.
5	patriot cornerback rise occasion win bronco	Patriot cornerback-up opportunity to win bronco.	Patriot cornerback up opportunity to win bronco.	Patriot cornerback up bronco win opportunity.
5	welker probable bronco game england	Possible sea lion Bronco in England.	Bronco likely sea lion in England.	Probable sea lion bronco in England.
5	pat philosophy playing hard matter score pay comeback win	Hard-matter philosophy, back to square one.	Hard-matter philosophy, back to basics.	Philosophy of hard matter, back to square one.
5	bronco doubt demaryius thomas	Bronco has doubts about demaryius thomas.	Bronco doubts demaryius thomas?	Bronco's doubt demaryius thomas.
5	belichick defense disguise thing going long day	The day-long belichick defense disguise.	Oh, the belichick defense disguise that lasts all day.	The belichick defense disguise that lasts all day.
5	nfl capsule	Nibs.	Maple pad.	Uh, capsule nfl.
5	tom brady outplays peyton manning head head matchup	Tom Brady plays more than Peyton Manning Head Matchup.	Tom Brady's playing more than Peyton Manning Head Matchup.	Tom Brady plays more than peyton manning head matchup.
5	concussion symptom bronco wes welker	Bronco wes welker.	Symptom of concussion, bronco wes welker.	Uh, concussion pattern, bronco wes welker.
5	road greatness tom brady peyton manning	Tom Brady Road mileage Peyton manning.	Tom Brady Road Grandmaster Peyton manning.	Grand road Tom Brady Peyton manning.
5	coming defense	Here comes the defense.	Okay, defense's on their way.	The defense is coming!
5	thing watch nfl	Let's see.	That's what we'll see.	I'm sorry, but I don't think we should.
5	gostkowski fg patriot ot win bronco	Gostkowski fg-patriot to win bronco.	Gostkowski fg patriot to win bronco.	Gostkowski fg patriot to win bronco.
5	julius thomas status bronco patriot question	The patriotic knight, Jules Thomas, questions the patriot.	Jules Thomas, a Knight Patriot, questions the patriot.	Jules Thomas, a Knight Patriot, asks questions about the status of the patriot.
5	peyton manning disappointing day fantasy owner patriot	Peyton manning disappointing day... fantastic patriotic owner.	Peyton manning disappointing fantastic patriotic owner day.	Peyton manning disappointing day fantastic patriotic owner.
5	patriot bronco game delivers special finish	The Bronco Patriotic Game has a special finish.	The game of patriotic bronco has a special finish.	The bronco game of patriotism has a special finish.
5	bill belichick explains patriot wind ot win	Bill Belichick explains that the winner of the race is not the patriot.	Belichick explains that the patriot does not win.	Bill Belichick explains that the patriot doesn't win.
5	patriot rally big deficit beat bronco overtime	Grand Deficit Patriotic Gathering defeated Bronco overtime.	Grand Deficit Patriotic Gathering Bronco overtime beaten.	Patriotic rally big deficit beaten Bronco overtime.
5	legacy check manning brady	Brady test; heredity handling brady brady.	Test d' heredity handling brady brady.	D&apos test; heredity handling brady brady.
5	bill belichick bronco shut guy	Bill Belichick Bronco closed the guy down.	Bill Belichick Bronco shut the guy down.	Bill Belichick Bronco shut the guy down!
5	best worst bronco patriot	The Bronco's finest patriot.	You know, the best patriot in the Bronco.	The best patriot in the Bronco.
5	welker attends bittersweet reunion	Welker returns bitterly and softly.	Welker witnessed a bitter and sweet reunion.	Well, Welker is witnessing a bitter and sweet reunion.
5	live peyton manning bronco lead	Peyton eating bronco lead.	Living Peyton eating lead bronco.	Living Peyton eating bronco lead.
5	armchair quarterback guide nfl week	Quarterback guide, week-end.	Guide quarterback chair nfl week.	Quarterback chair guide nfl week.
5	josh mcdaniels left mark denver	Josh McDaniels has left the Denver mark.	Josh McDaniels left Denver mark.	Josh McDaniels left the mark Denver.
5	bronco prove elite running game style	It's not a game, it's a game, it's a game, it's a game.	Bronco will prove that it's not just a game, it's an elite game.	Bronco will prove that it's not a game but an elite game.
5	peyton manning bronco practice expected	Peyton Manning Bronco was waiting for bronc training to begin.	Peyton Manning Bronco s' was waiting at a bronco practice.	Peyton Manning Bronco s' expected bronc training.
5	impress peyton manning wes welker	Impress Peyton Mannning Wes welker.	Impress Peyton Mannning Wes welker.	And impress Peyton Mannning Wes welker.
5	bronco injury peyton manning wes welker julius thomas practice thursday	Peyton, injured spinal cord, coached on Thursday at the school with Julius Thomas.	Peyton, wounded in the spine, s' coached Thursday at the school with Julius Thomas.	He is the youngest of three children, and his father is the youngest of three.
5	best nfl brady lead pat huge comeback win	Best brady pat brady great big victory comeback.	Best nfl brady pat brady great big win.	Best brady pat nfl brady great comeback ever.
5	tom brady outshines peyton manning matter	Tom Brady eclipses Peyton Menning Matter.	Tom Brady's eclipsing Peyton Menning Matter.	And Tom Brady eclipses Peyton Menning Matter.
5	dropping ball	Falling ball.	That's a freefall.	We got a freefall.
5	patriot win overtime thriller bronco	Patriot wins Extensions of the Bronco thriller.	Patriot's winning the Bronco thriller overtime.	Patriot wins the Bronco thriller overtime game.
5	patriot clutch	Patriotic clutch.	Engaging patriotic clutch.	Okay, it's a patriotic clutch.
5	julian edelman outshines wes welker danny amendola patriot comeback	Julian edelman eclipses Jeanne d'apos's patriotic return.	Julian edelman eclipses the patriotic return of Joan d' Arc.	Julian edelman eclipses patriotic return of Jeanne d' Arc.
5	bronco patriot prop elite signal caller renew rivalry primetime	Bronco Patriote d'apos; elitist call for talent; elitist call for talent; elitist call for talent renews prime-time rivalry.	Bronco patriote d'apos; elitist appeal d'apos; elite repeat prime-time rivalry.	Bronco patriote d' elitist call from abroad; elites renew rivalry in prime time.
5	peyton manning face cold weather bronco patriot	Peyton Manning faces the coldest times Bronco Patriot.	Peyton Manning faces Bronco Patriot cold weather.	Peyton Manning faces cold weather Bronco Patriot.
5	tom brady beat manning bronco freeze clutch video	Tom Brady Beat Bronco Manning Bronco Glacier Clutch video.	Tom Brady Beat Manning Bronco Glacier Video clutch.	Tom Brady Beat Manning Bronco Glacier clutch video.
5	wes welker bringing bronco return england	Wes welker's taking Bronco back to England with him.	Well, Wes welker's taking Bronco back to England.	Wes welker takes Bronco back to England.
5	amendola shrug comparison welker	It represents a different point of view from that of others.	It's a different thing; it's a different point of view than others.	It is important to note that this is a different perspective than that of the others.
5	patriot rich history bronco	Rich Patriot bronco story story.	Patriot rich story bronco story.	Patriot rich history bronco story.
5	knowshon moreno injury running suffers ankle injury patriot	Knowshon moreno run wound suffers from wounds to the patriotic ankle wound.	Knowshon moreno injury runner suffers from injury to the patriotic ankle injury.	Knowshon moreno running injury suffers from patriotic ankle injury injury.
5	brady manning face wackiest game season	Brady manning against the craziest season.	Brady manning face the wildest season of the game.	Brady manning face the craziest play season ever.
5	manning brady debating elite qb top game	Manning brady's elitist debate game qb top game.	Manning brady elitist debate qb top game.	Manning brady elitist qb top game debate.
5	peyton manning struggle continue cold	Peyton Manning continues her cold-blooded struggle.	Peyton Manning continues the cold fight.	Peyton Manning will continue the cold war.
5	patriot bronco offense	Bronco Patriot offends.	Patriote Bronco offends.	Hey, Patriot Bronco offends.
5	tom brady expects wes welker play sunday	Tom Brady s' waits for Wes Welker Sunday.	Tom Brady s' waits for Wes Welker to play next Sunday.	Tom Brady s' expects that Wes Welker will play on Sunday.
5	manning brady classic ruin	Manning Brady, classic, ruins.	Classic Manning Brady ruins.	Manning Brady classic ruins.
5	tom brady win england patriot mental toughness	Tom Brady wins the Apos; Britain Patriotes Patriotic Mental Endurance.	Tom Brady wins the Apos; England patriotes patriotic mental endurance.	Tom Brady wins the Apos; England is a patriot with a patriotic mental endurance.
5	tom brady peyton manning going strong	Tom Brady Peyton Manning is fine.	Tom Brady Peyton Manning's very well.	Tom brady peyton manning is doing great.
5	bill belichick break pre snap disguise peyton	Bill Belichick breaks before dressing up as Peyton.	Well, Bill Belichick took a break before he dressed up as Peyton.	Bill Belichick break before he dressed up as Peyton.
5	patriot player shocked belichick kicked overtime	Shocked Patriot Belichick kicked in the overtime.	Shocked Patriot player Belichick kicked the ball in overtime.	Shocked patriot Belichick kicked in overtime.
5	england patriot factor focus	It is the first of its kind in the world, and the second of its kind.	The apostles emphasize the patriotic factor of the Apostles; England.	The emphasis is on the patriotic factor of England.
5	bill belichick sound decision	Good call, Bill Belichick.	Bill Belichick, good call.	Hey, Bill Belichick, good call.
5	wes welker return practice appears track bronco fantasy owner	Wes welker backpacks seems to be the most fanciful knight-owner track.	Wes welker return to practicality seems to be the fanciful track of knighthood owner.	Wes welker return practice seems to be the knight-owner's fantasy track.
5	wes welker factor real	The wes welker-factor is real.	The factor wes welker is real.	The wes welker factor is real.
5	julius thomas status good bronco fantasy owner report	Jules Thomas's status is a good record of the imaginary Bronco owner.	The status of Thomas is a good report on the imaginary owner of Bronco.	Thomas's status is a good report on the imaginary owner of Bronco.
5	wes welker return england definitely excited	I'd like to thank you for coming to London.	Wes welker return the' England definitely excited.	Wes welker return the' England definitely excited.
5	report wes welker suffers concussion status patriot game doubt	Wes welker is reported to be suffering from a severe concussion, a dubious patriotic game.	Wes welker is reported to be suffering from concussion, dubious patriotic gambling.	It is reported that Wes welker suffers from a concussion, a game of patriotic dubiousness.
5	bronco patriot point spread pick england rare underdog	Bronco Patriot is a popular name for a rare, oppressed England.	Bronco patriot dot rare oppressed England draw.	Bronco patriot point widespread draw England rare oppressed.
5	tom brady best peyton manning	Tom Brady's the greatest Peyton Manning ever.	Tom Brady is the best Peyton Manning ever.	Tom Brady is the best peyton Manning ever.
5	wes welker neck concussion practice	Wes Welker's neck-shock training.	Practice on Wes Welker's neck concussion.	Wes welker's neck concussion training.
5	tom brady reminds week peyton manning	It's Peyton Manning Week again.	Tom Brady's recalling Peyton Manning Week.	Uh, Tom Brady's calling Peyton Manning Week again.
5	peyton manning return frigid bronco practice wes welker limited	Peyton Menning returns frigid bronco-training wes welker limited.	Peyton Menning comes back frigid bronco training wes welker limited.	Peyton Menning returns frigid bronco training wes welker limited.
5	patriot feeling cornered	Being a stuck-up patriot.	The feeling of being a trapped patriot.	The feeling of being a patriot in a corner.
5	manning struggle continue cold	This is a very important issue.	That is a very important issue.	It's a very important issue, and it's a very important one.
5	live patriot alfonzo dennard aqib talib mix time	The living patriot, alfonzo dennard aqib talib, blends time.	The living patriot alfonzo dennard aqib talib blends time.	Living patriot alfonzo dennard aqib talib mixes time.
5	wes welker blame bronco loss patriot	Wes welker blamed bronco's patriotic loss.	Wes welker blamed bronco patriotic loss.	Wes welker blames bronco loss of patriotism.
5	track tom brady peyton manning rivalry	Track down Tom Brady Peyton in his male rivalry.	Hunt down Tom Brady Peyton in his male rivalry.	Well, track down Tom Brady Peyton in his male rivalry.
5	peyton manning snf forecast low temp mph wind	Peyton Manning snf forecasts a low-temperature mi-height wind.	Peyton Manning snf forecasts a low-temperature wind at mi-heights.	Peyton Manning snf forecasts low temperature wind at mi-height.
5	belichick play better	I think Belichick plays better.	Belichick is a much better player.	Belichick's a better player.
5	wes welker practice excited sunday	On Sundays, we train with enthusiasm.	On Sundays, we all practice with enthusiasm.	On Sundays, we practice enthusiastically.
5	tom brady best peyton manning classic comeback	Tom Brady, classic Peyton Manning comeback.	This is Tom Brady, the best classic comeback ever made by Peyton Manning.	Tom Brady, Peyton Manning's best classic comeback ever.
5	perk daily deal	L' advantage, c' l' offers daily.	L' advantage, c' is l' daily offer.	L' advantage, c' daily offer.
5	patriot stopping peyton manning start keeping field	Patriot taking down Peyton Manning is starting to keep the field wide open.	Well, Patriot arresting Peyton Manning is starting to keep the field clear.	Patriot stopping Peyton Manning starts keeping the field wide open.
5	kickin kiz bench peyton manning play brock osweiler yeah	Kick in kiz bench peyton manning to play Brock osweiler yeah.	Kick it in the kiz bench peyton manning play Brock osweiler yeah.	Kick in kiz bench peyton manning play brock osweiler yeah.
5	robert kraft questioned bill belichick decision wind	Robert Kraft questioned Belichick's decision.	Robert Kraft has questioned Bill Belichick's decision.	Robert Kraft questioned the decision of Bill Belichick.
5	al michael relish latest brady manning showdown	Al Michael relishes the latest power struggle brady manning.	Al Michael relishes the latest brady manning strength challenge.	Al Michael relishes the latest brady manning showdown.
5	jonathan comey gillette stadium pick brady manning	"Jonathan Comey Gillette Stadium chose ""brady manning brady."""	Jonathan Comey Gillette chose brady manning brady Stadium.	Jonathan Comey Gillette Stadium chose brady manning brady.
5	week nfl	NFL week.	It's NFL Week.	This is NFL Week.
5	patriot practice patience comeback win	Patriot practice, patience comeback win.	Patriot practice patience comeback win.	Patriot practice patience comeback win it.
5	hochman nfl concussion protocol failed bronco wes welker	Hochman's concussion protocol just failed at Bronco Wes welker.	Hochman's concussion protocol failed Bronco Wes welker.	Hochman's concussion protocol failed in Bronco Wes welker.
5	final bounce benefit patriot	The final rebound benefits the patriot.	That final rebound will benefit the patriot.	The patriot will benefit from the final rebound.
5	kallas wear tear manning beat brady denver	Kallas wears heart-wrenching clothes beating Brady Denver.	Kallas was wearing heart-wrenching clothes beating Brady Denver.	Well, Kallas is wearing heart-wrenching clothes when he beats Brady Denver.
5	bronco wr wes welker practice day concussion	Bronco Wes welker, practicing daytime concussion of concussion.	Bronco Wes welker practice daytime concussion from concussion.	Bronco Wes welker practice day concussion concussion concussion.
5	live patriot turnover quarter	Patriots walking around alive.	It's like a quarter rotation of living patriots.	One-quarter turnover of living patriots.
5	patriot divorce wes welker bronco	Patriot's divorcing Wes welker bronco.	Patriot divorces wes welker bronco.	Patriot divorce welker bronco wes welker.
5	wes welker injury bronco te probable play fantasy owner	Wes welker bruise bronco likely game fancy owner.	Wes welker hurt bronco probably game fantasy owner.	Wes welker injury bronco likely proprietary game fantasy.
5	patriot top bronco ot thriller	Top bronc and thriller patriot.	Patriot top bronco and thriller?	Patriot top bronco and thriller.
5	bronco wes welker gotta better job botched punt	Bronco-Wes @ Wes-Wes @ Wes-Wes @ Wes-Wes-Wes @ @ @ We @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ E @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ E @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ E @ @ S @ @ @ S @ @ @ E- @ @ S @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @	Bronco-Wes @ @ Wes-Wes @ Wes-Wes-Wes @ Wes-Wes @-We @ @ @ @ @ @ @ E @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ E @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ E @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ S @ @ E @ S @ @ S @ S @ @ @ E- @ S @ @ S @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S@ E- @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @	Bronco-Wes-Wes @ Wes-Wes-Wes-Wes-Wes-Wes @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ E- @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ S @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @
5	patriot stun bronco big rally win ot	Trojan horse patriotic rally.	Patriotic rally against the trojan horse.	A patriotic rally against the Trojan horse.
5	nfl week pick giant cowboy bronco beat patriot	Week NFL choose cow giant-bronco boy beating patriot.	NFL choose the giant cow-boy bronco beating patriot.	Week NFL choose the giant cow-bronco bronco beat patriot.
5	patriot big brady comeback cast doubt bronco	The bradycardic patriot's return has raised doubts among the wild horses.	The return of the bradycardic patriot left wild horses in doubt.	The return of the patriot bradycardia has sown doubt among wild horses.
5	bill belichick disguising defense denver key	Bill Belichick dressing up as the Denver Key defense.	Bill Belichick, disguising the Denver Key defense.	Bill Belichick disguising the defense Denver Key.
5	pat pull biggest comeback top bronco ot	It's the first time I've ever seen a team of broncos.	Biggest comeback ever, the bronco team.	This is the biggest comeback ever for the bronco team.
5	welker bounced	The welder bounce.	Well, the welder bounced.	Welder bounced back.
5	dealing injury pat defense face manning	We're launching the wounded paw defense.	Launching the wounded paw defense.	Launching defense of the wounded man's leg.
5	bronco eye england patriot	You're a patriotic British Bronco-Eye.	I mean, a patriotic English eye Bronco.	Patriot british eye bronco.
5	patriot storm beat denver bronco	The patriotic storm has beaten the denver bronco.	Patriotic storm has beaten denver bronco.	Patriotic storm beat denver bronco.
5	eck bacon brady point em	Eck, bacon, brady, dot em.	Eck bacon brady dot em.	Eck bacon brady point em.
5	week nfl matchup	Week-end match @-@up nfl.	Match @-@up of the week nfl.	Match @-@up nfl week.
5	peter king sportsman denver bronco peyton manning	Peter King is a professional sportsman, and he's a professional sportsman.	Peter King sports denver bronco peyton manning.	Peter King sportsman denver bronco peyton manning.
5	qb duel materialized	It's the only way we're going to make it happen.	The duel of qb s&apos is materialized.	The qb s&apos duel materializes.
5	bronco patriot game preview manning brady square	It's called the Bronco Patriot Game Preview manning brady square.	Bronco Patriot game preview manning brady square.	Bronco Patriot game preview manning brady square.
5	paige great scott patriot win	Big Scott Patriot wins the game.	And the great Scott Patriot wins.	The great Scott Patriot wins.
5	peyton manning sits practice	Peyton Manning s&apos coach.	Peyton Manning s' coach.	Peyton manning s' coach.
5	week nfl quick hit brady win battle arm stren wind	Week nfl strikes fast Brady win arm of the battle strong wind.	Week nfl hit fast brady win arm of battle strong wind.	The week nfl hits fast hit brady win arm of battle strong wind.
5	brady manning cold wind tv	Brady manning windschill brady tv.	Brady manning winds cold tv brady.	Brady manning cold wind tv brady.
5	tom brady peyton manning matchup	Manning's Tom Brady Peyton Match.	Tom Brady Peyton Match from Manning.	Tom brady peyton match from manning.
5	nbc ready brady manning duel incognito test network	NBC lend brady manning duel brady manning incognito test network incognito ready.	NBC loan brady manning duel incognito test network ready.	NBC ready brady manning duel incognito test network ready.
5	bill belichick decision wind start patriot bronco overtime	Bill Belichick decides bronco winds patrio overtime departure patriotic.	Bill Belichick decides wind patrio bronco overtime patriotic departure.	Bill Belichick decides wind patrio bronco overtime departure patriot.
5	peyton manning tom brady real bronco season	Peyton Manning Tom Brady, true bronco season.	Peyton Manning Tom Brady... a real bronco season.	Peyton milling tom brady, real bronco season.
5	wes welker bit weird playing patriot	Wes Welker is kind of a weirdo being a patriot.	Wes Welker got a little weird playing patriot.	Wes Welker's a bit weird playing patriot.
5	bronco patriot wes welker mishap help england win	We are proud to be a part of the world and we are proud to be a part of it.	Bronco patriot wes welker mishap to help England win.	Bronco patriot wes welker mishap help Apostles; England to win.
5	halftime analysis bronco patriot	Half-Times Bronco Patriot.	Analysis at mi-times Bronco Patriot.	Scan @-time @ Bronco Patriot.
5	unconventional preview patriot bronco	This is an unconventional, patriotic bronco preview.	Preview unconventional patriotic bronco.	This is an unconventional preview of the patriotic bronco.
5	live von miller return stevan ridley fumble touchdown	Miller returned to the Stevan Ridley Fumble Touchdown.	Von Miller returns to the Fumble Touchdown Stevan Ridley.	Von miller goes back to the stevan ridley fumble touchdown.
5	wes welker return practice bronco	Well, Wes welker are back to practicing bronco.	Wes welker are returning to bronco practice.	Wes welker return to practice bronco.
5	brady lead epic comeback patriot stun manning bronco ot	Bravo epic epic epic epic return stunning bronco man to the head.	Epic epic epic patriotic dizzying bronco man returns to the head.	Bravo epic epic epic epic patriotic comeback stunning bronco man to the head.
5	patriot key win bronco	The Patriot Key wins bronco.	Patriot key wins bronco.	The patriot key wins bronco.
5	bronco lot patriot	Patriotic bronze lottery.	Bronco patriotic lot.	Patriotic bronco lottery.
5	patriot bronco plan ice	It's a patriotic plan, bronco ice.	Patriotic bronco ice cream plan.	Patriotic plan bronco ice cream.
5	pick memorable brady manning matchup	Choose a memorable game of brady manning.	Go pick a memorable brady manning match.	Pick a memorable brady manning match.
5	tom brady patriot storm bronco ot	This is Tom Brady Patriot Bronco.	Tom Brady Patriot Bronco.	Tom brady patriot storm bronco.
5	bronco patriot capsule	Bronco Patriot's patriotic capsule.	This is a patriotic capsule by the Bronco Patriot.	Patriot capsule by Bronco Patriot.
5	nfl injury roundup manning welker practice peterson ready week	We're practicing Peterson's crew on week-end.	Nfl injury rally of l' welker crew week-old Peterson practice.	Nffl injury rally of l' welker crew practice Peterson ready week.
5	planning success belichick wind	Planning Your Success Belichick Wind.	Planning the success of Belichick Wind.	Planning success Belichick Wind.
5	patriot defense counted	It was a patriotic defense.	Patriotic defense was important to me.	Patriotic defense mattered.
5	unorthodox ot move confused player paid patriot	What is unorthodox is that the player has paid the patriot.	What's unorthodox is that the player paid off the patriot.	What's unorthodox is that the player paid the patriot.
5	game clock failed england patriot	L' clock missed out on the English patriot.	L' clock missed the English patriot.	And the clock has failed the English patriot.
5	patriot stun bronco overtime	You know, Patriot, he's going to kill the bronco overtime.	Patriot to stun bronco overtime.	Patriot stun bronco overtime.
5	wes welker blame mistake bronco loss	Wes welker blames bronco error loss.	Wes welker blames mistake bronco loss.	Wes welker blames mistake bronco loss.
5	peyton manning playoff form patriot good	Peyton Manning's playoffs are a great patriot.	The Peyton Manning playoffs are a good patriot.	Peyton Manning's playoffs are a good patriot.
5	wes welker cleared play patriot	Wes welker's playing the patriotic game.	Well, Wes welker played the patriotic game.	Wes welker played the patriotic game.
5	tom brady peyton manning headline historic patriot bronco game	Tom Brady Peyton Manning on the front page History Patriote Bronco Game.	Tom Brady Peyton Manning on the front page of The History of the Bronco Game.	"Tom Brady Peyton Manning on the front page of the game, ""History of the Bronco Game."""
5	tom brady wes welker definitely play sunday	Tom Brady Wes welker's definitely playing on Sunday.	Tom Brady Wes welker is definitely playing on Sunday.	Tom Brady Wes welker will definitely play on Sunday.
5	patriot owner robert kraft shocked bill belichick wind ball	Patriot Robert Kraft shocked Belichick.	And patriot Robert Kraft shocked Bill Belichick.	Patriot Robert Kraft shocked bill Belichick.
5	peyton manning tom brady adept adapting	Peyton Manning Tom Brady is a follower of adaptation.	Peyton Manning Tom Brady is a fan of the adaptation.	Peyton Manning Tom Brady is one of the most experienced writers in the field.
5	patriot bronco	Bronco patriot.	Patriot bronco.	Hey, Patriot Bronco.
5	wes welker anticipated return head	Wes welker s' was just waiting for his head to come back.	Wes welker s&apos, waited for his head to come back.	Wes welker s' waited for his head to come.
5	litke qb duel materialized	The QB Duel s&apos is materialized.	The duel of QB s&apos is materialized.	The QB s&apos duel materializes.
5	patriot underdog time	Oppressed patriots time.	The time of oppressed patriots, of course.	The time of oppressed patriots.
5	bronco patriot stats	Patriot stats.	Bronco Patriot stats!	Bronco patriot stats.
5	bronco patriot preview	Preview Bronco patriot.	Bronco patriot previews.	Bronco patriot preview.
5	patriot defeat bronco overtime big rally	Patriot to beat Bronco Extension Grand Rally.	Patriot to beat Bronco overtime big rally.	Patriot beat Bronco overtime big rally.
5	wes welker demaryius thomas tough matchup patriot julius	This is what you get for your patriotic matchup.	Wes welker demaryius thomas for patriot matchup julius.	Wes welker demaryius thomas patriot julius matchup thomas.
5	patriot considered best team afc comeback victory	Patriot has considered the best afc team comeback victory.	Patriot considered the best team comeback afc victory.	Patriot considered the best team afc comeback victory.
5	wes welker expects ready patriot	Wes welker is waiting for a new generation of patriots.	Wes welker waiting for a patriot ready to go to work.	Wes welker awaits a patriot ready to work.
5	wes welker blame botched punt sunday night	Wes welker blames Punt for sloppy timing on Sunday night.	Wes welker blames sloppy Punt on Sunday night.	Wes welker blames sloppy Punt Sunday night.
5	welker return practice hope play despite concussion	Practice on the welkers' return, a game of d' hope in spite of the welker's concussion.	Training the welkers back, game d'apos; hope despite concussion.	Welkers return training, d&apos game; hope despite concussion.
5	dennis dillon bronco patriot cowboy giant week attend	Dennis Dylan Bronco Patriot Cow-giant boy will also be attending the week.	Dennis Dylan Bronco Patriot Cow-giant boy will be in attendance.	Dennis Dylan Bronco Patriot Cow-giant boy will attend week.
5	fantasy football projection week bronco patriot featuring peyton	Patriot Bronco Fantastic Football Projection Week with Peyton as the star.	This week's Fantastic Football Projection Bronco Patriot with Peyton as the star player.	Bronco Patriote fantasy football screening week starring Peyton.
5	wes welker transition brady manning smooth swift	Wes welker brady transition smooth and fast manning brady.	Wes welker transition brady manning smooth and fast.	Wes welker transition brady manning smooth and fast.
5	welker return practice day sustaining concussion	The welkers' return training was marked by a concussion.	The day of the welkers' return training was marked by a concussion.	The day of departure; welker return training has been marked by a concussion.
5	patriot defense earns praise big second half	The patriotic defense movement is to be praised for its second half-time.	Patriotic defense deserves praise for its second mi-time.	The patriotic defense deserves praise for its second half @-@time.
5	patriot captain thought bill belichick overtime decision crazy	The Patriotic Captain thought Bill Belichick's decision to work overtime was foolish.	The patriotic captain thought Bill Belichick's decision to work overtime was crazy.	The patriotic captain thought Bill Belichick's overtime decision was crazy.
5	patriot stun bronco ot historic rally	Patriot knock out bronco and rallying history.	Patriot to knock out bronco and historic rally.	Patriot knock out bronco and historic rally.
5	peyton manning tom brady matchup hand	Peyton manning brady handup tomning brady matchup.	Peyton manning tomning brady matchup handy.	Peyton manning tom brady matchup handup.
5	wes welker track face pat	Wes welker face-pat-pat.	Uh, Wes welker face pat pat pat.	Wes welker face pat pat-pat.
5	wr wes welker active bronco patriot	Wes wes wes active bronc patriot patriot.	Wes wes wes active bronco patriot patriot.	We are active bronco patriot patriot.
5	bronco mailbag wes welker beating flag	Bronco e-mailbags wes welker, flying a flag.	Bronco e-mailbag wes welker beating flag.	Bronco mailbag wes welker beating flag.
5	fourth bill belichick understands overtime packer	The 4th belichick ticket includes the extra hours packer.	The fourth belichick ticket includes the extra hours packer.	The fourth belichick ticket includes packer overtime.
5	patriot rally wild overtime win bronco	Wild patriotic gathering extensions earn bronco.	Wild rally patriotic overtime win bronco.	Patriotic rally wild overtime win bronco.
5	wes welker del rio wes welker definitely play	We are what the river is we are what definitively play.	It's what you want from the game that you want to play definitively.	Wes wes welker of the river wes what definitively play.
5	peyton manning tom brady pretty comparing career playoff game	Peyton Manning Tom Brady compared the playoffs of his career.	Peyton Manning Tom Brady compared the playoffs of his career.	Peyton Manning Tom Brady has been comparing the playoffs of his career.
5	wes welker practicing wednesday fantasy owner wait concussion	Wes welker practises Wednesday's fantasy of waiting for a concussion.	Wes welker practice Wednesday fantasy owner expecting concussion.	Wes welker practicing Wednesday fantasy owner expecting concussion.
5	patriot wes return business meeting	Patriot Wes goes back to business.	Patriot Wes goes back to his business meeting.	Patriot Wes goes back to his business meeting.
5	greg cote peyton manning tom brady qb matchup age	Greg Peyton, Tom Brady, Age of the Apos; match.	Greg scores Peyton, Tom Brady qb, age of the apos; match.	Greg likes Peyton, Tom Brady, age of the match.
5	takeaway patriot bronco game	Take-away patriotic knight game.	A game of Knights of Columbus to take with you.	Patriotic knight game to go.
5	kiszla peyton manning tom brady oldie goody	Kiszla Peyton manning Tom Brady Goody.	Kiszla Peyton is manning Tom Brady Goody.	Kiszla peyton manning tom brady goody.
5	bronco injury wes welker pass concussion protocol julius thomas	Bronco injury wes welker passes the protocol of concussion julius thomas.	Bronco injury wes welker passes the concussion protocol julius thomas.	Bronco injury wes welker passes concussion protocol julius thomas.
5	julius thomas injury bronco te patriot	Julius Thomas wounded Bronco the patriot.	Julius Thomas hurt Bronco the patriot.	Well, Julius Thomas wounded the patriot Bronco.
5	patriot rally edge bronco overtime	Wild horses are a patriotic rally.	Patriotic rally in favor of wild horses.	Patriotic rally for wild horses!
5	bill belichick stuck patriot plan bronco	Bill Belichick trapped bronco patriotic plan.	Bill Belichick stuck patriotic bronco plan.	Bill Belichick stuck bronco patriotic plan.
5	patriot hobbling secondary deal peyton manning nfl best	Patriot hobbing second-string peyton manning nfl.	Patriot hobbing second deal Peyton manning nfl better.	Patriot hobbing second deal peyton manning nfl better.
6	psalm book fetch record ny auction ktvn channel reno	Psalm book fetch record ny encan ktvn file channel reno ktvn.	Psalm book fetch record ny encan ktvn channel reno ktvn.	Psalm book fetch record ny encan ktvn channel reno ktvn.
6	book record york auction	York auction record.	Record auction in York.	A record auction in York.
6	update book printed america sell record	Upgrade books printed in the United States to sell some discs.	Updates books printed in America sell discs.	American printed update books sell discs.
6	bay psalm book expensive printed work	Baysalm book, expensive print work.	Bay Psalm Book, an expensive print job.	Bay psalm book, expensive print jobs.
6	expensive book sell	They're selling overpriced books.	Sale of overpriced books.	Overpriced book sales.
6	hub church psalm book sell	The Book of Psalm of the Hub Church sells.	The book of psalm of l' church hub sells.	The apos psalm book; hub church sells.
6	psalm book fetch record york auction	Psalm delivers go for York Record York auction.	Psalm pound go get York record auction york.	Psalm book go get York record york auction.
6	sale bay psalm book fetch south church	The Psalm Book of the Sales Bay is looking for the Southern church.	The Bay of Sales Psalm Book is looking for the south church.	The book of the psalm of the bay of sales goes looking for the church of the south.
6	rare psalm book sell	There is a sale of a rare book of psalms.	You know, a rare book of psalms sells.	A rare psalm book sells.
6	book printed sell record	Book-printed discs sold.	You can buy printed records of books.	Sales of printed book records.
6	expensive book auctioned	Expensive, auctioned-off book.	It was an expensive book that was sold at auction.	An expensive book sold at auction.
6	valuable book sold	Sale of books and books with added value.	Value-added books.	Value-added book sales.
6	book printed sold record breaking	Books printed, books sold, books sold, records broken.	Printed books, sales, records broken.	Books printed, sales, record breaking.
6	psalm book fetch record ny auction wxvt tv de news	Psalm book fetch record ny auctioneer wxvt tv news.	Psalm book fetch record ny auction wxvt tv news.	Psalm book fetch record ny auction wxvt tv news.
6	book news psalm book net auction	News from the book Psalm Book Net Book Auction.	News from Psalm book net book auction.	Book news Psalm book book net auction book.
6	prayer book sell record breaking	It's a book of prayers that sells records.	The prayer book is selling sales records.	The prayer book has record sales.
6	book printed sold auction	A book auction.	A printed book for sale.	A printed book sold at auction.
6	book auction bring south church	The church is located in the southern part of the city.	The book auction will take you to the church in the south.	The book auction brings the southern church.
6	bay psalm book published set record selling	Published Book of the Bay Psalm, sales record.	Book of the Psalm of the Bay published sales record.	Bay Psalm book published sales record.
6	psalm book bring record auction	And the Psalm Book brings in the record auction.	Psalm book brings the record auction.	The psalm book brings the record auction.
6	bay psalm book set record auction	The auction of the Book of the Bay Psalm set a record.	The bay psalm book auction has set a record.	The bay psalm book auction set a record.
6	expensive book sell	They're selling overpriced books.	Sale of overpriced books.	Overpriced book sales.
6	expensive book sell sotheby	The book costs a lot of money to sell Sotheby.	Sotheby Sotheby is a very expensive book to sell.	The book is expensive to sell sotheby sotheby.
6	valuable book sell record	Books, records and records sales.	Sale of books, records and records.	Book, record and disc sales.
6	book printed america fetch auction	Printed books are sold at auctions to pick up the map of America.	A printed book is sold at auction to go to get l' America.	A printed book is sold at auction to fetch l' America.
6	oldest book sell record auction	Oldest records are auctioned off.	You know, auctioning off some of the oldest records.	The auction of the oldest records.
6	psalm book fetch nyc auction	Psalm book's gonna get nyc's auction.	Well, the psalm book is going to get the nyc auction.	The psalm book goes after the nyc auction.
6	early american religious book break record auction	The first American religious books broke records for auctions.	America's first religious books... broke records for auction sales.	America's first religious books broke auction records.
6	tiny book psalm sell	Tiny Book Psalm Sell Psalm.	Tiny Psalm book sell psalm.	Sell psalm tiny psalm.
6	bay psalm book sold	Sold Book of the Bay Psalm.	Book of the Psalm of the Bay.	Book of the bay psalm sold.
6	rare book psalm sell record	Rare Book Psalm sells records.	The rare book psalm sells a number of records.	The rare book psalm sells records.
6	expensive book sold	An overpriced book, s&apos, is sold.	Overpriced s&apos book is sold.	An expensive book s' is sold.
6	psalm book fetch record nyc auction	So Psalm pound go get a record nyc auction.	Psalm pound go get record nyc auction.	Psalm pound go get auction record nyc nyc.
6	america book sell record	Sell the American book.	I want you to sell the American book.	Well, sell the American book.
6	book printed sell record mn sotheby auction	Sotheby's books sell sotheby sale at auction.	Printed books sell record mn sotheby auctioneer.	Books printed sell record mn sotheby auction.
6	expensive printed book sell	The price of printed books is high.	Expensive printed books sell well.	Well, expensive printed books sell well.
6	historic book psalm set auction record	The psalm of the historical book has now set a record for auctions.	The psalm of the historical book set a record for auctions.	The historical psalm set a record for auctions.
6	book psalm printed net auction	Book Psalm Printed Net Auction.	Print net auctions of psalm.	Auction with printed psalm netting.
6	billionaire drop printed book owned south church	Southern church belongs to a billionaire.	The church of the south belongs to a man who is a billionaire.	The south church belongs to a billionaire.
6	crown jewel american printing fetch record auction	American Printing Fetch Record Record Auction.	Fetch Fetch record-breaking record auction.	Crown Jewel American Printing Fetch record auction.
6	expensive book	Expensive book.	Expensive book.	An expensive book.
6	bay psalm book fetch auction	Auction of the Bay Psalm Book.	Book of the Psalm of the Bay sold at auction.	Book of the bay psalm sold at auction.
6	book published set record auction	A record number of books have been published and the auction has reached record levels.	A book was published and the bidding reached record levels.	A book was published and a record auction was held.
6	book believed printed sell record	The book was written in the style of a book.	The book believed that Apos; he sold printed records.	The book believed that' it sold printed records.
6	bay psalm book book written fetch record	Bay Psalm book.	The Book of the Bay Psalm.	Book of the bay psalm.
6	book printed sell auction	Printed book auctions.	We're auctioning printed books.	You know, book auctions.
6	book dying book printed sell whopping	Dying book, printed book, as far as the eye can see.	Dying book, printed book... sell as far as you can see.	Dying book, printed book sell as far as the eye can see.
6	expensive printed book sell auction	Expensive printed books are auctioned off to the public.	Expensive printed books are sold at the auction house.	The expensive printed books are sold at auction.
6	book psalm worth	Psalm value psalm.	Psalm, psalm, psalm.	Book psalm worth psalm.
6	expensive book sell mn york	The book costs a lot of money to sell York.	Well, it's a very expensive book to sell.	It's expensive to sell mn york.
6	book printed america sell record	There's this book that's printed in America, and it's selling records.	You know, a book printed in America sells records.	A book printed in America sells records.
6	expensive print book sell	An expensive, printed book sells well.	Well, an expensive printed book sells well.	An expensive printed book will sell well.
6	book printed fetch record breaking sum auction	Printed Book Get Record Record Auction of Record Sum.	Print book go look for a record auction of record sum.	Get printed book record auction of record sum.
6	valuable book	Book of value.	Book of value.	A valuable book.
6	airline add flight holiday thing	The airline's adding the whole air vacation thing.	Plus, the airline adds the air vacation thing.	The airline adds the air-vacation thing.
6	book printed america sell record	There's this book that's printed in America, and it's selling records.	You know, a book printed in America sells records.	A book printed in America sells records.
6	rare psalm book sell	There is a sale of a rare book of psalms.	You know, a rare book of psalms sells.	A rare psalm book sells.
6	historic psalm book brings south church	The book of the Psalm brings with it the apos; the church of the south.	The historical psalm book brings the apos; church of the south.	The historical psalm book brings the southern church.
6	book printed sell	Sale of books in print.	Sale of printed books.	Print book sales.
6	book printed america sell record	There's this book that's printed in America, and it's selling records.	You know, a book printed in America sells records.	A book printed in America sells records.
6	expensive printed book sell	The price of printed books is high.	Expensive printed books sell well.	Well, expensive printed books sell well.
6	oldest psalm book sell record dollar nyc auction	The oldest Psalm is auctioned to the nearest dollar.	The oldest psalm book is sold to the nearest dollar.	The oldest psalm book sells at a dollar-per-cent auction.
6	expensive book sell	They're selling overpriced books.	Sale of overpriced books.	Overpriced book sales.
6	spent book	Tired book.	Book's out.	I'm out.
7	surface review comparison window powered tablet pitted	Comparison of Powered Window Spike Tablet.	Comparison of refreshed tablet window area.	Comparison of the area of window powered tablet piqué.
7	nokia lumia launch	Nokia Lumia launch.	Launch of Nokia lumia.	Nokia lumia launched.
7	window phone outsells io latin america	Window phone sells better than Latin phone-American.	The phone in the window sells better than the Latin phone-American.	The window phone sells better than the Latin phone-American.
7	best nokia lumia price deal november	Best price agreement in November.	Best Price Agreement nokia lumia November.	Best price deal nokia lumia November.
7	nokia launch gb ram lumia uk	Nokia launches ram gb lumia uk uk.	Nokia launches gb ram lumia uk uk.	Nokia throws gb ram lumia uk uk.
7	verizon nokia lumia penny	I'll take care of it.	Verizon nokia lumia penny.	Verizon nokia lumia penny.
7	nokia lumia official rock candy coated cover gb ram	Nokia lumia official candy of rock covered gb ram cover gb.	Nokia lumia official rock candy covered gb ram cover gb.	Nokia lumia official rock candy coated gb ram blanket gb.
7	december release price confirmed nokia lumia uk	The price of the issue of the December issue confirmed this.	The price of the December issue confirmed nokia lumia uk.	The December issue price confirmed nokia lumia uk.
7	nokia normandy leaked	Nokia Normandy leaked.	Nokia Normandy leaked.	Nokia Normandy leaked it.
7	nokia turn ipad bashing lumia ad	Nokia rotates to the luminescent level.	Nokia rotated ipad bashing lumia ad al lumia.	Nokia rotates ipad bashing lumia ad lumia.
7	nokia lumia release announced	Nokia Lumia announces Nokia Lumia's release.	Nokia Lumia announces the release of Nokia Lumia.	Nokia Lumia has announced the release of Nokia Lumia.
7	nokia lumia tablet rumored early	Nokia lumia is a very early rumor.	Nokia lumia tablet rumor very early.	Nokia lumia tablet very early rumor.
7	rumor nokia launch window tablet early	Rumor has it that Nokia launched the window tablet earlier today than expected.	Rumor has it Nokia launched the window tablet earlier than expected.	Rumor has it that Nokia launched the window tablet early.
7	nokia lumia amazon	This is Nokia Lumia Amazon.	Nokia, Nokia, Lumia, Amazon.	Nokia lumia amazon.
7	comparison silencing smartphones	Comparison of shutting down a smartphone.	This is a comparison between shutting down smartphones.	It's a comparison between silencing smartphones.
7	nokia lumia launched france listed pre order uk	Nokia Lumia launches France listed pre-order uk uk.	Nokia Lumia launched France listed pre-order uk uk.	"Nokia Lumia launches ""France"" listed pre @-@ordre uk uk."
7	nokia lumia coming taiwan november	In November, Nokia Lumia arrives in Taiwan.	Nokia Lumia arrived in Taiwan in November.	In November, Nokia Lumia arrived in Taiwan.
7	nokia jab ipad air ad tablet	Nokia jab ipad jab air tablet ad.	Nokia jab ipad air advertising tablet.	Nokia jab ipad air tablet ad.
7	nokia unveils budget contender lumia	Nikia unveils the candidate for the budget, Lumia.	And Nikia unveils budget candidate Lumia.	Nikia unveils budget candidate Lumia.
7	buy nokia lumia window tablet power keyboard	Purchase the Nokia Lumia Window Tablet Power Adapter keyboard.	Purchase the Nokia Lumia window tablet power supply keyboard.	Purchase Nokia Lumia window tablet power keyboard.
7	nokia lumia ante low window phone	Nokia Lumia ante low-window telephone.	Nokia Lumia ante phone with low window.	Nokia Lumia ante low window phone.
7	taiwan market nokia launch lumia cooperation	Taïwan Marketplace nokia launcher co-opera lumia.	Taiwan market nokia launch lumia cooperation lumia.	Taiwan market nokia launch lumia cooperation lumia.
7	nokia lumia flame stoked power keyboard mail	Nokia Lumia flame-powered Power Keyboard mail.	Nokia Lumia flame powered Power Keyboard mail.	Power Keyboard mail fueled flame Nokia Lumia Power Keyboard.
7	nokia lumia ad martial art perfect photo	Nokia ad martial art photo perfect.	Nokia lumia ad martial art photo perfect.	Nokia lumia ad martial art perfect photo.
7	nokia owns global window phone device market share	Nokia holds a share of the world market for window telephony devices.	Nokia also holds a share of the global market for window telephony devices.	Nokia holds a global market share in window telephony devices.
7	nokia lumia reach uk december starting	Nokia Lumia will reach ukDecember from 0 to 10.	Nokia Lumia reach uk Decembre from the beginning.	Nokia Lumia reach uk Decembre from.
7	nokia lumia camera grip	Nokia Lumia camera, grip.	Nokia Lumia grip camera.	Nokia lumia camera grip.
7	nokia lumia specification price revealed launch official	The official launch was revealed by the price of the nokia lumia specification.	The price of the nokia lumia specification has revealed the official launch.	The nokia lumia specification price has revealed the official launch.
7	nokia lumia tablet kill surface	The tablet lumia nokia kills the surface.	The nokia lumia tablet is killing the surface.	The nokia lumia tablet kills surface.
7	finnish music video shot entirely nokia lumia	This is a video clip by Nikia Lumia.	This is a Finnish music video shot entirely by Nikia Lumia.	Finnish music video shot entirely by Nikia Lumia.
7	gadget executive	Executive gadget.	Gadget executive.	Uh, gadget executive.
7	lumia announced nokia budget friendly window phone modest	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I can't help you with that.	Lumia announced nokia budget user-friendly modest phone window.	Lumia announced nokia budget convivial window phone modest.
7	redbox instant window phone exclusive nokia device	Redbox exclusive instant dialog nokia device.	Redbox exclusive nokia window instant phone device.	Redbox exclusive nokia device window instant phone.
7	nokia released price	Nokia publishes the prize.	Nokia's published the award.	And Nokia published the prize.
7	nokia advert sell lumia ridiculing ipad air	Nokia advert selling Lumia ridiculing the apos air; iPad.	Nokia advert sell Lumia ridiculing the air of the apos; iPad.	Nokia advert sell Lumia ridiculing the air of l' ipad.
7	lumia landing store december	Landing of Lumia in December.	The d&apos store; December landing of Lumia.	The store d' Lumia landing in December.
7	nokia account percent window phone market	Nokia is the percentage of the total market for window phones.	Nokia is the percentage of the window phone market.	Nokia is the window phone market percentage.
7	microsoft nokia device buyout deal side	Buyout of Microsoft Windows; microsoftware nokia.	Redemption of software; microsoft devices nokia.	Acquisition of apos; microsoft nokia devices.
7	nokia lumia review price spec amazon price start	Nokia Lumia review spec Amazon price start.	Nokia Lumia revise the price spec Amazone start price.	Nokia Lumia to revise the price spec amazon price to start.
7	verizon nokia lumia amazon	Verizon, nokia lumia, amazon.	Verizon nokia lumia amazon.	Verizon nokia lumia amazon.
7	adduplex nokia control window phone market	Adduplex nokia is the market leader in the telephone market window.	Adduplex nokia controls the telephone window market in the telephony market.	Adduplex nokia controls the telephone market window market.
7	contract att nokia lumia discounted time	Contract nokia lumia att reduced time.	Contract att nokia lumia reduced time.	Reduced time contract att nokia lumia.
7	nokia phab plan chinese mobile market	Nokia phab mobile Chinese market plan.	Nokia phab plan mobile Chinese market.	Nokia phab mobile market chinese plan.
7	nokia announces lumia upgraded successor top selling	Nokia announced today that Lumia has upgraded its best-selling successor.	Nokia announces that Lumia has upgraded its best-selling successor.	Nokia announces Lumia has upgraded its best-selling successor.
7	nokia lumia display hardware spec quick review	Nokia lumia Fast Review material display spec fast.	Nokia lumia display fast spec fast material review.	Nokia lumia display material fast review spec fast.
7	redbox instant tm verizon arrives nokia lumia window phone device	Redbox instant verizon tm arrives nokia lumia phone window lumia.	Redbox moment tm verizon arrives nokia lumia phone device window lumia.	Redbox instant tm verizon arrives nokia lumia phone window lumia.
7	nokia lumia review	This is Nokia Lumia Review.	Nokia review lumia.	Nokia lumia review.
7	best keyboard typing trick nokia lumia	Best typing technique on the Nokia Lumia keyboard.	The best typing technique on the Nokia Lumia keyboard.	Best Nokia Lumia keyboard typing technique.
7	redbox window phone lumia day	On the day of the red-box window, there's a light phone.	On the day of the window of the red box, the phone light.	Red box window day, phone lumia.
7	nokia lumia arrives uk december	In December, Nokia Lumia arrives.	Nokia Lumia arrives in December.	Nokia lumia arrives in December.
7	deal nokia free power keyboard purch	Distribute free of charge in Nokia l' buy d' a free electric keyboard.	Distribute free of charge in Nokia l' buy a free electric keyboard.	Distribute free in Nokia l' buy d' free electric keyboard.
7	nokia lumia arrival night	Nokia Lumia night, d'apos; arrival.	Nokia Lumia night and night.	Nokia Lumia night d' arrival.
7	window phone store surpasses billion total app downloads	Phone window store outpaces applications downloads.	The phone window store is better than the downloads of any other application.	The phone window store surpasses downloads from applications.
7	nokia sony lg tablet offspring set launch	The launch was launched by the offspring of the tablets nokia sony lg.	The nokia sony lg tablets' offspring launched.	The nokia sony lg tablet offspring launched the game.
7	nokia lumia top business feature	Nokia Lumia is the name of Nokia Lumia.	Nokia Lumia top business feature.	Nokia lumia top business feature.
7	review htc nokia offer good giant choice	This is a great way to make a great choice.	Htc nokia magazine offer a good giant choice.	Review htc nokia offer a good giant choice.
7	nokia announces uk availability lumia	Nokia will announce the availability of the package.	Nokia announces apos availability; uk lumia.	Nokia announces the availability of uk lumia.
7	nokia lumia launch early	Nokia Lumia is one of the world's most popular music studios.	Nokia Lumia is launched early this evening.	Nokia lumia is launched early this evening.
7	nokia lumia low light video test amazing	Nokia Lumia low-light test video.	Nokia Lumia low light test video amazing.	Nokia Lumia low light video test amazing.
7	nokia lumia land compelling reason switch	Nokia Lumia is a land that needs to be changed.	Nokia Lumia earth compelling reason to change it.	Nokia Lumia earth compelling reason to change.
7	rumour nokia plotting inch lumia tablet early release	Rumor has it that Nokia traced the apo trail; a lighted tablet; a thumb was released prematurely.	Rumor had it that Nokia tracing the trace of the apos; a tablet lumified d'apos; a thumb was released prematurely.	It is rumored that Nokia tracing the trace of the apos; a tablet lumia d'apos; a thumb was released prematurely.
7	nokia commercial call ipad keyboard	Nokia commercial keyboard ipad keyboard.	Nokia commercial call ipad keyboard keyboard ipad keyboard.	Nokia commercial call ipad keyboard ipad.
7	nokia lumia release smartphone expected dec	Nokia Lumia will release the next generation of smartphone.	Nokia Lumia release smartphone scheduled dec.	Nokia Lumia release smartphone planned dec.
7	nokia unveils lumia	Nokia has revealed Lumia.	Nokia unveils Lumia's story.	Nokia unveils Lumia!
7	nokia lumia december cost month	Nokia lumia de December is a good place to stay.	Nokia lumia de December costs months.	Nokia lumia in December will cost months.
7	nokia lumia december release uk starting month	Nokia Lumia in December release uk at the beginning of month.	Nokia Lumia December release uk debut month.	Nokia Lumia December release uk first month.
7	nokia lumia att microsoft delayed	Nokia lumia is a delayed microsoft att.	Nokia lumia att delayed microsoft.	Nokia lumia att microsoft delayed.
7	nokia normandy asha inside lumia	Nokia Normandy is located in the heart of the city of Lumia.	Nokia normandy asha at apos; interior of Lumia.	Nokia normandy asha in Lumia.
7	nokia lumia launch uk price	Nokia Lumia start prizes uk.	Nokia Lumia launch a new price uk.	Nokia Lumia launch uk price.
7	att microsoft nokia lumia face shipment delay	At nokia lumia microsoft face a delay from shipping.	At microsoft nokia lumia face a delay of d' expedition.	At microsoft nokia lumia face a shipping delay.
7	nokia lumia android update blow	Nokia Lumia android update.	Nokia Lumia android update blow.	Nokia Lumia android update blow.
7	nokia imaging year progress lumia	Nikia Lumia Lumia imagery.	Improvements in image quality; year of birth; Imaging of Nikia Lumia Lumia.	Progress; year of birth; Nikia Lumia Lumia imaging.
7	top att nokia lumia gophone black friday cyber monday	This week's edition will be available in English and French.	Top att nokia lumia black gophone Friday cyber Monday.	TOP att nokia lumia gophone noir friday cyber monday.
7	nokia lumia gb ram wp smartphone cheap	Nokia lumia gb ram smartphone wp cheap.	Nokia lumia gb ram wp smartphone inexpensive.	Nokia lumia gb ram wp smartphone cheap.
7	inch nokia lumia tablet rumored early launch	Inch nokia lumia-tablette rumors of early launch.	Inch nokia lumia tablet rumors of early release.	Inch nokia lumia tablet early launch rumors.
7	best nokia lumia sim free deal november	I'd like to thank you very much for your time.	Best nokia lumia sim business open November.	November best nokia lumia sim free business.
7	nokia asha handset including normandy pictured	Nokia asha phone with a Normandy image on it.	Asha phone nokia with a normandy image.	Phone nokia asha with a normandy image.
7	samsung galaxy grand nokia lumia spec comparison	Samsung Galaxy Grand Nokia lumia spec.	Samsung Galaxy Grand Nokia lumia spec comparison.	Samsung Galaxy Grand Nokia lumia spec comparison lens.
7	nokia lumia tablet sale today	Nokia Lumia tablets were sold today.	The sale of Nokia Lumia tablets was held today at Nokia Lumia.	Nokia Lumia's tablet sale took place today.
7	nokia microsoft lead bash apple ipad	Nokia microsoft lead bash lead apple ipad apple.	Nokia microsoft lead bash apple ipad apple bash.	Nokia microsoft lead bash apple ipad ipad.
7	nokia lumia hit uk december	Nokia Lumia has reached Uk of December.	Nokia Lumia has reached the uk of December.	Nokia lumia has reached the uk of December.
7	redbox instant hit window phone remain lumia exclusive day	Instant Redbox from the phone window remain bright exclusive day.	Instant Redbox from the phone window will remain lumia exclusive day.	Instant redbox from the window phone remain lumia exclusive day.
7	nokia postponed nokia lumia shipment demand	Nokia has delayed delivery of Nokia Lumia.	Nokia has postponed delivery of Nokia Lumia.	Nokia postponed Nokia Lumia's delivery request.
7	top nokia lumia sim free deal november	Top Nokia Lumia Sim Free Deal November.	Nov. top Nokia Lumia sim free deal.	Top Nokia Lumia sim free deal November.
7	nokia announces pricing launch lumia	Nokia will announce the launch prices lumia lumia.	Nokia announces launch prices lumia lumia.	Nokia announces lumia lumia launch prices.
7	nokia lumia delay notify	The notification is delayed by Nokia Lumia.	Nokia Lumia delays notification.	Nokia Lumia will delay notification.
7	nokia lumia today	Today, Nokia Lumia.	Nokia Lumia today.	Nokia lumia today.
7	nokia lumia promo dig apple ipad air	Nokia Lumia is a great place to relax and relax.	Nokia Lumia to promote apple iPad air.	Nokia Lumia promotion apple ipad air.
7	nokia lumia sim free price uk revealed	Nokia Lumia is a free-to-go, free-to-go, free-to-go game.	Nokia Lumia sim free price uk revealed.	Nokia Lumia sim free price uk revealed.
7	nokia lumia unveiled inch display gb ram mp camera	Nokia Lumia unveiled inch gb mp camera ram.	Nokia Lumia unveiled inch gb ram mp camera.	Nokia Lumia unveiled gb ram mp camera inch.
7	nokia lumia inch tablet	Nokia lumia inch is a tablet.	Nokia lumia inch tablet.	Nokia lumia inch tablet tablet.
7	buy apple ipad black friday	Buy Ipad apples on Black Friday.	Buy black Friday iPad apples.	To buy Ipad apples on black Friday.
7	nokia lumia launch sequel finn best selling window phone	Nokia Lumia will be launching next year the new Finn best selling window phone.	Nokia Lumia launch suite Finn best selling window phone.	Nokia Lumia launch Finn best selling window phone suite.
7	nokia mock ipad air lumia advert	Nokia makes fun of the iPad airluminous advert.	Nokia mocking ipad air lumia advert.	Nokia jokes ipad air lumia advert.
7	lumia headed dec	Head-on Lumia dec.	Lumia to the head.	I don't know.
7	window phone owner redbox instant nokia verizon	Nokia verizon instant red box phone window owner verizon.	Phone window owner instant red box nokia verizon verizon phone.	The phone window owner instant red box nokia verizon verizon.
7	nokia lumia officially official	Officially Nokia Lumia.	And Nokia Lumia is officially official.	Nokia lumia officially official.
7	nokia lumia spec confirmed nokia reveal lumia window phone	Nokia confirmed spec spec nokia reveals lumia phone window lumia.	Nokia lumia spec confirmed nokia reveal lumia phone window lumia.	Nokia lumia spec confirmed nokia reveal lumia window lumia phone.
7	nokia lumia ad challenge ipad lack keyboard	Nokia is a good place to stay, but it's a good place to stay.	Nokia lumia ad challenge iPad lack of keyboard.	Nokia lumia ad challenge iPad lack keyboard.
7	nokia lumia phablet arrival delayed demand release	The Nokia lumia phablet is the only one of its kind in the world.	The arrival of the Nokia lumia phablet delayed the start of the application.	L' Nokia lumia phablet arrival delayed the start of the application.
7	nokia lumia announced	Nokia has announced that it will be released tomorrow.	Nokia lumia has announced the following.	Nokia lumia announced that.
7	nokia lumia beefed spec	Spec reinforced Nokia Lumia.	Nokia Lumia reinforced spec.	Nokia Lumia has been upgraded with the latest technology.
7	apple air microsoft surface nokia lumia	Microsoft surface air apple nokia lumia lumia.	Apple air microsoft surface nokia lumia lumia lumia.	Apple air microsoft surface nokia lumia lumia.
7	nokia lumia coming store december rm	In December, Nokia Lumia arrives in stores.	Nokia Lumia arrived in the stores in December.	In December, Nokia Lumia arrived in the store.
7	nokia unveils lumia gb ram	Nokia reveals lumia ram gb ram.	Nokia unveils the lumia gb ram ram.	Nokia unveils lumia gb ram ram.
7	nokia lumia tv advert ipad air video	Nokia lumia announces ipad video air ipad air.	Nokia lumia tv announces a new air ipad air video.	Nokia lumia tv announces ipad air video ipad air.
7	buy nokia lumia dec power keyboard free	Purchase free keyboard power nokia lumia.	Buy nokia lumia has free keyboard power.	Buy nokia lumia that free keyboard power.
7	meet nokia normandy	Meet Nokia Normandy.	Meet Nokia Normandy.	To meet Nokia Normandy.
7	psa htc max nokia lumia verizon	Diese könnnen werden werden können.	Psa htc max nokia lumia verizon.	Psa htc max nokia lumia verizon max.
7	nokia officially unveils lumia	Nokia is officially unveiling Lumia now.	Nokia officially unveiled Lumia!	Nokia officially unveils Lumia.
7	nokia lumia official	This is Nokia Lumia official.	Nokia Lumia official.	Nokia lumia official.
7	nokia launch inch lumia tablet	Nokia launches the Nokia inch tablet.	Nokia launches the lumia inch tablet.	Nokia launches lumia inch tablet.
7	nokia lumia unveiled successor popular window phone	Nokia Lumia unveiled the popular telephone-window successor.	Nokia Lumia unveiled the popular phone window successor.	Nokia Lumia unveiled popular phone window successor.
7	puzzling capable nokia lumia tablet	It's a great way to get your hands on a tablet.	Amazing ability nokia lumia tablet.	Amazing nokia lumia tablet capacity.
7	nokia lumia sale uk december	December's Nokia lumia sold uk.	Nokia lumia sold uk from December.	Nokia lumia sold uk de December.
7	att launch version nokia lumia window tablet	At launch nokia lumia version tablet window nokia.	At launch version nokia lumia tablet window.	At launch version nokia lumia window tablet.
7	nokia india offering lumia exchange select	Nokia india offering the 'select Light Switch.	Nokia india offering the' exchange of lumia select select.	Nokia india offering l' exchange of lumia select.
7	nokia lumia shipment att delayed overwhelming	Shipment of Nokia Lumia has been delayed.	The expedition of Nokia Lumia was delayed.	Nokia Lumia's expedition was delayed.
7	nokia reveals uk ad lumia tablet ipad	Nokia announces a new version of Uk ad lumia.	Nokia reveals uk ad lumia tablet ipad ipad.	Nokia reveals uk ad lumia tablet ipad ipad.
7	nokia lumia video ad taunt ipad air	Nokia Lumia is a video game to make fun of it.	Nokia Lumia video to make fun of the air ipad.	Nokia Lumia video mocking the apos; air ipad.
7	harvey norman sell nokia lumia telco	Harvey Norman sells telco nokia lumia.	Well, Harvey Norman sells nokia lumia telco.	Harvey norman sells nokia lumia telco.
7	nokia inch lumia hit uk december	Nokia Lumia arrived in December.	Nokia inch Lumia arrived in December.	Nokia inch lumia arrived in December.
7	nokia tablet lumia poised spring release	Nokia slippery spring lumia tablet release.	Nokia tablet lumia sticky spring release.	Nokia tablet lumia sticky spring release lumia.
7	nokia swanky lumia sibling	Nokia, sister of Lumia very chicos.	Nokia, sister of Lumia, very chicos.	Nokia, sister of Lumia, very chic.
7	nokia lumia price deal amazon starting price att	Nokia Lumia Amazon prices att att att market starting prices.	Nokia Lumia Amazon prices starting prices att att market.	Nokia Lumia price Amazon start price att att market.
7	nokia lumia uk release confirmed	Nokia lumia uk.	Nokia lumia uk release confirmed.	Nokia lumia uk release confirmed.
7	nokia lumia announced africa asia middle easy initially	Nokia Lumia announced apo milieu; African Asia initially easy.	"Nokia Lumia has announced the middle of the ""Asia""; initially easy."	Nokia Lumia announced the middle of l' initially easy Africa.
7	nokia lumia lumia spec price comparison australia	Nokia lumia lumia spec, australia price comparison.	Nokia lumia lumia spec comparison price australia.	Nokia lumia lumia spec australia price comparison.
7	tech reviewer nokia lumia beat microsoft surface design	L' technical examiner Nikia Lumia has beaten the design of surface microsoft.	L&apos technical reviewer Nikia Lumia beat the microsoft surface design.	Technical reviewer Nikia Lumia beat microsoft surface design.
7	nokia lumia motorola moto best budget smartphone	Nokia lumia moto moto better budget.	Nokia lumia motorcycle motorcycle bike best budget smartphone.	Nokia lumia moto moto moto best budget smartphone.
7	lumia launching december uk	Lumia launches a new version of the game.	Lumia December launch uk uk uk.	Lumia launch December uk uk.
7	review htc nokia offer good choice giant phone	You can choose from a wide range of mobile phone options.	Magazine htc nokia offer a good choice of giant telephone of choice.	Review htc nokia offer a good choice giant phone of choice.
7	inch nokia lumia window tablet tipped early launch	Inch nokia lumia pop-up tablet window has toppled the early launch.	Inch nokia lumia tablet window toppled the early launch.	Inch nokia lumia window tablet toggled early launch.
7	nokia lumia sale uk december	December's Nokia lumia sold uk.	Nokia lumia sold uk from December.	Nokia lumia sold uk de December.
7	nokia quietly launch lumia modest upgrade budget window	Nokia quietly launches Lumia modest Upgrade Budget window.	Nokia quietly launches Lumia modest window budget upgrade.	Nokia will quietly launch Lumia modest budget upgrade window.
7	upcoming window tablet nokia allegedly working slate	The next tablet of window nokia work itself-saying l' slate.	Next window tablet nokia work itself-saying l' slate.	Next window tablet nokia working-saying l' slate.
7	nokia unveils lumia ra affordable win	Nokia announces a victory for the city of Lumia ra.	Nokia unveils a victory from Lumia ra affordable.	Nokia unveils an affordable Lumia ra victory.
7	nokia lumia price deal win chance meet saturday	Nokia Lumia will win the first prize on Saturday.	Nokia Lumia award deal win chance meet on Saturday.	Nokia Lumia award deal win chance meet Saturday.
7	nokia inch lumia tablet reportedly coming early	It would have been an earlier Nokia Inch Lumia tablet.	A tablet of Nokia Inch Lumia would have arrived earlier.	A Nokia Inch Lumia tablet would have arrived sooner!
7	nokia lumia camera app update raw image shooting	Nokia lumia app camera update map; raw image taken.	Nokia lumia camera app update l' raw shot image.	Nokia lumia camera app update l' raw image shot.
7	nokia offering free power keyboard lumia purchase	Nokia offers free internet access, free of charge, free of charge and free of charge.	Nokia offers free l' purchase lumia keyboard d' lumia feeding.	Nokia offers free L' keyboard purchase lumia d&apos.
7	nokia lumia official inch dual core snapdragon	Nokia Lumia is the official inch-dual, core-snapdragon.	Nokia Lumia official dual core snapdragon inch.	Nokia Lumia official inch dual core snapdragon.
7	nokia camera update add raw file support	The support for raw files is added by updating the nokia camera.	Upgrading the nokia camera adds support for raw files.	The nokia camera update adds raw file support.
7	nokia lumia officially unveiled lumia	Nokia Lumia has officially revealed Lumia to the public.	Nokia Lumia has officially unveiled Lumia.	Nokia Lumia officially unveiled Lumia.
7	javascript mail address	Javascript mailing address.	Mailing address: javascript.	Mailing address javascript.
7	nokia lumia great buy christmas	Nokia Lumia big to buy.	Nokia Lumia big buy Christmas.	Nokia Lumia great buy Christmas.
7	gossiping nokia corporation adr nyse nok release lumia	Gossiping company nokia ad nyse nok liberate lumia.	Gossiping company nokia adr nyse nok liberate lumia.	Gossiping company nokia adr nyse nok release lumia.
7	nokia lumia reach buyer december	Nokia Lumia reach the apos; December buyer.	Nokia Lumia reach l' Buyer December.	Nokia Lumia reach l' buyer December.
7	inch nokia lumia tablet launching	Inch nokia lumia tablet.	Inch nokia lumia tablet to be launched.	Inch nokia lumia tablet launching.
7	nokia lumia hit store week	Nokia Lumia struck the shop week.	Nokia Lumia strikes week shop.	Nokia Lumia hit store week.
7	nokia lumia uk release december	Nokia lumia uk release Nokia lumia uk release Nokia lumia uk release.	Nokia lumia uk release Decembre.	Nokia lumia uk release December.
7	nokia lumia price spec overview	Nokia Lumia offers a wide range of products and services.	Prices Nokia Lumia spec panorama price of prices.	Nokia Lumia price spec panorama prices.
7	microsoft poised enter smartphone fray	Microsoft sticky enter fray fray fray fray smartphone.	Microsoft sticky enter smartphone fray fray fray fray.	Microsoft sticky enter smartphone fray fray fray fray.
7	redbox instant window phone lumia device	Instant Redbox phone line lumia device lumia phone window lumia.	Instant Redbox phone lumia device lumia phone window lumia.	Redbox instant phone lumia device lumia phone window lumia.
7	nokia advert aim ipad air	Nokia's goal is to be able to fly in the air.	Nokia aim advert ipad air.	Nokia advert aim ipad air.
7	exchange phone nokia lumia buyback scheme	Nokia Lumia d' Phone Swap Redemption Plan.	Nokia Lumia d&apos mobile phone exchange plan.	Nokia Lumia d' exchange phone plan buyout.
7	nokia lumia release bring style fun	Nokia lumia release will bring the fun.	Nokia lumia release bring the style fun.	Nokia lumia release bring style fun.
7	nokia lumia cheaper buyback scheme	Nokia Lumia buy-back plan cheaper.	Nokia Lumia... a cheaper buyout plan.	Nokia Lumia a cheaper buyout.
7	nokia lumia ad openly mock ipad	Nokia Lumia mocks the apos openly.	Nokia Lumia openly mocked the apos; iPad.	Nokia Lumia openly mocks her father.
7	nokia apple ipad keyboard battery power	Nokia Apple ipad battery keyboard.	Nokia Apple ipad battery keyboard battery power.	Nokia Apple ipad battery battery power keyboard.
7	nokia lumia uk sale december price revealed	Nokia Lumia uk selling price of December revealed.	Nokia Lumia uk sale price is announced in December.	December sale price revealed Nokia Lumia uk.
7	nokia lumia tablet set launch early	The Nokia Lumia Tablet was launched early this evening.	The new Nokia Lumia tablet was launched early this evening.	Nokia Lumia tablet was launched early this evening.
7	nokia lumia low stock store	Nokia Lumia is a small, medium-sized company.	Low stock store Nokia Lumia.	Nokia lumia low stock store.
7	nokia mock ipad air lumia ad video	Nokia simulacre ipad video air lumia.	Nokia simulacre ipad air lumia video.	Nokia simulacre ipad air lumia video game.
7	nokia lumia	Lumia nokia.	Nokia lumia.	Oh, my God, Nokia Lumia.
7	nokia lumia uk ad swing ipad air	Nokia lumia uk... and swing ipad air.	Nokia lumia uk and swing ipad air.	Nokia lumia uk and swing ipad air.
7	nokia striving business lumia	Nokia trying to make a deal with Lumia.	Nokia trying to do business with Lumia.	Nokia trying to do business with Lumia!
7	nokia lumia continues dominate window phone market	Nokia Lumia has continued to dominate the telephone window market.	Nokia Lumia continues to dominate the window market.	Nokia Lumia continues to dominate the phone window business.
7	wildest gift idea phone	C&apos is a great idea.	C&apos, that's a great idea.	You know, C&apos is a great idea.
7	nokia unveils lumia window phone	Nokia is proud to announce the release of the Nokia window phone.	Nokia unveils lumia window phone.	Nokia unveils lumia window phone.
7	top pop star window phone apps nokia lumia	I'm a big fan, I'm a big fan, and I'm a big fan.	Top pop star apps phone nokia lumia application.	Apps phone nokia lumia application top pop star apps.
7	nokia confirms lumia coming australia harvey norman	Nokia confirmed that Lumia had arrived in Australia with Harvey Norman.	Nokia confirms that Lumia arrives in Australia with Harvey Norman.	Nokia confirms that Lumia is coming to Australia with Harvey Norman.
7	ad nokia lumia dig ipads	I don't know if you want to do this.	Ipads in nokia lumia.	Ad nokia lumia dig ipads.
7	nokia lumia awarded laptop game changer award	Nokia Lumia has won the Nokia Lumia Portable Computer Game changer award.	Nokia Lumia has received the award for the game changer for the portable computer.	Nokia Lumia received the laptop game changer award.
7	nokia ipad woman	Nokia ipad, woman.	Nokia ipad is a woman.	Nokia ipad woman.
7	lumia surface understanding trade offs	The surface of the surface from which the water originates; the surface of the surface from which the water originates; the surface of the water.	The surface of the surface where it comes from; water from the surface of it; where it comes from; water.	Surface area where water comes from; surface water from; water from; water from.
7	nokia lumia free power keyboard	Nokia Lumia keyboard d&apos.	Nokia keyboard Lumia d' free feeding.	Nokia Lumia keyboard d' free food.
7	nokia lumia arriving december	In December, Nokia Lumia arrives.	Nokia Lumia arrives in December.	Nokia lumia arrives in December.
7	play change price phone model	Sample game-changing phone.	Phone model to change the price of the game.	Sample phone to change the price of game.
7	nokia lumia sim free uk week	Nokia Lumia is free of charge.	Nokia Lumia sim for free week uk.	Nokia Lumia sim free week uk.
7	nokia lumia zhuzhes cover swap ram	Nokia lumia, zhuzhes, swap covers.	Nokia lumia zhuzhes covers swap rod.	Nokia lumia zhuzhes cover swap rod.
7	harvey norman sell nokia lumia australia	Harvey Norman sells australia nokia lumia.	Well, Harvey Norman sells nokia lumia australia.	Harvey norman sells nokia lumia australia.
7	nokia reportedly planning inch lumia tablet	Nokia would have planned a one-inch light tablet.	Nokia would have planned to have a tablet with a lumia d'apos; a thumb.	Nokia would've planned a tablet lumia d'apos; an inch.
7	supersized smart phone gorgeous inch display great camera	It's nice to be able to see the camera, it's nice to be able to see it.	The size of the camera is superb, the size of the camera is impressive.	The camera size is superb, the size of the camera is impressive.
7	nokia reveals uk launch detail massive lumia	Nokia releases the launch details of the Uk mass lumia.	Nokia reveals details of the launch of Uk massive lumia.	Nokia reveals launch details of Uk massive lumia.
7	redbox instant window phone appears temporary nokia exclusive	Instant telephone window redbox seems temporary exclusive nokia.	Instant Redbox phone window seems temporary nokia exclusive.	Instant Redbox phone window appears temporary nokia exclusive.
7	nokia lumia budget smartphone launched	Nokia Lumia Smartphone Budget launched.	Nokia Lumia smartphone budget launched.	Nokia Lumia budget smartphone launched.
7	nokia officially unveils lumia budget wp smartphone gb ram	Nokia officially unveils the budget lumia wp gb ram smartphone lumia.	Nokia now officially unveils the budget lumia wp smartphone gb ram.	Nokia officially unveils budget lumia wp smartphone gb ram.
7	nokia lumia video review window phone phablet	Video Nokia Video Revision phone window phablet phablet.	Nokia lumia video phone revision window phablet phablet.	Nokia lumia video review window phone phablet phablet.
7	nokia lumia preorder att	Nokia Lumia is a preorder att.	Nokia Lumia preorder att.	Nokia lumia preorder att.
7	nokia announces entry level lumia	Nokia announces the level D' Lumia's level entry.	Nokia announces the Lumia entry level.	Nokia announces the level d' entry level of Lumia.
7	lumia quietly boost nokia low	Lumia booster de tranquilmente bas de nokia.	Lumia booster quietly low nokia low.	Lumia quietly booster low nokia low level.
7	nokia lumia launched succeed best selling window phone	Nokia lumia launched to make the best sale of the phone window.	Nokia lumia launched to succeed the best sale of phone window.	Nokia lumia launched to be the best selling window phone company.
7	nokia lumia hitting uk store december	Nokia Lumia hit Uk shop in December.	Nokia Lumia hit the Uk store in december.	Nokia lumia hit the Uk store in December.
7	nokia land australia	This is Nokia Land Australia.	Nokia land Australia.	Nokia land Australia.
7	nokia lumia video review assistance	Nokia Lumia has been helping with the video revision.	Nokia Lumia helps with the video editing.	Nokia Lumia helps with video editing.
7	nokia lumia tablet inch display launch report	Nokia lumia tablet stainless steel.	Nokia lumia tablet inch launch report.	Nokia lumia tablet inch report of launch.
7	inch nokia lumia tablet rumoured early	Inch nokia lumia tablet, a new rumor.	Inch nokia lumia tablet blizzard blizzard blizzard.	Inch nokia lumia tablet rumor beginners.
7	nokia swipe ipad lumia advert	Nokia slides ipad lumia.	Nokia glides ipad lumia advert.	Nokia slides ipad lumia advert.
7	att nokia lumia amazon	This is Nokia Lumia Amazon.	Nokia, Nokia, Lumia, Amazon.	Nokia lumia amazon.
7	nokia lumia tablet buyer free power keyboard case	Free electric keyboard box of Nikia Lumia de l&apos tablet; buyer.	Free electric keyboard box of the tablet Nikia Lumia de l' buyer.	Nikia Lumia de l&apos tablet electric keyboard box free of charge.
7	htc gold arrives uk	L&apos, or htc, will come in uk.	L' or htc arrives in uk.	L' or htc arrives in uk.
7	review nokia lumia	Nokia Lumia again.	To see Nokia Lumia again.	See nokia lumia again.
7	nokia lumia launch detail uk december	Nokia Lumia will be launching details in December.	Nokia Lumia launch details in December.	Nokia Lumia launch details in December.
7	lumia enormous hardware troublesome software	Lumia is a huge piece of malicious software.	Lumia huge software hardware, harmful.	Lumia enormous harmful software hardware.
7	nokia lumia budget window phone gb ram unveiled	Nokia budget Lumia phone window gb ram unveiled.	Nokia Lumia budget phone window gb ram unveiled.	Nokia Lumia budget window phone gb ram unveiled.
7	sim free nokia lumia pre order uk	Nokia lumia pre-command uk uk.	Nokia lumia free pre-command uk uk.	Nokia lumia is free pre-command uk uk.
7	nokia lumia spec price amazon original	Nokia lumia spec Amazon Original Amazon Prize.	Nokia lumia spec Amazon prizes original Amazon.	Nokia lumia spec Amazon original prize.
7	nokia lumia officially announced	Official announcement by Nokia Lumia.	Nokia Lumia is officially announced.	Nokia Lumia officially announced today.
7	nokia lumia upgraded variant lumia official lumia	Nokia lumia has improved the official version of the Lumia lumia.	Nokia lumia has improved the official lumia variant of lumia lumia.	Nokia lumia has improved the official lumia lumia variant.
7	nokia lumia massive screen hit uk shelf week	Nokia Lumia solid-screen TV has reached its weekly peak.	Nokia Lumia's massive screen has reached uk week of stores uk week.	Nokia Lumia massive screen reached uk week of week.
7	promotion nokia gift euro window phone marketplace voucher	Promotion nokia euro gift window coupon phone.	Promotion nokia euro gift window telephone market coupon.	Promotion nokia gift euro window coupon phone.
7	nokia lumia shipping delay explained	The delay in Nikia Lumia's expedition was the main reason for the delay.	The delay in the expedition of Nikia Lumia explains this delay.	Nikia Lumia's delay in shipping explains this delay.
7	nokia lumia fan region instagram	I would like to thank you for your time.	Nokia lumia fan region instagram.	Nokia lumia fan region instagram.
7	redbox instant arrives nokia lumia phone	Redbox moment arrives phone nokia lumia.	Redbox moment arrives nokia lumia phone.	Redbox moment arrives nokia lumia phone line.
7	nokia tipped launch inch tablet lumia report	Nokia has toggled the launch in the report of the lumia tablet.	Nokia flipped over the launch in the lumia tablet report.	Nokia has tipped the launch into the tablet lumia report.
7	nokia lumia buyer delay microsoft att store	Nokia Lumia Buyer is delaying the release of the microsoft att store.	Nokia Lumia Buyer will delay microsoft att store.	Nokia Lumia buyer delay microsoft att store.
7	nokia lumia officially announced gb ram	Nokia lumia has officially announced the release of gb ram ram.	Nokia lumia has now officially announced gb ram ram.	Nokia lumia officially announced gb ram ram.
7	nokia sell tablet making fun ipad	Nokia mocks tablets while selling them.	Nokia sells tablets mocking them; iPad.	Nokia is selling tablets and making fun of them.
7	nokia lumia nokia lumia differ	Nokia lumia nokia lumia, Nokia lumia, Nokia lumia.	Nokia lumia nokia lumia differ.	Nokia lumia nokia lumia differ from one another.
7	nokia reveals lumia successor lumia	Nokia announces that it is the successor to Nokia lumia lumia.	Nokia reveals lumia successor lumia lumia lumia.	Nokia reveals lumia successor lumia lumia lumia.
7	demand window phone channel tv streaming app	The window of the request of the TV channel in streaming app app app.	The TV phone channel request dialog box in streaming app app app.	TV phone channel request window in streaming app app app.
7	nokia lumia verizon wireless network	Nokia Lumia Wireless Network.	Wireless network Nokia Lumia Verizon.	Nokia lumia verizon wireless network.
7	nokia lumia	Lumia nokia.	Nokia lumia.	Oh, my God, Nokia Lumia.
7	nokia lumia smartphone sale december uk	Nokia Lumia will be selling a December uk uk december smartphone.	Nokia Lumia sale of smartphone December uk uk December.	Nokia Lumia smartphone sale December uk uk december.
7	nokia lumia ad suggests buyer thing people	Nokia Lumia announces advertisement for buyers.	Nokia Lumia announces it's advertising for buyers.	Nokia Lumia has announced a new advertisement for the company.
7	amazon offering att nokia lumia	This is a great place to relax and relax.	Amazon att nokia lumia att nokia.	Amazon offering att nokia lumia.
7	nokia lumia land uk december	Nokia lumia-land in December.	In December, Nokia lumia land.	Nokia lumia land in December.
7	nokia music change mixradio overnight	Nokia music will change mixradio night and night.	Nokia music change mixradio night and night.	Nokia music change mixradio night and night.
7	nokia planning release inch tablet early year rumor	Nokia is planning to release the tablet at the beginning of the new year.	Nokia is planning to release the inch tablet at the beginning of this year's rumor mill.	Nokia plans to release the inch tablet at the beginning of rumor year.
7	nokia lumia budget window phone surface swappable cover	Nokia Lumia budget window swappable cover phone surface.	Nokia Lumia budget window phone surface swappable cover.	Nokia Lumia budget window phone surface swappable cover.
7	nokia lumia snapdragon inch screen	Nokia lumia screen snapdragon inch.	Screen nokia lumia snapdragon inch.	Screen nokia lumia snapdragon inch.
7	top mobile nokia lumia black friday cyber monday christmas	Top Black Nikia Lumia Mobile Friday E-Monday.	Top mobile Nikia Lumia black Friday e-Monday of Christmas.	Top black Nikia Lumia mobile Friday cyber Christmas Monday.
7	curious case lumia	Lumia freak case.	This is a curious case, Lumia.	Curious case lumia.
7	nokia window tablet ad pick ipad air msft	Nokia tablet window and choose ipad.	Nokia window tablet and choose ipad air msft.	Nokia air msft window tablet and choose ipad air msft.
7	nokia lumia ad forget art smartphone camera combat	Nokia lumia to forget about it; artwork; artwork; artwork.	Nokia lumia to forget the camera; art smartphone combat.	Nokia lumia ad forget l' art smartphone combat camera.
7	nokia lumia verizon wireless	Wireless Nokia Lumia Verizon.	Nokia Lumia Wireless Verizon.	Wireless nokia lumia verizon.
7	nokia microsoft lumia ad ipad lack	Nokia microsoft lumium ad ipad lacks light.	Nokia microsoft lumia ad ipad lacks light.	Nokia microsoft lumia ad ipad lack of light.
7	nokia lumia officially announced australia availalbe dec	Nokia lumia has officially announced that it is ready for release in Australia.	Nokia lumia has officially announced decalbe Australian availability.	Nokia lumia officially announced Australian availability decalbe.
7	nokia sweetens tablet launch free keyboard	Nokia sweetens tablet to launch the free of charge keyboard.	Nokia sweetens tablet launch the free keyboard.	Nokia sweetens tablet launch free keyboard.
7	nokia france promote nokia lumia shoot zoom phone	Nokia France promote zoom nokia lumia phone.	Nokia France promote nokia lumia zoom phone.	Nokia France promote nokia lumia zoom phone line.
7	nokia smartphones percent window phone device	Nokia smartphones for the percentage of the total number of phone calls.	Nokia smartphones for percentage of phones; phone windows.	Nokia smartphones for percentage of phones; window phone devices.
7	nokia lumia web ad poke fun ipad wrong tablet	Nokia lumia webia a pike fun ipad blizzard.	Nokia web lumia ad pike fun ipad wrong tablet.	Nokia lumia web ad pike fun ipad bad tablet.
7	nokia latest lumia ad poke fun ipad	Nokia is the last bright spot in the world to have fun.	Nokia last light to poke fun ipad ipad.	Nokia last lumia ad poke fun ipad ipad.
7	amazon offering verizon nokia lumia penny	I'm an Amazon, and I'd like to offer you a wormhole.	Amazon offering verizon nokia lumia penny.	Amazon offering verizon nokia lumia penny.
7	nokia working inch lumia tablet	Nokia works on a dapos lumia tablet; one thumb.	Nokia is working on a lumia d&apos tablet; one inch.	Nokia works a tablet lumia d'apos; one thumb.
7	lumia official add memory	Lumia adds the memory to the memory.	Lumia official add the memory.	Lumia official add memory to it.
7	nokia lumia official	This is Nokia Lumia official.	Nokia Lumia official.	Nokia lumia official.
7	htc max nokia lumia	Diese könnnen können.	Htc max nokia lumia.	Htc max nokia lumia max.
7	nokia create challenge apps visually impaired	Nokia creates challenging applications that are visually deficient.	Nokia also creates visually deficient challenge applications.	Nokia creates visually deficient challenge applications.
7	nokia lumia att store backordered microsoft	Nokia att att attocke microsoft at l' rear @-@plan.	Nokia lumia attocke microsoft at l' back @-@plan.	Nokia lumia att attocke microsoft @-@plan.
7	credit aloysius low cnet	All right, let's go.	Aloysius credit low cnet.	Credit low cnet aloysius.
7	nokia owns window phone market	Nokia is the owner of the market for telephone windows.	Nokia's got the phone window market.	Nokia owns the window phone market.
7	uk nokia lumia start selling december	Uk nokia lumia begin to sell in December.	Uk nokia lumia will start selling December.	Uk nokia lumia start selling December.
7	nokia extends buyback offer lumia exchange smartphones	Nokia is extending its buy-in to smart phones light switches.	Nokia is expanding its offer to purchase smartphones with the addition of lumia switches.	Nokia extends its buyout offer to smart light exchange phones.
7	microsoft showcase device window	Microsoft Storefront Window for Microsoft Demonstration Devices.	Microsoft storefront window for demonstration devices.	A microsoft window for the display devices.
7	nokia lumia phablet	Nokia lumia-phablet.	Nokia lumia phablet?	Nokia lumia phablet.
7	microsoft day xbox nokia lumia lumia	Microsoft Windows Xbox nokia lumia lumia lumia lumia day.	Xbox microsoft day nokia lumia lumia lumia lumia.	This is a microsoft day xbox nokia lumia lumia lumia.
7	carphone warehouse kick nokia lumia uk pre order	Carphone warehouse bottez nokia lumia uk pre-command.	Carphone warehouse bottez nokia lumia uk pré-command.	Carphone warehouse bottez nokia lumia uk pré-command.
7	phone review nokia window lumia phone cheese	Telephone review window nokia lumia phone phone cheese.	Phone review nokia window lumia phone line cheese.	Phone review nokia window lumia phone cheese.
7	samsung galaxy iphone nokia lumia unlocked price check	Samsung Galaxy iphone nokia lumia unlock the control of the price.	Samsung Galaxy iphone nokia lumia unlocked Price Control.	Samsung Galaxy iphone nokia lumia unlocked price control.
7	nokia lumia sale december	Nokia Lumia will be sold in December.	Nokia Lumia sale in December.	Nokia lumia sale in December.
7	nokia lumia inch tablet work early launch	Nokia lumia tablet inch work early launch.	Nokia lumia inch tablet work early in the launch.	Nokia lumia inch tablet work early release.
7	nokia lumia tablet rumored	Rumor had it that Nokia Lumia was circulating.	Rumor has it that the Nokia Lumia tablet is circulating.	The Nokia Lumia tablet was rumored to circulate.
7	nokia ad teach assau iphone galaxy owner	Nokia announces d' educating the owner of Galaxie Iphone Assassin.	Nokia announces d' teach the owner of Galaxie Iphone assau.	Nokia announces d' teach Galaxie Iphone owner assau.
7	inch nokia lumia launching early rumor	Inch nokia lumia spreading rumors for the first time.	Inch nokia lumia spreading the first rumors.	Inch nokia lumia spreading the early gossip.
7	nokia chat beta updated offline mode faster startup	Nokia chat beta update offline faster boot mode.	Nokia chat beta updated offline faster boot mode.	Nokia chat beta updated offline mode faster.
7	nokia normandy asha phone large display hint leak	Nokia normalandy asha phone big screen leak.	Nokia normandy asha phone big screen hatch leak.	Nokia normandy asha phone large leak indicator screen.
7	nokia lumia shipment delayed att microsoft send email	Nokia lumia send delayed microsoft att send e @-@mail.	Nokia lumia send delayed att microsoft send e @-@email.	Nokia lumia send delayed att microsoft send e-mail.
7	nokia lumia ad mock ipad fails	Nokia Lumia and its imitation of Ipad failed.	Nokia Lumia and her imitation of L'apos failed.	Nokia Lumia and her apos imitation; ipad fails.
7	nokia update camera app raw image shooting	Nokia update of l' photo application taken from l' raw images taken.	Nokia update of l' photo application taken d' raw shot images.	Nokia update of l' application shot d' raw images shot.
7	nokia video target ipad comically bad web ad	Nokia video target ipad is a comically bad webcast.	Nokia video target ipad comically bad web announcement.	Nokia video target ipad comically bad web announcement.
7	microsoft att alert nokia lumia shipment delay software giant	Microsoft att alert nokia lumia delays the apos; shipping of the giant software.	Microsoft att alert nokia lumia will delay shipping of the giant software.	Microsoft att alert nokia lumia delays shipping the giant software.
7	nokia lumia commercial misleads play geek insecurity	Nokia Lumia is a commercial, misleading, geeky insecurities game.	Nokia Lumia Commercial Misleading plays geek insecurities.	Nokia Lumia misleading commercial plays geek insecurities.
7	funny nokia lumia ad suggests getter start	L' Funny Announcement by Nokia Lumia... suggests that we get going.	L' funny announcement by Nokia Lumia suggests that we go.	L' Nokia Lumia funny announcement suggests to start.
7	nokia lumia pricing availability uk revealed	Nokia Lumia prices are now available uk revealed uk availability.	Nokia Lumia price available uk revealed uk availability.	Nokia Lumia price available uk revealed availability uk.
7	nokia corporation adr nyse nok facebook nasdaq fb notable	Nokia Corporation adnyse nok facebook nasdaq fb notable.	Nokia Corporation adr nyse nok facebook nasdaq fb notable.	Nokia Corporation adr nyse nok facebook nasdaq fb notable.
7	nokia lumia delayed december	December was delayed by Nokia lumia.	Nokia lumia has delayed December.	Nokia lumia delayed December.
7	redbox instant verizon arrives nokia lumia device	Instant Verizon Redbox is now available.	The instant verizon redbox arrives at the apos; device nokia lumia.	The instant redbox verizon arrives at the nokia lumia device.
7	nokia lumia review bigger better window phone	Nokia lumia see again larger phone window better.	Nokia lumia see bigger window better phone.	Nokia lumia see bigger window phone better.
7	low att nokia lumia supply evident retail store	Faible att nokia lumia is an obvious supply of retail stores.	Low att nokia lumia evident retail store supply.	Low att nokia lumia supply evident retail store.
7	nokia play beta lumia download	Nokia play the Beta Lumia download.	Nokia play Beta Lumia download.	Nokia play the download Beta Lumia.
7	nokia camera app updated raw support	L' application of the camera nokia has just updated the raw support.	L' camera application nokia has updated the raw support.	L' nokia camera application updated raw support.
7	window phone remains second mobile platform latin america	The dialog continues to be the second-level-mobile latino-U.S.	The phone window remains the second plate-mobile form latino-in the US.	The phone window remains the second plate-form mobile latino-U.S.
7	company update verizon communication nyse vz nokia lumia	This is the latest update of the company's communication technology.	Update of list; communication company verizon vz nokia lumia.	Communication company verizon vz nokia lumia update.
7	nokia lumia promo video arrives	Nokia Lumia is just coming up with a promotional video.	Nokia Lumia promotional video is coming.	Nokia Lumia promo video coming up.
7	nokia command window phone install base	Nokia phone command dialog box install base.	Nokia command dialog install base base.	Nokia command window phone install base base.
7	lumia help microsoft control smartphone market	Lumia helps microsoft also controls the smartphone market.	Lumia helps control the smartphone market.	Lumia helps microsoft control the market of the smartphone.
7	att microsoft delay shipment nokia lumia	This is the first time you'll be able to download your e-mail.	Een microsoft timer de&apos, een dispatch van de klijk.	Expeditions nokia lumia at microsoft times.
7	nokia normandy mystery handset leaked online hint asha	The mystery phone of Nokia Normandy s&apos is leaked online as an allusion to Asha.	Nokia Normandy's mystery phone s&apos is leaked online as a reference to the Asha.	Nokia Normandy's mystery phone is leaked online as a reference to Asha.
7	nokia lumia impression	Implication of Nokia Lumia.	Nokia Lumia imitation.	Nokia lumia imitation.
7	nokia lumia south africa	Nokia Lumia South Africa.	Nokia Lumia South Africa.	Nokia lumia south africa.
7	nokia lumia tablet review	Nokia lumia tablet, see again.	Nokia lumia tablet again.	Nokia lumia tablet back.
7	nokia lumia inch tablet rumored release april	"There are rumors that the tablet, ""nokia lumia inch"", was released in April."	Rumor has it that the nokia lumia inch tablet was released in April.	The nokia lumia inch tablet is rumored to be available in April.
7	nokia normandy leak combine asha lumia intrigue	Normandy nokia escape combines the mystery of Lumia and the mystery of Lumia.	The escape of the normandy nokia combines the intrigue of Lumia and the intrigue of Lumia.	The leak nokia normandy combines the story of Lumia and the story of Lumia.
7	nokia lumia official	This is Nokia Lumia official.	Nokia Lumia official.	Nokia lumia official.
7	nokia lumia window tablet video review	Video examination of Nokia Lumia Window Tablet.	Video examination of Nokia Lumia window tablet.	Nokia Lumia window tablet video review.
7	nokia lumia metropcs	Nokia-lumia-metropcs.	Nokia lumia metropcs.	Nokia lumia metropcs.
7	high tablet launched nokia lg sony early	A high tablet has been launched at the beginning of the game.	A high tablet launches start nokia lg sony.	A high tablet launched start nokia lg sony.
7	nokia lumia going sale black fri	Nokia Lumia's gonna sell black-fried, you know.	Nokia Lumia will sell the black fry.	Nokia lumia will sell black fry.
7	dhoom game review window phone nokia lumia	Dhoom Game Review Window phone nokia lumia.	Dhoom Game Review Window phone nokia lumia.	Dhoom Game Review Window phone nokia lumia.
7	nokia lumia inch budget smartphone gb ram unveiled	Nokia lumia budget inch smartphone gb ram unveiled.	Nokia lumia inch budget smartphone gb ram unveiled.	Nokia lumia inch budget smartphone gb ram unveiled.
7	nokia introduces smart upgrade offer lumia discount	Nokia introduces the intelligent upgrade of the lumia discount offer lumia.	Nokia introduces the intelligent offer lumia discount lumia upgrade.	Nokia introduces intelligent upgrade offer lumia discount offer lumia.
7	nokia lumia launch pushed overwhelming demand	The launch of Nikia Lumia has generated a great deal of interest and demand.	The launch of Nikia Lumia has generated overwhelming demand.	There was overwhelming demand for the launch of Nikia Lumia.
7	buy lumia price drop snapdeal	Buy lumia low price lumia snapdeal snapdeal.	Buy lumia lower price snapdeal snapdeal.	Buy lumia price drop snapdeal snapdeal.
7	nokia lumia price free keyboard offer rival surface	Nokia Lumia offers a great deal of space without a keyboard.	Nokia Lumia Prices without keyboard offers a rival surface.	Nokia Lumia price without keyboard offers a rival surface.
8	scientist unreported fish trap space	It was noted that there is a need for more information on the use of fish traps.	One scientist did not report the location of fish trapping.	One scientist did not report the fish trap site location.
8	google earth image capitulate better data fish catch	L&apos, an image of Google Earth, makes it easier to catch fish.	L' Google Earth image makes it easier to catch fish.	Google Earth image makes it easier to catch fish.
8	google earth reveals unreported fish catch persian gulf coast	Google Earth reports that there have been undeclared fish catches on the Persian Gulf Coast.	Google Earth reports unreported catches of fish on the Persian Gulf coast.	Google Earth reports catches of unreported fish off the persian coast of the Gulf of Mexico.
8	google earth improves estimate fish catch	Google Earth improves the quality of its products and services.	Google Earth improves the accuracy of fish catch estimates.	Google Earth improves fish catch estimates.
8	cheap simple technique provide accurate fishing statistic worldwide	Accurate fishing statistics from around the world can be obtained using a simple and inexpensive technique.	A simple and inexpensive technique makes it possible to obtain accurate fishing statistics all over the world.	A cheap and simple technique allows you to obtain accurate fishing statistics worldwide.
8	untold fish catch revealed google earth	Fish catches of unknown fishes have revealed Google Earth.	Some unknown fish catches have revealed Google Earth.	Unknown fish catches revealed Google Earth.
8	google earth detailed picture space better info fishing	Google Earth details; space d' fishery best information image.	Google Earth detail of the map; space d' image better fishing information.	Google Earth details; space d' image better fishing information.
8	iran underreporting fish catch	Iran-reports catches of fish.	Iran at @-@fish catch reporting.	Iran under-@-@ fish catch reporting.
8	investigating fish trap space google earth image reveal severe	It's a good way to learn more about fish traps and how to use them.	L' examination of l' image of the google earth on the fish traps reveals serious problems.	L' examination of l' image of the google fish trap land reveals serious problems.
8	google earth reveals untold fish catch	Google Earth reports that there are so many different kinds of fish.	Google Earth reveals countless catches of fish.	Google Earth reveals countless fish catches.
8	google earth busting persian gulf nation overfishing	And on Google Earth, the nation of the Persian Gulf is plagued by overfishing.	On Google Earth, the Persian Gulf nation is plagued by overfishing.	The Persian Gulf nation is plagued by overfishing on Google Earth.
8	google earth help researcher estimate fishing rate	Google Earth helps the researcher to estimate the amount of fish caught in the fishery.	Google Earth helps the researcher estimate catch rates.	Google Earth helps researchers estimate fishing rates.
8	google earth spy unreported fish trap study reveals	L&apos, Google Earth's Unreported Fishtrap Study, revealed a number of fish traps.	L' Google Earth Unreported Fishtrap Study reveals fish traps.	L' Google Earth unreported fish trap study reveals fish traps.
8	satellite image persian gulf underreported fish catch	L' satellite imagery of the Persian Gulf under-estimated fish catches.	L' satellite image of the Persian Gulf under-estimated the catch of fish.	L' satellite image of the Persian Gulf under-estimated fish catch.
8	study find google earth capture fish trap unreported	Google Earth's fish traps have not been reported, according to one study.	One study shows that the Google Earth fish traps have not been reported.	A study shows that Google Earth's fish traps were not reported.
8	google earth image caught persian gulf fisherman breaking international law	Image of Google Land caught fishing Persian Gulf violating international law.	Image of the google land caught fisherman of the Persian Gulf violating international law.	Image of google land caught fishing Persian Gulf breaking international law.
8	google earth spot unreported fish trap persian gulf researcher	Google Earth just spotted fish traps not reported by a Persian Gulf researcher.	Google Earth spotted unreported traps from a researcher in the Persian Gulf.	Google Earth has spotted unreported fish traps from Persian Gulf researcher.
8	google earth image bust persian gulf fishery catch time	Google Earth image buste persian gulf fishing catch time.	Google Earth image bust persian gulf catch time peach fishery.	Google Earth image bust persian gulf catch time peaches.
8	google earth image yield better data fish catch	L' image from Google Earth gives better data on catches of fish.	Google Earth image provides better data on fish catches.	Google Earth image provides better fish catch data.
8	google earth reveals secret gigantic persian gulf fish trap	Google Earth reveals the secret Giant Persian Gulf Fish Trap.	Google Earth reveals the gigantic Persian Gulf fish trap as a secret.	Google Earth reveals the giant persian gulf fish trap.
8	google earth satellite image reveal overfishing persian gulf	L' satellite imagery from Google Earth reveals the existence of overfishing in the Persian Gulf.	L' Google Earth satellite image reveals overfishing in the Persian Gulf.	Google Earth satellite image reveals overfishing in the Persian Gulf.
8	google earth image help researcher identify severe persian gulf overfishing	L' image of Google Earth helps researchers to identify the serious overfishing in the Persian Gulf.	L' Google Earth image helps researchers identify the Persian Gulf's severe overfishing problem.	Google Earth image helps researchers identify severe overfishing in the Persian Gulf.
8	persian gulf fishery underreport catch figure researcher google	Fishing in the Persian Gulf-declared.	The fishing in the Persian Gulf is-declared.	The fishing in the Persian Gulf is under the heading-declared.
8	google earth validate catch statistic	Google Earth validates statistics catch.	Google Earth validates catch statistics.	Google Earth will validate the catch statistics.
8	google earth reveals fish catch time greater thought persian gulf	Google Earth reveals that the time of capture of fish is greater than the time of capture of persian gulf.	Google Earth reveals that fish capture time is longer thought persian gulf.	Google Earth reveals that fish catching time is greater thought persian gulf.
9	edward snowden latest leak nsa monitored online porn habit radicalizers	Edward Snowden, the NSA's latest leak, has been monitoring radical online porn.	The latest NSA leak, Edward Snowden, has been monitoring online porn radicals.	Edward Snowden, the latest leak of the NSA, has been monitoring online porn radicals.
9	nsa planned discredit radical web porn	The NSA has plans to discredit this radical web porn.	The NSA is planning to discredit radical web porn!	NSA's planning to discredit radical web porn.
9	nsa spying porn watching habit islamic radicalizers	The NSA spies on porn while they watch the usual radical Islamists.	The NSA spies on porn by watching the usual radical Islamists.	The N.S.A. spies on porn watching the usual radical Islamists.
9	nsa logged online porn habit muslim radicalizers	The N.S.A. Online taped radical Muslims accustomed to porn.	The NSA has online a record of radical Muslims accustomed to porn.	NSA online recorded radical Muslims used to porn.
9	nsa spy porn habit undermine muslim radicalizers	N.S.A. spying undermines Muslim radicals.	Porno d' NSA spying undermines Muslim radicals.	N.A.S. Spy porn undermines Muslim radicals.
9	nsa target porn poor fact checking	They're targeting poor, truth-checking pornos.	The NSA is targeting poor pornos who check the facts.	NSA targets poor pornos who check the facts.
9	nsa tracking people porn habit	Nsa stalk people, pornos.	Nsa hunts people, pornos.	Nsa's tracking people, pornos.
9	nsa spied porn habit muslim discredit radicalizers	Nsa spy's habit of discrediting radicals.	Nsa spy habit of porn muslim discrediting radicals.	Nsa spy porn habit muslim discredit radicals.
9	nsa monitored porn site	NSA's been monitoring porn.	NSA's been monitoring the porn site.	NSA's been monitoring the porn site for a while.
9	nsa spied porn habit muslim radical undermine influence	The NSA has been spying on radical, Muslim pornographic habits, undermining influence.	The NSA has been spying on radical Muslim pornographic habits, undermining their influence.	The NSA has spied on radical Muslim pornographic habits undermining their influence.
9	nsa collected detail online sexual activity islamist radical	NSA has been gathering details of radical Islamists' online sexual activity.	NSA has gathered details of the online sexual activity of radical Islamists.	NSA gathered details about the online sexual activity of radical Islamists.
9	nsa collected porn visit data discredit radicalizers	The NSA has been collecting data on pornographic visits to discredit radicals.	NSA collected data on the pornographic visits to discredit the radicals.	NSA collected data on pornographic visits to discredit radicals.
9	nsa collecting porn activity discredit radicalizers	The NSA, which collects pornographic material, discredits radicals.	The NSA, which collects pornography, discredits radicals.	NSA collecting pornographic activity discredits radicals.
9	nsa spied radicalisers porn surfing discredit reveals snowden	Spied radicals from the NSA are discrediting Snowden.	N.S.A. Spied radicals surfing on porn discredits the life of Snowden.	The NSA's spied radicals surfing porn discredits Snowden.
9	report nsa track online porn habit discredit muslim radicalizers	D' after the NSA, Muslim radicals are discredited by online porn.	D' after the NSA, l' habit of online porn discredits Muslim radicals.	D' after the NSA, l' online porn habit discredits Muslim radicals.
9	nsa spied porn habit muslim radicalizers effort	The N.S.A. has been spying on radicalizing Muslims accustomed to porn.	The NSA has been spying on the radicalization of porn-accustomed Muslims.	The NSA spied on the apos; effort to radicalize Muslims accustomed to porn.
9	muslim radicalisers porn habit monitored nsa	N.A.S.A. Pornography-watching radical Muslims.	Muslim radicals have a habit of watching porn.	Radical Muslims used to watch porn NSA.
9	agency spy radical muslim target porn habit	L&apos, an agency that spies on Muslim radicals targeting pornographic habits.	The agency spies on radical Muslims targeting pornographic habits.	The agency spies on radical Muslims targeting porn habits.
9	top secret document reveals nsa spy porn habit suspected terrorist	A top-secret document reveals a pornographic habit of the National Security Agency (NSA) being suspected of terrorism.	A top-secret document reveals a pornographic habit of suspected terrorism-related NSA espionage.	A top secret document reveals a porn habit of d'apos; NSA espionage suspected of terrorism.
9	nsa planned shame radicalizers revealing porn history	The NSA has been planning to radicalize the shame element by revealing the story of porn.	NSA is planning to radicalize the shame by exposing the porn story.	The NSA planned to radicalize the shame by revealing the story of porn.
9	top secret document reveals nsa spied porn habit plan	A classified document revealed that the NSA had been spying on a porn plan.	A top-secret document reveals that the NSA has been spying on a porn plan.	A top secret document reveals the NSA spied on a porn plan.
9	nsa monitored online sexual habit muslim radicalizers bid	NSA has been monitoring Muslim radicals' offers online.	The NSA has been monitoring online the offers of the Muslim radicals of the sexual habit.	NSA monitored online offers from Muslim radicals of the sexual habit.
9	nsa record radicalizers porn habit st internet speed bitcoin	N.A.N.S. is the world's most popular online service provider.	Internet speed bitcoin is the most popular porn radicalizer in the world.	Nsa record porn radicalizers habitue st internet speed bitcoin.
9	nsa surveillance europe threatens freeze data sharing arrangement	The Europe of NSA surveillance threatens to freeze the sharing of data.	The Europe of NSA surveillance is threatening to freeze data sharing.	NSA surveillance Europe threatens to freeze data sharing.
9	nsa spied porn habit plan discredit radicalizers	The NSA has been spying on porn's plan to discredit radicals.	So the NSA spied on the porn plan to discredit the radicals.	NSA spied on the porn plan to discredit the radicals.
9	security service spied pornography online promiscuity	Security has been spying on the promiscuous online pornography.	Security has been spying on online pornography that is promiscuous.	The security service spied on promiscuous online pornography.
9	report nsa spied porn habit discredit muslim radical	D' after the NSA, Muslim radicals are discredited by the habit of spy porn.	D' after the NSA, l' habit of spy porn discredits radical Muslims.	D' after the NSA, the spy porn habit discredits radical Muslims.
9	report nsa spied porn habit discredit radicalizers	D' after the NSA, radicals are discredited by spy porn.	D' after the NSA, spy porn discredits radicals.	D' after NSA, spy porn discredits radicals.
9	nsa spied porn habit huffpo report	NSA has been spying on porn's Huffpo report.	The NSA spied on the Huffpo report of porn.	NSA spied on the porn Huffpo report.
9	nsa spied porn habit radicalizers planned detail	NSA has been spying on pornos, radicals have been planning details.	NSA has been spying on porn, radicals have been planning details.	The NSA spied on porn, radicals planned details.
9	nsa monitored porn habit discredit radicalizers	The NSA has been monitoring the pornographic habit to discredit radicals.	NSA has been monitoring the porn habit to discredit radicals.	NSA monitored the porn habit to discredit radicals.
9	surveillance cover porn leak nsa considered undermining	Surveillance coverage has covered the NSA's suspected porno leakage as a security threat.	Surveillance covers the leak of NSA porn considered a security threat.	Surveillance covers the NSA's porn leak considered a security threat.
10	gerry adam ira irrelevant mcguinness	Gerry Adam will go irrelevant, Mcguinness.	Gerry Adam will go irrelevant Mcguinness.	Gerry adam will go irrelevant mcguinness.
10	pressure adam documentary issue ira membership	Adventure, admiration, admiration, admiration, admiration, admiration, admiration.	To promote the apostles; to adamate the documentary; to admire, to admire, to admire, to admire, to admire, to admire, to admire and to admire.	It's a pleasure to be able to see you at home, to see you at home, to see you at home and to see you at work.
10	sinn fein submission haass talk full empty rhetoric	Sinn fein submissive hasass talk empty rhetoric.	Sinn fein submission hasass talk empty rhetoric.	Sinn fein submission haass talk empty rhetoric.
10	gerry adam apologised ira disappeared victim jean mcconville family	Gerry Adam s' is excused for the disappearance of Jean McConville, the victim of the disappearance of the city of Ira.	Gerry Adam s&apos, is excused for the disappearance of Jean McConville, the victim of the disappearance of Ira.	Gerry Adam s' is excused for the disappearance of Jean McConville, victim of Ira's disappearance.
10	alec reid gerry adam man god	Alec Reid Gerry Adam Man God.	Alec Reid Gerry Adam, man God.	Alec Reid Gerry adam man god.
10	gerry adam brother jailed year raping daughter	Gerry Adam, brother's been in jail for a year, raping his daughter.	Gerry Adam, one-year-old prison brother, raping his daughter.	Gerry Adam, brother in prison for a year, raping his daughter.
10	gerry adam brother sentenced today sexual abuse	It's a shame that we don't know what to do about it.	Gerry Adam's brother today condemned the sexual abuse.	Gerry Adam's brother condemned sexual abuse today.
10	liam adam laugh prison guard sentenced year prison	He was sentenced to one year in prison, and was sentenced to one year in prison.	Liam Adam laughed, sentenced prison guard to one year in prison.	Liam Adam laughed, prison guard sentenced to a year in jail.
10	gerry adam brother liam jailed raping daughter aine	Gerry Adam's brother, Liam, raped his daughter while she was in prison.	The brother of Gerry Adam, Liam, raped his daughter in prison.	Gerry Adam's brother Liam raped his daughter in prison.
10	liam adam receives year prison	Liam Adam is hereby sentenced to one year in prison.	Liam Adam gets a year in prison.	Liam adam gets a year in prison.
10	letter group accountable murder	Assassination responsible.	Group of letters: responsible assassination.	The group of letters is called the responsible murder.
10	adam brother jailed rape	Brother Adam has been found guilty of rape.	Brother Adam got convicted of rape.	Brother Adam has a rape conviction.
10	liam adam jailed raping daughter	Liam Adam raped his daughter in a prison cell.	Liam Adam raped his daughter in prison.	Liam adam raped his daughter in prison.
10	pressure mount gerry adam ahead tv documentary	Gerry Mountain Pressure adam straight ahead of documentary tv.	Right gerry adam mount pressure ahead documentary tv.	Right mount gerry adam pressure ahead documentary tv.
10	adam paedophile brother jailed	He is the brother of the child molester D'apos; Adam is imprisoned.	The paedophile brother d'apos; Adam is in jail.	Adam's paedophile brother is imprisoned.
10	liam adam sentenced sexual abuse daughter	Liam Adam convicted his daughter of sexual-abuse.	Liam Adam convicted his daughter of sexual abuse?	Liam adam convicted his daughter of sexual abuse.
10	liam adam sentenced abuse daughter	Liam Adam condemns his abused daughter.	Liam Adam condemned his abused daughter!	Liam adam condemned his abused daughter.
10	claim adam ira irrelevant mcguinness	Pretending that Adam's name is not related to Mcguinness.	Pretending that Adam will go has nothing to do with Mcguinness.	To claim that Adam ira n'apos has nothing to do with Mcguinness.
10	mary lou leader arose	Marie-Lou s&apos is up.	Marie-Lou s&apos, is lifted.	Marie-Lou s' canceled.
10	liam adam jailed year sex abuse daughter	Liam Adam, the rape victim's daughter, has been in prison for a year.	Liam Adam, the daughter of the victim of d' sexual abuse, has been imprisoned for a year.	Liam Adam, the daughter of the sexual abuse victim, has been in prison for a year.
10	brother sinn fein leader gerry adam receives year prison sentence	Brother Sinn Fein, leader Gerry Adam, is sentenced to one year.	Brother Sinn Fein, leader Gerry Adam, was sentenced to one year in prison.	His brother Sinn Fein, leader Gerry Adam, was sentenced to one year in prison.
10	liam adam jailed year raping daughter	Liam Adam, sentenced to one year, rapes his daughter.	Liam adam, sentenced to one year in prison, rapes his daughter.	Liam Adam, who was sentenced to one year in prison, is raping his daughter.
10	gerry adam brother jailed year raping daughter	Gerry Adam, brother's been in jail for a year, raping his daughter.	Gerry Adam, one-year-old prison brother, raping his daughter.	Gerry Adam, brother in prison for a year, raping his daughter.
10	adam mcconville	This is Adam McConville.	Adam mcconville.	Uh, Adam McConville.
10	liam adam jailed raping abusing daughter	Liam Adam, imprisoned, rapes his daughter, and mistreats her.	Liam Adam, imprisoned, rapes his daughter and mistreats him.	Liam Adam, who is in prison, is raping his daughter and abusing her.
10	mary lou positioned replace adam	Mary Lou has been positioned to take Adam's place today.	Mary Lou has been positioned to replace Adam.	Mary Lou's been positioned to replace adam.
10	brother sinn fein chief adam jailed raping daughter	Brother Chief Adam Sinn Fein in prison raping the girl.	Brother Sinn Fein Chef Adam in jail raping the girl.	Hey, brother Sinn Fein Chef Adam in prison raping the girl.
10	ira adam question sidestepped	Adam dodged the question.	Adam dodged the question.	Adam dodged the question altogether.
10	liam adam sentenced year prison	Liam Adam was sentenced to one year.	Liam Adam was sentenced to one year in prison.	Liam adam was sentenced to one year in prison.
10	documentary gerry adam	Gérard adam, documentalist.	I'm Gérard Adam, a documentary artist.	Gerard adam, documentary artist.
10	sinn fein lining mary lou mcdonald follow gerry adam president	Sinn fein sining mary mcdonald follower gerry adam president.	Sinn fein sining mary lou mcdonald follow gerry adam president.	Sinn fein sining mary lou mcdonald follow gerry adam president.
10	sinn fein head brother jailed abuse	Sinn Fein is the head of the prison cell; he's an abusive brother.	Sinn Fein leader of l' abuse of jailed brother.	Sinn Fein head of l' abuse of jailed brother.
10	sinn fein leader adam god fr alec reid	Sinn Fein Leader adam god fr alec reid.	Sinn Fein leader adam god fr alec reid.	Sinn Fein, leader adam god fr alec reid.
10	liam adam sentenced year rape daughter	And Liam Adam sentenced his daughter to one year's worth of rape.	Liam Adam sentenced his daughter to a year's rape.	Liam adam sentenced his daughter to one year of rape.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth girl secretly fiance	Jennifer loves Hewitt, baby's fiancee; a child born secretly.	Jennifer loves a secretly born child, Hewitt, the bride of Apos.	Jennifer loves Hewitt, the secretly born child's fiancée.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby secretly	I mean, Jennifer secretly loves Hewitt as a baby.	Jennifer secretly loves Hewitt, baby.	Jennifer secretly loves baby Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth secretly married baby daddy	Well, Jennifer loves Hewitt secretly giving birth to a baby daddy.	Jennifer likes Hewitt to be born secretly married baby daddy.	Jennifer loves Hewitt being secretly married baby daddy.
11	girl newlywed jennifer love hewitt	Jennifer, bride loves Hewitt.	Jennifer, the bride, loves Hewitt.	Oh, Jennifer, newlywed, loves Hewitt.
11	love hewitt baby girl	J' loves Little Girl Hewitt.	J' loves this little girl Hewitt.	J&apos loves little girl Hewitt.
11	hewitt announces birth marriage	Well, Hewitt's announcing his wedding at birth.	Hewitt's announcing his birth marriage.	Hewitt announces his marriage at birth today.
11	jennifer love hewitt mom wife	Jennifer loves mother-wife-wife Hewitt.	Jennifer loves Hewitt mother mother mother mother wife.	Jennifer is in love with Hewitt, mother-mother-wife.
11	jennifer love hewitt daughter secretly marries brian hallisay	Jennifer is married to Brian Hallisay, who is the daughter of Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves Hewitt, her daughter secretly marries Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves Hewitt, her daughter secretly marries Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl	Jennifer loves Little Hewitt.	Jennifer adores the little girl Hewitt.	Jennifer loves little girl Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl secretly married	Jennifer loves the birth of a little girl, Hewitt, who is secretly married.	Jennifer loves the birth of a Hewitt baby girl who is secretly married.	Jennifer loves the birth of a secretly married little girl Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt mom surprise wife	Jennifer loves Hewitt, surprise mom, surprise wife, surprise mom.	Jennifer likes Hewitt mom surprise surprise wife mother.	Jennifer loves Hewitt mom surprise wife surprise mother.
11	jennifer love hewitt pregnant baby bump approach promotes	Jennifer likes pregnant Hewitt baby bump, promotes apos, approaches Hewitt baby bump.	Jennifer likes it; pregnant Hewitt baby bump approach promotes baby bump; pregnant Hewitt baby bump approach.	Jennifer likes pregnant Hewitt baby bump approach promotes apos; Hewitt baby bump approach.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl autumn james secretly married	Jennifer loves Hewitt's birth, a little girl from the fall that James secretly married.	She loves the birth of Hewitt, a little girl from the fall that James secretly married.	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt, a little girl whom James has secretly married.
11	jennifer love hewitt brian hallisay baby girl autumn james	Jennifer is a fan of Hewitt Brian Hallisay, granddaughter of James Fall.	Jennifer is a fan of Hewitt Brian Hallisay, the granddaughter of the late James Fall.	Jennifer loves Brian Hallisay, little girl from Hewitt, Fall James Fall.
11	jennifer love hewitt daughter secret wedding	Jennifer likes the secret marriage of the Hewitt girl.	Jennifer likes the Hewitt girl's secret wedding.	Jennifer likes the Hewitt girl's secret wedding night.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby reveals married thanksgiving parade	Baby Jennifer Love Hewitt unveils the Married Thanksgiving Day Parade.	Jennifer Love Hewitt baby breaks out the married Thanksgiving parade.	Jennifer Love Hewitt baby reveals the parade of married Thanksgiving.
11	girl husband jennifer love hewitt	The young girl's husband, Jennifer, loves Hewitt.	The girl's husband Jennifer loves hewitt.	Young girl Jennifer's husband loves Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl married secret	Jennifer loves Hewitt baby secret bride.	Jennifer likes Hewitt baby secret married girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt baby girl secret married.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl secretly marrying star brian	Jennifer loves the idea of Hewitt giving birth to a little girl who secretly marries the star, Brian.	Jennifer loves that Hewitt gives birth to apos; a little girl secretly marrying star Brian.	Jennifer loves Hewitt's birth; a little girl secretly marrying star Brian.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl autumn married	Well, Jennifer loves Hewitt, baby, married fall girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt baby married autumnal daughter.	Jennifer loves Hewitt baby married autumn girl.
11	double joy jennifer love hewitt	Jennifer's Double Joy loves Hewitt.	Double Joy Jennifer likes Hewitt.	Joie double Jennifer likes Hewitt.
11	rihanna drake jennifer love hewitt man steel land morning	Rihanna Drake Jennifer loves Hewitt, a man who lives on the land.	Rihanna Drake Jennifer Jennifer likes Hewitt man earth from apos; morning steel.	Rihanna Drake Jennifer loves Hewitt man earth d'apos; steel morning.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl autumn secretly marries brian hallisay	Jennifer is in love with Hewitt, and the fall girl is secretly marrying Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves Hewitt, the fall girl secretly marries Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves Hewitt, the autumn girl secretly marries Brian Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt daughter secret wedding	Jennifer likes the secret marriage of the Hewitt girl.	Jennifer likes the Hewitt girl's secret wedding.	Jennifer likes the Hewitt girl's secret wedding night.
11	jennifer love hewitt announces birth baby girl marriage	Jennifer Love Hewitt has announced the marriage of apos, a little girl.	Jennifer Love Hewitt announces apos wedding; a little girl born.	Jennifer Hewitt announces the marriage of apos; a little girl born.
11	jennifer love hewitt brian hallisay secretly daughter autumn	Jennifer loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay secret fall girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay secretly as fall girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay secretly fall girl.
11	girl jennifer love hewitt daughter autumn james	Jennifer loves Hewitt, her daughter, Fall James.	Jennifer loves Hewitt, her daughter Fall James.	Jennifer loves Hewitt, her daughter Fall James.
11	jennifer love hewitt married birth baby daughter	Jennifer loves Hewitt as a baby-baby-baby bride.	Jennifer loves Hewitt when she's married and she's a baby.	Jennifer loves Hewitt married baby girl.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl marrying client list star	Jennifer loves that' a little girl from Hewitt marries a guest star.	Jennifer loves that' a little girl from Hewitt marries a star on the client list.	Jennifer loves that' a little girl from Hewitt marries a client list star.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl	Jennifer loves Little Hewitt.	Jennifer adores the little girl Hewitt.	Jennifer loves little girl Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl marries brian hallisay	Jennifer loves the birth of a baby, a Hewitt, who marries Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves the birth of the baby Hewitt who marries Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves the birth of a Hewitt baby who marries Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl hubby brian hallisay	Jennifer loves Hewitt little daughter husband brian hallisay.	Jennifer likes Hewitt little girl husband brian hallisay.	Jennifer likes hewitt little girl husband brian hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby autumn james secretly marries	Jennifer loves Hewitt Fall Baby James is getting married secretly.	Jennifer loves Hewitt fall baby James is getting married secretly.	Jennifer loves Hewitt fall baby James is secretly getting married.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth daughter secretly marries brian hallisay	Jennifer loved Hewitt's biological daughter and secretly married Brian Hallisay.	She loves Hewitt's biological daughter and secretly marries Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves Hewitt's biological daughter and secretly marries Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth	Jennifer loves Hewitt's birth.	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt.	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl secretly marrying fiance brian	Jennifer loves the idea of Hewitt giving birth to a little girl who secretly marries her fiancée, Brian.	Jennifer loves that Hewitt gives birth to apos; a little girl secretly marrying her fiancée Brian.	Jennifer loves that Hewitt gives birth to a little girl secretly marrying Brian.
11	client list jennifer love hewitt brian hallisay baby	Jennifer loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay baby.	Jennifer's client list loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay as a baby.	Jennifer's client list loves baby Hewitt Brian Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt secretly married baby girl	Jennifer secretly loves Hewitt as a little girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt secretly married as a little girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt secretly married little girl.
11	secret wedding baby girl jennifer love hewitt brian hallisay	Secret little married Jennifer loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay.	The secret, little married girl Jennifer loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay.	The secret little married girl Jennifer loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay.
11	hewitt hallisay daughter	Hallisay Hewitt girl.	Hewitt Hallisay girl.	Hewitt hallisay girl.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl secretly married brian hallisay	Jennifer loves the birth of a little girl, Hewitt, who is secretly married to Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt, a little girl who's secretly married to Brian Hallisay?	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt, a little girl secretly married to Hallisay.
11	girl client list star jennifer love hewitt husband brian hallisay	Jennifer, star of Hewitt's list of clients, loves Brian Hallisay, Hewitt's husband.	Jennifer, star of the client list, loves Brian Hallisay, husband of Hewitt.	Jennifer, client list star, loves Brian Hallisay, husband of Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl	Jennifer loves having the Hewitt baby.	Jennifer loves the birth of the Hewitt baby.	Jennifer loves the birth of baby Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth marries secret	Jennifer loves to have a baby, Hewitt is a secret wife.	Jennifer loves the birth Hewitt secret wife.	Jennifer likes birth Hewitt secret wife.
11	star birth announces marriage	Birth of the stars heralds marriage.	The birth of the stars heralds our marriage.	The birth of stars heralds marriage.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl reveals married brian	Brian is married to Jennifer Love Hewitt baby girl.	Jennifer Love Hewitt baby girl reveals Brian married Brian.	Jennifer Love Hewitt baby girl reveals Brian married.
11	jennifer love hewitt confirms baby secret marriage daughter arrives	Jennifer Love Hewitt confirmed that baby girl secret wedding is coming.	Jennifer Love Hewitt confirms that baby secret wedding girl is coming.	Jennifer Love Hewitt confirms baby secret wedding girl is coming.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl marries	Well, Jennifer loves Hewitt baby girl getting married.	Jennifer loves Hewitt baby girl getting married.	Jennifer loves Hewitt baby girl gets married.
11	jennifer love hewitt married baby girl	Jennifer loves Hewitt married, little girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt married a little girl.	Jennifer likes Hewitt married baby girl.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby girl confirms secret marriage	Jennifer Love Hewitt Baby Girl confirms the secret marriage.	Jennifer Love Hewitt baby girl confirms the secret marriage?	Jennifer Love Hewitt baby girl confirms secret marriage.
11	jennifer love hewitt married birth	Jennifer loves to have a family, and she loves to have children.	Jennifer loves the birth of babies; married couple.	Jennifer has a love for the birth of a married couple.
11	today news jennifer love hewitt baby girl confirms	Today, Jennifer loves Hewitt Baby Girl confirms.	Today, Jennifer loved Hewitt baby girl confirmed.	Today, Jennifer is in love with baby girl Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt daughter private marriage	Jennifer loves her daughter's private marriage, Hewitt.	Jennifer likes her daughter Hewitt's private marriage.	Jennifer loves the private marriage of her daughter Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth secret marriage brian hallisay	Jennifer loves Hewitt's secret birthplace Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves Hewitt secret birth Brian Hallisay.	Well, Jennifer loves Hewitt secret birth Brian Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth girl secretly marrying	Hewitt secretly marries his biological daughter.	Jennifer loves that' Hewitt secretly marries her biological daughter.	Jennifer loves that hewitt secretly marries her biological daughter.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl autumn secretly marries brian	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt, baby girl, secretly marrying Brian.	Jennifer loves the birth Hewitt baby fall girl secretly marries Brian Brian.	Jennifer loves birth Hewitt fall baby girl secretly marries Brian Brian.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby	Jennifer loves the Hewitt Baby.	Jennifer is in love with the Hewitt baby.	Jennifer loves baby Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt second child secret marriage	Jennifer loves Hewitt second secret marriage.	Jennifer loves Hewitt as the second child of a secret marriage.	Jennifer loves Hewitt second child secret wedding.
11	holiday gift guide photo	Photo from the Christmas Gift Guide.	Photo from the Guide to the Christmas Gift.	Holiday gift guide photo.
11	congratulation newlywed jennifer love hewitt brian hallisay	Congratulations Jennifer loves Hewitt Brian Hallisay.	Congratulations Jennifer newlywed likes Hewitt Brian Hallisay.	Congratulations newlywed Jennifer likes Hewitt Brian Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth reveals married baby father	Jennifer loves the birth Hewitt reveals the father of the baby.	Jennifer loves birth Hewitt reveals the baby's married father.	Jennifer loves birth Hewitt reveals baby's married father.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl reveals married	Jennifer likes the birth Hewitt baby daughter revealed married.	Jennifer loves the birth of the baby Hewitt girl revealed married.	Jennifer loves birth Hewitt baby girl revealed married.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth married	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt, married.	Well, Jennifer loves the birth of married Hewitt.	Jennifer loves the birth of married Hewitt.
11	taylor swift stuns prince william winter gala jennifer love hewitt	Taylor Swift Stuns Prince William Winter Gala Jennifer loves Hewitt.	Taylor Swift Stuns Prince William Winter Gala Jennifer loves Hewitt.	Taylor Swift Stuns Prince William Winter Gala Jennifer is in love with Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth girl	Jennifer loves Hewitt's birth.	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt.	Jennifer loves birth of Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl reveals brian hallisay	Jennifer loves Hewitt baby girl, says Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves Hewitt birthing baby daughter reveals Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves baby Hewitt baby girl reveals Brian Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt mom wife	Jennifer loves mother-wife-wife Hewitt.	Jennifer loves Hewitt mother mother mother mother wife.	Jennifer is in love with Hewitt, mother-mother-wife.
11	jennifer love hewitt jennifer love hewitt baby girl	Jennifer Loves Hewitt Jennifer Loves Hewitt Baby Girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt Jennifer loves Hewitt, baby girl.	Jennifer loves Hewitt Jennifer loves baby girl Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl secret wedding	Jennifer loves little Hewitt's secret wedding.	Jennifer loves the secret marriage of the little girl Hewitt.	Jennifer loves the little girl Hewitt's secret wedding party.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth secretly marries brian hallisay	Jennifer loved the birth of Hewitt and secretly married Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt, and secretly marries Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves Hewitt's birth and secretly marries Brian Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl secretly client list	She loves Hewitt's secret client list.	Jennifer loves Hewitt's secret client list.	Jennifer loves Hewitt's secret client list so much.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl secretly marries brian hallisay	Jennifer loves the birth of Brian Hallisay, the daughter of Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt, the little girl secretly marries Brian Hallisay.	Jennifer loves the birth of Hewitt, the little girl secretly marries Hallisay.
11	jennifer love hewitt baby autumn james hallisay husband brian	Jennifer loves Hewitt Fall Baby James Hallisay Brian Brian husband.	Jennifer Loves Hewitt Fall Baby James Hallisay husband Brian Brian.	Jennifer loves Hewitt baby fall James Hallisay husband Brian Brian.
11	mazel tov jennifer love hewitt baby girl secretly marries	Mazel Tov Jennifer loves Hewitt secretly.	Mazel Tov Jennifer loves Hewitt little girl to marry secretly.	Mazel Tov Jennifer likes hewitt little girl to get married secretly.
11	newlywed jennifer love hewitt birth baby girl	Jennifer, a newlywed, loves the idea of the baby Hewitt.	Well, Jennifer, a newlywed, loves the birth of the baby Hewitt.	Jennifer, a bride, loves the birth of baby Hewitt.
11	jennifer love hewitt birth married deets	Jennifer loves to have a baby girl.	Jennifer loves the birth of a married baby, right?	Jennifer loves the birth of a married baby.
12	seahawks targeting antoine winfield	The Seahawks target Antoine Winfield.	The Seahawks are targeting Antoine Winfield.	Seahawks are targeting Antoine Winfield.
12	brandon browner suspended year video seahawks cb face	Brandon Browner suspended video year-end cb seahawks.	Brandon Browner suspended video year seahawks cb headline.	Brandon Browner suspended this year video seahawks cb face.
12	seahawks cb brandon browner denies facing year ped suspension	Brandon Browner denies being exposed to a one-year pedal suspension.	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner denies being exposed to a suspension of pedals from Apos; one year.	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner denies being exposed to a one-year pedal suspension program.
12	seahawks cb wa er thurmond suspended perrish cox signed	Seahawks cb wa thurmond suspendus perrish cox signed.	Seahawks cb wa er Thurmond suspendus perrish cox.	Seahawks cb wa er Thurmond hangingus perrish cox signed.
12	browner reportedly banned year messy	Browner forbids the disorder of the year.	Browner would have forbidden the disorder of the year.	Browner would have banned the year's chaos.
12	seahawks antoine winfield discussing return	Seahawks Antoine Winfield discusses the return.	Seahawks Antoine Winfield discusses return.	Seahawks Antoine Winfield's discussing the return.
12	report seahawks browner facing year suspension nfl	The Seahawks face a year-round suspension.	The Seahawks are currently facing a suspension from their current year.	The Seahawks are facing a suspension from the year 2000.
12	seahawks wr golden tate call teammate selfish	Seahawks Golden Tate calling Selfish Partner.	Seahawks Golden Tate calling selfish teammate.	Hey, Seahawks Golden Tate calling selfish partner.
12	seahawks thurmond game suspension substance abuse	Seahawks Thurmond Game Excessive Suspension of Toxic Substances.	Seahawks Thurmond Game Suspension abuse of toxic substances.	Seahawks Thurmond game wild suspension abuse of toxic substances.
12	antoine winfield contacted seattle seahawks	Antoine Winfield called Seattle Seahawks.	And Antoine Winfield contacted Seattle Seahawks.	Antoine Winfield contacted Seattle Seahawks.
12	seahawks combat drug	The Seahawks fight drugs.	The Seahawks can fight drugs.	Well, the Seahawks fight drugs.
12	statement nfl spokesperson cornerback wa er thurmond	Stargate statements-word of Thurmond corner.	Statements from the door-Thurmond corner.	Statements from the door-word from the corner of Thurmond.
12	seahawks cornerback wa er thurmond suspended game	The Seahawks cornerback has just seen Thurmond suspend the game.	The Seahawks cornerback saw Thurmond suspend his game.	Seahawks cornerback watched Thurmond suspend the game.
12	jerry brewer disturbing trend seahawks add chapter	The Seahawks add a chapter to the jerry brewer's disturbing trend.	The Seahawks add a chapter to the disturbing trend of the brewer jerry.	The Seahawks add a chapter to the disturbing trend of brewer jerry.
12	seattle pro suspended pot	Seattle pro-potty is on hold.	Suspended Seattle pro jar.	Seattle pro pot hanging.
12	seahawks wr golden tate call teammate selfish	Seahawks Golden Tate calling Selfish Partner.	Seahawks Golden Tate calling selfish teammate.	Hey, Seahawks Golden Tate calling selfish partner.
12	carroll signing antoine winfield possibility	Carroll signing a possible Antoine Winfield.	Carroll signing Antoine Winfield possible.	Carroll signing antoine Winfield.
12	brandon browner year suspension seahawks	Brandon Browner, Year of Suspension Seahawks, suspension.	Brandon Browner Year of Suspension Brandon Browner Seahawks suspension.	Brandon Browner Suspension year Seahawks suspension.
12	suspension seattle	Seattle suspension.	Suspension Seattle.	We're suspending Seattle.
12	report seahawks cb wa er thurmond facing game suspension	Seahawks cb wer thurmond game facing a game suspension.	Seahawks cb wer thurmond facing a game suspension.	Seahawks cb wer thurmond facing game suspension.
12	seahawks rebuilding side defense	The Seahawks rebuild the lateral defense.	The Seahawks are now rebuilding the side defenses.	The Seahawks are rebuilding side defenses.
12	nfl formally announces wa er thurmond game suspension	The match against Thurmond was officially suspended by the NFL.	The NFL is officially announcing the suspension of the match against Thurmond.	The NFL announced the suspension of the match against Thurmond.
12	wa er thurmond drop appeal game suspension	But Thurmond has given up the game of d' call suspension game suspension.	But Thurmond dropped the d&apos game; call suspension game suspension.	Thurmond dropped the game d' call suspension game suspension.
12	seahawks cb brandon browner suspended year violating nfl substance	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner suspended one year in violation of the provisions of the Act.	Brandon Browner suspended one year violating the substance nf.	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner suspended one year violating nf.
12	seahawks sign cb cox	CB Cox is signed by the Seahawks.	The Seahawks signed on to CB Cox.	Seahawks sign CB Cox.
12	seahawks cb thurmond suspended game	Seahawks cb Thurmond hanging game.	Seahawks cb Thurmond hanging game.	Seahawks cb Thurmond game hung.
12	pete carroll belief second chance	Pete Carroll, he believes in a second chance.	Pete Carroll believes in a second chance.	Pete carroll believes in a second chance.
12	wa er thurmond serve game suspension substance abuse violation	Wer thurmond serves game animals in game suspension, in violation of the Wer thurmond Act; substance abuse.	Wer thurmond serves game in suspension from game in violation of anti-substance abuse law.	Wer thurmond serves game suspension game in violation of the anti-substance abuse law.
12	seahawks forced dance cornerback shuffle	Seahawks cornerback dance force shuffle shuffle.	Seahawks dance force, cornerback shuffle shuffle.	Seahawks dance cornerback shuffle shuffle.
12	seahawks wr golden tate teammate selfish suspension	Seahawks golden teammate selfish suspension.	Seahawks golden tate selfish partner suspension.	Seahawks golden tate teammate selfish suspension.
12	implication thurmond suspension	Implication Suspension Thurmond.	Implication suspension of Thurmond.	Thurmond's suspension involvement.
12	brad biggs nfl power ranking	Brad Biggs, nf Power Rating.	Brad Biggs nfl Power Classification.	Brad biggs nfl power ranking.
12	seahawks browner suspended year violating nfl drug policy	Suspension of Seahawks Browner one year in violation of the NFL's anti-@-@drug policy.	Seahawks Browner suspended a year in violation of the NFL's anti-@-@drug policy.	Seahawks Browner suspended one year in violation of NFL drug policy.
12	golden tate seahawks mate selfish suspension	Golden Tate Seahawks s' mate with a suspension of selfishness.	Golden Tate Seahawks s' mate to a selfish suspension.	Golden Tate Seahawks s' mate with selfish suspension.
12	browner thurmond teammate	Just sniffing out his partner Thurmond.	Fliff his partner Thurmond.	I want to sniff out his teammate Thurmond.
12	updated brandon browner reportedly suspended year	It was reported that Brandon Browner, who had been upgraded, had suspended the program.	Brandon Browner update would have suspended this year.	Brandon Browner updated would have suspended the year.
12	seahawks brandon browner face suspension eyeing antoine winfield	The Seahawks Brandon Browner, facing Suspension Eye Antoine Winfield.	The Brandon Browner Seahawks face suspension eye Antoine Winfield.	Brandon Browner Seahawks face suspension Antoine Winfield eye.
12	seahawks sign perrish cox light potential brandon browner suspension	Seahawks sign for cox light potential perrish suspension brandon browner.	Seahawks sign cox light potential perrish suspension brandon browner.	Seahawks sign cox light potential perrish brandon browner suspension.
12	seahawks deal thurmond suspension	Thurmond suspensions are distributed by the Seahawks.	The Seahawks are giving out Thurmond suspension.	And the Seahawks are handing out Thurmond suspensions.
12	winfield help seahawks	Winfield helps the Seahawks.	Winfield's helping the Seahawks.	Well, Winfield is helping the Seahawks.
12	seattle seahawks teamreport	Seattle Seahawks team report.	Report from the Seattle Seahawks team.	Seahawks Team, Seattle Seahawks.
12	seattle seahawks brandon browner suspension cost team super bowl	Seattle Seahawks Brandon Browner suspension of the team.	Seattle Seahawks Brandon Browner suspension cost team Super Bowl.	Seattle Seahawks Brandon Browner suspension cost team Super Bowl.
12	tuesday nfl roundup seattle cb wa er thurmond suspended game	On Tuesday, the Seattle CB rally suspended Thurmond's match.	On Tuesday the Seattle CB rally suspended the match against Thurmond.	On Tuesday, the Seattle B.C. Rally... suspended the game against Thurmond.
12	seahawks cb brandon browner suspension resu unfair rule	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner suspension res.	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner suspension cb Res Resulted unfair rule.	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner suspension res unfair rule.
12	nfl power ranking	Power classification.	N.F.L. Power ranking.	NFL power rating.
12	seahawks moving browner thurmond call antoine winfield	Antoine Winfield is the name of the Seahawks.	Seahawks named Antoine Winfield.	The Seahawks call it Antoine Winfield.
12	cox sign seahawks	Cox has signed Seahawks.	Cox signs Seahawks.	Cox sign Seahawks.
12	carroll deter	Carroll deterrence.	Carroll deterrence.	It's called carroll deterrence.
12	antoine winfield carroll hint cb winfield signing	Antoine Winfield Carroll suggested that Winfield was signing.	Antoine Winfield Carroll suggested that cb Winfield would sign.	Antoine Winfield Carroll suggested cb Winfield sign.
12	report seahawks browner handed year suspension	Report a Seahawks Browner annual suspension.	Report an annual suspension of Seahawks Browner.	And report an annual suspension of Seahawks Browner.
12	brandon browner face year ban	Brandon Browner banished from the year.	Brandon Browner's been banned from the year.	Brandon Browner is one of the few people in the world to be banished.
12	thurman game browner entire season	Thurman Game Browner's the whole season.	Thurman Game Browner all season long.	Thurman Game Browner game is available all season long.
12	suspension browner win appeal	L'appos; appel est gagné par l'apos; arbitrage de suspension.	Appeals are won by the suspension referee.	The appeal is won by the suspension arbitrator.
12	seahawks cb brandon browner facing year suspension	Brandon Browner faced a one-year suspension.	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner faced with a one-year suspension of the company.	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner facing one year suspension.
12	update seahawks sign perrish cox cornerback depth	Update the depth cox cornerback cox perrish Seahawks panel.	Update panel Seahawks perrish cox cornerback depth.	Update Seahawks perrish cox cornerback depth panel.
12	impact loss browner thurmond seahawks defense	Impact on the defence of Thurmond Seahawks.	Loss of momentum; impact on the defense of Thurmond Seahawks.	Apos loss; impact on defense of Thurmond Seahawks.
12	tate teammate selfish responds twitter	Tate selfish partner tweets back.	Tate selfish partner replies twitter twitter.	Tate selfish partner responds to twitter twitter.
12	brandon browner reportedly suspended year	Apparently, Brandon Browner has been shutting down his business operations for a year.	Brandon Browner's been reported to have suspended operations for a year.	Brandon Browner reportedly suspended operations for a year.
12	seahawks thurmond officially suspended word browner	Seahawks Thurmond has officially suspended Browner Word Browner from service.	Thurmond has officially suspended Browner Word Browner.	Seahawks Thurmond officially suspended Browner Word Browner.
12	wa er thurmond iii suspended	Wer thurmond, iii, suspended.	Wer thurmond iii suspended?	Wer thurmond iii is suspended.
12	report seahawks browner face suspension	Report Suspension of the Seahawks Deaf Face.	Report the suspension of the deaf face of the Seahawks.	Report the deaf face suspension of the Seahawks.
12	report browner face year suspension violating drug policy	Please advise of any suspensions or suspensions of the application of the drug policy.	Report a one-year suspension for violation of drug policy.	Report a one-year suspension for drug policy violations.
12	antoine winfield return seattle seahawks	Antoine Winfield returns Seattle Seahawks.	Antoine Winfield turned Seattle Seahawks inside out.	And Antoine Winfield returns Seattle Seahawks.
12	seahawks tate call browner thurmond selfish	The Seahawks called Thurmond Browner selfish.	Well, the Seahawks call Thurmond Browner selfish.	The Seahawks call Thurmond Browner selfish.
12	report seahawks sign cb cox	The Seahawks are signing CB Cox.	Let the record show that the Seahawks are signing CB Cox.	And report that the Seahawks are signing CB Cox.
12	seahawks cb browner face year ban	Seahawks cb Browner faced the banishment of the Seahawks; year.	Seahawks cb Browner facing banishment of the year.	Seahawks cb Browner face banishment from the year.
12	nfl pot policy dumb player busted dumber	The stupid drug-policy gambler of the NFL s&apos gets caught dumber.	The dumb-ass NFL drug-policy player s&apos gets dumber.	The stupid NFL drug-policy player s&apos, gets the dumber one.
12	thurmond suspension official seahawks sign perrish cox	The Seahawks Cox perrish is the name of the Seahawks Cox perrish.	Suspension of Thurmond, official sign of Seahawks Cox perrish.	The official sign of the Seahawks Cox perrish is Thurmond suspension.
12	seahawks considering antoine winfield	Seahawks looking down on Antoine Winfield.	Seahawks considering Antoine Winfield.	Seahawks considering Antoine Winfield!
12	wa er thurmond suspended game substance abuse violation	But Thurmond suspended the drug abuse violation.	But Thurmond has suspended the violation of the drug abuse law.	But Thurmond suspended violation of the drug abuse law.
12	web	Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web.	Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web.	Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web Web.
12	seahawks browner face year suspension	The Seahawks are now facing a one-year suspension.	The Seahawks faced a suspension of one year.	The Seahawks face suspension of one year.
12	despite distraction carroll vow hawk march	Despite the distraction, Carroll vows to walk as a hawk.	Despite the distraction, Carroll takes a hawk's vow.	And despite the distraction, Carroll takes a hawk-walking vow.
12	seahawks stonergate continues carroll meet press	Seahawks Stonergate will continue carroll meeting press.	Seahawks stonergate continues to carroll meeting press.	Seahawks stonergate continues carroll press meeting.
12	report seahawks browner face year long suspension	The Seahawks are now facing a one-year suspension.	The Seahawks face a one-year suspension.	The Seahawks face suspension of one year.
12	nfl note nfl suspends seahawks wa er thurmond	The floating note nf hangs the Seahawks Wa er Thurmond.	Floating note nf hangs Seahawks wa er Thurmond.	Floating note nfl suspends Seahawks wa er Thurmond.
12	seahawks browner facing year long suspension	Seahawks face a one-year suspension.	The Seahawks face a one-year suspension from the Seahawks.	The Seahawks are facing a one-year suspension.
12	report seahawks cb thurmond facing suspension	Report of the Seahawks cb Thurmond in the face of a possible suspension.	Report of the Seahawks cb Thurmond facing a suspension.	Seahawks cb Thurmond facing suspension report.
12	seahawks bring cb antoine winfield	Antoine Winfield is coming to the Seahawks.	The Seahawks are bringing in antoine Winfield.	Seahawks bring cb Antoine Winfield.
12	wa er thurmond face game ban	Thurmond is in danger of being banned from playing.	That's where Thurmond is at risk of gambling.	C' is there Thurmond risks l' game ban.
12	seahawks golden tate call thurmond browner selfish	Golden Tate calls Thurmond Browner selfish.	Seahawks Golden Tate calling Thurmond Browner selfish.	Seahawks Golden Tate calling selfish Thurmond Browner.
12	report seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve game suspension	Seahawks cb wa thurmond serve suspension of game.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve suspension game.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve game suspension.
12	report seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve game suspension	Seahawks cb wa thurmond serve suspension of game.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve suspension game.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve game suspension.
12	report seahawks contacted antoine winfield	The Seahawks reached out to Antoine Winfield.	The Seahawks have contacted Antoine Winfield.	The Seahawks contacted Antoine Winfield.
12	man byron maxwell	Maxwell byron.	Man byron maxwell.	Hey, man byron maxwell.
12	brandon browner reportedly violates substance abuse policy	Dr. Brandon Browner would violate drug policy.	Brandon Browner would violate drug policy.	Brandon Browner would violate substance abuse policy.
12	seahawks cb wa er thurmond suspended game	Seahawks cb wa thurmond game suspended.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond game suspended.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond game suspended.
12	seahawks legion bong	Seahawks legion, bong bong bong.	Seahawks legion bong bong.	Seahawks legion bong bong.
12	sunday rough idle seahawks	The Seahawks are lazy on Sunday.	By Sunday, the Seahawks are lazy.	And on Sunday, the Seahawks are lazy.
12	seattle legion boom busted drug	The drugs were blown up by the Seattle Legion.	Seattle Legion exploded the drug.	The Seattle legion blew up drugs.
12	source seattle brandon browner face year suspension	Source Seattle Brandon Browner faced the year's suspension.	Source Seattle Brandon Browner facing suspension of momentum; year.	Source Seattle Brandon Browner face suspension from the year.
12	browner facing suspension	Eyebrow suspension.	Suspension to an eyebrow.	Uh, suspension in front of an eyebrow.
12	perrish cox sign contract seattle seahawks	Perrish Cox has signed the Seattle Seahawks contract.	Perrish Cox signs Seattle Seahawks.	Perrish Cox signs a contract with Seattle Seahawks.
12	seahawks wa er thurmond iii face suspension	Seahawks is in danger of being suspended.	Seahawks wer thurmond iii risk suspension.	Seahawks wer thurmond iii risk a suspension.
12	brandon browner facing year suspension substance abuse violation	Browner is subject to a suspension from employment for a year for violations of the laws on alcoholism and drug addiction.	Brandon Browner s' subject to suspension from parole hearing; year for violation of alcohol and drug laws.	Brandon Browner s' subject to suspension from parole; year for violation of alcohol and drug laws.
12	wa er thurmond facing suspension	There was a risk that Thurmond would be suspended.	Thurmond ran the risk of being suspended.	But Thurmond was in danger of being suspended.
12	pete carroll find answer wave suspension	Pete Carroll find suspension vague answer.	Pete Carroll find answer vague suspension.	Pete Carroll find answer vague suspension.
12	brandon browner denies report ped suspension	Brandon Browner denies that he ever reported a pedal suspension.	Brandon Browner denies reporting a pedal suspension.	Brandon Browner denies reporting a suspension pedal.
12	thurmond suspended hawk sign er cornerback	Suspended Hawk Thurmond signs er cornerback.	Thurmond hanging hawk signs er cornerback.	Thurmond suspended hawk sign er cornerback.
12	seahawks disappointed worried suspension	The Seahawks have been disappointing the concerned suspensions.	Seahawks disappoint anxious suspensions.	Concerned suspensions are disappointed by the Seahawks.
12	seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve game suspension	Seahawks cb wa thurmond serve suspension of game.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve suspension game.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond serve game suspension.
12	thurmond foolish mistake stress seahawks depth chart	Thurmond's insistence on the depth map of the Seahawks was a stupid mistake.	Thurmond made a stupid mistake by insisting on the Seahawks' depth map.	Thurmond made a foolish mistake by insisting on the Seahawks depth map.
12	report seahawks thurmond start game suspension	Report Seahawks Thurmond to begin the suspension of the game.	Report Seahawks Thurmond begin suspension game.	Report Thurmond Seahawks start the suspension game.
12	report seahawks browner facing year suspension	The Seahawks are suspended for one year.	The Seahawks are in danger of being suspended for one year.	The Seahawks are currently facing the prospect of a one-year suspension of their operations.
12	report brandon browner face suspension denies peds	It was reported that Brandon Browner Face Suspension denies pediatrics.	Brandon Browner faces suspension denies pediatrics.	It was reported Brandon Browner face suspension denies pediatrics.
12	playoff spot nfc west suddenly grab	The first round of the game was held in the north of the park, and the second round was held in the north of the park.	Place of the playoffs in the west of the PNC s' suddenly took the field.	Playoffs place at the west of the PNC s&apos, is suddenly taken over.
12	nfl announces wa er thurmond suspension	The NFL announced that he was suspended for suspension.	The NFL announced that it was suspended because of a suspension.	The NFL announces that it has been suspended due to the suspension of the game.
12	golden tate teammate selfish	Selfish teammate.	Tate d' or selfish partner.	Tate d' or selfish teammate.
12	browner face year ban	Year face-@-@ deafest face.	Banishment of posters; year face-@-@ deafer face.	Banishment of posters; year face-@-@ face deafer.
12	suspension ruining big week seattle	Suspension ruining Seattle Week.	Suspension ruining the great week of Seattle.	You know, suspension ruining the big week in Seattle.
12	carroll winfield return	Carroll Winfield back.	Carroll Winfield's on his way back.	Hey, Carroll Winfield's back.
12	seahawks expected sign deshawn shead practice squad	The Seahawks were waiting at a sign of the Apos; the team was waiting for training from Deshawn Shead.	The Seahawks were waiting at a sign from the Apos; Deshawn Shead training team.	The Seahawks were waiting at a sign from the Deshawn Shead training team.
12	seahawks cb wa er thurmond face game suspension substance abuse	Seahawks cb wa thurmond faced with the abuse of suspension substances of game.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond against apos; Game Suspension Misuse.	Seahawks cb wa er thurmond face to tail; Game Suspension Misuse.
12	richard sherman	This is Richard Sherman.	Richard sherman.	Oh, my God, Richard Sherman.
12	seattle seahawks brandon browner face suspension	Seattle Seahawks Brandon Browner face suspension suspension suspension.	Seattle Seahawks Brandon Browner face suspension suspension suspension.	Seattle Seahawks Brandon Browner face suspension suspension.
12	wa er thurmond suspended game violation nfl substance abuse	Thurmond suspended his suspension for violating the rules of the game.	Thurmond has suspended his suspension for violating the rules of the game in case of substance abuse.	Thurmond suspended his suspension for violation of the rules of the game in the event of a drug abuse offence.
12	nfl seattle defender game ban test loom	Seattle Defender Game Ban is at the scene; study.	The Seattle Defender Game Ban game is now underway.	The Seattle Defender game ban game is at the apos; study.
12	report seahawks brandon browner facing year suspension	Point out Brandon Browner faces a one-year suspension.	Point out that Brandon Browner faces a one-year suspension from the company.	Point out that Brandon Browner is facing a one year suspension.
12	report seahawks cornerback brandon browner facing year suspension	Report the suspension of Brandon's next year... the Seahawks' cornerback.	Report the suspension of the next year Brandon, the Seahawks cornerback.	Report Brandon's next year suspension of the Seahawks cornerback.
12	seahawks thurmond suspended game	Seahawks Thurmond pulled the plug.	So Seahawks Thurmond suspended the game.	Seahawks thurmond suspended the game.
12	wa er thurmond iii wa er thurmond suspension marijuana	Thurmond suspension thurmond thurmond marijuana.	Wer thurmond iii wa er thurmond suspension marijuana.	Wer thurmond iii wa er thurmond suspension marijuana.
12	seahawks brandon browner face year ban drug	Seahawks Brandon Browner Face of the Year of the Apos; Drug Prohibition.	Seahawks Brandon Browner, face of the apogee; year of apogee; drug prohibition.	Seahawks Brandon Browner face of the year of the drug ban.
12	wa er thurmond iii report seahawks cb thurmond banned gm	Thurmond report Seahawks cb Thurmond prohibited gm.	Wer thurmond iii report Seahawks cb Thurmond prohibited gm.	Wer thurmond iii report seahawks cb Thurmond cb prohibited gm.
12	wa er thurmond suspension seahawks sign cb perrish cox	There's foam sprinklers-t-signing cb perrish cox?	Are there-t-suspended scumers who sign cb perrish cox?	Are there any freeloaders that sign cb perrish cox?
12	seahawks sign cb cox wa er thurmond suspended	The Seahawks are signing cb cox wa er thurmond suspended.	The Seahawks sign cb cox wa er thurmond suspension.	Seahawks sign cb cox wa er thurmond suspension.
12	seahawks thurmond facing suspension	Seahawks Thurmond will face the suspension.	Thurmond Seahawks facing suspension.	Seahawks thurmond facing suspension.
12	seahawks cornerback brandon browner face year suspension	Seahawks cornerback Brandon more deaf suspension of year.	Seahawks Brandon cornerback face deafest suspension of l' year.	Seahawks cornerback Brandon face deafest suspension of the year.
12	seahawks brandon browner facing suspension peds	Seahawks Brandon Browner will face a pediatric suspension.	Seahawks Brandon Browner to face the threat of paediatric suspension.	Seahawks Brandon Browner facing pediatric suspension.
12	report seahawks thurmond facing game suspension	The Thurmond Seahawks are facing a suspension.	The Seahawks Thurmonds are facing a game suspension.	The Seahawks Thurmond are facing game suspension.
12	joe flacco criticizes raven wildcat offense	Joe Flacco has been criticizing the apos; the wildcat attack.	Joe Flacco criticizes l' attack of the wildcat.	Joe Flacco criticizes the wildcat attack.
12	dropping appeal help seahawks thurmond	Abandon the apostle; Call Help Seahawks Thurmond.	Abandon the apostle; call for help to Seahawks Thurmond.	Call for help Seahawks Thurmond.
12	front row jason elliott nov	Jason Elliott nov. in first place.	Jason Elliott Nov., front row.	First row Jason elliott nov.
12	report hawk thurmond facing game suspension	Let the record show that Hawk Thurmond faces a suspension from the game.	Point out that Hawk Thurmond is facing a suspension from the game.	Point out Hawk Thurmond is facing a suspension from the game today.
12	brandon browner suspended nfl star facing year ban substance	Brandon Browner has been suspended from the race for the first time in a year.	Brandon Browner suspended from star exposure year; substance ban.	Browner suspended nf star facing l'apos; year d' prohibition substance.
12	report seahawks sign cox	The Seahawks are signing Cox.	Point out the Seahawks signed Cox.	And report that the Seahawks are signing Cox.
12	report brandon browner year suspension ped	Report Brandon Browner Year suspension, ped.	Notify Brandon Browner Year suspension ped.	And report Brandon Browner Year suspension ped.
12	seahawks cb brandon browner reportedly facing year suspension	The Seahawks would be threatened with a one-year suspension.	The Seahawks cb Brandon Browner would be placed in jeopardy of a one year suspension.	Seahawks cb Brandon Browner would be threatened with a one year suspension.
12	carroll percy harvin day day	Percy Harvin Carroll Day.	Carroll Percy Harvin Day.	Carroll Percy harvin day day.
12	golden tate call suspended seahawks selfish	Golden Tate Call put Seahawks away for selfish reasons.	Golden Tate Call just suspended selfish Seahawks.	Golden Tate Call suspended selfish Seahawks!
12	report seahawks cb wa er thurmond suspended game	Suspended Seahawks cb wer thurmond game.	Seahawks cb wer thurmond game hanging.	Seahawks cb wer thurmond game hanging from the air.
12	seahawk facing suspension report	Seahawk is facing the Suspension Report.	Seahawk facing the report suspension.	Seahawk facing suspension report.
12	seahawks wa er thurmond suspended game	Seahawks wer thurmond giber.	Seahawks weer thurmond game hanging.	Seahawks wer thurmond game is suspended.
12	national football league roundup	Football League rally.	Gathering of the National Football League.	National football league rally.
12	seahawks set sign perrish cox	The Seahawks placed panels perrish cox.	The Seahawks have placed perrish cox panels.	The Seahawks have perrish cox panels.
12	report browner face year substance abuse suspension	Report a Suspension for Substance Abuse during the Noisiest Year.	Report a suspension for substance abuse during the peak year.	Report substance abuse suspension during the noisiest year.
12	report brandon browner suspension len hened year	Report the Suspension of Brandon Browner the following year.	Report Brandon Browner's suspension from employment in the following year.	Report Brandon Browner's suspension the following year.
13	turkey black friday sale cyber monday	Black turkey, Friday cyber sale, Monday sale.	Sell black turkey Friday Internet sale Monday sale.	Black turkey friday cyber sale monday sale.
13	thing buy black friday	Buy a Black Friday.	Buy a black Friday.	To buy a black Friday.
13	holiday shopping qa consumer rejecting shopping thanksgiving	Holiday purchases who refuse to shop at Thanksgiving.	Vacation purchases that refuse Thanksgiving shopping.	Holiday purchases qa consumers refusing to shop at Thanksgiving.
13	guest column bonding black friday	It's a good time to get to know each other and to know each other.	Column d' guests bonding with each other; black Friday friendship.	Column d' guests bonding black Friday.
13	black friday ate thanksgiving destroyed	Black Friday Thanksgiving ruined.	Black Friday just ate Thanksgiving ruined.	Black Friday ate destroyed Thanksgiving dinner.
13	black friday feast thanksgiving	Thanksgiving Black Friday party.	It's Black Friday Thanksgiving.	Black Friday thanksgiving party.
13	violence american black friday tradition	Violence, American Dark Friday tradition.	Violence... the tradition of American Black Friday.	American Black Friday tradition of violence.
13	black friday bleeding gray thursday	Black Friday, Grey bloody Friday, Thursday.	Black Friday, Grey bloody Friday, Thursday.	Black Friday, bloody gray Friday, Thursday.
13	local shop start sale thanksgiving day	Local stores are starting to sell on Thanksgiving.	Local stores start selling Thanksgiving Day.	Local stores start selling on thanksgiving day.
13	store seek sale holiday	Looks like the store's looking to sell vacation.	The store's looking to sell vacation.	The store wants to sell vacation.
13	eventful thanksgiving day	Eventful Thanksgiving.	Day of Thanksgiving; Eventful Thanksgiving.	Day of grace; eventful Thanksgiving.
13	local shop offer black friday thanksgiving sale	Black Thanksgiving on Fridays is available at local shops.	Local shops offer Black Thanksgiving sale on Friday.	The local shops offer black Thanksgiving sale on Friday.
13	area prohibit black friday shopping	This neighborhood doesn't allow Black Friday shopping.	Well, the neighborhood doesn't allow black Friday shopping.	Neighborhood forbids black Friday shopping.
13	thursday tl stuffed deal	I fulfilled my contract on Thursday.	Thursday, j' fulfilled my contract.	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.
13	best black friday deal tv depends	The best deal on Black Friday will depend on the TV.	Well, the best deal on Black Friday depends on the TV.	Black Friday's best deal depends on TV.
13	black friday feel month	Black Friday, it seems, is Black Friday.	Black Friday seems to be Black Friday.	Black Friday seems like black Friday month.
13	black friday shopper set strategy seeking sale	Black Friday's sales shopping strategy.	The Black Friday shopping strategy aimed at sales.	Black Friday shopping strategy aimed at sales.
13	historic triangle store offer black friday deal early	The Historical Triangle offers a Black Friday at the beginning of the year.	The historical store Triangle offers a Black Friday at the beginning of the year.	The historic Triangle store offers a Black Friday at the beginning of the year.
13	holiday shopping choice	You can choose from a variety of options.	Vacation shopping options.	Vacation shopping options.
13	black friday hard core shopper set camp early	On Black Friday, hard core buyers set up camp in the early hours of the morning.	And on Black Friday, hard core buyers set up camp early in the morning.	Black Friday hard core buyers set up camp early in the morning.
13	area resident differing view thanksgiving shopping	Local residents have a different perspective on Thanksgiving.	Well, the locals have a different view of Thanksgiving.	Residents of the area will have a different view of Thanksgiving.
13	official share shopping safe	An official-safety deposit box for stock purchases.	An official-safe for stock purchases.	An official safe for purchases of shares.
13	best buy shopper camp week thanksgiving deal	Best Buy Camp Weekend; Purchase of Ideas; Thanksgiving deal.	Best buy week-end camping; purchase of apos; Thanksgiving deal.	Best buy camp week d'apos; purchase of apos; Thanksgiving deal.
13	gray thursday store stronger sale shopper bargain	Best deal for buyers, Thursday Grey Shops.	Grey Thursday store, best deal for buyers.	Thursday gray store, best deal for buyers.
13	activity shopping black friday	Shopping on Black Friday night.	Active shopping on Black Friday.	Activity shopping on black Friday.
13	black friday earlier start	Black Friday night starts early.	Black Friday's a little earlier than I thought.	Black Friday begins earlier than expected.
13	move black friday county shopper start thanksgiving day	Shopping for Black Friday starts on Thanksgiving Day.	Moving county's Black Friday starts on Thanksgiving Day.	Moving the county's black Friday starts on Thanksgiving.
13	dodge black friday sleep	Dodging Friday night's sleep.	Dodging Friday night's black sleep.	To dodge Friday night's black sleep.
13	poll holiday shopping brings mix anticipation dread	It's a good idea to shop on a holiday, but it's a good idea.	Holiday shopping brings a powerful combination of anticipation.	Holiday shopping brings a blend of anticipation and anticipation.
13	thanksgiving latest year shopper appear unfazed	Last year's Thanksgiving guests don't seem surprised.	It's just that last year's Thanksgiving guests don't seem to be surprised.	Thanksgiving clients last year don't seem surprised.
13	thanksgiving day deal bring flock shopper	L' Thanksgiving deal, gets the herd to buy.	L' Thanksgiving deal gets the herd to buy.	Thanksgiving deal gets the herd to buy.
13	thanksgiving black friday shopping hour guide	The Thanksgiving Black Friday Races Guide.	L'apos guide; Black Friday shopping time at Thanksgiving.	The guide to l' black Friday Thanksgiving shopping time.
13	black friday cyber monday	This is Black Friday on the Internet, Monday.	Black Friday online on Monday.	Internet black Friday, Monday.
13	tech buying guide black friday cyber monday	D&apos Guide; Black Tech Buy on Friday eMonday.	D&apos guide; black techno shopping Monday.	D&apos guide; black techno purchase Friday cyber Monday.
13	black friday shopper ready post thanksgiving retail deal	On Black Friday, customers are ready to be retailed after Thanksgiving.	Customers are ready for retail after Thanksgiving on Black Friday.	Black Friday, customers are ready for retail after Thanksgiving.
13	nathan column dangerous holiday	Nathan Dangerous Holiday Column.	Nathan Column dangerous vacation.	Nathan column dangerous vacation.
13	gray thursday starting eclipse black friday	Gray Thursday, the beginning of the Black Friday night, eclipses Black Friday.	Gray Thursday, beginning of the list; eclipses Black Friday.	Gray Thursday, beginning of l' eclipses black Friday.
13	shopper preparing black friday	It's Shopper prepping Black Friday.	Shopper's prepping for Black Friday.	Shopper preparing for black Friday.
13	black friday best bargain	Best deal on Black Friday.	Black Friday, best deal ever.	Black Friday, best deal.
13	black friday thing going	Friday is Black Friday.	Friday, c&apos, is Black Friday.	Friday, c' is black Friday.
13	black friday spill traditional holiday	You know, Black Friday is a big turnaround for traditional holidays.	Black Friday overturns all the traditional holidays.	Black Friday reverses traditional holidays.
13	nation walmart launch pre black friday price war	Walmart Nation launches a war on prices before Black Friday.	Walmart Nation is starting a price war before Black Friday.	Walmart Nation launches price war before Black Friday.
13	black friday big deal retailer	Big retailer, Black Friday.	Black Friday, big retailer.	On Black Friday, big retailer.
13	avoid black friday crowd save	Avoid the crowds from Fridays to Apos, except for Fridays.	Avoid black crowds from Fridays to Apos, with the exception of Fridays.	With the exception of Friday, avoid the black crowd.
13	black friday success	Black Friday success.	You know, the success of Black Friday.	The success of Black Friday.
13	snow globe pet stocking pancake thanksgiving black friday	Animal Snowball Storing Pancake Thanksgiving Black Friday.	Animal snowball, stocking up on pancake Thanksgiving black Friday.	Snowball animal stocking pancake Thanksgiving black Friday.
13	store opening door thanksgiving	Opening of Thanksgiving Store door.	This is the opening of the Thanksgiving store door.	Opening thanksgiving store door.
13	ready holiday shopping season	I think Christmas shopping time is ready.	Christmas shopping time is ready.	Christmas shopping season is almost ready.
13	stress earlier shopping emphasizes black friday	It's a great way to spend your money, and it's a great way to spend money.	The stress of shopping early puts the emphasis on Black Friday.	Early shopping stress puts the emphasis on Black Friday.
13	retailer black friday thanksgiving hour	Friday night is Black Retailer Thanksgiving time.	Friday night, l' Thanksgiving time of the black retailer.	Friday night, black retailer Thanksgiving time.
13	holiday shopping early start	Early morning vacation shopping.	Holiday shopping starts in the early morning.	The holiday shopping starts early in the morning.
13	chart black friday matter	Black card Friday night.	Friday black card.	Uh, Friday black card.
13	thanksgiving store retail creep	Thanksgiving Day is a shabby little retail store.	Thanksgiving is one seedy retail store.	The Thanksgiving store is a seedy retail store.
13	infographic shopping black friday cyber monday	Online Fridays-Black Monday.	Buying d' info on Friday cyber-black Monday.	Purchase of photos; infographics on cyber Friday-black Monday.
13	consumer boycotting black friday thanksgiving day shopping	Consumer boycotting Thanksgiving Black Friday shopping.	A consumer boycotting Thanksgiving Black Friday shopping.	A consumer boycotting Black Friday shopping for Thanksgiving.
13	black friday gift	Black Friday present.	Black Friday gift.	It's a black Friday gift.
13	turning thanksgiving black thursday	Turning Thanksgiving into Black Thanksgiving on Thursday.	Turn Thanksgiving Day into a black Thanksgiving Thursday.	Turning Thanksgiving black Thanksgiving on Thursday.
13	black friday thanksgiving day affair retailer open holiday	Black Friday, Thanksgiving Day, the D&A Day Retailer opens Holiday.	Black Friday, Thanksgiving Day, the day retailer opens the business on a holiday.	Black Friday, Thanksgiving day, the day retailer d' business opens holiday.
13	shopping strategy holiday season	Shopping Strategy - Holiday Season.	How to Shark The Holiday Season.	Holiday season shopping strategy.
13	shopping holiday tradition	Tradition of vacation shopping.	This is a tradition of shopping holidays.	Shopping holiday tradition.
13	top save time money black friday	Save money on Black Friday.	Top save time and money on Black Friday.	Top save time money on black Friday.
13	black friday frenzy overshadows thanksgiving	Thanksgiving is overshadowed by the frenzy of Black Friday.	Black Friday frenzy just eclipses Thanksgiving.	Black Friday frenzy eclipses Thanksgiving.
13	thanksgiving shopping turn retail revenue bleak black	Thanksgiving shopping is all about dark-black retail income.	Thanksgiving shopping turns dark, dark, black retail income.	Thanksgiving shopping turns dark black retail income.
13	sioux fall black friday sale event store opening	Sioux Falls Black Friday Sale Event Store opens.	Sioux Falls Black Friday Sale Event Store opens.	Sioux Falls Black Friday Sale Event store opens.
13	store opening time thanksgiving day open pm	Time of Day; Store Opening Day; Thanksgiving Open pm.	Hours of operation; opening of the store on the day; Thanksgiving action open pm.	Time stamp; store opening day; Thanksgiving open pm.
13	store open earlier thanksgiving day holiday shopper	Opening earlier in the store; Thanksgiving.	Opening the store earlier in the year; Thanksgiving.	To open the store earlier in the year.
13	counting black friday	Black Friday included.	That includes Black Friday.	Counting black Friday.
13	brown crouppen discus black friday shopping secret	Brown, crouching, discus, black, Fridays trade secret.	Uh, brown, crouching, discus, black, trade secret from Friday.	Brown hair, squat, discus, black hair, trade secret from Friday.
13	retailer aim avoid shopping chaos	The retailer's goal is to avoid the retailer's chaos.	The retailer's goal is to avoid the shopping chaos.	Retailer's goal is to avoid shopping chaos.
13	turkey black thursday	Black turkey, Thursday.	Black turkey Thursday.	Oh, black turkey Thursday.
13	store cash black friday creep	Fridays' dirty money.	Store it' Friday dirty money.	To store the' dirty money of Friday.
13	black friday interest fading online sale grow	L' interest of the Black Friday s' fades with online sale.	L' Black Friday interest s' fades with online sale.	L' interest of the Fridays black s' fades with the sale online.
13	big retailer kill thanksgiving	The big-time retailers are killing Thanksgiving.	Big-time retailers kill Thanksgiving, right?	The big retailers kill Thanksgiving.
13	black friday expected bring long low price	The Black Friday will bring you a long way to go.	The Black Friday planned to bring long low price tag.	Black Friday planned bring long low price long.
13	retailer distancing black friday madness	The retailer's distancing himself from Black Friday madness.	Retailer distancing Black Friday madness.	The retailer is distancing Black Friday's madness.
13	walmart black friday tech deal	Friday Tech Deal Walmart Black.	Walmart Black Friday Tech Deal.	Walmart black friday tech deal.
13	black friday employee nightmare	Black Friday's nightmare.	Black Friday employee nightmare, huh?	It's a black Friday employee nightmare.
13	top black friday tech deal target	Black Friday techno chord.	The target of the Black Friday techno deal.	The target of l' black Friday techno deal.
13	thankful early start black friday shopping mania	Thanks for starting early on Black Friday, shopping Friday morning.	Thank you for starting early on Black Friday shopping mania Friday morning.	Thanks for starting early Black Friday shopping mania Friday morning.
13	black friday deal best deal market	Best deals on Black Friday.	Black Friday is a market for the best bargains.	Black Friday's the best deal in town.
13	black friday madness tragic turn	On Black Friday night, the tragic madness takes a tragic turn.	On Black Friday, tragic madness takes a tragic turn.	Tragic madness takes a tragic turn on Black Friday.
13	retailer upend thanksgiving	They're bringing Thanksgiving up.	The retailer's bringing up Thanksgiving.	Well, the retailers are bringing up Thanksgiving.
13	rule black friday shopping	Black Friday rule.	It's Black Friday rule.	Okay, Black Friday rule.
13	garrett thanksgiving deserves day	Garrett thanksgiving, he deserves a day.	Garrett thanksgiving deserves a day here.	Garrett thanksgiving deserves a day off.
13	goody open thanksgiving night doorbuster deal	Open Thanksgiving door party-@-@ door.	Goody opens Thanksgiving evening door-@-@ door.	Goody open Thanksgiving night door-to-door.
13	walmart prepares black friday rush	I've got Walmart working on the Black Friday rush.	Walmart's doing Black Friday rush.	Walmart's prepping the black Friday rush.
13	reader view thanksgiving day shopping	Thanksgiving Day shopping.	Readers see Thanksgiving Day shopping!	The reader sees Thanksgiving Day shopping.
13	best buy celebrates black friday hot deal online store	Best Buy celebrates Friday Black Friday's online shop deal hotline.	Best Buy celebrates Black Friday hot deal shop online store.	Best Buy celebrates online shop black Friday hot deal shop.
13	best doorbuster deal thanksgiving black friday	The best-door-Thanksgiving door on Black Friday.	The best-gate at-Black Friday Thanksgiving door.	The best gate-to-Thanksgiving door on Black Friday.
13	black friday greedy	Black Friday night, greedy.	Black Friday greedy.	Black greedy Friday!
13	driving year black friday mania	Driving Black Year on Friday obsessive.	Black year driving on Friday, mania.	Black year driving on Friday.
13	area store starting black friday deal thanksgiving	The corner store starts selling on Black Friday at Thanksgiving.	The corner store starts selling Thanksgiving Black Friday.	Local store starts selling black Friday on Thanksgiving Day.
13	analyst black friday big wild card	I'm a black analyst, and Friday is a big, wild card wild card.	Black Analyst Friday big wild card joker.	Black analyst friday big wild card joker.
13	retailer earlier store hour	Earlier in time at the store.	Detailing earlier in the week; store time.	Detailing earlier at store time.
13	black friday shopping craze squeezing thanksgiving	On Black Friday, it's all about shopping and Thanksgiving shopping.	Black Friday, the craze for shopping, Thanksgiving press.	Black Friday, l' shopping craze Thanksgiving press.
13	uconn poll american shopping thanksgiving	Uuconn, U.S.A. and U.S.A.	Uuconn American shopping thanksgiving survey.	Uuconn american shopping thanksgiving survey.
13	st louis store prep black friday dress rehearsal crowd plan	St Louis store Preparation Black Friday crowding dress rehearsal.	St Louis store Preparation black Friday dress rehearsal general crowd plan.	St Louis store Black preparation Friday dress rehearsal crowd plan.
13	black friday store hour complete list opening time	It's a great way to get a sense of what's going on in the world.	Black Friday at the store completes the list of opening hours.	L' Black Friday time at the store completes the list of opening hours.
13	io shopping apps handy black friday	I shop apps practicing Black Friday.	I'm shopping apps practice Black Friday.	I'm shopping apps practicing black Friday.
13	daily offer survival shopping black black friday	Daily offerings are black Friday survival shopping.	Daily offer survival black shopping black Friday.	Daily offer survival shopping black Friday.
13	black friday sale preparation underway walmart target	Preparation for the Black Friday auction in progress.	Preparation for Black Friday sale in progress Walmart target.	Black Friday sale preparation in progress Walmart target.
13	early bird shopper eat	Early birds eat.	The-early risers eat.	The levies-early are eating.
13	thing holiday shopper	Oh, vacation shopping thing.	Vacation shopping thing.	Shopping holiday thing.
13	black friday shopping thanksgiving togetherness	Black Friday, Friday, Thanksgiving together.	Friday, Black Friday, Thanksgiving together.	Friday, black Friday, thanksgiving together.
13	blue law prohibit turkey day shopping state	It's the state where you can't shop on the day of the turkey.	Blue law prohibits lapos; state where lapos; shopping on turkey day.	The blue law forbids the state where you shop on turkey day.
13	holiday sale early thanksgiving day norm expert	Christmas Sale, beginning of the year; Action de grâces, expert in the standards for the holidays.	Christmas sale, beginning of the year; Thanksgiving action, expert in holiday standards.	Christmas Sale, early Christmas Thanksgiving, expert in holiday standards.
13	expectation muted holiday sale	Waiting has reduced sales of holidays.	L' waiting has reduced the sale of vacation.	L' waiting reduced holiday sales.
13	refile black friday warrior share best attack plan	Re-archiving Warrior Black Friday Sharing the Best Plan D'apos; Attack.	Re-archiving the Black Friday warrior share the best plan d' attack.	Re-archiving the Black Friday warrior share the best attack plan.
13	family shopping thanksgiving	Running errands with the family on Thanksgiving.	Run the family Thanksgiving errands.	Uh, family shopping on Thanksgiving.
13	hold turkey pas deal shopping eats thanksgiving	The-@-@ footsteps market-turkey eat Thanksgiving.	Steps-@-@-Turkey eats Thanksgiving.	The Marketplace-@-@-d turkey eats Thanksgiving.
13	black friday blackfriday ad thanksgiving sale holiday shopping	Black Friday, Black Friday, Thanksgiving announcement, sale, Christmas shopping.	Black Friday, Black Friday, Thanksgiving announcement, Christmas sale, Christmas shopping.	Black Friday, black Friday, icos; Thanksgiving announcement, sale, Christmas shopping.
13	shopping black friday	Black Friday.	Buy Black Friday.	Buy black Friday.
13	holiday scavenger hunt hard core shopper point	It's a good idea to get rid of the hard core at the end of the year.	Holiday scavengers chase the hard core from the d&apos point; purchase.	Holiday scavengers chase hard core from dapos; purchase.
13	poll majority retail store open thanksgiving	Survey the Majority Thanksgiving Retail Store.	Take a look at the majority retail store opening Thanksgiving.	Survey the majority retail store opening Thanksgiving.
13	black friday loses luster	Looks like Black Friday's losing its sparkle.	Black Friday fades.	Black Friday loses its radiance.
13	affluent retailer open thanksgiving turkey	A successful retailer opens the market for Thanksgiving turkey.	A successful retailer opens the Thanksgiving turkey market.	A successful retailer opens Thanksgiving turkey market.
13	holiday shopper expected buy online mobile year	The hotel is located in the heart of the city, close to the city centre and the city centre.	The vacationers were waiting to buy online l' mobile year.	Holidayers were waiting to buy mobile year online.
13	shopper alert top bargain black friday week	Top Cheap Customer Alert Friday Black Week of Friday.	Top-of-the-line customer alert service Friday black week of Friday.	Customer alert top cheap Friday black week of Friday.
13	retailer staying open thanksgiving receiving backlash protest	Retailers remain open at Thanksgiving and receive protests in return.	The retailer stays open at Thanksgiving and receives protests in return.	The retailer remains open at Thanksgiving and is receiving protests in return.
13	state blue law store closed black friday	It's the only place in the world that's ever been in the world.	Store of right blue d' state closed on Black Friday.	Blue store closed on Black Friday.
13	chain opening thanksgiving	Thanksgiving d' channel opening.	Thanksgiving dinner; chain opening.	Thanksgiving d' chain opening.
13	inland empire retailer brace earlier shopping season	Retailers in the Interior Empire are getting ready to shop early.	Interior Empire retailers are getting ready to shop earlier in the season.	Interior Empire retailers are getting ready to start shopping earlier in the season.
13	black social	Black socialite, black.	Black, black social.	Uh, black social black.
13	meet super shopper lauren sheehan	Meet Lauren Super Shopper Sheehan.	Meet Super Shopper Lauren Sheehan.	Meet super shoe Lauren Sheehan.
13	savingsangel black friday	On the Friday of the Apostle angel; savings.	The Friday of the apos; angel of the apos; savings.	On the Friday of the following day, you will be saved.
13	epic thanksgiving black friday shopping weekend essential guide	Epic Black Thanksgiving Friday-shopping end essential guide.	Epic Black Thanksgiving Friday week-shopping end essential guide.	Epic Black Thanksgiving Friday week-essential guide shopping end.
13	clever store plan control crowd black friday	Smart Store Plan Controlling the Black Crowds on Friday.	Smart store plan Controlling Black Crowds Friday.	Smart store plan control the black crowd Friday.
13	georgea kovanis wise shopper find deal black friday	Georgea Kovanis will be happy to meet you on Friday.	Georgea Kovanis shopping wise find black deal Friday night.	Georgea kovanis wise shopping find black deal Friday.
13	meet super shopper lauren falco	Meet Lauren Super Shopper Falco.	Meet Super Shopper Lauren Falco.	Meet super shoe Lauren falco.
13	thanksgiving thursday build black friday	Thanksgiving building Thursday Black Friday.	Thanksgiving Thursday build black Friday night.	Well, thanksgiving thursday build black Friday.
13	walmart black friday place worth waiting tech deal	It's a good idea to get a technical agreement.	Walmart Black Friday Place is worth waiting for a technical agreement.	Walmart Black Friday Place is a place worth waiting for.
13	navigate wal mart black friday tech deal	Wal-Mart Black's Friday technology business.	Browse through the apos; the Wal-Mart Black Friday technology business.	Browse through the web site of the Wal-Mart Black Fridays technology store.
13	black friday loses luster thanksgiving day sale	Black Friday has lost the lustre of the Thanksgiving sale.	Black Friday loses the lustre of the Thanksgiving sale.	Black Friday loses the Thanksgiving sale glow.
13	teen plan early black friday bargain	Teenage plan, Black Friday market, early.	Teenage plan, early market black Friday.	Teenage plan, early black Friday market.
13	attn shopper open thanksgiving	It's Thanksgiving.	The client's opening Thanksgiving.	Well, the client is opening Thanksgiving.
13	turning thanksgiving black friday pay retailer	Turn Thanksgiving Black Friday into a paying retailer.	Turn Thanksgiving into Black Friday retailer for a fee.	Turn Thanksgiving into friday black retailer for a fee.
13	good deal predicted black friday	Among them, many foresaw a Black Friday.	It's just that a lot of them were planning on having a black Friday.	Many apos; among them planned a black Friday.
13	holiday shopping love hate online	Hate Holiday Shops online hate.	Holiday shops love online hate hate.	Holiday shops love hate online hate.
13	best deal black friday	Best deal ever is Black Friday.	The best deal ever is Black Friday.	The best deal is Black Friday.
13	retailer offer early holiday deal entice shopper	Retailers offer a variety of vacation packages that appeal to their customers.	Retailers offer early vacation packages that appeal to buyers.	Retailers offer early vacation packages that attract buyers.
13	watch road rage parking space war auto theft aaa warns	Watching the rage of l' Parking Space War Car Flight aaaa warns.	To watch the rage of the apos; parking space Flight of war car aaaaa warns.	Watching the rage of the parking space war car theft aaaa warns.
13	time shop drop holiday season	C' is the season of the holidays in the stores of products of the time.	C&apos is the holiday season in stores of products of the time.	C&apos is holiday season in time product stores.
13	shopper mull dessert doorbusters thanksgiving	Shopper-Mull-door-for-dessert for Thanksgiving.	Multi-door shopper for dessert for Thanksgiving.	Multi-door dessert shopper for Thanksgiving.
13	congratulation black friday awesome	Congrats on Black Friday awesome.	Congratulations on a great black Friday.	Congratulations, awesome black Friday.
13	retailer head start black friday sale gray thursday	It starts on Black Friday, Gray Thursday at auction.	The retailer begins on Black Friday, Grey Thursday at auction.	The retailer will start on Black Friday, Grey Thursday at auction.
13	black friday merchandising crush creep thursday	Merchandising breaks on Thursday.	On Black Friday... merchandising breaks on Thursday.	On Black Friday, Thursday's merchandising breaks.
13	quality time shopping black friday	Good times to buy Black Friday.	Yeah, a good time to buy a black Friday.	Fine time to buy a black Friday.
13	retailer open thanksgiving mixed review	Retailer opens Thanksgiving with mixed reviews.	Well, the retailer opens Thanksgiving with mixed reviews.	The retailer will open Thanksgiving with mixed reviews.
13	retailer thanksgiving madness	Retailers' Thanksgiving.	The retailer's madness.	The madness of the Retailers' Thanksgiving.
13	black friday early start	Early in the morning, Black Friday.	Black Friday is an early morning thing.	Black Friday's early in the morning.
13	avoiding black friday traffic revealed	Avoiding the traffic on Black Friday has revealed.	Avoiding Black Friday traffic revealed.	Avoiding black Friday traffic came out.
13	black friday shopping guide season best bargain	Black Friday's best-of-season shopping guide.	Black Friday season shopping guide best deals.	Black Friday shopping guide season best bargain.
13	meet super shopper margaret goldstein	Meet Super Margaret Goldstein Shopper.	Meet Super Shopper Margaret Goldstein.	Meet super shopper Margaret goldstein.
13	black friday shopper ready	All the Black Friday clients are ready.	Black Friday customers are ready.	Black Friday clients are ready to roll.
13	thanksgiving newest side dish shopping	The brand-new food shop accompanies Thanksgiving.	The brand-new store for food and Thanksgiving accompaniment.	It's the newest store in the world where you can enjoy Thanksgiving specials.
13	local business black friday	Black Friday of Local Affairs.	Black Friday of local affairs.	Local business black Friday.
13	shopping thanksgiving tradition	Thanksgiving shopping.	The Thanksgiving shopping tradition.	Thanksgiving shopping tradition.
13	shopping thanksgiving	Thanksgiving shopping.	Shopping Thanksgiving.	You know, shopping at Thanksgiving.
13	black friday sale best black friday hdtv computer laptop deal	Best Black Friday Black Friday sale hdtv laptop dealer d' laptop Friday.	Black Friday Sale best Black Friday laptop deal d&apos laptop Friday.	Black Friday sale best black Friday hdtv laptop deal d' laptop Friday.
13	shopping thanksgiving day family time	Shopping on Thanksgiving as a family.	To go shopping on Thanksgiving as a family.	Shopping on thanksgiving day as a family.
13	thanksgiving keeping holiday sacred shopping ban	It's a great place to shop, and it's a great place to shop.	Thanksgiving keeping the holidays sacred; forbidden to shop.	Thanksgiving keeping the holidays sacred; shopping banned.
13	black friday deal worth shopping thursday stay	And on Black Friday, it's worth shopping on Thursday.	Black Friday is so worth shopping on Thursday.	Black Friday, it's worth shopping on Thursday.
13	thing black friday	Black Friday.	Well, it's a black Friday.	A black Friday.
13	store spread deal black friday safer	Black Friday is the safest Friday.	On Friday, on Black Friday, it's safer.	On Friday, on the Black Friday, it's safer.
13	shopper lining black friday deal	Black understudy Shopper Friday case.	Shopper black understudy, Friday business.	Shopper's black understudy friday case.
13	quarter consumer holiday shopping thanksgiving	One-quarter of all Thanksgiving vacation shoppers.	A quarter of consumers are shopping for Thanksgiving vacations.	One-quarter of consumers buying holiday shopping at Thanksgiving.
13	best buy black friday deal matching price	Black Friday is better for the same price as Black Friday.	It's better to buy Black Friday at the same price as Black Friday.	Better to buy Black Friday at the same price as Black Friday.
13	black friday king shopping day draw younger consumer	Black Friday attracts younger consumers.	Black Friday, Shopping Day, attracts the younger shoppers.	Black Friday, shopping king's day, attracts younger consumers.
13	good deal thanksgiving day black	Big Black Day Thanksgiving deal.	Good deal Black Day Thanksgiving.	Well, good deal on Black Day Thanksgiving.
13	black friday doorbuster deal tv phone pc total ripoffs	Black Friday porterbuster deal total PC phone scams.	Black Friday porterbuster deal tv phone PC total scams.	Black Friday porterbuster deal tv phone PC total scams.
13	durango store gear friday	Durango shop equipment Friday.	Hardware from durango shop on Friday.	The durango store materials on Friday.
13	better shopping thanksgiving thursday black friday cyber	Best Thanksgiving shopping Thursday, cyber-Friday black.	Best Thanksgiving shopping on Thursday, cyber black Friday.	Best shopping thanksgiving thursday, cyber black friday.
13	black friday store open thanksgiving day hot deal	The Black Friday shop opens on Thanksgiving Day.	The Black Friday gift shop opens on Thanksgiving.	The Black Friday gift shop opens on thanksgiving day.
13	black friday shopping gadget preparation	This is the perfect place to spend your holidays.	Preparation for a Black Friday shopping spree.	Preparing a gadget for black Friday shopping.
13	retailer regret decision jump black friday	Retailers are regretting skipping Black Friday.	Retailers regret skipping Black Friday.	Retailers regret skipping the Black Friday.
13	celebrate thanksgiving	Thanksgiving.	Celebrate Thanksgiving?	To celebrate Thanksgiving.
13	paw walmart black friday deal	"""Paw Walmart Black,"" Friday."	What; Paw Walmart Black, Friday.	Canadian Wildlife Service Occasional Paper Series no.
13	hallmark shopping focus	The emphasis is on shopping.	L' the emphasis is on shopping.	L' shopping is the focus.
13	blue law retail store closed thanksgiving holiday	Blue Law's closed for Thanksgiving.	The Blue Law store has closed its doors for thanksgiving.	The Blue Law store closed for Thanksgiving.
13	black friday deal store study shopping habit roll plan help	Black Sell Friday Shop Study roll-up shopping habits d&apos plan; help help help.	Black sell shop Friday study roll-up shopping habits plan d' help help help.	Black sell Friday store study roll-up shopping habits d&apos plan; help help help.
13	holiday	Home vacation.	It's a vacation.	Uh, vacation.
13	millennials move kickoff holiday shopping season earlier	The senior generation will start early in the Christmas shopping season.	The senior generation begins earlier in the Christmas shopping season.	The senior generation begins Christmas shopping season earlier.
13	consumer going black friday deal	There's a black market on Friday.	The consumer has a black market on Friday.	The consumer black markets on Friday.
13	black friday christmas shopping qa	Black Friday, Christmas, shopping, that sort of thing.	Black Friday, christmas, shopping qaaa qa.	Black Friday, Christmas, shopping qaaqa.
13	retailer plan early black friday sale	Retailers expect early sales on Black Friday.	And retailers are planning an early sale on Black Friday.	Retailers expect an early black Friday sale.
13	target update io app time black friday	Target update app o app time black Friday.	Update target io app time black Friday.	Target update io app time black Friday.
13	local retailer worker meet shopping demand holiday	Local retailers are also responding to the demand for shopping vacations.	Local retailers respond to the demand for a shopping holiday.	Local retailers respond to shopping holiday demand.
13	shopping thanksgiving	Thanksgiving shopping.	Shopping Thanksgiving.	You know, shopping at Thanksgiving.
13	black friday store hour master list	Blacklist of Friday's shopping hours; opening of Friday's shops.	Blacklist of Friday's shopping hours.	Black list of times d' opening of Friday stores.
13	thanksgiving day shop shop	Thanksgiving-day gift shop.	It's Thanksgiving Day.	Thanksgiving day gift shop.
13	peace america shopping holiday	This is Peace American shopping holiday.	Peace American shopping holiday.	American peace shopping holiday.
13	black friday shopping start early thanksgiving morning	Early Thanksgiving starts on Black Friday.	Black Friday starts early on the Thanksgiving morning.	Black Friday starts early on the morning of Thanksgiving.
13	latest holiday dilemma shop	Latest store of holiday dilemmas.	Latest holiday dilemma shop.	It's the latest holiday dilemma store.
13	lisa law thanksgiving shop till retail worker drop	It's just that it's a Thanksgiving store law until the retailer gives up.	It's Thanksgiving store law until the retailer drops out.	It's law Thanksgiving shop until the retailer gives up.
13	shopping thanksgiving kill poor worker holiday	Thanksgiving shopping kills working-class vacations.	Thanksgiving shopping kills a poor working-class vacation.	Thanksgiving shopping kills poor worker vacations.
13	thing buy black friday	Buy a Black Friday.	Buy a black Friday.	To buy a black Friday.
13	black friday creep restaurant eye opportunity	Black Friday is a chance to have a scary look in the restaurant.	The hotel is located in the heart of the city, close to the city centre.	Black Friday is an opportunity to have a scary look in the restaurant.
13	store ready black friday shopper	The store's all set for Black Friday.	The store's ready for Black Friday.	The store is ready for Black Friday!
13	black friday apps smoother shopping	It's easier to buy Black Friday apps.	The Black Friday apps are easier to buy.	Black Friday apps are easier to buy.
13	retailer positive spin creep thanksgiving	Retailer's positive, freaky, at Thanksgiving.	Well, the retailer is positive, freaky, at Thanksgiving.	It's a freaky, positive retailer at Thanksgiving.
13	black friday boom bust	Friday's Boom-black buster.	Boom-black Friday buster.	Boom-Friday black buster.
13	black friday killing holiday	Friday night, Black Friday, murder holiday.	Black Friday, murder holiday.	Black Friday, holiday of murder.
13	early bird adjust thanksgiving shopping hour	It's time to get ready for the next race of the year.	Early-Rises adjust the apos; Thanksgiving shopping time.	Early risers adjust Thanksgiving shopping time.
13	black friday start thursday year	Black Friday begins on Thursday of the year.	Black Friday starts on Thursday of the year.	Black Friday begins on the year Thursday.
13	jewish shopping titan map black friday strategy early	Titan Jewish Shopping Black Card Strategy early Friday morning strategy.	Titan Jewish Shopping Black card strategy early Friday morning strategy.	Jewish shopping titan black card strategy Friday morning early strategy.
13	tackle year black friday shopping	Plate-format d' purchase of l' Black Friday year.	Plate-form d' purchase of l' year of Black Friday.	Plate-form d' purchase of black Friday year.
13	black friday warrior share best attack plan	The Fridays Black Warrior shares the best plan of the attack.	The Black Friday warrior shares the best plan of the attack.	The Black Friday Warrior shares the best attack plan.
13	black blue retailer bet gray thursday	The blue-black retailer bets on Thursday.	The blue-black retailer bets on the gray on Thursday.	The black blue retailer bets on the gray on Thursday.
13	black friday extends thanksgiving area mall	The Thanksgiving Mall is extended on Black Friday.	Black Friday extends the Thanksgiving Mall.	Black Friday extends the thanksgiving mall.
13	consumer expected conservative approach black friday holiday	Consumers were waiting for a conservative Black Friday approach.	Consumers were looking for a conservative approach to Black Friday.	Consumers were expecting a conservative approach to the black Friday festival.
13	shorter retail season impact retailer consumer	In addition, a shorter retail sales season has an impact on retail consumers.	The shorter retail season has an impact on retail consumers.	A shorter retail season impacts retail consumers.
13	online seller guide key holiday shopping	Key Vacation Buys Online Sales Guide.	Online Salesman Guide to Key Vacation Purchases.	Online seller guide key holiday purchases.
13	shopper ready black friday	The client's prepped for Black Friday.	The client's ready for Black Friday.	Customer's ready for black Friday night.
13	black friday best tech deal	L' Black Friday business on top of the best technology.	L' Black Friday business on best technology.	L' black Friday business on the best technology.
13	shopping frenzy launch earlier	Early shopping kick-off.	Frenzied launch of the shopping cart earlier.	Frenzied shopping launch earlier today.
13	public investigator retail climate black friday turning shade gray	Public Investigator, Retailer, Black Climate Friday becoming Dark Grey.	Public investigator, retailer, and Friday night's black climate turning dark gray.	Public investigator, retailer, black climate Friday turning dark grey.
13	hillis black friday thanksgiving gratitude moot	Black Hillis Friday Thanksgiving gratitude, questionable.	Black Hillis Friday Thanksgiving gratitude debatable.	Hillis black Friday Thanksgiving gratitude questionable.
13	long beach area retailer opening thanksgiving	It's Thanksgiving at the Long Beach Retailer.	The Long Beach retailer opens Thanksgiving.	Long Beach's retailer is opening thanksgiving.
13	shopping thanksgiving thing	Thanksgiving shopping.	Shopping for Thanksgiving.	Uh, shopping for Thanksgiving.
13	holiday forecast thanksgiving side shopping	Thanksgiving party planning.	Forecast of Thanksgiving parties.	Uh, Thanksgiving party planning.
13	thanksgiving hour online sale bite traditional black friday	Online sale of Thanksgiving time is brimming with traditional Black Friday.	The online sale of Thanksgiving time bites the traditional Black Friday tradition.	Thanksgiving hour online sale bites traditional Black Friday tradition.
13	local store compete black friday	Local stores are competing on Black Friday.	Local stores compete on Black Friday.	Local stores compete on black Friday.
13	black friday lost retail magic	There's no magic in the details on Black Friday.	Black Friday has lost its magic in detail.	Black Friday has lost retail magic.
13	shopper black friday deal thanksgiving day	Black Friday, Thanksgiving day.	Black Friday, Thanksgiving.	On Black Friday, on the day of Thanksgiving.
13	shopper find coast mall shopping center open thanksgiving	Shopper find mall coast shopping mall mall open Thanksgiving.	Shopper find shopping center of the coast shopping center open Thanksgiving.	Shopper find shopping mall of the coast shopping center open Thanksgiving.
13	black friday	Black Friday.	Black Friday.	It's black Friday.
13	black friday start thursday	Black Friday starts Thursday.	Black Friday starts Thursday.	Black Friday will start on Thursday.
13	season shopping black friday coverage number	This is the cover issue of Black Friday to shop in season.	"This is the cover issue of ""Black Friday"" for shopping in season."	The black Friday cover number to shop in season.
13	uconn poll american shopping thanksgiving day	Uuconn American Thanksgiving shopping poll.	Uuconn American shopping survey Thanksgiving day.	Uuconn american shopping day Thanksgiving poll.
13	triangle merchant prepare black friday sale	Triangle dealer's preparing to sell Black Friday.	The Triangle Merchant is preparing for the sale of Black Friday.	The merchant of the triangle is preparing the sale of Black Friday.
13	store open turkey day	Store on Open Turkey Day, Turkey Day.	Store on the open turkey day, turkey day.	Store on open turkey day, turkey day.
13	shopper cash pre black friday sale	Purchase, cash, before the Black Friday sale.	Cash purchase before sale on Black Friday.	Purchase cash before sale of Black Friday.
13	american deal	Agreement with the North America.	One agreement with l'apos; North America.	It's the only way we're going to get it.
13	black friday guide store hour best deal shopping	Black Friday, L' Store Guide Time, Best Buy, Shopping.	Black Friday, time of the store guide, best deal, shopping.	Black Friday, store guide time, best deal, shopping.
13	black friday backlash	Black Friday backlash.	Friday black, backlash.	You know, Black Friday, backlash.
13	retailer offering jaw dropping deal tempt shopper	A retailer that offers sales at a loss will be tempted to sell the product to the consumer.	A loss-oriented retailer will tempt the consumer.	A retailer offering below-cost sales will tempt consumers.
13	poll shopping thanksgiving day plan	Thanksgiving Day Plan for Survey Shopping.	This is Thanksgiving Day's plan for survey shopping.	Thanksgiving day plan for survey shopping.
13	thanksgiving telegraph arrive store wednesday big	Thanksgiving Telegraph is coming in Wednesday.	The Thanksgiving telegraph is due on Wednesday.	The thanksgiving telegraph arrives on wednesday.
13	black friday bad weather shopper delayed denied	Delayed buyers have been turned down.	Black Friday bad weather, the delayed buyers have been rejected.	Black Friday bad weather, delayed buyers turned down.
13	black friday shop	Black Friday's shop.	Black Friday shop.	The black Friday store.
13	ready set shop holiday gift buying season start thursday	The season of ready-to-go gifts starts on Thursday.	The ready-to-eat gift shopping season begins on Thursday.	The season for buying gifts ready at l'apos; employment starts on Thursday.
13	black friday start week thanksgiving christmas eve	Black Friday begins on Christmas Eve Thanksgiving week.	Black Friday begins Thanksgiving week on Christmas Eve.	Black Friday starts Thanksgiving week on the eve of Christmas.
13	tackle year black friday shopping link black friday	Black Friday, Black Friday, Black Friday, Black Friday, Black Friday.	Black Friday of the year, Black Friday, Black Friday, Black Friday, Black Friday.	Black Friday of l' year, black Friday, black Friday, black Friday.
13	controversy surround store opening thanksgiving	Controversy surrounds the opening of a Thanksgiving store.	Controversy surrounds the opening of a store on Thanksgiving.	There is controversy about opening a store on Thanksgiving.
13	holiday shopping choice	You can choose from a variety of options.	Vacation shopping options.	Vacation shopping options.
13	paw walmart big black friday deal	Paw Walmart, big, black thing on Friday.	Paw Walmart big black thing on Friday.	Paw walmart big black thing friday.
13	local retailer asked share black friday shopping deal hour	A local retailer has asked to share the store's black Friday sales time.	A local retailer asked to share the time of black Friday sale.	A local retailer asked to share black Friday sales time.
13	best video game console deal black friday	The best video game system in the world features a Black Friday.	Black Friday is the best video game console in the world.	The best video game console is Black Friday.
13	black friday creep thursday shopper plan earlier	Black Friday is the Black Friday, Black Friday is the early Thursday shopping plan.	On Friday black, c' is on Friday black, on Thursday plan shopping earlier.	Black Friday is Black Friday, Thursday shopping plan earlier.
13	open thanksgiving retailer push holiday shopping season gain	An open-access Thanksgiving retailer is a great incentive for vacation shopping.	Open Thanksgiving retailer pushes vacation shopping to win.	An open Thanksgiving retailer drives vacation shopping to win.
13	team retailer feel pressure open thanksgiving	The retail team feels the pressure of opening Thanksgiving.	The team retailer feels the pressure to open a Thanksgiving.	The team retailer feels the pressure to open Thanksgiving.
13	black friday shopper cautioned urge splurge	The Black Friday consumer warned that a lot of money had to be spent.	The consumer of Black Friday warned that it was necessary to spend a lot of money.	It's been a long time since we've had the opportunity to talk about what we're doing.
13	black friday success	Black Friday success.	You know, the success of Black Friday.	The success of Black Friday.
13	clark howard guide black friday	This is Clark Howard Black Friday Guide.	Clark Howard Black Guide Friday.	Clark howard guide black friday.
13	black friday deal best sale	Best selling on a Black Friday.	The best selling of apos; a Black Friday.	The best sale of apos; a black Friday.
13	retail expert shopping frenzy start early consumer	Consumers are beginning to see the frenzy of expert retail shopping.	The frenzy of expert shopping begins early in the consumer's life.	The retail expert shopping frenzy begins early.
13	compete big guy black friday	Tall black guy friday.	Tall black guy on Friday night.	Hey, big black guy on Friday.
13	thanksgiving black friday number	It was Black Friday at Thanksgiving.	Black Friday at Thanksgiving.	Thanksgiving black Friday!
13	black friday lined	Black Fridays are aligned in black.	The Black Fridays are lined up in black.	And black Fridays are lined up in black.
13	thanksgiving shopping tradition	Thanksgiving shopping.	The Thanksgiving shopping tradition.	Thanksgiving shopping tradition.
13	holiday creep fourth black friday shopper plan start thanksgiving	The fourth Black Friday shopping spree begins Thanksgiving.	Scary of the holidays, the fourth Friday black shopping plan begins Thanksgiving.	Freaking parties, fourth black Friday shopping plan begins Thanksgiving.
13	black friday blue	Black Friday, blue.	Black, Friday, blue.	Black guy, Friday, blue guy.
13	top black friday tech deal	Top of the Dark Friday Techno.	Black Friday's top techno.	Yeah, top of the Dark Friday tech scene.
13	black friday uk despite total lack thanksgiving day	It's a great place to have fun, and it's a great place to be.	Black Friday uk despite the apos; no thanksgiving at all.	Black Friday uk despite the apos; total absence of Thanksgiving.
13	local shopping scene check black friday weekend	The scene of the local shopping verifies the black Friday of the week-end.	The local shopping scene will check the black Friday of the week-end.	The local shopping scene checks the weekend-end black Friday.
13	best black friday apps	Best black apps on Friday night.	Some of the best black apps on Friday.	Friday's best black apps.
13	black friday plan early saving	Plan Friday Black Friday, save early plans to save.	Black Friday save early plan save.	Plan friday black save early plan save.
13	backlash black friday creep thanksgiving day	On Black Friday, Thanksgiving Day, the bad kind of Thanksgiving unleashes back.	Black Friday, Thanksgiving Day, bad Thanksgiving guy, rages back.	Black Friday, thanksgiving day, the creepy thanksgiving guy, lashes out back.
13	black friday move thanksgiving day	Thanksgiving Black Friday's Thanksgiving Day; Thanksgiving Day.	Friday Black move Thanksgiving on the Day of the Apostle; Thanksgiving Day.	Friday black move Thanksgiving on the day of l' Thanksgiving.
13	nation shopper buying thanksgiving day	It's Thanksgiving Day for the nation's shopping.	Nation shopping buys on Thanksgiving.	Well, nation shopping buys on Thanksgiving.
13	black friday	Black Friday.	Black Friday.	It's black Friday.
13	best black friday investment	Best Black Friday investment.	This is the best investment on Black Friday.	Black Friday's best investment ever.
13	shopping black friday	Black Friday.	Buy Black Friday.	Buy black Friday.
13	making peace shopping holiday	Shopping for peace, holidays.	Shopping for peace holidays.	To go shopping for peace holidays.
13	black friday move thanksgiving day	Thanksgiving Black Friday's Thanksgiving Day; Thanksgiving Day.	Friday Black move Thanksgiving on the Day of the Apostle; Thanksgiving Day.	Friday black move Thanksgiving on the day of l' Thanksgiving.
13	black friday best day shop	Best-day Black Friday shop.	The best-day Black Friday gift shop.	Black Friday gift shop for the best day ever.
13	corporate grinch stole thanksgiving	Grinch steal Thanksgiving.	Grinch stole thanksgiving.	Hey, Grinch stole Thanksgiving.
13	shopping blue law ban store opening thanksgiving day	The Blue Law Ban opens its doors on Thanksgiving Day.	The Blue Law Ban store is now open on Thanksgiving.	The Blue Law Ban store opens on Thanksgiving.
13	investor shopping guide top retailer	Investment guide; purchase of investors first retailer.	Guide d' purchase of companies; investors first retailer.	D&apos guide; purchase of prime retailer investors.
13	best buy black friday sale deal tv hunger game blu ray camera	The best buy Black Friday sale d' agreement TV game of the Hunger Camera of the Blue Shelf video game.	The best buy black Friday sale d' agreement TV game of the hungry camera of blue radius video game.	The best buy black Friday sale d' agreement TV game of the hunger camera blue radius video game.
13	black	Black.	Black.	A black one.
13	black friday stretch long weekend buying	Black Friday s' spreads over a long weekend-end d' buy it.	Black Friday spreads over a long week-end d' purchase.	Friday black s' extends over a long week-end d' purchase.
13	best buy celebrates third cyber monday online sale	Best Buy celebrates the third Monday Online Sale on the Internet.	Best Buy celebrates the third online sale of the game on Monday.	Best Buy celebrates our third online sale on Monday.
13	find black friday deal great mobile apps	Find the Black Friday of good applications mobile.	Find the best and best mobile applications on Black Friday.	To find the Black Friday good mobile applications.
13	meet super shopper jennifer johnson	Meet super-buyer Jennifer Johnson.	Meet the super-buyer Jennifer Johnson.	Meet super buyer Jennifer Johnson.
13	black friday shopping guide	Black Friday Shopping Guide.	Black Friday shopping guide.	Black Friday shopping guide.
13	best black friday apps smarter shopping	The best Black Friday apps are the smartest way to shop.	The best Black Friday apps are smarter for shopping.	The best Black Friday apps are smarter to go shopping with.
13	craigslist user offer thanksgiving black friday shopping service	Craigslist user L&apos offers Black Thanksgiving Friday service; purchase.	L' craigslist user offers Black Thanksgiving on Friday; purchase.	L' craigslist user offers Black Thanksgiving service on Friday.
13	thanksgiving shopping turkey	Thanksgiving dinner, buy turkey.	Thanksgiving, buy some turkey.	Thanksgiving, turkey shopping.
13	retailer prepare black friday uma student	Retailer prepares a Black Friday for l' student aa.	The retailer is preparing a Black Friday for l' student uma.	The retailer prepares a black Friday for l' student uma.
13	black friday carves deeper thanksgiving	Black Friday gashes more deeply Thanksgiving.	Black Friday has a much deeper bite on Thanksgiving.	Black Friday gashes deeper thanksgiving.
13	black friday survival guide helpful apps kill time dressing	Black Friday Survival Guide, time-killing, useful applications in s' clothing.	Black Friday Survival Guide, time-killing and useful applications.	Survival guide of Black Friday, useful applications that kill time in s' clothing.
13	popular black friday deal sale	Black Friday sale.	Popular sale of Black Friday.	The popular sale of Black Friday.
13	local chain store open thanksgiving	Local chain stores are opening at Thanksgiving.	Local chain stores open on Thanksgiving.	The local chain stores are opening on Thanksgiving.
13	retail pick turkey	Retail spike turkey.	Peak-to-retail turkey.	Turkey pick in detail.
13	thanksgiving shopping state ban	L' prohibition of shopping; and, Thanksgiving State, no shopping.	L' ban on apos; state of Thanksgiving prohibits shopping.	It's a Thanksgiving state ban on shopping.
13	shopping thanksgiving tradition poll	Shopping at Thanksgiving Day is a tradition.	Shopping at Thanksgiving is tradition.	Going shopping on thanksgiving is a tradition.
13	hottest smart tv hdtv deal black friday	Black Friday is the warmest Friday on TV.	Black Friday is the hottest Friday on TV.	Black Friday is the hottest Friday ever.
13	retailer jump aboard black friday creep	Retailer jumps on board on Frightening Black Friday.	It's just that a retailer jumps on board; it's a freaky, black Friday.	A retailer jumps on board; a creepy black Friday.
13	shop black friday sale pro	Sales of Black Friday haberdashery items.	Sale of black haberdashery products from professional Fridays.	Professional Friday black haberdashery items.
13	pricegrabber survey reveals black friday creep return retailer	It's just that it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, but it's a big deal.	A survey of wholesalers revealed that on Black Friday, retailers return to improv.	Wholesale survey reveals that on Black Friday, retailers return to improv.
13	survive earliest black friday sale	Surviving the First Sale of Black Friday.	Surviving the first sale of Black Friday?	To survive the first sale of Black Friday.
13	best black friday deal	Best Fridays ever.	Best Black Friday.	The best black Friday ever.
13	win black friday shopping strategy	Win the D&apos strategy; Black Friday Buy.	Win the strategy d' purchase of Black Friday.	Win strategy d' buy Black Friday.
13	change afoot black friday thing move thursday	Change in progress Friday black thing to move thursday.	Change in progress Fridays black thing move Thursday.	Change in progress friday black thing move thursday.
13	walmart black friday deal hand	Black Walmart of Fridays.	Walmart black from Friday.	Walmart black of the Friday.
13	shopping thanksgiving kind worker	Thanksgiving worker.	Worker of l' Thanksgiving.	It's a good thing you're not.
13	black friday outlook grim retailer	Dark Friday, dark day, dark retailer.	Black Friday, dark day, dark retailer.	A black Friday, a dark day, a gloomy retailer.
13	labor law cyber monday online shopping office	Labour law, e-commerce, e-commerce, e-commerce, e-commerce and e-commerce.	Labour Law e-London office d' e-commerce.	Labour law e-lundi office d' online purchase.
13	transformation black friday	Black Friday transformation.	Turning black Friday night.	Turning black Friday.
13	eat thanksgiving meal fast black friday thursday	Eat Thanksgiving dinner on Black and Fast Friday.	Eat your meal; Thanksgiving Day on a fast and dark Friday.	Eat the meal d' Thanksgiving fast and dark Friday.
13	ri state ban thanksgiving shopping	Shopping at Thanksgiving is not allowed in the state.	You know, the state doesn't allow shopping at Thanksgiving.	L' state forbids shopping on Thanksgiving.
13	shopping black friday	Black Friday.	Buy Black Friday.	Buy black Friday.
13	black friday success find best deal	The success of Black Friday night finds the best case.	Black Friday success finds the best deal.	Black Friday success finds the best deal in town.
13	shopper advantage thanksgiving day store hour	Customers benefit at Thanksgiving time.	Customer benefit at Thanksgiving time.	Customer benefit at Thanksgiving store time.
13	american prefer traditional dinner shopping discount thanksgiving	The American public prefers traditional discounts for Thanksgiving dinner.	Americans prefer the traditional discount for Thanksgiving dinner.	Americans prefer traditional discounts at Thanksgiving dinner parties.
13	thanksgiving lull ahead black friday	Thanksgiving is coming up on Black Friday.	Thanksgiving lull is coming up on Black Friday.	L' thanksgiving lull is coming up on black friday.
13	reality check save money black friday	It saves money on Black Friday.	Verification of reality saves money on Black Friday.	Verification of reality will save money on Black Friday.
13	thanksgiving shopping	Thanksgiving shopping.	Shopping for Thanksgiving.	Uh, shopping for Thanksgiving.
13	thanksgiving shopping illegal three state	Illegal Thanksgiving Purchases in three states.	Illegal Thanksgiving shopping in three states.	Uh, illegal Thanksgiving shopping in three states.
13	black friday survival guide deal	On Black Friday night, the Survival Guide proposes a deal.	On Black Friday the Survival Guide proposes a deal.	On Black Friday, the survival guide proposes a deal.
13	rare occurrence walmart tv camera inside door talk black	It seldom happens that Walmart TV camera at the door, inside the door, speak black.	Rarely, Walmart TV camera to l'apos; inside the door speak black talk.	It's not often that Walmart TV camera to the inside of the door talk black to talk.
13	black friday king shopping day	Shopping day, Black Friday.	Black Friday, the king of shopping.	Black Friday, shopping king day.
13	newspaper gearing black friday	On Friday night, the paper is in black.	Friday the paper is in black.	On Friday, the newspaper is in black.
13	thanksgiving shopping craze	I'm so excited about Thanksgiving shopping.	L' the craze for Thanksgiving shopping.	Thanksgiving shopping craze.
13	shopping apps aim help consumer avoid black friday hassle	Shopping applications are designed to help consumers avoid Black Friday hassles.	The shopping applications are designed to help consumers avoid Black Friday hassles.	Shopping applications are designed to help the consumer avoid Fridays.
13	shopper retailer gear gray thursday black friday	Grey garments are sold by the retailer on Black Thursday.	And the retailer sells gray garments on black Thursday.	The retailer sells black Thursday gray clothing.
13	black friday	Black Friday.	Black Friday.	It's black Friday.
13	wake america ruining thanksgiving	Wake America ruining Thanksgiving Day.	Wake America ruining thanksgiving.	Wake america ruining thanksgiving.
13	making nervous favorite retail stock	Favourite retail stores.	Make your favorite nervous retail inventory.	Make favorite retail stores nervous.
13	earlier shopping hour prompt distinct response	A separate answer is given at the time of purchase.	Earlier in the day, a separate answer is given.	Earlier in the shopping hour, a separate answer will be given.
14	challenge china airspace	Chinese airspace.	Defy Chinese airspace.	Defying China's airspace and airspace.
14	defying china aircraft fly east china sea notification	In the East China Sea, porcelain planes defy notification.	The porcelain planes defy notification in the East China Sea.	Porcelain aircraft are defying notification in the East China Sea.
14	japanese airline snub china air rule	Japanese airlines have been sniffing around the Chinese air policy.	The Japanese airlines snub the rule of l'apos; Chinese air.	Japanese airlines snub Chinese air policy.
14	china summons japan envoy air zone protest	China has called the Japanese envoy from the protesting air zone.	China summons Japanese envoy from the protest air zone.	China summons Japanese envoy from the air zone of protest.
14	pentagon prepared defend plane china defense zone	The Pentagon has set up an air-defense zone in China.	Sir, the Pentagon has prepared an air defense zone in China.	Pentagon has prepared an air defense zone in China.
14	fly bomber disputed island claimed china	The island, which had been attacked by the bombers, claimed responsibility for the porcelain.	The bombers' island has claimed responsibility for the porcelain.	L' island disputed by the bombers claimed the porcelain.
14	update australia summons chinese ambassador airspace announcement	Australian Update convenes the apos; Chinese Ambassador announces apos; airspace.	Update australia convenes l' Chinese ambassador announces of l' airspace.	Update australia convenes l' Chinese ambassador announces airspace.
14	china defense zone struggle amid regional backlash	The area of defense of the porcelain s&apos is debated in the midst of the regional backlash.	The s&apos porcelain defense zone is debated in the midst of a regional backlash.	The defense zone of s&apos porcelain is debated amid regional backlash.
14	special report china navy break high sea	Special Report of the Chinese Navy Breaking the High Seas.	Chinese Navy breaking the high seas special report.	This is a special report from the Chinese Navy on breaking the high seas.
14	disputed china air zone official	Official of the Challenged Porcelain Air Zone.	Challenged porcelain aerial zone official.	Official porcelain air zone challenged.
14	china monitored air zone flight	China has been monitoring the plane's flight.	China has been monitoring the flight of the aircraft.	China monitored the plane's flight.
14	criticises china zone includes disputed island vow defend	Criticisms of the porcelain include the contested vow to defend the Apos; island.	Criticism of the porcelain area includes the contested vow to defend the island.	Criticism of the porcelain area includes the contested vow to defend the island and the island.
14	japanese flyer defiant chinese air zone	A Japanese pilot defying the Chinese Air Force, sir.	A Japanese pilot defying the air force of China.	A Japanese pilot defying the air zone.
14	china monitored bomber flight airspace zone	China has been monitoring the area of the bombers' airspace.	China watched the area d' bombers' airspace.	China has been monitoring the airspace of the bombers.
14	china trade barb china sea defense zone	Porcelain trade, Barb china, maritime defense zone.	Porcelain trade Barb china is a maritime defense zone.	China trade Barb china maritime defense zone.
14	war japan china accident waiting happen	There's a war-related accident in Japan, China, waiting to happen.	There's a war accident in Japan, China, waiting to happen.	There is a war accident waiting to happen in Japan, China.
14	bomber challenge disputed china air zone	There is a challenge to the aerial bombardment of the porcelain zone.	We're gonna have a china air-zone bomber challenge.	China air zone bomber challenge contested.
14	update asian airline flight plan china airspace zone created	Update of the China-Asian Airline Flight Plan (AAFP) D&A zone; airspace created.	Update Asian flight plan China zone d' airspace created.	Update Asian flight plan China zone created airspace.
14	china airspace claim inflames tie south korea	In China's airspace, it is said that the oil fires are linked to South Korea.	In Chinese airspace, it is said that South Korea is involved in the flares.	Chinese airspace says that the conflagrations are linked to South Korea.
14	china monitored flight disputed island east china sea	China has been monitoring the disputed Apos flight; East China island China Sea.	China monitored the disputed flight of the island of China East China Sea of China.	China monitored the flight of the disputed island of East China China Sea.
14	china creates air defence zone east china sea	China creates an air-defense zone in the South China Sea.	This porcelain creates an air defence zone in the East China Sea.	China creates an air defence zone in the East China Sea.
14	japan criticize china air defense zone	Japan is criticizing China's air-defense zone.	Japan's critical of China's air defense zone.	Japan is criticizing the air defense zone of China.
14	japanese airline disregard china air zone rule	The Japanese airline does not abide by the rules of the Chinese airline zone.	The Japanese airline does not respect the rules of the Chinese air zone.	The Japanese airline doesn't follow China's air zone rules.
14	military aircraft challenge china air defense zone	Military aircraft defy China's air-defense zone.	Military aircraft challenge China's air defense zone.	The military aircraft are now challenging the air defense zone of China.
14	china claim air disputed island	China claims disputed island.	China claims a disputed island.	There's a disputed island China claims.
14	japan warns unpredictable event china air zone	The Japanese are now warning of the possibility of an unforeseeable Chinese air zone.	Japan warns of the unpredictability of the Chinese air space.	Japan warns of Chinese air zone unpredictability.
14	china protest japan criticism airspace rule	China has protested against the law of l'apos; Japanese airspace.	China protests against Japan's law of flight.	China protests against the law of l'apos; airspace of Japan.
14	china establishes air defence zone east china sea	China is establishing an air defense zone in the East China Sea.	China has established an air defence zone in the East China Sea.	China establishes an air defence zone in the East China Sea.
14	bomber fly china air defense zone	Bombers are flying into the air defence zone.	Bombers are now flying into the air defense zone.	Bombers flying in air defense zone.
14	rpt update asian airline flight plan china airspace zone	Air France, France, France, France, France, France, France, France, France, France, France, Germany.	Updated flight plan for d&apos, an Asian airline.	Updating the flight plan for an Asian-based airline company.
14	bomber fly disputed island chain informing china	It's been a long time since we've been able to get to China.	Bombers fly over the chain of islands wrestled to inform China.	Bombers fly over a chain of disputed islands to inform China.
14	sends china claimed water	He's also sending saltwater to China.	He's sending saltwater into China.	He sends salt water to China.
14	china claim air island	It is the only country in the world that has the capacity to do so.	China claims the island of l' Air.	China reasserts its claim to the island of l' Air.
14	china airspace announcement inflammatory white house	Announcement of L' Chinese White Space Incinerator.	Announcement of the apos; Chinese airspace white house incendiary.	L&apos announcement; airspace Chinese white house incendiary.
14	island flight anger chinese	Island flight, it irritates the Chinese.	Island flying rattles Chinese.	The island flight irritates the Chinese.
14	japan asks airline ignore china flight plan rule	In addition, Japan has asked the airline to ignore the rule of the Chinese flight plan.	Japan has asked the airline company to ignore the Chinese flight plan rule.	Japan asks Chinese airline to ignore Chinese flight plan rule.
14	japan ministry foreign affair statement china defense identification	The Japanese Ministry of Foreign Affairs has issued a statement on the subject of the Chinese defence identity.	Japan's Ministry of Foreign Affairs issued a statement on the apos; identification of Chinese defense.	The Japanese Ministry of Foreign Affairs made a statement on Chinese defense identification.
14	china set air defense zone area disputed japan	Air Defence Zone Contested in Japan.	Air defense zone disputed in Japan?	This is a disputed air defense zone in Japan.
14	japanese airline china flight plan zone	Flight Plan Area (FPZ) d' a Japanese airline in China.	Plan Area d' Japanese airline in China.	Flight plan zone d' a Japanese airline in China.
14	china monitored defiant flight	China has been monitoring the provocative flight.	China's been watching the flight for a while.	China monitored the provocative flight.
14	south china sea row escalates bomber defy chinese	Rank of South China Sea Climbing Bomber Defiance Chinese.	Rank of South China Sea Climbing Chinese bomber challenge.	South China Sea row escalation bomber challenge Chinese.
14	japan decries creation east china sea air defense zone	Japan denounces the establishment of an Eastern China Sea Air Defence Zone.	In addition, Japan denounces the establishment of an air defence zone in the East China Sea.	Japan denounces the creation of an air defence zone in the East China Sea.
14	china reject julie bishop irresponsible criticism air zone east	China does not accept Julie Bishop Air Zone East's irresponsible criticism.	The irresponsible criticism of Julie Bishop Air Zone East is rejected by China.	China rejects irresponsible criticism of Julie Bishop Air Zone East.
14	sends military plane disputed island challenge china	This was the first time in the history of the United States that the United States had been involved in the war.	Sending in military aircraft challenging the island of China.	Shipping military aircraft challenging the island of China.
14	concern china announcement air defence zone disputed	It's been a long time since the war, but it's been a long time since the war.	Concerns about the upcoming announcement in China of a disputed air defence zone.	Concerns about a disputed air defence zone in China.
14	defies china sends bomber disputed east china sea zone	China's challenge is to send a series of disputed bombers into the East China Sea Zone.	Defiance China dispatches disputed bombers into East China's maritime zone.	Defiance China sends disputed bombers to East China's maritime zone.
14	chinese air defense news	Chinese air-defense news.	News from Chinese air defense.	Chinese air defense news.
14	defend japan china	Defending the Japanese China.	Defending Japanese China!	To defend Japanese China.
14	china air zone official	Official porcelain aerial zone, sir.	Official porcelain flight zone operator.	China air zone official.
14	china monitored bomber air zone	China has been monitoring the bomber's airspace.	China has been monitoring the bombers' air zones.	China monitored the bombers' air zones.
14	air defense zone issue worsens northeast asian situation korea	The problem of the Air Defence Zone (ADZ) aggravates the situation in North Korea-East Asia.	The problem of the air defence zone aggravates the situation in North Korea, @-@East Asia.	The problem of the air defence zone aggravates the situation in North Korea.
14	australia call chinese ambassador air zone move	L' L' L' L' L' L&apos.	L' Australia calls the Chinese ambassador to travel in the air zone.	L' Australia calls for Chinese ambassador to travel in the air zone of the country.
14	china american bomber crossed airspace claimed china	A U.S. bomber flew through China's airspace.	An American bomber went through the Apos; airspace and claimed China.	An American bomber crossed the Apos; airspace and claimed China.
14	update voice strong concern china east china sea tension	High-Level Update Of Concern About China East China Sea Tension.	Update loud voice concern of China East China Sea tension.	Update loud voice concern of China tension of the East China Sea.
14	diplomat hauled beijing ministry	Diplomat appealed to Beijing Ministry of Foreign Affairs.	One diplomat appealed to the Beijing ministry.	A diplomat appealed to the ministry in Beijing.
14	china bomber plane fly disputed airspace	There are also a number of airplanes in the area.	Porcelain bombers overfly the Apos; disputed airspace.	Porcelain bombers fly over disputed airspace.
14	plane fly disputed east china sea island	The flight of d' disputed airplane East China Sea Island island.	Flying from the island of East China, disputed island of East China.	Flight d' disputed island island of East China sea island.
14	japan china air defence zone disputed island dangerous	Japanese Air Defence Zone of Japan Contested Island Dangerous.	Japan's disputed dangerous island air defense zone.	Japanese China air defense zone disputed island dangerous.
14	china lash aust criticism	Critics are baffled by China's porcelain.	China porcelain knocks critics out.	China's china knocks the critics out.
14	aircraft fly disputed china air zone	The planes are now flying through a disputed porcelain air space.	The planes fly into a disputed porcelain air zone.	Airplanes fly in a porcelain air zone that is disputed.
14	china hit japan air defence issue	China has hit Japan in the area of air defense.	China has hit Japan in air defense.	China hit Japan in the air defence field.
14	oryza quick glance news	Oryza will take a quick look at the news.	Oryza takes one quick look at the news.	Oryza takes a quick look at the latest news from the French press.
14	china hit complaint maritime air defense zone	The porcelain hit the maritime air defense.	The porcelain has hit the maritime air defense zone.	China hit the maritime air defense zone.
14	china monitored flight bomber defied beijing maritime	China watched the in-flight bomber defying the ship in Beijing.	China has been monitoring the in-flight bomber that defied the Beijing ship.	China watched the bomber in flight that defied the Beijing ship.
14	japan china war airspace	This was the air space of the China War in Japan.	L' airspace of the China War in Japan.	L' airspace of the China war in Japan.
14	analysis risk conflict east china sea	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.	L' analysis could lead to conflict with the Sea of East China.	There is a risk of conflict with the East China Sea.
14	japan answer china warning island airspace	The Japanese are responding to the warning of the Chinese in the air space of the island.	Japan responds to the call; Chinese warning in the airspace of the island.	Japan responds to Chinese warning in the airspace of the island.
14	china warned island airspace	China has been warning the island's airspace.	China has alerted the airspace of the island.	China warned the apos; airspace of the island.
14	fly airspace china claim	Air space claims sovereignty; air space claims sovereignty.	China's airspace, airspace and air space claim.	China of l' airspace claims airspace.
14	international outcry china fly zone	There has been an international outcry in the area of the porcelain flies.	An international outcry broke out in the porcelain-flies area.	There has been an international outcry in the world's china fly zone.
14	china japan ramp airspace dispute	Challenging China and Japan airspace.	Challenged by the airspace of China and Japan.	China and Japan airspace protest.
14	china monitored defiant bomber flight	China has been monitoring defiant bombers.	China has been monitoring the flight of defiant bombers.	China monitored the flight of defiant bombers.
14	update china bolster east china sea claim warns defensive measure	Update China's support for the claim of the East China Sea is a step in the right direction.	Update China's support for the claim of the East China Sea warns defensive action.	Update China supporting East China Sea claim warns defensive action.
14	fear grow clash japanese chinese ship plane patrol disputed	Japanese aircraft patrolling disputed ships grew in fear.	There was a growing fear of the Chinese aircraft being used to patrol the disputed ships.	Fear grew against Japanese Chinese patrol aircraft of disputed ships.
14	china explains handling flight tension escalate	The porcelain explains the increase of the voltage in flight.	The porcelain explains the apos; escalation of the tension in flight increases.	China explains that the apos; escalation of flight tension increases.
14	japanese flying china air defense zone defiant	Japanese flying into China defying the air-defense zone.	Flying in China, defying the air defense zone.	Japanese flying in defiance of the air defense zone in China.
14	china seek territory status air zone	China will be seeking the status of a free-swimming zone in the region.	China will seek the status of a free-swimming zone in the world.	China will seek free air status.
14	investor misprice political risk	Political riskiness is misjudged by the investor.	Political risk is miscalculated by the investor.	The political risk is misjudged by the investor.
14	military aircraft defies china defence zone fly disputed east	Military planes challenge the Chinese defense zone.	Military aircraft are now challenging the Chinese defence zone.	There are military aircraft challenging the Chinese defence zone.
14	diplomatic headway mideast problem pile east asia	Major Problem on the Diplomatic Way in East Asia.	A major problem in the diplomatic process in East Asia.	Major diplomatic problem in Asia of the East.
14	shinzo abe nationalism throwback japanese imperialism	Shinzo abe nationalism, they reject Japanese imperialism.	Shinzo abe nationalism reject the Japanese imperialism.	Shinzo abe nationalism reject Japanese imperialism.
14	china japan island dispute escalates	The conflict on l' China Island-Japan S&apos is intensifying.	The conflict on the island of China-Japan s&apos intensifies.	Conflict on island of China-Japan s&apos intensifies.
14	japanese pm chinese air defense zone unenforceable	Japanese pm Chinese Air Defence Zone inapplicable.	Japanese do not apply Chinese air defense zone.	Japanese pm Chinese air defense zone inapplicable.
14	china protest japan criticism airspace move	Protesting in China, Japanese critics have been saying that air space is moving.	Japanese criticism l' air space moves in China.	Chinese protest Japanese critics l' airspace moving.
14	bomber challenge china air defense zone	And the bomber is defying China's air defense zone.	Bombardier defies China's air defense zone.	The bomber defies the air defense zone of China.
14	bishop call chinese envoy	L' bishop is called l' sent Chinese.	L' bishop calls l' Chinese envoy.	L' bishop called l' envoy of the Chinese.
14	chinese blogger turn fire beijing amid challenge	In the middle of the challenge, the Chinese blogger sets Beijing on fire.	Chinese blogger sets fire to Beijing in the midst of the challenge.	Chinese blogger sets Beijing on fire amid defiance.
14	china air zone incensed japan	The Chinese aeration has angered Japan.	It's been a long time since China's invasion of China.	China's drought zone angered Japan.
14	australia summons chinese ambassador airspace announcement	L' L' L' L' L' L' L' L' L&apos.	L' Australia summons Chinese Ambassador to Apos; announcement of Apos; airspace.	Australia summons Chinese ambassador to Apos; announcement of apos; airspace.
14	monitored bomber flight airspace zone china	Bombardier overflew Chinese airspace.	A bomber has flown over the area of Chinese airspace.	A bomber flew over Chinese airspace.
14	test disputed china air zone flight	And the tests have challenged the flight into China's air zone.	The test flights challenged the flight into China's air zone.	The tests have disputed the China air zone flight.
14	china creates air defence zone japan controlled island	The porcelain will create an air defense zone on a Japanese-controlled island.	The porcelain creates an air defense zone on a Japanese-controlled island.	China creates an air defense zone on an island controlled by Japan.
14	fly bomber china expanded air defence zone	Bombers in China widened the air-defense zone.	And bombers in China have expanded the air defense zone.	Bombers in China have expanded air defense zone.
14	china defence zone increase tension	The tension is increased by the porcelain defense zone.	The porcelain defense zone increases the tension.	The porcelain defense zone will increase the tension.
14	china asserts control air zone despite bomber	Despite the bomber, China controls the air space.	China controls the air space, despite the bomber.	China controls the air zone despite the bomber.
14	update china airspace announcement inflammatory white house	Apos update; apos announcement; Chinese airspace White House incendiary.	Update of list; announcement of listings; Chinese airspace Incendiary White House.	Update; announcement of apos; Chinese airspace White House incendiary.
14	east china sea air defense identification zone source xinhuanet	It is located in the southern part of the island, in the southern part of the island.	Zone d' air defence identification of the East China Sea, source xinhuanet.	Zone d' East China Sea air defence identification source xinhuanet.
14	east china sea air defense identification zone	Eastern China Sea Air Defence Identification Zone.	Zone d' East China Sea air defence identification.	Zone d' air defence identification of East China Sea.
14	criticizes china zone vow defend japan	This is a critical area of China that wishes to defend Japan.	Critical Chinese zone has vowed to defend Japan.	Critical Chinese zone to defend Japan.
14	ana jal peach disregard china adiz	Adiz porcelain is not considered by Ana je peaches.	Ana Peaches does not consider adiz china.	Ana jal peach doesn't take into account adiz china.
14	fly warplane east china sea ignoring chinese air defense	Warplane from eastern China, unaware of Chinese air defence.	A warplane from the Apos; east of China, ignoring the Chinese air defense.	A warplane from China's east coast, ignoring China's air defense.
14	japan official low key flight	Japan is now officially on a low-level flight.	Japan's got an official low-level flight.	It's an official low-level flight.
14	china riles japan air defense zone	China laughs at Japan's air-defense zone, sir.	China's laughing at Japan's air defense zone.	Japan's air defense zone is China's air defense zone.
14	australia express concern china air defence zone	L' Australia expresses concern about China's air defence zone.	L' Australia expressed its concern about the air defence zone in China.	Australia expresses concern about the air defence zone in China.
14	japan protest china air defense zone	Japan is protesting against the Chinese air-defense zone.	Japan is protesting the Chinese air defense zone.	Japan is protesting China's air defense zone.
14	send defiant message china disputed island	Send a message that defies China's own disputed island.	Sending a message defying the disputed island of China.	To send a message defying the disputed island of China.
14	japan support china fly zone	Japan supports the Fly Zone of China.	Japan supports the fly-fishing zone of China.	Japan supports the fly zone of China.
14	north american air defense identification zone work	Zone d' North Air Defence Identification-U.S.	Zone d' identification of the air defence system.	Zone d' identification air defense north-U.S.
14	china allowed monitored flight testing fly zone	This was the first time that the aircraft had been able to fly in flight.	The porcelain allowed us to fly and test it in flight.	The porcelain allowed aircraft to fly during a flight test.
14	japan china tension soar air zone	There are also a number of small-scale projects in the region.	Chinese tension in Japan is soaring in the air zone.	Japanese tension in the air zone is soaring.
14	challenge china claim	This is a protest of the Chinese claim.	Challenging Chinese claim.	Chinese claim challenge.
14	china face island edict	The edict of the Supreme Court of the United States of America.	The decree of the island of China face to face.	The edict of l' China island face to face.
14	japan reject china claim airspace disputed island	Japan rejects the Chinese claim to the island's disputed airspace.	Japan is rejecting China's claim to the disputed island airspace.	Japan rejects China's claim to the disputed island airspace.
14	fly bomber challenging china air defence zone official	Bombardier challenges an officer in China's air defense zone.	Bomber challenges air defense zone officer in China.	A bomber challenges an air defence zone officer in China.
14	headline china tracked bomber zone	China has been following the bombers' zone.	In short, China has been following the bombers.	The headline is, China has been following the bomber zone.
14	china establishes air defense zone east china sea amid dispute japan	The United States, for its part, was the only country in the world to be able to do so.	China establishes an air defence zone in the east coast of the China Sea in the middle of a dispute in Japan.	China establishes an air defence zone in the east China Sea in the middle of a dispute in Japan.
14	notable quotable senkaku island dispute	L' Isle of Senkaku is a remarkable conflict which can be cited.	L' island of senkaku is a remarkable conflict that can be cited.	L' senkaku island is a remarkable conflict, which can be cited.
14	china air defense zone cool warming tie seoul	China's air-defense cooling zone is bonding with the city of Seoul.	China's cooling-warming air defense zone ties in with Seoul.	China's cooling-warming air defense zone ties into Seoul.
14	defying china bomber japanese plane fly air zone	Japanese aircraft are flying in defiance of Chinese bombers.	The Japanese are now flying in defiance of the Chinese bombers.	Defying Chinese bombers, Japanese planes fly in airplanes.
14	china mum plane flying air defense zone	It's an airplane with an army of guns.	L' aircraft; air force.	L' plane de l' armada de l&apos.
14	china monitored flew air zone	Area air; landing.	L' air in the landing zone; landing zone.	L' air of the zone d' landing.
14	tokyo reject china air claim	Tokyo has rejected China's air claim.	Tokyo rejects China's air claim.	Tokyo rejects air claim from China.
14	china slam inappropriate remark territorial dispute japan	Spoiler alert, japanese territorial conflict.	China kick, unseemly remark, japanese territorial conflict.	You know, china kick, misplaced remark, japanese territorial conflict.
14	china air zone raise regional risk analyst	In addition, there are a number of risk factors that can be used to assess risk.	The air of the porcelain d&apos zone increase regional risk analyst.	The area of the air of the porcelain d' increase the regional risk analyst risk.
14	bomber fly china defence zone	We have a bomber circling China's defense zone.	A bomber flies over China's defense zone.	There's a bomber over the defense zone of China.
14	beijing brinksmanship	Beijing brinkmanship strategy.	The Beijing brinkmanship.	This is the strategy of the Beijing brinkmanship.
14	japanese airline obey china air zone rule	The Japanese airline operates under the strict rules of the air zone in China.	The Japanese airline obeys China's air zone rule.	The Japanese airline obeys the air zone rule in China.
14	bomber fly china air zone boost japan	Bombers are flying in China's aerial zone, boosting Japan.	Bombers are flying in China's aerial zone to boost Japan.	Bombers fly in the air zone of China boosting Japan.
14	china medium air defence zone	China Middle Porcelain Air Defense Zone, sir.	Average China porcelain air defense zone.	China porcelain medium air defense zone.
14	china monitor bomber flying defense zone	China has eyes on the bomber in the defense zone.	China's monitoring the bomber in the defense zone.	China guarding bomber in defense zone.
14	south korea asserts control inside china air zone	In addition, South Korea is asserting control over the interior of China's air zone.	South Korea asserts its control to the interior of China's air zone.	South Korea asserts control inside China's air zone.
14	fact sheet china air defense zone	China Air Defence Zone Fact Sheet.	Aerial Defence Zone (ADZ) Fact Sheet.	Fact sheet on the air defense zone in China.
14	shinzo abe china air defence zone move dangerous	Shinzo abe china area of air defense to move dangerously.	Shinzo abe china air defense zone move dangerous.	Shinzo abe china air defense zone move dangerous.
14	pentagon slam chinese move change operates	The Chinese movement of the Pentagon is changing; the Chinese movement of the Pentagon is changing.	The Chinese movement of the s&apos pentagon changes.	Chinese movement change of the pentagon s&apos.
14	sino japanese tension rise china air rule	The Japanese Sino-tension has raised the rule of Chinese air.	The tension sino-Japanese raises the rule of l' Chinese air.	The tension sino @- Japanese-raises the rule of l' Chinese air.
14	china monitor bomber defense zone	China's monitoring the bomb-defense zone.	China guards the bombers' defense zone.	China is monitoring the bombers' defense zone now.
14	asian airline flight plan china airspace zone created	In addition, there are a number of airports in the region, such as the airport, the airport, and the airport.	The D&apos zone; Chinese airspace in the D&apos flight plan; an Asian airline has been established.	D&apos zone; Chinese flight plan airspace d' an Asian airline was created.
14	wrapup defying china bomber japanese plane fly	It's the first time I've ever seen a Japanese airplane fly.	Challenging the Chinese bomber, the Japanese plane flies.	Completed defying Chinese bomber, icos; Japanese plane flies.
14	japan pm china air defence zone move dangerous	Japan pm China dangerous air-defense zone.	Japan pm China's air defense zone move dangerously.	Japan pm China air defense zone move dangerous.
14	deeply concerned china air defense zone john kerry	Deeply concerned about the China Air Defence Zone, John Kerry.	Deeply concerned about China's John Kerry air defense zone.	Deeply concerned about the China air defense zone John Kerry.
14	update japanese airline china flight plan zone	Updating of the Japanese Chinese Airline Flight Plan Area.	Update of the Japanese Chinese airline flight plan zone.	Japanese airline's flight plan zone update.
14	china claim air disputed island creates risk incident	In the case of China, there is a risk of an accident.	China claims that the disputed island creates the risk of an incident.	China claims that the disputed island creates an incident risk.
14	defies china flying bomber disputed airspace	It's a challenge to the Chinese bombers, who are flying in and out of the disputed airspace.	Challenged Chinese bombers flying into the disputed airspace.	Defies Chinese bombers flying into disputed airspace.
14	update defying china aircraft fly east china sea notification	Update Challenging Porcelain Aircraft Flying in the East China Sea Notification.	Update defying porcelain airplanes flying in the East China Sea notification.	Update challenging porcelain aircraft to fly in the East China Sea, notification.
14	china japan relation deteriorate disputed island	China's relations with Japan are deteriorating the island, which is under attack.	Relations between China and Japan are deteriorating the disputed island.	The disputed island is deteriorating relations between China and Japan.
14	china downplays bomber flight disputed airspace	China minimizes the flying of bombers in the island, which is a disputed airspace.	The porcelain is designed to minimize the number of bomber flights in the disputed airspace.	China minimizes bomber flights in disputed airspace.
14	defies china fly zone flight	Defy the flight... of the swarm of Chinese flies.	So defy the flight of the Chinese Fly Zone.	Defy the fly-by-fly zone of China.
14	air defense zone affect flight freedom	The air-defense zone affects freedom of flight.	The air defense zone is affecting the freedom of flight.	The air defense zone affects flying freedom.
14	official flew china controversial air defense zone	Official in China, Controversial Air Defense Zone.	Official aircraft in China, controversial air defense zone.	Official in China, controversial air defense zone.
14	china reject australian concern air defence zone	China rejects Australia's preoccupation with the air defense zone.	China rejects the preoccupation of the Australian air defence zone.	China rejects the Australian concern air defence zone.
14	government call air zone threatens china relation	The government is calling the area a threat to the security of China.	The government calls the area d'apos; air threatens China.	The government calls the air zone a threat to China.
14	fly warplane newly claimed chinese airspace	It's been a long time since we've been able to get out of here.	Recently, combat aircraft claimed control of Chinese airspace.	Combat aircraft recently claimed Chinese airspace.
14	bomber fly china defence zone	We have a bomber circling China's defense zone.	A bomber flies over China's defense zone.	There's a bomber over the defense zone of China.
14	criticizes east china sea air defense zone	East China Sea Air Defence Zone is critical.	This is a critical attack on the East China Sea air defense zone.	Critical of air defense zone in the East China Sea.
14	china air defense zone country exercising	The Air Defence Zone Country in China s&apos.	The country of China's air defence zone (AZ) s&apos.	China's air defence zone country s&apos.
14	japan pivot counter chinese navy	Japan is the backbone of the Chinese navy.	It's like Japan versus the linchpin of the Chinese Navy.	The Chinese navy's pivot is Japan.
14	china monitored defiant bomber flight	China has been monitoring defiant bombers.	China has been monitoring the flight of defiant bombers.	China monitored the flight of defiant bombers.
14	japan call airline complying china air zone	This is the first time that the airline has been able to comply with the terms of the agreement.	Japanese call d' airline company conforming to the Chinese air zone.	Japanese caller, an airline complying with China's air zone.
14	japanese airline toe china zone safety question	Safety in the China service area of Japanese airlines.	The issue of safety in the China service area of Japanese airlines.	The issue of Japanese airline safety in the China service area.
14	china japan showdown cold war sky	China's race-Japan in the Cold War sky.	L' or China's event-Japan in the Cold War sky.	It's the Chinese test-Japan in the cold war sky.
14	china object sea defense zone remark	Note on the island's maritime defence zone; porcelain object.	Note on maritime defence zone of the island; porcelain object.	Note on the maritime defence zone of l' object in porcelain.
14	china air zone move expands field island spat japan	The movement of the area d' air of porcelain extends the spat field of the Japanese island.	The movement of the zone d' air of the porcelain extends the field of spat of l' island in Japan.	The movement of the porcelain air zone extends the spat field of the island in Japan.
14	china internet user call action japan airspace spat	"A user of the Internet in China is calling the Internet ""lapos""; action has lost it; airspace."	China's Internet user calls it l' japanese action has lost it; airspace.	An Internet user in China called l' action japan has lost the airspace.
14	sends mission challenge chinese claim	Mission dispatches disputing Chinese claim.	Sending a mission disputing the Chinese claim.	Sending a mission disputing the claim of China.
14	hostile aircraft shot adiz chinese general	A hostile plane has fired at the Chinese General Adiz.	Chinese General Adiz has been shot down by hostile aircraft.	A hostile aircraft has fired on Chinese General Adiz.
14	china air defense zone point long game	China Air Defence Zone no long game.	China's air defense zone, point long game.	China's air defense zone no long game at all.
14	talk follow asian island	Discussion follows the Asian island.	The discussions follow on from the Asian island.	The discussions follow the Asian island.
14	china public air defence zone	China Public Air Defence Zone.	This is China's public air defense zone.	China's public air defense zone.
14	express concern china set air defense zone east china sea	Expressing concerns in China has now established the East China Sea Air Defence Zone.	Expressing concerns in China established the East China Sea Air Defence Zone.	To express concern in China has established the air defence zone of the Sea of East China.
14	criticism escalates china airspace defense rule	It's not like that, but it's a good thing.	Critics are increasing the rules of defense for China's airspace.	Critics are increasing China's airspace defense rules.
14	japan protest china air defense zone	Japan is protesting against the Chinese air-defense zone.	Japan is protesting the Chinese air defense zone.	Japan is protesting China's air defense zone.
14	bomber defy china prompting fear retaliation	Bombers are defying porcelain and fearing reprisals.	The bombers defy the china and fear retribution.	Bombers defy porcelain and fear retaliation from the enemy.
14	japanese carrier adhere china adiz despite gov opposition	Despite the government's opposition, the Japanese carrier joined China.	The Japanese carrier joined China despite the government's opposition.	Japanese carrier joins China despite opposition from the government.
14	china lash interfering territorial dispute japan	The porcelain whip, which is impinging on the territorial conflict in Japan.	Porcelain whipping impinging on the territorial conflict in Japan.	The lash of porcelain encroaching on the territorial conflict in Japan.
14	china defiant declaration military zone despite concern	Despite the concerns, China's rebel statement's military zone.	The military zone of China's worry-free rebellion statement.	China's rebel declaration military zone despite concerns.
14	china monitor bomber flying disputed east china sea island	This is a porcelain bomber flying an island in the waters of the disputed East China Sea.	A porcelain bomber flying an island in the disputed East China Sea?	Porcelain bomber flying a disputed island in the East China Sea.
14	disputed china air zone	Contested porcelain aerial zone.	Porcelain aerial area disputed.	This is a china air zone we're arguing about.
14	china set air defence zone disputed east china sea	Eastern China Porcelain Air Defence Zone Contested.	Air defense zone in the porcelain of eastern China.	Air defense zone disputed in oriental China porcelain.
14	fly china air defense zone	China Air Defence Zone.	China's air defense zone.	This is an air defense zone of China.
14	criticizes china airspace claim vow defend japan	The Chinese government has taken a number of steps to protect the country's airspace.	The critics of the Chinese airspace claim the oath to defend Japan.	Critics of Chinese airspace claim an oath to defend Japan.
14	continue flight air defense zone claimed china	To continue the air defence of the area that is claimed to be the site of the war in China.	Continue the air defense of the claimed area in China.	Continue air defense of China's claimed area.
14	korea discus china air defense zone	Korea discus china air-defense zone.	Korea's air defense zone is the only one in the world.	Korea discus china air defense zone.
14	china japan inching closer war disputed islet	The United States, for its part, was the only country in the world to do so.	China and Japan are approaching apo; a war on disputed islands.	China and Japan are getting closer to home; a war on disputed islands.
14	japan pm call china air defence zone dangerous	Japan considers the air-defense zone in China to be dangerous.	Japan considers the air defense zone in China's airspace to be dangerous.	Japan views the air defence zone in China as dangerous.
14	china air defense zone target specific country expert	The air defence zone is made of porcelain, and the air defence zone is made up of porcelain and porcelain.	The air defense porcelain area targets the apoes expert from a specific country.	China's porcelain air defense zone is targeted by a specific country's experts.
14	china bolster east china sea claim warns defensive measure	China's support for the claim of the Sea of East China is a warning to the defensive measures.	China supports the claim of the East China Sea warns the defensive measure.	China supports the East China Sea claim warns defensive action.
14	airspace row china internet user call war japan	This is the first time in the history of the United States that the United States has been involved in the war.	L' Chinese netizen in row d' airspace calls for war on Japan.	Chinese netizen from the row d' airspace calls for war Japan.
14	japan govt suga japanese airline submit flight plan	Japan Govt Suga submits its flight plan.	Japanese airline Japan Govt Suga submits its flight plan.	The Japanese airline Japan Govt Suga submits the flight plan for the flight.
14	japan china defense zone unenforceable	Japanese Defense Zone inapplicable.	Zone of Japanese defense inapplicable.	Japanese defense zone inapplicable.
14	china establishes air defense zone	China is setting up an air-defense zone.	China is establishing an air defense zone.	An air defense zone is being established by China.
14	china air zone raise risk	China air is dangerous.	The air of porcelain is dangerous.	The china air is dangerous.
14	defying china bomber fly east china sea zone	Challenging the porcelain bombers in the porcelain maritime zone.	Challenging porcelain bombers in the maritime zone of porcelain.	Challenging porcelain bombers in the porcelain sea zone is a challenge.
14	china air defense zone point long game	China Air Defence Zone no long game.	China's air defense zone, point long game.	China's air defense zone no long game at all.
14	china ante conflict japan air defense zone	Pre-conflict China japan air-defense zone.	China ante conflict japan air-defense zone.	China ante conflict japan air defense zone.
14	tension rise china disputed island	Tension is building in China, which is a disputed island.	Tension builds in China, a disputed island.	Tension is building in the disputed island of China.
14	japan mull expanding air zone report	Japan Mull expansion of the Japan Mull airfield report.	Japan Mull expansion of aerial report area.	Japan Mull aerial zone expansion report.
14	china asserts control air zone despite flight	China claims to control the air space in spite of the flight.	China claims to be in control of the air space despite the flight.	China claims to control the air zone despite the flight.
14	japanese pm concerned china air defense zone china sea	The China Sea Air Defence Zone has been of interest to the Japanese.	And the Japanese have taken an interest in the China Sea Air Defence Zone.	The Japanese took an interest in the China Sea air defense zone.
14	china japan island row	Islands in China and Japan.	Rank d' islands in China and Japan.	It's in a row of islands in China and Japan.
14	bomber japan plane defy china fly zone	A Japanese bomber aircraft is challenging the porcelain flight zone.	A japanese bomber plane defies the porcelain flight zone.	Japanese bomber plane defies porcelain flight zone.
14	china bolster east china sea claim warns defensive measure	China's support for the claim of the Sea of East China is a warning to the defensive measures.	China supports the claim of the East China Sea warns the defensive measure.	China supports the East China Sea claim warns defensive action.
14	china set air defense zone east china sea	The porcelain has established an air defence zone at the eastern end of the China Sea.	China China has established an air defence zone in the eastern China Sea.	The china has established a zone of air defense in the eastern part of the China Sea.
14	chinese pilot patrol controversial air zone disputed senkaku diaoyu	China's pilot of the controversial zone air patrol has challenged senkaku diaoyu.	China's pilot of the controversial air patrol disputed senkaku diaoyu.	China's controversial air patrol pilot zone disputed senkaku diaoyu.
14	voice concern china claim airspace disputed island	It's about China claiming sovereignty over the world; it's about air space.	China's concern is claiming sovereignty; disputed airspace island.	It's about China claiming sovereignty; airspace disputed island.
14	china protest japan criticism air defence zone	China protests against Japan's criticism of the air-defense zone.	China objects to Japan's criticism of the air defense zone.	China protests against Japan's air defense zone criticism.
14	china air zone korea control ieodo seoul	China's air zone controls Korea.	The air zone of China controls Korea ieodo seoul.	China's air zone controls Korea ieodo seoul.
14	china threatens military action east china sea island	China China is threatening military action on the island of the East China Sea.	The porcelain threatens military action on the island of the East China Sea.	The china threatens military action on the island of the South China Sea.
14	japan china tension rise china declares air defense zone video	Japan china tension montée china declares video air defence zone.	Japan china tension rise china declares a zone of aerial defense video.	Japan china tension rise china declares air defense zone video.
14	fly china air defense zone	China Air Defence Zone.	China's air defense zone.	This is an air defense zone of China.
14	fly china air defense zone	China Air Defence Zone.	China's air defense zone.	This is an air defense zone of China.
14	bomber fly disputed china air defense zone	Bombers are flying over the disputed China Air Defence Zone.	Bombers flying over disputed China air defense zone.	Bombers flying over disputed air defense zone of China.
14	china creates air defense zone east china sea amid dispute japan	The porcelain creates an air-defense zone on the East China Sea in the middle of D' an argument in Japan.	China is creating an air defense zone on the East China Sea in the middle of a dispute in Japan.	The porcelain creates an air defense zone on the East China Sea in the middle of Japan.
14	defies china flight	Challenging the porcelain flight.	Defy porcelain flying.	Defy the china flight.
14	china restriction airspace disputed islet lead war	The limited airspace of China has challenged the lead-island war.	L' limited airspace of China disputed the war of the islets of lead.	China's limited airspace challenged the war over lead islands.
14	bomber cross china claimed air defense zone	Bomber Cross China claimed an air-defense zone.	Bomber Cross China has claimed an air defense zone.	Bomber cross China has claimed an air defense zone.
14	china regional aggression flight	A robbery in China.	A robbery; regional aggression in China.	Robbery, regional aggression in China.
14	china air defense zone game changer	Change of Play of Air Defence Zone in China.	Game change in the air defense zone in China.	Change of air defense zone game in China.
14	flouts china air zone rule	You have to defy the rules of China's air zone.	Defying the rules of the air zone of China.	Defying China's air zone rules.
14	china latest threat boost japan abe	This is the last known threat to Japan from the Chinese government.	Last threat to Japan in China.	The latest threat to Japan in China.
14	japan slam china destabilizing move east china sea airspace	Japan and China destabilize the East China Sea airspace.	Japan and China destabilize the airspace of the East China Sea.	Japan and China are destabilizing the airspace of the East China Sea.
14	china clash beijing adiz	Adiz porcelain conflict in Beijing.	China conflict in Beijing adiz.	This is a china clash in Beijing adiz.
14	analysis enforcing rule air zone stretch china air force navy	It's the first time in the history of the United States, it's the first time in the history of the United States.	Analysis of the causes; application of the rules of space; air zone; extension of the navy of space; army of space; air in China.	Analysis of the situation; application of airport rules; air zones; expansion of the island's navy; air force in China.
14	defies china flight disputed island	Dare to fly in the porcelain of the island.	Defies the flight of the island's porcelain, disputed island.	Defies the china flight of l' disputed island.
14	sends bomber air zone claimed china	It's sending bombers into the Chinese zone.	He's sending bombers into Chinese territory.	He's sending bombers into the Chinese zone now.
14	beijing furious julie bishop irresponsible remark	In Beijing, Julie Bishop, furious, irresponsible remark.	In Beijing Julie Bishop, furious and irresponsible remark.	In peking, julie bishop, furious and irresponsible remark.
14	china south korea plan build statue japan upset	The project of building a statue in China, in South Korea, has upset the people of Japan.	Plans to build a statue in China, in South Korea, has upset Japan.	The project to build a statue in South Korea has upset Japan.
14	japan rebuke china island dispute	It is the only country in the world that has the capacity to do so.	Japan rejects the conflict on the island of China.	Japan repudiates conflict over the island of China.
14	china navy break high sea special report	Chinese Navy Special Report on the High Seas.	Special report on the high seas by the Chinese Navy.	This is the Chinese Navy's special report on the high seas.
14	china declares air defense zone east china sea amid row	China declares an Eastern China Sea Air Defence Zone.	China declares an air defence zone in the East China Sea.	China declares an air defense zone at the eastern end of the China Sea.
14	deeply concerned kerry criticizes air defense zone china	Kerry criticizes China's air defense zone.	Kerry's critical of the air defense zone in China.	Kerry criticizes the air defense zone in China.
14	china expands defense zone include island claimed japan	China is expanding the area of defense, including the claimed island of Japan.	China widens the zone of defense, including the island claimed in Japan.	China expands defense zone, including the island claimed in Japan.
14	voice strong concern china east china sea tension	China's tension in the East China Sea is a cause for great concern.	It's a voice of great concern to the tension in China's East China Sea.	Strong voice of concern over tension in China's East China Sea.
14	japan call airline complying china air zone	This is the first time that the airline has been able to comply with the terms of the agreement.	Japanese call d' airline company conforming to the Chinese air zone.	Japanese caller, an airline complying with China's air zone.
14	china muted reaction flight adiz	China has taken down the adiz-reaction flight.	China's destroyed the adiz reaction flight.	The adiz reaction flight has been destroyed by China.
14	disputed island china air defence zone move anger japan	China's disputed air defense zone has angered Japan.	The disputed air defense zone on the island of China has angered Japan.	This is the first time in the history of the United States that an air defence zone has been in conflict with China.
14	china fire bishop	L' bishop of the Fires of China.	L' bishop of the bishopric of the fire of China.	L' bishop of the fire of China.
14	china air defence zone trigger protest japan	The protest in Japan is triggered by China's air defense zone.	China's air defense zone sets off a protest in Japan.	China's air defense zone sparked the protest in Japan.
14	ambassador kennedy chides china move create air zone	Ambassador Kennedy china china movement to create a zone of freedom and freedom.	Ambassador Kennedy china china movement create zone d' air.	Ambassador Kennedy china china movement create air zone d&apos.
14	japan reject china claim air island	Japan rejects China for an aerial island.	Japan rejects China's claim to an island in the air.	Japan rejects China's claim to an air island.
14	taiwan evasive cooperation japan china air defense zone	Taiwan Evasive Cooperation Japan China Air Defence Zone.	Taiwan Taiwan Taiwan evasive cooperation China Air Defense Zone Japan.	Taiwan evasive cooperation Japan air defense zone of China.
14	abe urge china withdraw air zone plan	China has its own action plan.	China's got a plan of action.	China's got a plan of action here.
14	china hit japan criticism air defence zone	China has hit Japan's critical air-defense zone.	And China has hit Japan's air defense zone critics.	China hit Japan's air defense zone critics.
14	reject chinese rule flying senkakus airspace	Rejecting China's rule of flying in and out of Sinkaku airspace.	Reject the Chinese rule of l' flying senkakus airspace.	Reject China's rule of flying senkakus airspace.
15	york knicks report card grading knicks loss blazer	The York Knicks reported on the scoring of Knicks losing blazer.	The York Knicks report on Knicks scoring losing blazer.	York Knicks report on Knicks losing blazer rating.
15	opening trade rumor sinking shump	Rumor has it that the opening up of trade is causing the ink to run out.	A rumor of the opening up of the trade that is pouring in.	A rumor of opening trade that flows the apos; ink.
15	knicks fall blazer losing skid hit	The Knicks fall down blazer, losing skid hit.	The Knicks fall blazer losing skid hit.	The knicks fall blazer losing skid hit.
15	york knicks doomed poor start loss portland trail blazer	York Knicks condemned poor beginning loss blazer blazer Portland trail blazer.	York Knicks condemned poor early loss blazer Portland trail blazer blazer.	York Knicks doomed poor early loss blazer Portland trail blazer blazer.
15	york knicks firing mike woodson solve biggest	Yeah, the York Knicks who saw Mike Woodson, they solved the biggest problem.	The York Knicks who saw Mike Woodson solved the biggest problem.	York Knicks firing Mike Woodson solves the biggest problem.
15	york knicks celebrate amar stoudemire scoring point	The Knicks of York are celebrating the goal of the game.	The York Knicks celebrate the goal point at the end of the game.	The Knicks celebrate the goal point of D' Amar Stoudemire.
15	knicks coach mike woodson lost locker room	Coach Mike Woodson lost his locker.	L' coach Mike Woodson has lost his dressing room.	L' coach Mike Woodson has lost his locker room.
15	knicks knack losing nba	Knack lose the NBA.	Knicks Knack lose the NBA.	The Knicks knack lost the NBA.
15	smith panicking remark irritates woodson	Woodson's irksome Smith Panic.	Smith Makes Woodson angry.	Smith Worry irritates Woodson.
15	amar stoudemire bemoans knicks woeful offense	Amar grieves with sorrowful trespasses.	Amar Stoudemire groans at sad trespasses.	Amar stoudemire moans at grievous trespasses.
15	mike woodson perception iman shumpert bullsh	Mike Woodson perception shumpert bullshit iman shumpert.	Mike Woodson perception iman shumpert bullshit.	Mike woodson perception iman shumpert bullshit.
15	carmelo anthony fun monkey turned gorilla	And Carmelo Anthony Fun Monkey became a gorilla.	Carmelo anthony monkey fun has become a gorilla.	Carmelo anthony fun monkey turned gorilla.
15	mike woodson early panic	Yeah, Mike Woodson started freaking out.	Mike Woodson started freaking out.	Mike woodson started freaking out.
15	double dribble york knicks soap opera main player	Double dribble knicks york knicks soap main soap opera main player.	Double dribble york knicks soap main soap opera player.	Double dribble york knicks soap main soap opera main player.
15	knicks raymond fe expected play clipper	The Knicks Raymond s' were waiting to play at Clipper.	The Knicks Raymond's were waiting to play Clipper.	Knicks Raymond were waiting to play Clipper.
15	iman shumpert claim trade rumor bothering	Iman Shumpert claims that commercial gossip is disturbing.	According to Shumpert, the commercial rumor is disturbing.	Iman Shumpert says that the rumor of the trade is disturbing him.
15	carmelo anthony york knicks season	Carmelo Anthony York Knicks season.	Carmelo Anthony york Knicks' season.	Carmelo Anthony york knicks season.
15	longer mike woodson loses ny knicks locker room good	Mike Woodson's lost his Knicks locker room.	Mike Woodson does lose his Knicks locker room, though.	Mike Woodson does lose his locker room at the Knicks.
15	pdx sport monday	Monday's Pdx Sport.	Pdx Sport Monday.	Pdx sport monday.
15	clipper knicks questionable blogger	Clipper knicks is a dubious blogger.	Clipper knicks blogger dubious.	Blogger Clipper knicks questionable blogger.
15	joking mike woodson punch panic smith	Mike Woodson strikes the forge of panic.	C' is a joke, Mike Woodson strikes the forge of panic.	C' is a joke, Mike Woodson strikes panic forge.
15	betting site smith state panic	I bet on the game site of the State of Apostles; Stranger, of the Apos; Equality, of the Apos; Equality and of the Apos; Equality of the sexes.	I bet on the apo game site; state of apo; foreign, apo; equality, apo; equality and apo; gender equality.	I'm betting on the game site of l' State of l' Stranger, l' Equality, l' Equality and Gender.
15	knicks rewind blame lack ball movement	Knicks rewind the ball's lack of motion.	Well, knicks rewind the blame for lack of ball movement.	Knicks rewind blame lack of ball movement.
15	ny knicks coach mike woodson lost locker room	Coach Mike Woodson lost his locker.	L' coach Mike Woodson lost his locker.	L' coach Mike Woodson has lost his locker room.
15	carmelo anthony amare stoudemire bicker fueling york	Carmelo Anthony has quarrelled inciting York.	Carmelo Anthony's got a quarrel stirring York.	And Carmelo Anthony has a quarrel stirring York.
15	york knicks amar stoudemire ready contribute	The knicks york amar stoudemire are ready to make a contribution.	Knicks york amar stoudemire ready to contribute.	The york knicks amar stoudemire ready to contribute.
15	knicks raymond fe grin bear	This is Knicks Raymond Fein Bear.	Knicks Raymond Fein Bear.	Knicks raymond fein bear.
15	york knicks searching winning formula	Well, York Knicks is looking for the winning formula.	York Knicks looking for the winning formula.	York knicks looking for the winning formula.
15	frustration mounting hapless knicks struggle continue	Continued accumulation of misfortune.	The accumulation of disease continues; misfortune continues.	Weaknesses continue to accumulate.
15	potential trade ny knicks forced	Forced trafficking and stabbing.	He's a potential drug trafficker with a history of forced stab wounds.	Potential trafficking and forced stabbing.
15	amar stoudemire frustrated york knicks	Amar Stoudemire frustrated, Knicks York.	Amar Stoudemire, frustrated Knicks York.	Amar Stoudemire frustrated knicks York.
15	stoudemire express frustration	Stoudemire expresses frustration.	The stoudemire expresses his frustration.	The stoudemire expresses frustration.
15	york knicks coach mike woodson panicking	Mike Woodson's Knicks York Coach freaking out.	The Knicks York Coach Mike Woodson freaking.	The knicks york coach mike woodson freaking out.
15	woodson furious suggestion dislike shumpert	Woodson's wild suggestion-- they hate shumpert.	Woodson furious suggestion hate the shumpert.	Woodson furious suggestion hate shumpert.
15	state york knicks boiled single stat	This is the first time I've heard of the Yorkshicks.	The yorkshicks of the state boiled to the very minute.	Yorkshicks d' state boiled to the minute.
15	amar stoudemire reveals york knicks ambition	Amar Stoudemire has revealed the apos; ambition of the York Knicks.	Amar Stoudemire reveals the apos, the ambition of York Knicks.	Amar Stoudemire reveals the apos; ambition of York Knicks.
15	mike woodson time knicks panic	It's Mike Woodson Time Knicks freaking out.	Mike Woodson Time Knicks freaking out.	Mike woodson time knicks is freaking out.
15	week knicks losing continues	This week's Knicks keep losing.	The Knicks of the week keep on losing.	Knicks of the week keep losing.
15	knicks coach mike woodson dump iman shumpert	Knicks coach Mike Woodson ditches in the middle of the night.	Well, the Knicks coach Mike Woodson ditches iman shumpert.	Knicks coach Mike Woodson ditches iman shumpert.
15	blazer beat knicks straight win	Blazer, beating Knicks straight, wins.	Blazer defeats Knicks straight to win.	Blazer beat Knicks straight to win.
15	amar stoudemire plenty left tank knicks	This was the first time that the enemy had been able to defeat the enemy.	Amar Stoudemire left many tanks to attack.	Amar Stoudemire left behind many tanks.
15	fe expects return clipper	You know, we're just waiting for the clipper to come back.	We're waiting for the clipper to come back.	We're waiting for the clipper to come.
15	melo future uncertain gotham	I don't know what to do about it.	Melo uncertain future gotham gotham.	Melo future uncertain gotham gotham.
15	carmelo anthony iman shumpert york knicks future	I'm looking forward to seeing you in the future.	Carmelo Anthony, iman shumpert york knicks future.	Carmelo Anthony iman shumpert york knicks future.
15	york knicks losing streak carmelo anthony frustration time high	York knicks losing high frustration streak carmelo anthony time.	York knicks losing streak carmelo anthony high-failure time.	York knicks losing streak carmelo anthony time high frustration.
15	daily jo	Everyday Jo.	Jo daily.	Uh, daily Jo.
15	mike woodson blame game skid lack defense	Mike Woodson blames Skid defenseless game.	Mike Woodson blames the game Skid for being defenseless.	Mike Woodson blames the game Skid defenseless.
15	mike woodson time panic knicks	Mike Woodson, panic attack time.	Mike Woodson, time for the panic attack.	Mike Woodson, time for the panic attack.
15	amar stoudemire struggling knicks watch monday night football	Amar Stoudemire Knicks, in trouble, will be watching football on Monday night.	Amar Stoudemire Knicks in trouble watching football Monday night.	Amar Stoudemire Knicks struggling watch football Monday night.
15	amar stoudemire hope hall famer knick	Amar Stoudmire Hope Hall fam Knick.	This is Amar Stoudemire, Hope Hall, starring Knick.	Amar Stoudemire Hope hall famer knick.
15	carmelo anthony amar stoudemire worry defense shot	Carmelo Anthony Amar Stoudemire has been shot.	Carmelo Anthony Amar Stoudemire worried defense shot.	Carmelo Anthony Amar Stoudemire worried defense shot.
15	carmelo anthony thanksgiving surprise boy girl club	Carmelo Anthony Thanksgiving surprise surprise Boy Boy Club.	Carmelo Anthony Thanksgiving surprise Boy Boy Club.	Carmelo Anthony Thanksgiving surprise boy boy club.
15	knicks shumpert secret surgery included trade proposal	Shumpert Knicks Secret Surgery included a proposal for an exchange.	The secret surgery Shumpert Knicks included a proposal for an exchange.	Shumpert Knicks secret surgery included a proposal from apos; exchange.
15	woody shumpert looked totally lost	Woody Shumpert had the air completely lost.	Woody Shumpert had the air completely lost.	Woody Shumpert had the air completely lost to him.
15	mike woodson iman shumpert	Mike Woodson im the shumpert.	Mike Woodson iman shumpert.	Mike woodson iman shumpert.
15	knicks grumble stay melo	Knicks grumbling remain mellow.	Knicks grumble keep quiet.	The knicks grumble are still melo.
15	woody lost locker room	Looks like Woody's lost his locker.	Woody's lost his locker.	Woody lost the locker room.
15	york knicks mike woodson claim lost locker room	The York Knicks, Mike Woodson, have claimed that they have lost a locker room.	The York Knicks, Mike Woodson, claim to have lost a locker room.	York Knicks, Mike Woodson, claim to have lost a locker room.
15	shumpert knicks starter struggle return relevance	Shumpert Knicks starts wrestling back relevance.	Shumpert Knicks starts wrestling back relevance.	Shumpert knicks starts wrestling back relevance.
15	carmelo anthony save hapless ny knicks	Carmelo Anthony saves poor little Knicks.	Carmelo Anthony saves from the unfortunate little Knicks.	Well, Carmelo Anthony saves unfortunate little Knicks.
15	iman shumpert shumpert imploding knicks	Iman Shumpert Shumpert implodes knicks.	I mean, Iman Shumpert Shumpert is imploding knicks.	Iman shumpert shumpert implodes knicks.
15	knicks injury poor defense blame slow start	The stab wounds hurt the poor, helpless defense blames the slow start.	The poor defender blames the slow start for the stab wounds.	Stab wounds poor defense blames slow start.
15	york knicks issue amar stoudemire	The York Knicks are the ones who emit it.	The York Knicks emit the apos; amar stoudemire.	York Knicks emit apos; amar stoudemire.
15	knicks mike woodson stay upbeat key trip loom	The Knicks are still optimistic.	The Knicks Mike Woodson remained optimistic.	And the Knicks Mike Woodson are still optimistic.
15	carmelo anthony carmelo anthony enjoying losing	Anthony Carmelo Anthony Anthony loves to lose.	Carmelo Anthony Carmelo Anthony likes to lose.	Well, Carmelo Anthony Carmelo Anthony loves to lose.
15	scouting report york knicks	York Knicks exploration report.	Report of the York Knicks Exploration.	Canadian Wildlife Service Occasional Paper Series no.
15	time panic york knicks brooklyn net	New York City Temporal Panic Knicks Brooklyn net Brooklyn net.	York Knicks Time Panic Brooklyn net Brooklyn net.	York Knicks time panic Brooklyn net Brooklyn net.
15	posting toasting facebook	Posted here toasting facebook.	Posted toasting Facebook.	Posted toasting facebook.
15	opening early panic	Opening doors of panic.	Open the gates of panic.	Open the panic doors.
15	mike woodson iman shumpert fine	Mike Woodson ima Shumpert fine.	Mike Woodson iman Shumpert thin thin.	Mike woodson iman shumpert fine fine.
15	knicks drop sixth straight falling portland	The Knicks crashed for the sixth time in a row in Portland.	Knicks take their sixth consecutive fall in Portland.	The Knicks took their sixth straight down in Portland.
15	carmelo anthony knicks continue downward spiral syracuse cny	Carmelo Anthony knicks will continue down the syracuse spiral cny.	Carmelo Anthony knicks continue down the spiral spiral syracuse cny.	Carmelo Anthony knicks continue downward spiral syracuse cny.
15	amar stoudemire knicks turn monday night football game	Saturday night, Amar Stoudemire Knicks shoot soccer match.	Amar Stoudemire Knicks shoot soccer game on Monday night.	Amar Stoudemire Knicks shoot Monday night football game.
15	york knicks time blow	The York Knicks have been blowing in time.	York Knicks are blowing through time.	The York Knicks blow through time.
15	woodson lost locker room	Looks like Woodson lost his locker.	Woodson lost his locker.	Woodson lost the locker room.
15	pre game knicks blazer	Before the game, blazers before the game.	Before the game, blazer blazers before the game.	Before the game is played, the blazer before the game.
15	york knicks leave melo stranded	The York Knicks have left Melo stranded.	York Knicks left Melo stranded in the woods.	York Knicks leave Melo stranded.
15	mike woodson call rumor dislike iman shumpert bull expletive	Mike Woodson talks about the rumor that we don't like chatty bulls in the first place.	Mike Woodson talked about a rumor that we don't like chatty bull.	Mike Woodson talks about the rumor that he doesn't like bull talkers.
16	net face game season	Face-@-@-net face season.	The season face-@-@-face net.	The season face-@-@ net face.
16	win net turning halftime nap time	Win half-nap time.	Earn half of the-nap time.	Win the nap half-time.
16	shorthanded net beat raptor climb place division	Short to the net, the climbing rapptor is short-handed.	The climbing raptor is short-handed.	Short to the net, climbing raptor is short-handed.
16	jason kidd rose strong kid	Jason Kidd raised a big kid.	Jason Kidd raised a strong child.	Jason kidd raised a tough kid.
16	mason plumlee jason kidd net playing time wide open	Mason plumlee Jason kidd clear open game time.	Mason plumlee Jason kidd net game time wide open.	Mason plumlee Jason kidd net game time wide open.
16	net lose	Net loss.	Net loss.	A net loss.
16	net beat raptor gifs	I can't believe you're doing this.	Gifs net battor raptor.	Gifs net raptor battor.
16	game thread detroit piston matinee action brooklyn net	This is the first game of the game, and it is the second game of the game.	String game strait piston morning d' net stock Brooklyn action.	Straight-to-the-moment piston game threads; Brooklyn net action stock.
16	despite strong game derozan lowry raptor lose net	Despite the game's strong derozan raptor Lowry lose net.	Despite the game strong derozan raptor Lowry lose net.	Despite the strong game derozan raptor Lowry lose net.
16	joe johnson joe johnson hit pointer score	Joe Johnson Joe Johnson scores the score.	Joe Johnson Joe Johnson, scoring the pointer.	And Joe Johnson Joe Johnson scores the pointer.
16	kevin garnett net struggle embarrassed	Kevin Garnett has been very embarrassed by the net wrestling.	Kevin Garnett got embarrassed by the net wrestling.	Kevin Garnett was embarrassed by net wrestling.
16	preview net raptor	Preview net raptor, please.	Preview net raptor.	You know, preview net raptor.
16	net snap early season woe	This is the first season of the season.	Net snap start of bad season early season.	Net snap early season woe season beginning of season.
16	net raptor preview	View d' before-net raptor.com.	View d' before-premier du raptor net.	View d' before-net raptor premiere.
16	nba viewing guide piston net kick light sunday	NBA Pumpon Net Kick Light Visualization Guide Sunday night.	NBA net kick light piston visualization guide Sunday night.	NBA visualization guide piston net kick light Sunday night.
16	brooklyn net win good win point	The Brooklyn net's getting a good win.	Brooklyn net gets a good win.	The brooklyn net will get a good point win.
16	appreciation bench	Appreciation.	Banc d' appreciation.	I would like to express my appreciation to you.
16	bondy story net	History of Internet bondage.	L&apos is the story of online bondage.	L' bondy story on the net.
16	piston net question answer netsdaily	Answers to questions and answers about piston nets on a daily basis.	Answers to questions on piston nets daily.	Answers to piston net questions daily.
16	net backup front center	Backback Front Center.	It's called the Net Backback Front Center.	Net backback front center.
16	net survive raptor late win	Well, I guess I'll just have to win later.	Net survive to win raptor late win.	Net survive raptor win late win.
16	brooklyn net toronto raptor video highlight recap	Brooklyn net toronto video raptor summary summarized video summary.	Brooklyn net toronto raptor video summary summary summary summary.	Brooklyn net toronto raptor video summary summary.
16	banged net head toronto hoping skid	Toronto hit the net's head, hoping to slip away.	And Toronto hit the head of the net hoping to slip.	Toronto banged the head of the net hoping to slip.
16	recap toronto brooklyn	Back to Toronto Brooklyn.	Go back to Toronto Brooklyn.	I want you to go back to Toronto Brooklyn.
16	paul pierce critical brooklyn net coach making adjustment	Paul Pierce criticizes Brooklyn Net Coach to make some adjustments.	Well, Paul Pierce criticizes Brooklyn net coach making adjustments.	Paul pierce criticizes Brooklyn net coach making adjustments.
16	nba roundup net hang rare win	Rare victory NBA rally NBA rally.	NBA rally hang net hang rare victory rally.	NBA gathering net hang rare victory.
16	brooklyn net toronto raptor live stream free watch nba online	NBA Online is a free online streaming service for the NBA.	Brooklyn net toronto raptor live stream free watch NBA online.	Brooklyn net toronto raptor live stream free watch NBA online.
16	toronto raptor brooklyn net	Toronto rack rack rack rack Brooklyn.	Toronto raptor filet brooklyn.	Toronto raptor brooklyn net.
16	kevin garnett embarrassed	Garnett was embarrassed.	Kevin garnet was embarrassed.	And Kevin Garnett was embarrassed.
16	nba piston hand net straight loss	Right-line loss of the NBA Piston Net.	This is a straight line loss of the NBA piston net.	Losing the NBA piston net in a straight line.
16	panic setting woeful net	Sewer panics.	Panic d' sewer.	D' d' sewers.
16	jason kidd backing net ownership despite rough start report	Jason kidd has been supporting the Net Property despite an approximate start-up ratio.	Jason kidd supports the concept of net ownership despite an approximate start-up ratio.	Jason kidd supports net ownership despite a boot ratio.
16	breaking wrong brooklyn net offense	By breaking up the bad network of apos; attack of Brooklyn, we broke the bad network of apos; attack.	By breaking the wrong network of apos; Brooklyn attack, we broke the wrong network of apos; attack.	By breaking the wrong network of apos; Brooklyn attack, we broke the wrong network.
16	andray blatche score start	Okay, Etray blatche score, start.	Etray blatche score start.	Etray blatche score start.
16	paul pierce jason kidd veiled shot brooklyn net	Paul Pierce Jason kidd Brooklyn net.	Paul Pierce Jason kidd veiled brooklyn net.	Paul Pierce Jason kidd veiled net from Brooklyn.
16	sunday night nba grade net woe third quarter continue	On Sunday evening, we will continue with the game of net ware ware.	Sunday evening, nba net ware third quarter continue.	Sunday evening, net ware third quarter continue nba net ware.
16	brooklyn net needed win toronto raptor	The Brooklyn net needed to win Toronto Raptor.	Well, the Brooklyn net needed to win toronto raptor.	Brooklyn net needed to win toronto raptor.
16	kevin garnett brooklyn net embarrassed	Kevin Garnett Brooklyn Net embarrassed.	Kevin Garnett Brooklyn Net embarrassed.	Kevin garnet brooklyn net embarrassed.
16	detroit piston brooklyn net pm	Hey, hey, hey, hey, hey.	Detroit piston net from Brooklyn pm pm.	Detroit, Brooklyn net pm pm.
16	lewenberg raptor face place net tsn	The face of Lewenberg's bird of prey places the tzn net.	The face of Lewenberg's Raptor places the tsn net.	Lewenberg's raptor's face puts a tsn net in place.
16	kidd unable clean sloppy net	The child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the child of the deceased; the child of the child of the deceased; the child of the deceased; the child of the child of the child of the deceased; the child of the child of the deceased; the child; the child of the child of the child of the deceased; the child; the child; the child of the child of the death; the death; the death; the child of the death; the child of the death; the death; the death; the child; the death; the child of the death	The child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; child of the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender; the offender;	A child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the same age; a child of the age; a child of the same age; a child of the age; a child of the age; a child of the age; a child of the age.
16	recap brooklyn detroit	Walk me through Brooklyn Detroit.	Give me a recap of Brooklyn Detroit.	Review brooklyn detroit.
16	paul pierce paul pierce score point win	Paul Pierce Paul Pierce scores a winning point.	Paul Pierce Paul Pierce scores a winning point.	Paul Pierce Paul Pierce scores a winning point on this one.
16	jason kidd report jason kidd supported ownership	Jason Kidd reports that Jason Kidd was a supporter of the property.	Jason kidd reported that Jason kidd supported the property.	Jason kidd reports that Jason kidd supported it.
16	net hold raptor game slide	Slide on the Raptor Netting game.	Slide on the net catch raptor game.	Slide on the raptor game of netting.
16	jason kidd rumor brooklyn net coach fired mikhail prokhorov blame	Jason kidd brooklyn net-coach rumor fired Mikhail Prokhorov.	Jason kidd rumor brooklyn net coach Mikhail Prokhorov blames.	Jason kidd rumor brooklyn net coach fired michael prokhorov blames.
16	kevin garnett net embarrassed team fails meet	L' Kevin Garnett's embarrassment failed.	Kevin Garnett's embarrassed team failed.	L' the embarrassed team of Kevin Garnett failed.
16	preview piston net	Preview the piston net, please.	Preview the piston net.	Okay, preview the piston net.
16	detroit piston designated closer fan maurice cheek	This is the closest plunger to a Maurice Cheek fan.	A piston gap designated as the closest Maurice cheek fan.	Straight piston designated closer fan Maurice cheek.
16	rodney stuckey piston drop net	This is Rodney Stuckey's dropable net with stuckey piston.	Rodney Stuckey's dropable stuckey piston net.	Rodney Stuckey stuckey piston drop net.
16	detroit piston gameday piston trouble brooklyn net reeling	Detroit pistons and game pistons are disrupting the Brooklyn net.	Disturbance of the Brooklyn net by Detroit pistons and game pistons.	Disturbance of the brooklyn net by Detroit pistons and game pistons.
16	latest toronto raptor news raptor hq	This is the latest edition of the new hq raptor.	Last toronto raptor of new hq raptor.	The latest toronto raptor of hq raptor.
16	net fall place division loss piston	We've got a loss-of-divisioniston in a net-fall position.	Dividing lossiston in the position of a net drop.	Division lossiston in net fall position.
16	net	Once you have before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before.	Once you're ready; one step ahead of you before you arrive; one step ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead ahead forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward forward	Once you're ready, you'll be able to see before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start, before you start.
16	raptor rapid recap raptor comeback net fall short	Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor.	Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Reback net fall shorts.	Raptor Raptor Raptor Raptor Reback net fall shorts.
16	piston brooklyn net	Piston netting brooklyn.	Piston net brooklyn.	You know, brooklyn piston net.
16	raptor late push beat net	Pump-clear late raptor.	Raptor tardy push beat net.	Late raptor push beat net.
16	jason kidd drama	It's Jason Kidd drama.	Uh, Jason Kidd drama.	Jason kidd drama.
16	detroit brooklyn piston sunday	Piston Detroit Brooklyn on Sunday.	Detroit Brooklyn piston on sunday.	Detroit brooklyn piston on Sunday.
16	net remain key player detroit	The Internet remains a key element in the work of the United Nations in the Straits of Crisis.	The net continues to be a key element in the action of the Straits of Straits.	The net remains a key element of the UN Straits Action Plan.
16	blatche net hold raptor	Raptor chatches tight hold.	Raptor blatches net hold.	Raptor's blatche net hold.
16	brooklyn net star kevin garnett admits player embarrassed	Brooklyn's online star, Kevin Garnett, admits that the gameplayer is embarrassed.	Brooklyn net star Kevin Garnett admits that the player is embarassed.	Brooklyn net star Kevin Garnett admits the player is embarrassed.
16	piston send net basement	Sending net under-ground.	Piston send net under-ground.	Please send net under-ground.
16	glamour net lose straight	The glamour net's going all the way down now.	Oh, the glamour net is going all the way down.	And the glamour net goes straight down.
16	despite late charge raptor lose net	Despite the late raptor charge lose net.	Despite the late charge raptor lose net.	Despite the late charge raptor lose net.
16	andray blatche andray blatche score point block	Etray blah-blah-blah-blah-blah-blah.	Etray blatches etray blatches block of dots.	Etray blatche etray blatche block of points.
16	paul pierce call struggling brooklyn net coaching staff	Paul Pierce calls the staff of d' supervision of the network of Brooklyn in difficulty.	Paul Pierce is calling staff from Brooklyn network in trouble.	Paul Pierce calls Brooklyn Transit staff in trouble.
16	detroit piston advantage struggling brooklyn net score	L&apos is the advantage of the Detroit piston over the Brooklyn scoreboard in trouble.	Detroit piston's advantage over Brooklyn's net score in trouble.	L' Detroit piston advantage over Brooklyn's net score in trouble.
16	brooklyn net key player piston	Brooklyn key player key player key piston piston net key piston key player piston.	Brooklyn key player key player piston key piston net key player piston key piston key player piston.	Brooklyn key player net key player piston piston of the key player piston.
16	brooklyn net detroit piston pick odds prediction	Probabilities of prediction are predicted in Brooklyn nettroit piston.	Brooklyn net additional predictive piston predictive probabilities.	Brooklyn net detroit piston prognostic probabilities.
16	brooklyn net coach jason kidd losing streak net player tuned video	L' Brooklyn coach, Jason kidd, loser streak player tuned video video video.	Brooklyn coach Jason kidd, streak net player tuned video video.	L' Brooklyn coach Jason kidd, losing streak net player tuned video video.
16	video kevin garnett hear criticism	Video, Kevin garnett, hears criticism.	Kevin garnett, video, reviews.	Kevin garnett, video feed, hears criticism.
16	piston net preview	Preview of the Piston Net.	Piston net preview, please.	Preview piston net.
16	net slip raptor	Slipping Raptor to the net.	Slide Raptor to the net.	Slide raptor in the net.
16	paul pierce brooklyn net making adjustment loss piston	It is not possible to make an adjustment for the loss of money.	Paul Pierce brooklyn net make piston loss adjustment; adjustment.	Paul Pierce brooklyn net make adjustment loss piston d' adjustment.
16	net raptor momentary relief salvation	"The momentary salute of the ""Raptor Net"" is a momentary relief."	The momentary salvation of the net raptor is a momentary relief.	The momentary salvation of net raptor is momentary relief.
16	piston net pm	Piston fillet pm.	I don't know.	Piston net pm.
16	net fall piston	Fall netting.	Piston d' fall netting.	Piston d' fall net.
16	piston net expensive team worst	C' is the most expensive of all piston netting equipment.	C' is the most expensive team in the piston net.	C' is the most expensive piston net team.
16	kidd bench starter losing skid hit	Start of a school child losing skating skate hit.	Starting bench child losing skate struck skate.	Junior bench start losing skate hit skate.
16	joe johnson andray blatche punch brooklyn	It's Joe Johnson and Ray Blatche hitting Brooklyn.	Joe Johnson and Ray Blatche hit Brooklyn.	Joe johnson and ray blatche hit brooklyn.
16	deron williams brook lopez ruled sunday	The verdict of Deron Williams brook lopez came on Sunday.	And Deron Williams brook lopez ruled on Sunday.	Deron williams brook lopez ruled on Sunday.
16	raptor pride beating loss net	Pride in loss-netting raptors.	Pride of the raptors beating the loss net.	Pride of raptors beating the loss net.
16	watch andray blatche ball basket syracuse cny	Look at Andray Blatche ball syracuse cart syracuse cny syracuse.	Look at Andray Blatche ball syracuse cny syracuse basket.	Look at Andray Blatche ball basket syracuse cny syracuse.
16	paul pierce call jason kidd net coaching staff	Paul Pierce calling Jason Kidd Net Coach Staff.	Paul Pierce calling Jason kidd net coach staff.	Paul Pierce calling Jason kidd net staff coach.
16	rodney stuckey score point detroit victory brooklyn	Rodney Stuckey scores a Detroit Victoire Brooklyn point.	Rodney Stuckey scored one point at Detroit Victoire Brooklyn.	Stuckey scored one point in Detroit Victoire Brooklyn.
16	garnett enters twilight career	Garnett will enter a quarry at dusk.	Garnett walks into a quarry in the twilight.	Garnett enters quarry at dusk.
16	jason kidd relieved reaction net win priceless	Jason kidd reacted in a way that made him feel a lot better.	Jason kidd relieved net reaction win priceless.	Jason kidd relieved reaction net gain priceless.
16	twilight kevin garnett career	Kevin Garnett's career, at dusk.	Kevin Garnett's career at dusk.	Kevin Garnett's twilight career.
16	piston send net straight loss place victory	The piston sends victory instead of the net's direct loss.	The piston sends victory instead of the direct loss of the net.	The piston throws victory instead of direct loss of net.
16	detroit brooklyn rodney stuckey drop point piston road win	Detroit Brooklyn Rodney Stuckey drop piston point road will win.	Detroit Brooklyn Rodney Stuckey drop point piston road will win it.	Detroit Brooklyn Rodney Stuckey drop point piston road wins.
16	net gain loss third quarter woe continues	Net Earnings Loss In the third quarter, there is still a lot of unhappiness.	This is the second consecutive quarter of the year.	Net gain loss In the third quarter, unhappiness persists.
16	morning shootaround nov	We're on a first-day morning tour.	Noval morning tour.	Nov. morning tour.
16	net avoid fourth quarter finally game skid win	Get rid of the fourth quarter-time and finally get rid of the game.	Net avoid the fourth quarter-time game finally win skid game.	Net avoid the fourth quarter-time finally game skid win.
16	atlantic division toronto raptor lose	The Toronto Raptor, of the Atlantic Division, was defeated.	The Atlantic Division's Toronto Raptor loses.	The Atlantic division's toronto raptor loses.
16	video elated relieved jason kidd celebrates net close win raptor	Relieved Jason kidd celebrates victory near net raptor.	Relieved video Jason kidd celebrates victory near net raptor.	Relieved video Jason kidd celebrates the net raptor victory.
16	net hold raptor snap game losing streak	The game of l&apos, the apotheosis of net raptor, is now losing speed.	The game of l' apotheosis of net raptor loses speed.	The game of l&apos, net raptor apotheose, is losing speed.
16	worse net	Once there are more, a set together together together together together together together together together together together together together together together.	Once there's more, a set together together together together together together together together together together together together together together together.	Once there are more; a set together together together together together together together together together together together together together together together.
16	jason kidd shot net starter loss paul pierce fire	Jason kidd fired at the net's start button, losing Paul Pierce Fire.	Jason Kidd shot at the net starter, losing Paul Pierce Fire.	Jason kidd pulled the net starter, losing Paul Pierce Fire.
16	net raptor	Net-hungry.	Raptor to the net.	Hey, net-hungry.
16	brooklyn net key player piston	Brooklyn key player key player key piston piston net key piston key player piston.	Brooklyn key player key player piston key piston net key player piston key piston key player piston.	Brooklyn key player net key player piston piston of the key player piston.
16	brooklyn net toronto raptor tuesday nba game preview	"L' avant-premiere of the game ""Toronto Raptor Toronto"" in Brooklyn on Tuesday in the NBA."	L' before-game premiere in Brooklyn's Toronto raptor on Tuesday in the NBA.	L' before-premiere of the game Toronto rapptor toronto Brooklyn Tuesday in the NBA.
16	good heel bad ugly knicks net	You got a good heel, you got a bad kick, you got a bad kick, you got a bad kick.	A good heel, a bad punch, a bad punch, a bad punch.	A good heel, a bad move, a bad move.
16	brooklyn net toronto raptor pm	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Brooklyn net toronto raptor pm.	Brooklyn net toronto raptor pm.
16	king kidd net jason	King Kidd neat Jason.	King kidd neat Jason.	Clean kidd king Jason.
16	net raptor williams lopez remain	The Williams lopez bird of prey stays in place.	The greedy Williams lopez stays put.	The rapacious Williams lopez will remain in place.
16	raptor catching underachieving net opportune time	Raptor catch-performance timely net.	Raptor catch under @-@performance timely net.	Raptor catch under @-@performance.net.
16	nba brooklyn toronto	Brooklyn, Toronto, NBA.	NBA Brooklyn toronto.	Uh, nba brooklyn toronto.
16	brooklyn net serious long term trouble	Net brooklyn severe long-term problems.	Deep brooklyn net long-term problems.	Well, brooklyn net serious long-term problems.
16	relieved jason kidd net win video	It's a great way to win a video game.	Saved Jason kidd net win video video win.	Relieved Jason kidd net win video video win.
16	stuckey sunday	Sunday stuckey.	Stuckey, Sunday.	Hey, Stuckey, Sunday.
16	paul pierce suggests jason kidd making coaching adjustment	Paul Pierce suggests that Jason Kidd s' adapts to the needs of training.	Paul Pierce suggests that Jason Kidd adapt to the training.	Paul Pierce suggests that Jason Kidd adapt to training.
16	report despite net struggle prokhorov kidd	It's not a big deal, it's a big deal.	Report despite the net fight prokhorov kidd fighting.	Report despite clear prokhorov kidd fight.
16	nba roundup net fizzle detroit	Roundup Net Fizzle Detroit, NBA.	The NBA Roundup Net Fizzle Detroit.	NBA Roundup net fizzle Detroit.
16	golden state warrior orleans pelican live	Orleans Pelican lives as a warrior.	The warrior d'apos, or Orleans Pelican lives.	The warrior d'apos; orleans Pelican lives.
16	joe johnson great individual effort net lose straight piston win	Joe Johnson great individual effort... lose right plunger.	Joe Johnson great individual effort net lose right piston win.	Joe Johnson great individual effort net lose piston straight win.
16	net lethargy spread boo lack vigor	Net lethargy spreads, Boo lacks vigor.	The net lethargy is spreading Boo lacks vigour.	Boo's net lethargy is spreading lack of vigor.
16	piston defeat slumping net	Folding plunger failure; slump.	Failure of plunger net that s' slump.	Poinon failure net descending.
16	net paul pierce swipe jason kidd coaching loss	Paul Pierce net-swipes Jason kidd, lost coach.	Paul Pierce net swipes Jason kidd, lost coach.	Paul pierce net swipes Jason kidd lost coach.
16	net beat raptor snap losing streak	Raptor batting victory, loss of momentum.	Raptor hit by the bat, loss of speed.	Batting raptor wins, losing speed.
16	brooklyn net losing streak win toronto raptor	The series of defeats of the Brooklyn net wins the game of Toronto Raptor.	The toronto raptor was won by the Brooklyn net series of defeats.	Brooklyn net losing streak wins the toronto raptor.
16	deron williams frustrated watching brooklyn net lose bench	Deron Williams was frustrated that the Brooklyn net had lost its bench.	Deron Williams has been frustrated to see the Brooklyn net lose its bench.	Deron Williams got frustrated watching the Brooklyn net lose its bench.
16	andray blatche score net beat raptor snap game slide	Andray Blatche scores net score beat raptor snap game slide.	Andray Blatche score net raptor snap game slide beat.	Andray Blatche score net beat raptor snap game slide.
16	piston net	Piston net.	Piston net!	Uh, piston net.
16	net delve deeper standing loss piston	The net is made of the same material as the net.	The net digs the permanent loss plunger deeper.	The net hollows out the permanent loss piston more deeply.
16	net drop straight game fall piston	Piston d' Fall of the Right Game Netfall.	Son d' fall of the net straight.	Piston d' fall straight game net fall.
16	net collapse toronto	Collapse of the Toronto net.	Collapse of the toronto net.	Toronto net collapse.
16	vote rooting brooklyn net lose	You root brooklyn root net lose.	Your root brooklyn net lose.	Yours root brooklyn net lose.
16	kevin garnett kevin garnett score point win	Kevin Garnett Kevin Garnett scores one point.	Kevin Garnett Kevin Garnett scores a point.	Kevin Garnett Kevin Garnett scores a point on this one.
16	blatche score net beat raptor	Blatche score-net score-net drummer raptor.	Blatche score net hitter raptor.	Blatche score net raptor drummer.
16	fundamental desperation toll net trouble mount	And the basic desperation is causing the disruption of the toll system to rise.	Basic desperation is causing the disruption of the toll system to mount.	Basic desperation drives up the toll disruption.
16	net claw raptor	Griff de filet rapacia rapacia.	Rapacious net claw.	Rapacious net claw.
16	brooklyn net rely youth	Young people are the backbone of the Brooklyn net.	The Brooklyn net is all about the young.	The Brooklyn net is young people.
16	kidd player lot easier	Easier kid.	You know, kid's a lot easier.	Kid's a lot easier to play with.
16	deron williams ankle sunday	Deron Williams has an ankle, Sunday.	Deron Williams got his ankle on Sunday.	Deron Williams has ankle Sunday.
16	brooklyn net lose straight	Brooklyn net's losing all right.	The Brooklyn net loses all right.	Now, the Brooklyn net is going straight down.
16	piston hand net straight loss	Loss in a straight line of the net.	Straight-line loss of the piston net.	Piston net straight line loss.
16	latest connecticut sport news associated press	This is the latest in Connecticut sports news, and it's all tied to the press.	Latest sports news from Connecticut associated with the press.	Connecticut's latest sports news associated with the press.
16	watch jason kidd react net finally winning game	Watching Jason kidd reacting online to the gameplay finally win the game.	Watch Jason kidd reacting online finally win the game.	Watching Jason kidd react on the net finally win the game.
16	net note third quarter troublesome	Third trimester clean bill of health is embarrassing.	Clean bill of the third trimester embarrassing.	Embarrassing third quarter clean bill of health.
16	net knicks stumble early defense	They're all on their way to the first line of defense.	They stumble on the first defense.	The net knicks fall on the first defense.
16	blatche score net beat raptor	Blatche score-net score-net drummer raptor.	Blatche score net hitter raptor.	Blatche score net raptor drummer.
16	star unfamiliar role pull familiar resu net beat raptor	The role of Unknown Star Pulled Result Familiar Network Raptor drummer.	The role of unknown star reset home network raptor drummer.	Unknown star role draw resoled familiar network raptor drummer.
16	piston net box	Piston netting box.	Piston net box.	This is a piston net box.
16	piston rodney stuckey front coach	Rodney Stuckey front-body trainer.	Lead trainer Rodney Stuckey.	Front piston trainer Rodney stuckey.
16	net struggling second half adjustment	L' adjusting the second half of the map; before-last half of the map; before-last half of the map; before-plan.	L' adjustment of the second half of the apos; before-last half of the apos; before-last half of the apos; rear-plan.	L' second half adjustment; before-last half of the map; before-last half of the map; rear-plan.
16	kevin garnett net embarrassed	Kevin toppet, he's so embarrassed.	Kevin neat garnett is embarrassed.	Kevin neat garnett embarrassed.
16	detroit piston bench score road victory net	This was the first time in the history of the game.	Detroit piston net score net road victory.	Detroit piston benchmarking net road victory score.
17	alec baldwin returning msnbc	Alec Baldwin going back msnbc.	Alec Baldwin returning msnbc.	Alec baldwin returning msnbc.
17	joan river defends alec baldwin string racial gay slur watch	Joan River is defending Alec Baldwin, an anti-gay/racial and anti-gay/racial.	River defends Alec Baldwin, an anti-racial homosexuality and anti-gay watch.	Joan River defends Alec Baldwin, an anti-racial homosexuality watch and anti-gay watch.
17	alec baldwin extreme gay killed	Alec Baldwin, homo killer extreme.	Alec Baldwin, extreme homosexual slain.	Alec Baldwin, extreme gay killer.
17	alec baldwin msnbc canceled anti gay slur scandal	Alec Baldwin canceled the anti-gay insult scandal.	Alec Baldwin msnbc canceled the gay-insult scandal.	Alec Baldwin msnbc canceled the scandal of anti-gay-insults.
17	alec baldwin reportedly fired msnbc	Alec Baldwin would have dismissed Ms.nbc.	Well, Alec Baldwin would have fired Ms.nbc.	Alec baldwin would have fired Ms.nbc.
17	joan river defends alec baldwin epithet imaginable	Joan River is defending a very imaginable Baldwin epithet.	Joan River defends a possible Baldwin epithet.	Joan River defends an imaginable Baldwin epithet.
17	alec baldwin talk msnbc sudden cancellation	Alec Baldwin speak msnbc msnbc.	Alec Baldwin will speak msnbc sudden cancellation.	Alec Baldwin talk msnbc sudden cancellation.
17	msnbc fire baldwin anti gay slur source	Msnbc, the late Baldwin, is the source of the anti-gay insult.	Msnbc's late Baldwin source of anti-gay slurs.	The late Baldwin source of apoes; anti gay insult.
17	alec baldwin reportedly msnbc	Alec Baldwin would be msnbc.	Alec Baldwin would have been msnbc.	Alec baldwin would have been msnbc.
17	msnbc cancel alec baldwin talk actor anti gay slur	Msnbc cancels alec Baldwin speaks anti-gay insult.	Msnbc cancels alec Baldwin talks anti-gay insult.	Msnbc canceled the alec Baldwin talk about anti-gay insult.
17	msnbc cancel alec baldwin anti gay outburst	She canceled Alec Baldwin's anti-gay-crisis.	Msnbc cancels Alec Baldwin and her anti-gay crisis.	Msnbc canceled the Alec Baldwin anti-@-@ gay crisis.
17	report msnbc fire alec baldwin	This is the report of the fire at alec Baldwin.	Report msnbc fire to alec baldwin.	Report msnbc fire alec Baldwin.
17	joan river defends alec baldwin msnbc firing launch slur filled	Joan River is defending alec Baldwin msnbc msnbc, a mud-filled launch butcher.	Joan River defends alec Baldwin msnbc launch butcher filled with mud.	Joan River defends alec baldwin msnbc butcher filled with mud.
17	outspoken liberal star replace alec baldwin msnbc	Liberal star-talk replaces Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Frankish liberal star-talk replaces Alec Baldwin msnbc.	The liberal star with the franc-talk replaces Alec Baldwin msnbc.
17	video joan river defends alec baldwin homophobic rant	Joan River defends Alec Baldwin's homophobic bragging.	Video Joan River defends Alec Baldwin homophobic bragging rights.	Video Joan River defends homophobic bragging Alec Baldwin.
17	msnbc fire alec baldwin report	Fire Alec Baldwin report.	Report msnbc Fire Alec Baldwin.	The report msnbc Fire Alec Baldwin.
17	msnbc cancel alec baldwin talker late	Msnbc canceled Alec Baldwin.	Msnbc cancels late Alec Baldwin.	Msnbc canceled the late Alec Baldwin.
17	nbc cancel late post alec baldwin gay remark	NBC voids the-post gay comment Alec Baldwin.	NBC canceled the gay post-post Alec Baldwin comment.	NBC cancels the gay comment post-post Alec Baldwin.
17	alex baldwin msnbc	It's Alex Baldwin msnbc.	Alex Baldwin msnbc.	Alex baldwin msnbc.
17	alec baldwin political cancelled	Alec Baldwin canceled politics.	Alec Baldwin politics cancelled.	Alec baldwin politics canceled.
17	alec baldwin late night talk axed	Late that evening, Alec Baldwin cut the discussion short.	Alec Baldwin cut the discussion short late in the evening.	Alec Baldwin late that evening cut short the discussion.
17	alec baldwin ease backlash gay slur	Alec Baldwin has made it easier for people to get hurt.	Alec Baldwin has been facilitating the backlash of the gay insult.	Alec Baldwin facilitated the backlash from the gay insult.
17	alec baldwin returning msnbc	Alec Baldwin going back msnbc.	Alec Baldwin returning msnbc.	Alec baldwin returning msnbc.
17	alec baldwin career msnbc fire angry actor gay slur diva	Alec Baldwin's career msnbc is a late, angry gay actor who insults diva diva.	Alec Baldwin career msnbc late actor angry gay insult diva diva.	Alec Baldwin career msnbc late angry gay actor diva insult.
17	alec baldwin stint msnbc ugly divorce	Alec Baldwin went through a terrible divorce, msnbc.	Alec Baldwin went through a terrible divorce msnbc.	Alec baldwin went through a terrible divorce msnbc.
17	alec baldwin axed	They fired Alec Baldwin.	Alec Baldwin's been fired.	Well, Alec Baldwin got fired.
17	alec baldwin late early	Late night Alec Baldwin.	Alec Baldwin, late this evening.	Alec baldwin late at night.
17	alec baldwin fundamentalist wing gay advocacy fau msnbc	Alec Baldwin fundamentalist gay wing, pleading fau msnbc fau msnbc.	Alec Baldwin fundamentalist gay wing pleading fau msnbc fau msnbc.	Baldwin fundamentalist gay wing pleads fau msnbc fau msnbc.
17	msnbc fire alec baldwin gay slur	Alec Baldwin's fire is a gay insult.	Msnbc, fire alec Baldwin insults gay.	Msnbc fire alec Baldwin gay insult.
17	alec baldwin msnbc cancellation martin bashir air	Alec Baldwin msnbc will cancel Martin bashir air.	Alec Baldwin msnbc Martin bashir air cancellation.	Alec Baldwin msnbc cancellation Martin bashir air.
17	msnbc pull plug alec baldwin late night talk	Msnbc get plug-in alec Baldwin talk late at night.	Msnbc pull plug alec Baldwin talk late into the night.	Msnbc pull plug alec Baldwin talk late at night.
17	alec baldwin late cancelled gay slur incident	Alec Baldwin later canceled the attack; the incident of the apos; insulted gay.	Alec late Baldwin canceled the apos incident; gay insult.	Alec Baldwin late cancelled the apos; incident of the apos; gay insult.
17	alec baldwin joan river corner	Alec Baldwin, by Joan River.	Alec Baldwin, on the corner of the Joan River.	Alec Baldwin, corner of the Joan River.
17	alec baldwin talk msnbc cancelled	Alec Baldwin talking canceled msnbc.	Alec Baldwin speak msnbc canceled.	Alec Baldwin talk msnbc canceled.
17	video msnbc reportedly fire alec baldwin paparazzo scuffle	Video msnbc would have fired atlec baldwin paparazzo paparazzo brawl.	Video msnbc would have shot alec baldwin paparazzo paparazzo brawl.	Video msnbc would've shot alec baldwin paparazzo paparazzo brawl.
17	alec baldwin msnbc officially	Officially Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Alec Baldwin msnbc officially.	Alec baldwin msnbc officially.
17	alec baldwin msnbc anti gay slur	Alec Baldwin insults msnbc anti-gay.	You know, Alec Baldwin msnbc anti-gay insults.	Alec Baldwin msnbc anti gay insults.
17	alec baldwin msnbc mutual parting	Mutual separation Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Alec Baldwin msnbc is a mutual separation.	Alec Baldwin msnbc mutual separation.
17	alec baldwin reportedly fired msnbc talk	Alec Baldwin would have used the language msnbc.	Alec Baldwin would have used the msnbc language instead.	Alec Baldwin reportedly used msnbc language.
17	joan river defends alec baldwin explicit rant	Joan River defending Alec Baldwin.	Joan River defends Alec Baldwin.	Well, Joan River defends Alec Baldwin.
17	alec baldwin fired msnbc	Alec Baldwin fires Msnbc.	Alec Baldwin fired Ms. Nrbc.	Alec baldwin fired Ms.nbc.
17	alex baldwin msnbc alleged homphobic slur	Alex Baldwin msnbc claimed that the homophobic mud was homophobic.	Alex Baldwin msnbc claimed homophobic mud.	Alex Baldwin msnbc alleged that homophobic mud was homophobic.
17	alec baldwin fired msnbc homophobic slur scandal	Alec Baldwin sent Msnbc back from the homophobic insult scandal. - What?	Alec Baldwin has dismissed Msnbc from the scandal of homophobic insults.	Alec Baldwin fired Msnbc from the homophobic insult scandal.
17	alec baldwin blame fundamentalist wing gay advocacy bit	Alec Baldwin blames the fundamentalist gay defense wing.	Alec Baldwin blames apos, the fundamentalist wing of the gay defense movement.	Alec Baldwin blames the fundamentalist wing of gay defense.
17	joan river defends alec baldwin barrage slur video	Joan River has defended alec Baldwin slur barrage video.	Joan River defends alec slur video Baldwin barrage slur.	Joan River defends alec Baldwin slur video barrage.
17	late alec baldwin canceled msnbc week	Alec Baldwin cancelled msnbc week.	Alec Baldwin canceled msnbc week.	Alec Baldwin canceled msnbc week today.
17	joan river defends alec baldwin relax fairy er	Joan River is defending Alec Baldwin, the world's relaxing fairy.	Joan River's defending Alec Baldwin, the relax fairy.	Joan River defends Alec Baldwin, the relax fairy.
17	alec baldwin boot msnbc	Alec Baldwin, boot msnbc, boot msnbc.	Alec Baldwin boot msnbc boot msnbc.	Alec baldwin boot msnbc boot.
17	msnbc fire alec baldwin anti gay slur	Fire Msnbc alec Baldwin insults anti-gay.	Msnbc fire alec Baldwin anti-gay insults.	Msnbc fire alec baldwin anti-gay insults.
17	joan river defends alec baldwin tirade	Joan River is defending Alec Baldwin's tirade.	Joan River defends Alec Baldwin's tirade. - Alec?	Joan River defends Alec Baldwin tirade.
17	msnbc alec baldwin late cancelled	Msnbc alec-Baldwin canceled late.	Msnbc alec Baldwin canceled late.	Msnbc alec baldwin canceled late.
17	alec baldwin msnbc	Baldwin msnbc.	Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Alec baldwin msnbc.
17	alec baldwin late cancelled	Baldwin canceled late.	Alec Baldwin canceled out late.	Alec Baldwin cancelled late.
17	msnbc alec baldwin experiment	Episode 2 is the best way to do this.	Experience msnbc atlec Baldwin.	Experience msnbc alec Baldwin.
17	alec baldwin axed msnbc homophobic slur rating slump	"Alec Baldwin dismissed Msnbc's ""homophobic insult."""	Alec Baldwin dismissed Msnbc's homophobic insult.	Alec Baldwin dismissed the homophobic insult to Msnbc.
17	duly alec baldwin situation escalated video	Alec Baldwin caused an escalation of the video.	The situation d' Alec Baldwin caused an escalation of the video.	The Alec Baldwin situation caused the video to escalate.
17	alec baldwin msnbc cancelled anti gay slur scandal	Alec Baldwin canceled the anti-gay insult scandal.	Alec Baldwin msnbc canceled the anti--gay insult scandal today.	Alec Baldwin msnbc cancelled the anti-gay insult scandal.
17	alec baldwin canceled late alec baldwin canned amid gay	Alec Baldwin canceled the last gay-canned Alec Baldwin.	Alec Baldwin just canceled the latest canned Alec Baldwin in the gay community.	Alec Baldwin canceled the last Alec Baldwin canned in the gay community.
17	alec baldwin speaks msnbc cancellation glaad responds	Alec Baldwin talking msnbc glaad cancel answers.	Alec Baldwin speaks msnbc glaad canceled reply.	Alec Baldwin speaks msnbc glaad cancellation answers.
17	alec baldwin tv host flamed	Alec Baldwin TV animator inflamed.	Alec Baldwin inflamed TV.	Alec Baldwin TV host flames.
17	alec baldwin reportedly fired msnbc alec baldwin	Alec Baldwin would have dismissed Ms. Alec Baldwin.	Apparently, Alec Baldwin has fired Ms. Alec Baldwin.	Apparently, Alec Baldwin fired Ms. Alec Baldwin.
17	alec baldwin fundamentalist gay advocate killed	Alec Baldwin, a gay militant, a fundamentalist, killed.	Alec Baldwin, fundamentalist gay activist, shot dead.	Alec Baldwin, fundamentalist gay activist, killed.
17	msnbc fired alec baldwin lady replace	Msnbc dismissed Alec Baldwin as her replacement.	Well, Msnbc fired Alec Baldwin to replace the lady.	Msnbc fired Alec Baldwin to replace the lady in the case.
17	msnbc cancel late night talk alec baldwin	Msnbc cancels late-night conversations with Alec Baldwin.	Msnbc cancels Alec Baldwin's nightly conversations.	Msnbc cancels the apos night conversations; Alec Baldwin.
17	fired alec baldwin msnbc	Alec Baldwin msnbc's been laid off.	Alec Baldwin msnbc has been terminated.	Alec Baldwin msnbc has been fired from his position.
17	alec baldwin fundamentalist gay sabotaged msnbc	Gay fundamentalist Alec Baldwin sabotaged msnbc.	Alec Baldwin fundamentalist gay sabotaged msnbc.	Alec Baldwin fundamentalist gay sabotaged msnbc.
17	totally fired alec baldwin blame fundamentalist gay advocate	Alec Baldwin, who's completely out of his mind, has accused of being a gay fundamentalist lawyer.	Alec Baldwin, who was completely out of his mind, blamed him for the fundamentalist gay lawyer.	Alec Baldwin, completely fired, accused l' fundamentalist gay lawyer.
17	alec baldwin fired msnbc	Alec Baldwin fires Msnbc.	Alec Baldwin fired Ms. Nrbc.	Alec baldwin fired Ms.nbc.
17	alec baldwin fired msnbc asks martin bashir	Alec Baldwin is asking for Martin Bashir Martin.	Alec Baldwin fired msnbc is asking Martin Bashir Martin.	Alec Baldwin fired msnbc asks Martin Bashir Martin.
17	alec baldwin msnbc gay slur fallout	Alec Baldwin, msnbc, gay insult, back in the game.	Alec baldwin, msnbc, gay insult, fall down.	Alec Baldwin, msnbc, gay insult, fall.
17	msnbc cancel alec baldwin late night talk	Msnbc has canceled Alec Baldwin to speak late this evening.	Msnbc canceled on Alec Baldwin to talk late at night.	Msnbc cancelled Alec Baldwin to talk late tonight.
17	alec baldwin msnbc talk permanently axed	Alec Baldwin msnbc msnbc msnbc msnbc msnbc msnbc msnbc msnbc msnbc msnbc.	Alec Baldwin msnbc definitely speak chopped.	Alec Baldwin msnbc definitely talk chopped.
17	alec baldwin side msnbc fall pretty	Alec Baldwin side msnbc would like to look pretty.	Alec Baldwin side msnbc fall pretty.	Alec Baldwin side msnbc fall pretty pretty.
17	alec baldwin blame gay activist killed	Alec Baldwin blames the death of a gay activist.	Alec Baldwin blames the apos; gay activist killed.	Alec Baldwin blames gay activist killed him.
17	tv channel cancel baldwin	Baldwin is cancelled by the TV station.	And the TV channel canceled Baldwin.	TV channel canceled Baldwin.
17	alec baldwin msnbc canceled wake homophobic slur	Alec Baldwin msnbc has canceled the anti-Semitic anti-Semitic insult.	Alec Baldwin msnbc canceled the apos; homophobic insult watch.	Alec Baldwin msnbc canceled the vigil homophobic insult.
17	alec baldwin quote officially losing msnbc	Alec Baldwin made official mention of the loss of msnbc.	Alec Baldwin officially mentions the loss of msnbc.	The loss of msnbc is officially cited by Alec Baldwin.
17	alec baldwin msnbc parting	Alec Baldwin msnbc, splitting up.	Alec Baldwin msnbc breaking up.	Alec baldwin msnbc splitting up.
17	alec baldwin blame gay activist pulled	Alec Baldwin blames the blogger, who is now retired as a gay activist.	Alec Baldwin blames it' retired gay activist.	Alec Baldwin blames the apos; gay activist pulled out.
17	alec baldwin attack msnbc firing keeping martin bashir air	Alec Baldwin attacks msnbc with Martin Bashir air.	Alec Baldwin attacks msnbc keeping Martin Bashir air.	Alec Baldwin attacks the msnbc shots by keeping Martin Bashir air.
17	third prize fired alec baldwin msnbc	Third prize was awarded to Alec Baldwin msnbc.	The third prize will go to Alec Baldwin msnbc.	The third prize went to Alec Baldwin msnbc.
17	alec baldwin msnbc canceled	Alec Baldwin canceled.	Alec Baldwin msnbc canceled.	Alec baldwin msnbc canceled.
17	angry rant bring alec baldwin msnbc	Anger is a constant source of anger for Baldwin Msnbc.	Anger rants to bring to Baldwin Msnbc.	Anger rants to bring alec baldwin msnbc.
17	joan river defends alec baldwin explicit rant	Joan River defending Alec Baldwin.	Joan River defends Alec Baldwin.	Well, Joan River defends Alec Baldwin.
17	timeline alec baldwin frenemies	Enemy Alec Baldwin timeline.	The enemy Alec Baldwin timeline.	The timeline Alec Baldwin enemies.
17	msnbc cancel alec baldwin	Msnbc cancels Alec Baldwin.	Msnbc cancels Alec Baldwin.	Msnbc will cancel Alec Baldwin.
17	baldwin axed gay slur	Baldwin has beheaded the apos; a gay insult.	Baldwin beheaded the apos; gay insults.	Baldwin beheaded the gay insult.
17	msnbc cancel baldwin paparazzo scuffle	She canceled paparazzi Baldwin's fight.	Msnbc's calling off paparazzi Baldwin's fight.	Uh, Msnbc canceled paparazzi Baldwin's fight.
17	alec baldwin msnbc parted	Alec Baldwin s&apos is separated.	Alec Baldwin msnbc s&apos is separated.	Alec Baldwin msnbc s' is separated.
17	alec baldwin talk scrapped	Baldwin ended his speech.	Alec Baldwin's ended his speech.	Well, Alec Baldwin ended his speech.
17	alec baldwin firing sitting joan river video	Alec Baldwin pulling the Joan River seated video.	Alec Baldwin shooting video of Joan River sitting.	Alec Baldwin shooting the video of a sitting Joan River.
17	alec baldwin fired msnbc	Alec Baldwin fires Msnbc.	Alec Baldwin fired Ms. Nrbc.	Alec baldwin fired Ms.nbc.
17	alec baldwin msnbc	Baldwin msnbc.	Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Alec baldwin msnbc.
17	alec baldwin answer question fired	Alec Baldwin just answered the firing question.	Alec Baldwin responded to the question fired.	Alec Baldwin answered the question fired.
17	alec baldwin msnbc mutual parting	Mutual separation Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Alec Baldwin msnbc is a mutual separation.	Alec Baldwin msnbc mutual separation.
17	alec baldwin msnbc	Baldwin msnbc.	Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Alec baldwin msnbc.
17	alec baldwin bid adieu msnbc	Alec Baldwin says goodbye to Msnbc.	Alec Baldwin said good-bye to Msnbc.	Well, Alec Baldwin said goodbye to Msnbc.
17	alec baldwin axed msnbc	Behead Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Alec Baldwin decapitated msnbc.	Alec baldwin beheaded msnbc.
17	alec baldwin msbnc talk late alec baldwin canceled wake	Alec Baldwin speech msbnc late at night alec Baldwin canceled the alarm clock.	Alec Baldwin address msbnc late alec Baldwin canceled the wake-up call.	Alec Baldwin speech msbnc late alec Baldwin canceled awakening.
17	msnbc fire alec baldwin cancel nypost report	Msnbc Fire Alec Baldwin canceled the report.	Msnbc Fire Alec Baldwin voids the nypost report.	Msnbc Fire Alec Baldwin canceled nypost report.
17	suspended alec baldwin returning msnbc air	Alec Baldwin hanging from the airplane returning.	Alec Baldwin hanging returning the apos; air msnbc.	Alec Baldwin suspended returning the apos; air msnbc.
17	msnbc cancel alec baldwin talk outburst	Msnbc cancels the statements of Alec Baldwin.	Msnbc overruled the comments of Alec Baldwin.	Msnbc denies the allegations made by Alec Baldwin.
17	alec baldwin late msnbc	Alec Baldwin late, msnbc.	Alec Baldwin late tonight msnbc.	Alec Baldwin late msnbc.
17	msnbc alec baldwin boot anti gay slur	Msnbc alec Baldwin boot anti-gay slur.	Msnbc alec Baldwin boot anti-gay slur.	Msnbc alec baldwin boot anti-gay slur.
17	late alec baldwin cancelled msnbc reportedly fired host	Last time, Alec Baldwin canceled msnbc.	Last Alec Baldwin canceled msnbc would have become host.	Last Alec Baldwin canceled msnbc would have gone host state.
17	tv late alec baldwin call	Last call, Alec Baldwin.	Last call to Alec Baldwin.	Last call to Alec Baldwin.
17	nbc cancel alec baldwin late actor homophobic outburst	NBC canceled the gay crisis of Alec Baldwin.	NBC canceled the homophobic Alec Baldwin Crisis.	NBC canceled the homophobic crisis at Alec Baldwin.
17	alec baldwin msnbc	Baldwin msnbc.	Alec Baldwin msnbc.	Alec baldwin msnbc.
17	alec baldwin alec baldwin axed	Alec Baldwin Alec Baldwin chopped.	Alec Baldwin Alec Baldwin chopped.	Alec baldwin alec baldwin chopped.
17	baldwin kaput msnbc	I don't know.	Baldwin kaput msnbc.	Oh, baldwin kaput msnbc.
18	currency union bad independent scotland uk minister	Bad Scottish Independent Monetary Union Uk Minister.	Bad Scottish Independent Monetary Union uk minister.	Scotland's currency union is a bad independent monetary union.
18	scottish independence salmond immigration vow	L' l' l' l' l' l' l' l&apos.	L' Scottish independence Salmond immigration vows.	L' Scottish independence salmond immigration vows; immigration.
18	snp minister risking destructive conflict english voter warns darling	Darling warns Minister Snp of a destructive conflict.	Minister Snp risks a destructive conflict with L' English voter warns Darling.	Minister snp risks destructive conflict L' English voter warns Darling.
18	scottish government reveal independence plan	The Scottish government has been a major force in the development of the Scottish economy.	The Scottish government unveiled their plan for independence.	Scottish government reveals plan dapos; independence.
18	peter jones salmond heed global view	Peter Jones Salmond takes into account the world viewpoint.	Peter Jones Salmond takes a global perspective into account.	Peter Jones Salmond takes a global perspective.
18	proposed scottish independence named	Proposition d' Scottish Independence Named.	Proposition d' and Scottish independence named.	Proposition d' named Scottish independence.
18	warning fall deaf ear salmond rehearses wishlist	Out of ears Salmond repeats his wish list.	Word of warning: deaf ears: Salmond repeats the wish list.	Warning: deaf ears: Salmond repeats his wish list.
18	white paper scottish business reaction	Reaction of Scottish companies to the proposal on white paper.	Scottish companies' response on white paper.	Scottish companies reacted on a white paper basis.
18	changing independence question	Changing the issue of l' independence.	We have to change the question of independence.	Change the independence issue.
18	independent scot hit year tax bombshell danny	It's been a long time since an independent tape hit the fiscal bomb of the year.	An independent scotch hit the fiscal bomb of the year of the Danny imposition.	An independent scot struck the tax-bomb in the year of Danny's imposition.
18	live scottish independence referendum plan unveiled alex salmond	The plan for the live referendum on the independence of Scotland revealed Alex Salmond.	The plan for a live referendum on Scotland's independence was unveiled by Scotland's Alex Salmond.	The Scottish independence live referendum plan revealed Alex Salmond.
18	scotland unveils legal argument independence	L' Scotland has revealed its legal independence.	L' Scotland declares legal independence.	Scotland unveils its legal independence.
18	reaction darling white paper work fiction	Reaction, reaction, reaction, reaction, reaction, reaction, reaction.	Reaction White Paper fiction of the reaction darling.	Reaction white book fiction of reaction darling.
18	scottish effort join eu common accord met resistance	Efforts are made; a coup d'apos; a coup d'apos; a coup d'apos; a concordat; and resistance.	A coup d'apos; a coup d'apos; a coup d'apos; un accord s' is met with resistance.	It is an effort that is met with resistance; a coup d'apos; a coup d'apos; a common agreement.
18	scottish independence white paper	Scottish independence.	White Paper on Portuguese; Scottish independence.	It's a white paper on l' Scottish independence.
18	scottish national party unveils plan independence	The Scottish National Party (SNP) unveiled its plan for independence.	The National Party of Scotland unveils its plans for the future independence of the country.	Scotland's National Party unveils its independence plan.
18	hard pressed highland parent wooed indy childcare pledge	A Highland relative seeking employment is committed to caring for him.	A parent from the Highlands looking for a job is committed to taking care of him.	A Highland parent seeking jobs is committed to taking care of him.
18	white paper round quote picture moment day	White book around to quote l' instant photo instant day.	The white book around to quote l' instant photo moment day.	The white paper around to quote l' instant photo snapshots.
18	scottish independence snp white paper unveiled	White Paper on l' Scottish Independence unveiled.	White Paper on the apos; Scottish independence unveiled.	White Paper on Scottish independence unveiled.
18	white paper rescue nationalist campaign	Nationalist White Book Rescue Campaign.	Nationalist campaign of white-book rescue.	A nationalist campaign in the form of a white book.
18	scotland picture rosy future	This is Scotland's bright future.	Scottish image bright future.	Scotland picture bright future.
18	independence cost scottish defense contractor	Independence is costly for the Scottish defence contractor.	It's expensive to be independent; it's a Scottish defense contractor.	The cost of independence to the Scottish defence contractor is high.
18	scottish independence alex salmond unveils scotland white paper	L' Scottish Independence Alex Salmond unveils the White Paper of l' Scotland.	L' Scottish independence Alex Salmond unveils the Apos; Scotland white paper.	Scottish independence Alex Salmond unveils the white paper of l'apos; Scotland.
18	alex salmond promise better fairer scotland unveils blueprint	It's the first time in the history of Scotland that we've heard of a plan for a better future.	Alex Salmond promises better justice, l' Scotland unveils its master plan.	Alex Salmond promises better justice, Scotland unveils its master plan.
18	key question independence white paper answered	Independence, to which the White Paper responded.	Key issue Independence, to which the White Paper responded.	Key question Independence answered in the White Paper.
18	scottish independence salmond hail scot prospect ahead white paper	L' Scottish independence, calls for a Scottish perspective on the White Paper.	Scottish independence calls for a Scottish perspective on the White Paper.	L' Scottish independence calls for a Scottish perspective on the white paper.
18	alex salmond vow win independence scotland blueprint unveiled	Alex Salmond promised independence, Scotland's plan unveiled.	Alex Salmond promised to win the independence, the plan of l' Scotland unveiled.	Alex Salmond has promised to win independence, Scotland unveiled plan.
18	scottish independence white paper political reaction	Scottish independence.	The Commission will continue its work in this area.	Political response to white paper on l' Scottish independence.
18	rocky road scottish nationalist	Just like Rocky Road.	What about Rocky Road?	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.
18	record view nationalist white paper bluster badly hea hy dose	View d' Nationalistic White Book Recording Giving Mildly Hea Hy Dose.	Vue d' recording of a nationalistic white book, blowing loudly hea hy dose.	View d' nationalist white book recording blows wickedly hea hy dose.
18	scottish gov launch independence blueprint focus economic growth	The Scottish government launched an independent project that focused on improving the quality of life in Scotland.	"The Scottish government launched the ""Independence"" project, which targets economic growth."	The Scottish government is launching an independent economic growth project.
18	pound debt snp	This is the pound of debt, snp snp.	Here's the pound of debt snp snp debt.	The pound of debt snp snp debt.
18	scotland set proposed independence day	It is a good idea to start a new relationship with Scotland.	L' Scotland one day proposed the independence.	L' Scotland proposed independence one day.
18	independence blueprint revealed	An independent project has been revealed.	An independence project has been revealed.	An independence project was revealed.
18	plan independent scotland answer	Planning the response of Scotland Independent response of Scotland.	It is also important to ensure that there are sufficient resources to meet these needs.	To plan the response of l' Scotland independent response of l' Scotland.
18	george kerevan snp game changing white paper	George Kerevan's snp game, changing the white book.	The George Kerevan snp game changing the white book.	George Kerevan's snp game changing white paper.
18	treasury unleashes tax attack scot await snp independence blueprint	The U.S. Treasury has been unleashing tax-induced attacks while it waits for the plan to come.	Treasury unleashes scotch tax attacks while waiting for the plan to come out.	The treasury unleashes the tax blitz while waiting for the plan to come.
18	snp strongest case independent scotland	L' Scotland Independent of the Most Powerful Case.	L' Scotland independent of the most powerful case.	L' Scotland independent of powerful case.
18	extra tax warning independence	Additional Independence in Respect of Tax Warnings.	Additional tax-related independence; tax warnings.	Additional independence regarding taxes; tax warnings.
18	scottish secretary warns sterling currency union work	The Scottish Secretary warned against monetary union.	The Scottish Secretary cautions against the work of monetary union.	Scottish Secretary warns against work on monetary union.
18	independence blueprint job	Independence outlines a work plan for independence.	L' independence will outline a work plan for independence.	L' independence outlines a work plan for independence.
18	scotland independent march referendum pass	The apo referendum; independence of the apo; Scotland goes through a referendum.	The referendum on l' independence of l' Scotland is through a referendum.	There is a referendum on the independence of Scotland.
18	special report scotland poised alex salmond blueprint independence	It is important to note that there are a number of issues that need to be taken into account.	The special report on Scotland confirmed the independence of the action plan; Alex Salmond.	Scotland's special report confirmed the independence of the Action Plan.
18	short view	Short view.	Short view.	Oh, short view.
18	scottish independence shared currency best uk	It's a good thing that you've got a lot of money.	Scottish independence has shared the best currency ukk.	Scottish independence shared the best currency.
18	excuse business engage independence white paper	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but this is a white paper.	Excuse the business engage l' White White Book independence.	Apologize business engages people; independence white paper.
18	scottish independence salmond thing people	Scottish independence.	The salmond de l' Scottish independence.	Le salmond de l' independence de l&apos.
18	insu scotland intelligence	I'm from the Scottish Secret Service.	Insu from Scottish secret service.	Scottish intelligence intel.
18	criticise independence paper skene call red letter day	Criticizing the apostles; independence is a paper-based process called red-letter day.	Criticize the paper independence call the day of red letter.	Criticize the apos; paper independence call red letter day.
18	sturgeon scotland future drive debate	The future of the Scottish sturgeon is the subject of much debate.	The future of the Scottish sturgeon fuels the debate.	The future of Scottish sturgeon fuels debate.
18	sterling union proposal confirmed	The proposal of the United States of America is confirmed.	The proposal of the union of the pound sterling is confirmed.	The pound union proposal is confirmed.
18	son nationalist campaigner stephen maxwell hail father vision	Stephen Maxwell, a nationalist activist son, salutes the father's vision.	Stephen Maxwell, son of a nationalist activist, salutes his father's vision.	Stephen Maxwell, son of a nationalist activist, salutes the vision of his father.
18	white paper preview snp key pledge scrap uk welfare reform fairer	White Paper preview key commitment to scrap metal uk reform of the good-be fair.	White Paper preview snp key commitment to scrap metal uk welfare reform-be fairer.	White Paper preview snp key commitment to scrap uk welfare reform-be fairer.
18	scottish independence pound plan job loss warning	It was also noted that there was a need for a more flexible labour market.	Scottish independence has warned against losing jobs.	Scotland's independence has been a warning against the loss of jobs.
18	uk liable scotland bank future crisis	The Future Crisis of Scotland's Responsible Banks-United Kingdom.	The future crisis of Scotland's responsible banks in the UK-United.	The future crisis of Scotland's UK banks-United.
18	man independent salmond depend english	The salmond is the most popular salmond in the world.	The independent salmond depends on the English language.	The independent salmond depends on English.
18	future scotland hand salmond	Future salmond Scottish hand.	Scottish hand future salmond.	And future salmond hand scotch.
18	alex salmond set plan scottish independence	Alex Salmond has laid out a blueprint for the Scottish Independence.	Alex Salmond has laid out a plan for Scottish independence.	Alex Salmond drew up a plan for independence in Scotland.
18	snp voter intention complacency undo union	L' l' l' l' l' l' l' l&apos.	L' intent of the apo; snp complacency voter; and the union.	L' the intention of the apos; the snp complacency voter and the union.
18	scottish independence salmond unveils white paper	The Salmond de l' Scottish Independence unveils its White Paper.	The salmond de l' independence from Scotland unveils its white paper.	The Scottish independence salmond de l&apos unveils its white paper.
18	scottish independence white paper key fact	Scottish Independence - White Paper is key.	Scottish Independence White Paper is key.	Key to Scotland's independence is the White Paper.
18	scottish independence wallace call honesty	L' Scotland's independence Wallace is called the Apos; honesty.	Scottish independence Wallace calls apos honesty.	Scotland's independence Wallace calls openness.
18	scottish independence white paper detail revealed	The details of the White Paper on Scottish Independence have been revealed.	The details of the White Paper on Scottish independence were revealed.	Details of the Scottish independence white paper have been revealed.
18	vote grab chance scottish independence	Seize the opportunity; Scottish independence.	Voting for opportunity Scotland independence.	Voting for opportunity; independence from Scotland.
18	scottish independence referendum year	The Year of the Referendum on Scotland; Scottish Independence.	Apos; year of referendum on Apos; Scottish independence.	L' year of the referendum on l' independence of Scotland.
18	battle drawn scotland unveils independent future	L' Scotland, stretched from the battlefield, reveals an independent future.	Scotland stretched from the battle reveals an independent future.	L' Scotland stretched from battle reveals independent future.
18	keeping pound queen dr scotland	Save the book Queen Dr. Scotland.	To keep the book Queen Dr. Scotland.	And keep the book, Queen Dr. Scotland.
18	white paper detail plan separate scotland	Detailed design on separate, white, Scottish separate paper.	Detailed plan on separate white paper, Scottish.	Separate Scottish white paper detailing.
18	scotland unveils plan operating independent country	This is the first of its kind in the world, and the first of its kind in Europe.	L' Scotland unveils an action plan for an independent country.	L' Scotland unveils action plan for an independent country.
18	ey scotland face uncertain energy future	It is important to remember that there is no such thing as an energy market.	Scotland's energy future is uncertain.	L' Scotland's energy future is uncertain.
18	pounding scotland white paper	It's the first time I've ever been to Scotland.	Beating the white paper of l' Scotland.	Beating white paper from l' Scotland.
18	independent scotland pound queen	Independent Queen of the Scottish Book.	Queen of the Scottish Independent Book.	Queen independent Scottish Book.
18	investment defence procurement independent scotland	Investment, Defence, Procurement, Independent Scotland.	Investment, defense, public procurement, independent Scotland.	Investment, defense, procurement, independent Scotland.
18	scotland unveil blueprint independence uk	L' Scotland unveils plans for independence.	Scotland unveils its Apos project; independence uk.	L' Scotland will unveil its blueprint for independence.
18	season ticket valid	Season ticket's valid.	Valid season ticket.	Uh, season ticket is valid.
18	quote scottish independence white paper reaction	Citation: the response of the White Paper on Scotland's independence.	Reaction of the white paper on l' Scottish independence.	Citation: white paper reaction on l' Scottish independence.
18	economy scot independence plan unveiled	The Plan of Action for Economic Independence has been unveiled.	The plan for economic independence has now been unveiled.	The economic independence plan was unveiled.
18	scotland moot move independence	The Scottish language, which is devoid of purpose, promotes independence.	L' Scottish does not promote independence.	The independence of Scotland is promoted.
18	scottish independence lamont scotland	Lamont Scottish Independence Scotland Scotland Scotland.	Scottish Independence Lamont Scotland Scotland.	Scottish independence Lamont Scotland Scotland.
18	independence white paper isle	L' Isle of L' Independence in White Paper.	L' Isle of L' independence in the white book.	Isle of L' independence in white paper.
18	scotland independence widnae work	L&apos @- @ custodians Scotland independence.	L' before-custodians of l' Scottish independence.	L' before-custodianship; independence Scotland.
18	independence white paper promise childcare change	It is important to remember that children are not the only ones to have access to the services they need.	The White Paper on independence promises a change of custody of children.	The independence white paper promises a change of custody for children.
18	happened scottish government white paper launch	The Scottish government's White Paper was launched.	It was the first time that the Scottish government had launched a White Paper.	He s' passed the launch of the Scottish government white paper.
18	oil chief fear vote tax rise	The head of the oil company is worried about a tax hike.	The oil chief said he was afraid of a tax hike.	The oil chief fears a tax hike.
18	precious feast white paper menu serving carte	Card-a-la-carte, white feast paper menu.	White Feast Paper menu serving à la carte.	White feast paper menu serving à la carte.
18	scottish independence alex salmond accused ducking big question	It's a good idea to have a little bit more of the same.	Scottish Independence Alex Salmond accused of dodging the big question?	Scottish independence Alex Salmond accused of dodging the big question.
18	alex salmond reveals scotland independence day march	Alex Salmond unveils Apos Day; Apos Independence; Scotland.	Alex Salmond unveils Apos Day; independence of Apos; Scotland.	Alex Salmond unveils the day of l' independence from Scotland.
18	history making battle scotland future	History sets the stage for the future of the Scottish fighter.	It's all about the future of the people of Scotland.	L'apos; history prepares l'apos; future of l'apos; Scots fighting.
18	white paper hea wellbeing social protection	White Paper on Good-Being and Social Protection.	White Paper on the good-being and social protection.	White Paper on @-@being and social protection.
18	scotland secretary raise possibility referendum defeat	The Secretary of the Scottish State spoke of a referendum defeat.	The Secretary of Apos; Scottish State talks about the possibility of defeat by referendum.	The secretary of the Scottish state talks about the possibility of defeat by referendum.
18	independent scotland currency	Scottish Mint, independent.	Scottish independent mint.	Scottish independent mint.
18	scotland europe	Scottish europe.	Europe, Scotland.	I mean, Scotland, Europe.
18	white paper international relation defence	International Defence Relations White Paper.	White Paper International Defence Relations.	A White Paper on international defence relations.
18	independent scotland pound salmond	Independent Scottish Book of Salmond.	Scottish independent book of salmond.	Scottish independent salmond book.
18	social medium change scotland vote	Scotland's Social Media Change Vote Scotland's Social Media Vote Scotland's Social Vote Scotland.	Social media change Scottish vote Scottish vote.	Social media change vote Scottish vote.
18	scotland maintain free education independence white paper suggests	It is important to remember that education is an important part of the social fabric of Scotland.	Scotland maintains the independence of schools; free education, as suggested in the White Paper.	Scotland maintains independence of schools; free education as suggested in the White Paper.
18	independence blueprint published	An independent draft has been published.	A project on independence has now been published.	A draft of independence was published.
18	scotland vote leave footing bill	The vote of the Council of Europe and of the Council of Europe.	The vote in Scotland leaves a trail.	Scotland's vote leaves a trail.
18	scotland lay blueprint independence britain	It is the capital of the region, and the capital of the region.	La Grande-Bretagne is the model of the independence of Scotland.	La Grande-Bretagne is the independence of Scotland.
18	white paper work fiction mp	White paper, fictional MP.	Paper white, fiction, MP.	Uh, white paper, fiction, MP.
18	snp claim vote force english share pound	Snp claims anglo force-saxonne part book.	Snp claims your strength anglo-sxonne part livre.	Snp claims to vote force anglo-saxonne part book.
18	scotland newspaper white paper	Scottish Newspaper, white paper, white paper.	Scottish white newspaper white paper.	Scottish white paper paper.
18	pm white paper pose huge set question answer	The White Paper asks a huge-response question.	The White Paper also asks a huge question-answer.	And the white paper asks a huge question:-answer.
18	scottish independence scotland independent march	Independence of Scotland: Independent walk of the Apos; Scotland.	Independence of the Apos; Scotland: Independent of the Apos.	Independence of the Apostles; Scotland: independence from the Apostles; Scotland.
18	audience plea tv debate programme	TV talk shows; public call.	TV talk show on l' public call.	Program of televised debate on l' public call.
18	independent scotland queen	Queen Elizabeth II of Scotland.	Queen independent of the Kingdom of Scotland.	Queen independent of Scotland.
18	scottish independence white paper today	White Paper on Scotland; Scottish Independence today.	White Paper on Scotland's independence; Scotland's independence today.	White Paper on Scotland's independence today.
18	snp set three overriding reason scotland independent era	It is not the time of the people, but the time of the people and the time of the people.	Snp identified three compelling reasons for apos; apogee era; Scottish independence.	Snp set three compelling reasons for the apogee era; Scottish independence.
18	scottish independence economy compare uk	L' economics d' Scottish independence, compares the UK-UK to UK-UK.	L' economics d' Scottish independence compares the UK to the UK.	L' economy d' independence Scotland compares the Kingdom-United to the Kingdom-United.
18	autonomy remove second mover advantage	L' autonomy, eliminates the second actor's advantage.	L' autonomy eliminates apos; advantage of the second actor.	L' autonomy eliminates the advantage of second actor.
18	scottish independence alex salmond standalone scotland retain	Scottish Independence Scottish Independent Alex Salmond to keep the apos; Scotland.	Scottish independence independent alex salmond Scottish independence to keep the apos; Scotland.	Scotland's independence Scotland's independent alex salmond to retain the status of Scotland.
18	decide salmond unveil historic document set blueprint	Decide that Salmond will unveil a management plan package historical document.	Decide that Salmond unveils historical document together management plan.	Decide that Salmond will unveil historic master plan package.
18	salmond pitch	Pitching salmers.	Salmond toss.	It's called salmond throwing.
18	currency union best interest	Monetary union.	The apo; the higher interest of the apo; monetary union.	L' superior interest of l' monetary union.
18	independence economic choice scotland	Economic Choice D' and Scottish Independence.	Economic choice in Scotland; independence.	Economic choice d' independence Scotland.
18	alex salmond promise pound white paper scottish independence	Alex Salmond has promised in the White Paper that Scotland will become independent.	Alex Salmond made a promise to the White Paper: Scottish independence.	Alex Salmond promised white paper l' Scottish independence.
18	scottish independence swinney warns funding cut vote	Swinney de l'apos; Scottish Independence cautions against reducing funding.	Swinney de l'apos; Scottish independence cautions against funding cuts.	Swinney de l'apos; Scottish independence warns against funding cuts.
18	scottish independent plan pound queen	Independent Scottish plan, impound queen.	I mean, an independent Scottish plan, the queen of the pound.	Scottish independent plan, queen of the pound.
18	scottish independence army revealed	Unveiled Scottish Independence Army.	The Scottish Independence Army revealed.	Scottish independence army revealed.
18	scotland generation opportunity	Scottish Generation Opportunities.	Scottish generational possibilities.	Scottish generation possibilities.
18	scottish independence uk relationship rich close	Uk Scottish independence rich and close relationship.	You know, Scottish independence uk relationship rich and close.	Scottish independence uk relationship rich and close.
18	white paper justice security affair	Security of Justice in White Papers.	L' affaire de la sécurité de la justice en blanc.	L' case of security of justice in white paper.
18	scottish independence better claim	It would be better to have the independence of Scotland in place.	Scottish independence would do better to be claimed.	Scotland's independence would be better claimed.
18	scotland government unveils rosy blueprint independence	The Scottish government unveiled an action plan for the development of independence.	The Scottish government unveiled an action plan for independence.	Scottish government unveils action plan for independence.
18	snp independence vision unveiled	It's a great place to get a feel for your life.	The vision of the apos; independence of the snp unveiled.	The snp vision unveiled.
18	white paper follow scotsman coverage	This White Paper follows the Scottish cover.	The White Paper follows the Scottish cover.	The white paper followed the Scottish cover.
18	alex salmond unveils blueprint independence	Alex Salmond will unveil the apos; independence of the management plan.	Alex Salmond unveils the plan's independence.	Alex Salmond unveils independence of the management plan.
18	alex salmond prepares snp biggest moment	Alex Salmond is about to make the biggest snp moment ever.	Alex Salmond is planning the biggest snp moment ever.	Alex Salmond prepares the biggest moment snp.
18	radical independence conference gather glasgow	The Conference on Lapos; Radical Independence brings Glasgow together.	The conference on l' radical independence brings Glasgow together.	The radical independence conference brings Glasgow together.
18	salmond blurry blueprint scotland future	L'Émile de l'Ecosse et l'Écosse.	The blurred salmond sketches the apos; future of Apos; Scotland.	The blurred salmond sketches the future of Scotland.
18	white paper independence change scotland	L' L' L' L' L' L' L' L&apos.	L' independence of the White Paper changes l' Scotland.	L' independence of the white paper changes l' Scotland.
18	independent scotland forge prosperity	Scotland creates prosperity.	L' the independence of Scotland creates prosperity.	It is also the home of many of the world's most important museums.
18	independent scot hit year tax bombshell	The indie tape has hit the tax-bomb of the apo last year.	Independent scotch hit Apos' fiscal bomb last year.	The independent scot hit the tax bomb of the apos last year.
18	scottish white paper view	View on Scottish paper.	View from Scottish white paper.	Scottish white paper view.
18	scotland brave	Ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec	The ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec ec	"For the purposes of this study, the term ""eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-ecoeco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco"
18	alex salmond love conflict win doubter	Alex Salmond likes a little conflict to get skeptical.	Alex Salmond likes conflicts win skeptical.	Alex Salmond likes conflict win skepticism.
18	salmond economy heart independence white paper	L' l' l' l' l' l' l' l' l' l&apos.	The independence of the heart, the white paper, the independence, the white paper.	L' Salvundian economy; apos; heart independence; white paper; independence; white paper.
18	scottish independence treasury claim tax rise	The Scottish Treasure of Independence is asking for an increase in taxes.	The treasury of the state; Scottish independence calls for an increase in taxes.	The Scottish independence treasury is asking for more tax dollars.
18	scottish government unveils vision independence	The Government of Scotland is now unveiling its vision of the future of independence.	The Scottish government unveils its vision of an independent government.	Scottish government unveils vision of independence.
18	independence death knell shipbuilding claim	Independence is the end of the demand for shipbuilding.	L' independence sounds the end of the demand for shipbuilding.	L'apos; independence sounded the death knell to the demand for shipbuilding.
18	currency heart white paper debate	Debate on the Core White Paper.	Debate on the White Paper of the European Monetary Union.	Debate on white paper of the heart of money.
18	carmichael independent scotland lose pound	Independent Scotland from Carmichael loses pounds.	L' Scotland, which is independent of Carmichael, is losing some of the pound.	L' Scotland, independent of Carmichael, loses pounds.
18	white paper cu ure community digital	White paper may be digitized in the community.	The white paper can also be digitized in the community.	And white paper can be digitized in the community.
18	scotland minister unveils independence blueprint	The Minister of the Interior and Kingdom of Scotland unveils the plan for the future of Scotland.	The Minister of Apos; Scotland unveils the Apos plan; independence.	The Minister of Apostles, Scotland unveils the independence plan.
18	scottish independence alistair carmichael issue complacency warning	Scottish Independence Alistair Carmichael issues a cautionary note of complacency.	Scottish Independence Alistair Carmichael issues a warning of complacency.	Scottish Independence Alistair Carmichael issues complacency warning.
18	scotland set blueprint independence	The management plan shall be drawn up in accordance with the provisions of the management plan.	L' Scotland has established the independence of the management plan.	Scotland established independence of management plan.
18	scotland citizenship passport plan outlined	Outline of the Scottish Citizenship Passport Plan.	The Scottish Citizenship Passport Plan is outlined.	Scottish citizenship passport plan outlined.
18	negotiation conflict	Bargaining dispute.	Negotiation dispute!	Uh, negotiation dispute.
18	ruling scottish national party independence day calendar	The Scottish National Party's Independence Day calendar; the Scottish National Party's independence.	The calendar of the Apos day; ruling Scottish National Party independence.	The calendar of the day of the apos; independence of the ruling Scottish national party.
18	scottish independence alex salmond vision	L' Scottish Independence Alex Salmond Vision.	L' independence Scotland alex salmond vision.	Scottish independence alex salmond vision.
18	free childcare benefit economy	L'economique de l'apos; allowance de garde d'apos; enfant gratuit.	Home economics, free child care allowance.	L' economy de l' allowance d' free child.
18	alex salmond softens hardline stance nato nuclear weapon	In addition, the United States and the United States are also taking steps to reduce the threat of nuclear weapons.	Alex Salmond has eased NATO's tough stance on nuclear weapons.	Alex Salmond softens NATO's hard nuclear weapons posture.
18	independent scotland pound queen salmond	Independent Scottish Queen of the Book, Queen Salmond.	Queen of the Scottish Independent Book, Queen Salmond.	Queen independent Scottish Book, Queen Salmond.
18	scottish government lay plan independence	The Scottish Government is planning for independence.	The Scottish government plans for independence.	The Scottish government plans for the independence of Scotland.
18	indyplan twitter reacted white paper	The Twitter user indyplan reacted to the white paper.	Well, the indyplan twitter reacted to the white paper.	The indyplan twitter reacted to white paper!
18	snp outline vision scottish independence	Vision sketches the apos; Scottish independence.	The vision outlines the Scottish Independence.	The vision sketches the independence of Scotland.
18	scottish independence white paper qa	Scottish independence.	White Paper on Portuguese; Scottish independence.	It's a white paper on l' Scottish independence.
18	government honest wallace	The Honest Government Wallace.	The honest government, Wallace.	Fair government Wallace.
18	number add standalone scotland	Numbers to be added; numbers to be added Self-contained Scots.	Number add l' Self-contained Scots.	Number to add l' number to self-contained Scots.
18	alex salmond heading row currency union alistair darling	Alex Salmond to Alistair Darling Monetary Union.	Alex Salmond to Alistair Darling Monetary Union.	Alex Salmond on his way to the U.S. currency union Alistair Darling.
18	scotland brave defence	Courageous defense of l&apos Scotland.	Brave defense of Scotland.	A brave defense of l' Scotland.
18	independent scotland pound qa	Scottish Independent Book qaa.	Independent Scottish Qaa.	Independent Scottish pound qaa.
18	scotland independence outlined white paper	Scotland has defined the main lines of the White Paper.	L' independence of Scotland has defined the main lines of the White Paper.	L' independence of l' Scotland defined the White Paper outline.
18	white paper environment energy resource	Energy Resources of L' White Paper Environment.	Energy resources of l' white paper environment.	Lapos energy resources; white paper environment.
18	scottish independence white paper clear defence	The White Paper on the Future of the European Union.	White Paper on Portuguese; Scottish independence, clear defence.	It's a white paper on l' Scottish independence, clear defense.
18	scotland change	Scottish twist.	It's a Scottish change.	Uh, Scottish change.
18	update battle drawn scotland unveils independent future	It's a great way to learn more about the history of Scotland.	The update has attracted the audience; Scotland unveils the independent future.	The update attracted l'apos; Scotland unveils l'apos; independent future.
18	snp unveils white paper outlining vision independent scotland	Snp unveils a white paper depicting an independent, Scottish vision.	Snp unveils a white paper depicting a vision for Scotland.	Snp unveils white paper outlining Scottish independent vision.
18	brian wilson substance snp white paper	White paper snp substance Brian Wilson.	Brian Wilson substance snp white white paper.	Brian Wilson substance snp white paper white.
18	nicola sturgeon unveiling white paper	L'apos; esturgeon nicola unveils its white paper.	L' sturgeon nicola reveals its white paper.	L' nicola sturgeon reveals white paper.
18	analysis dr eu priority independent scotland	Priority Analysis Independent Scotland.	Analysis Priority independent Scotland.	Analysis Give priority to independent Scotland.
18	alex salmond promise independent scotland pound	Alex Salmond promises an independent, Scottish book.	Well, Alex Salmond promises an independent Scottish book.	Alex Salmond promises Scottish independent books.
18	critic accuse snp wilfully ignoring uncertainty scottish independence	Criticism snobbishly accuses people; deliberately ignore apos; uncertainty; Scottish independence.	The criticism snobbishly accuses people; deliberately ignoring ignorance; uncertainty; Scottish independence.	Criticism blames Scotland's independence for deliberately ignoring it.
18	alex salmond reveals white paper independent scotland	Alex Salmond reveals the existence of a Scottish company; an independent Scotland on white paper.	Alex Salmond reveals the existence of apos; an independent Scotland on white paper.	Alex Salmond reveals apos, apos, an independent Scotland on white paper.
18	scotland plan public service broadcaster	The Plan of Action; Scotland of Apostles; Scotland of Apostles; Scotland of Apostles; Scotland of Apostles; Scotland of Apostles; Public Service Broadcasting of Apostles; State of Apostles; Scotland of Apostles; State of Apostles; Scotland of Apos Television; Scotland of Apos State; Scotland of Apos State; Scotland.	The Plan of Apostles; Scotland; Scotland; Plan of Apostles; Scotland; Public service broadcasting service of public service television of Apostles; State of Apostles; Scotland; State of Apostles; State of Apostles; Scotland; State of Apostles; State of Apostles; Scotland.	Apostle's Plan; Apostle's Scotland Plan; Apostle's Scotland Plan; Apostle's public service broadcaster service, Scotland; Apostle's State; Apostle's Scotland; Apostle's State; Apostle's State; Apostle's Television, Scotland; Apostle's State; Scotland.
18	scottish independence currency debate heat	Scottish independence.	Discussion on the currency of l' Scottish independence.	The debate on the currency of the European currency; independence of Scotland.
18	scotland	Scotland.	It's Scotland.	This is Scotland.
18	government reject mp call prepare scottish independence	The government rejects the preparation MP appeal; Scottish independence.	The government rejects MP's call to prepare and prepare for Scotland's independence.	The government rejects MP call to prepare for independence in Scotland.
18	happened minister question	The Minister has occasionally asked a question.	There have been times when the minister might ask a question.	The minister has asked a question.
18	salmond scotland future scotland hand	Scottish Hand of the Future Scottish Salmond.	Scottish hand of the future Scottish salmond?	Scottish hand of future Scottish salmond.
18	scottish independence bbc replaced broadcaster	The independent Scottish BBC has now replaced the broadcaster.	The Scottish independent BBC replaced the broadcaster.	The BBC has replaced the broadcaster with the BBC.
18	real danger scottish independence cabinet minister	It's a real danger, isn't it, the Scottish Minister of the Interior?	Scottish Minister of Apostles is a real danger.	A real danger, Scotland's independence minister.
18	scotland independence plan position stren government	The Plan d' Scottish Independence Position to Strengthen Government.	Plan d'apos; independence Scotland position to strengthen government.	Scotland's independence plan positions Scotland to strengthen government.
18	scottish independence darling salmond referendum plan	The Plan for a Referendum on Scottish Independence.	This is the plan for a referendum on Scottish independence.	The referendum plan on l'apos; independence from Scotland.
18	scotland independent nation march nationalist win	The victory will be won by the Nationalist Scottish Independent Nation march.	The march of the independent Scottish nation of nationalism will win.	The nationalist Scottish independent nation march will win.
18	sketch alex salmond pound drum	It's the only way you're going to be able to do it.	Sketch Alex salmond pound drum.	Alex salmond pound drum sketch.
18	independent scotland currency	Scottish Mint, independent.	Scottish independent mint.	Scottish independent mint.
18	seek independence change	It's a good idea to look for a change of heart.	Looking for a change in independence.	To seek a change of place; independence.
18	walk uk walk pound salmond warned	March Uk march Salmond delivered warned.	March Uk march delivers Salmond warned.	March Uk marching Salmond's book.
18	scotland selects independence day	L' Scotland chooses the Day of Initiation; independence.	L' Scotland chooses the day of the apostles; independence.	L' Scotland chooses the independence day.
18	scotland roll mission statement independence	It's a very important thing to do.	Apos mission statement; Apos independence; Scotland.	Mission statement d' independence of Spain; Scotland.
18	scotland nationalist set independence vision	The Scottish nationalists have established a vision of the apos; independence.	Scottish nationalists have established a vision of independence.	Scottish nationalists have set out a vision of an independent state.
18	scottish independence swinney salmond referendum plan	L' Scottish Independence, the Salmond Referendum Plan.	L' Scottish independence, the plan for the referendum in Salmond.	L' Scottish independence, referendum plan of Salmond.
18	ten oil executive predict tax rise independent scotland	In addition, there are a number of oil and gas companies that are planning to invest in oil and gas.	Ten oil executives predict an increase in independent Scotland taxes.	Ten oil executives predict tax hikes for independent Scotland.
18	white paper finance economy	This White Paper finances l' economy.	The White Paper finances the economy.	The White Paper is the first of its kind in the world.
18	white paper scottish independence released	Liberation of the apos; Scottish White Paper independence.	Liberation of l' Scottish independence from the White Paper.	Freeing of the apos; Scottish independence from the white paper.
18	scottish independence white paper pension pledge	White Paper on l' Scottish Independence, White Paper Pension Promise.	White Paper on l' Scottish independence, promise of a pension in white paper.	White Paper on l' independence in Scotland, pension promise in white paper.
18	scotland unveils legal argument independence	L' Scotland has revealed its legal independence.	L' Scotland declares legal independence.	Scotland unveils its legal independence.
18	proposed scottish independence named	Proposition d' Scottish Independence Named.	Proposition d' and Scottish independence named.	Proposition d' named Scottish independence.
18	scottish independence business owner weigh pro con	An independent Scottish company weighs the pros and cons.	The owner of Apos, an independent Scottish company, weighs the costs and benefits.	The owner of Apos, an independent Scottish company, weighs in.
18	scottish expat uae	Uaeuae Scottish export.	Exportation from Scotland uae uae.	Scottish export uae uae.
18	thing scotland independence plan	It's a place where you can get the most out of your life.	A plan for the independence of the apos; Scotland.	A plan for independence of Scotland.
18	snp document drive debate	Snp has been documenting the engine debate.	Snp documents the engine debate.	Snp documents the debate about engines.
18	scottish govt publish blueprint independence	The Scottish government publishes a plan for independence.	The Scottish government published a Plan d'apos; independence.	The Government of Scotland has published a plan for the future of the country.
18	scottish independence snp announces breakaway	It's the first time I've heard of a breakout.	The snp de l'apos; Scottish independence heralds an escape.	The snp de l'apos; Scottish independence announces an escape.
18	scottish independence alex salmond machinery british state	Alex Salmond Machine Scottish Independence British state.	Scottish Independence Alex Salmond Machine The British state.	Scotland's Independence Alex Salmond Machine, British government.
18	darling salmond living fantasy land	Dear Salmond lives in an imaginary world.	Well, dear Salmond lives in a fantasy world.	Dear salmond lives in a fantasy world.
18	leader snp throw gauntlet better	Chef throws gauntlet better.	The Chief throws the gauntlet better.	Chef throws the gauntlet better than you do.
18	eddie barnes white paper sway voter	Eddie Barnes, a voter on white paper, puts pressure on voters.	Eddie Barnes, a white paper voter, has been lobbying voters.	Eddie Barnes, a white paper voter, lobbies voters.
18	snp minister fail check state pension payment plan	The Minister is responsible for the administration of the pension program.	The Minister fails to verify the state pension payment plan.	Minister failed to verify state pension payment plan.
18	salmond vow bbc pound blueprint scottish independence	He would swear to the Scottish Scottish independence.	Salmond would swear to the fullness of Scotland's independence.	Salmond would swear bbc book plan d'apos; Scottish independence.
18	white paper hold surprise scotland farmer	White paper surprises Scottish farmer.	This white paper surprises the Scottish farmer.	The white paper surprises Scottish farmer.
18	scotland set timetable trident removal	Scotland has established a schedule for tridentate removal.	Scotland has established a schedule for the removal of tridentates.	L' Scotland has set up a schedule for the removal of tridentate.
18	scottish independence snp alex salmond immigration green card	L' Scottish independence Alex Salmond Immigration green card Immigration.	L' independence Scotland np Alex Salmond immigration green card d' immigration.	Alex Salmond immigration green card d' immigration.
18	scotland case independence	Apos case; Apos independence; Scotland.	Apos case; independence of Spain; Scotland.	The case of l'apos; independence of l'apos; Scotland.
18	oil chief fear higher tax salmond win vote	The chief oil tanker fears that the higher taxes will win the vote of the salmond.	The oil chief fears that the higher tax will win the vote of the salmond.	The oil chief feared that the higher tax would win the salmond vote.
18	scottish independence referendum white paper revealed	"The White Paper of the referendum on the ""Scottish independence"" revealed."	The White Paper of the referendum on Scottish independence revealed this.	The Scottish independence referendum white paper revealed.
18	ernst young scot independence oil gas tax rise	Most Scottish youth independents are raising the oil tax.	Most young Scottish independents raise oil taxes.	Most Scottish young independents raise the oil tax.
18	moment captured history scotland unveils blueprint independence uk	Scotland reveals the plan of the apostles; independence; independence.	The moment captured is the story of Scotland's unveiling of its plan; independence; independence.	The moment captured the apos; history lupos; Scotland unveils the plan of apos; independence uk lapos; independence.
18	status white paper	Status report.	It is not a legal document, but a legal document.	White Paper on apos; status report.
18	george kerevan radical left referendum role	George Kerevan radical left-wing Referendum role.	George Kerevan radical left role in the referendum.	George Kerevan radical left referendum role.
18	scottish independence white paper glance	Scottish independence.	It's the first time I've read a book on Scottish independence.	This is a white paper look at Scotland's independence.
18	joan mcalpine trust future scotland	Future Scotland, Joan Mcalpine Trust.	Joan Mcalpine Trust to be future Scotland.	Joan mcalpine trust future scotland.
18	scot warned independence expulsion sterling	It's the first time I've heard of it, and it's the first time I've heard it.	Scot has warned the apos; independence of the apos; expulsion sterling.	Scot warned the independence of the apos; expulsion sterling.
18	scottish independence radical independence hold glasgow conference	L' Scottish Independence, L' Radical Independence Holding the Glasgow Conference.	The Scottish independence, the independence of Scotland, and the radical independence of Glasgow.	L' Scottish independence, l' radical independence to hold conference in Glasgow.
18	scot face annual tax rise vote warns treasury	In addition, the government is responsible for the administration of the program.	An annual vote to increase taxes will notify the Consolidated Revenue Fund.	An annual vote warns the Consolidated Revenue Fund.
18	scottish independence impact higher education live chat	It is important to remember that education and training are not the only means of achieving equality.	Scotland's independence has an important impact on higher education.	Scottish independence has an impact on higher education.
18	scottish independence trident removal easy	The trident of Scottish independence, the Scottish independence, is easily withdrawn.	The trident of l' Scottish independence is easily withdrawn.	Scotland's trident independence easily withdraws.
18	scotland independence blueprint long promise short detail	It's a great place to go, and it's a great place to go.	Scotland's independence, a long promise, few details.	Plan de l'apos; independence of Scotland, long promise, few details.
18	scottish independence white paper live coverage	White Paper on l' Scottish Independence Live.	White Paper on l' independence from Scotland online.	Post White Paper; Scottish independence online.
18	msps asked white paper	SPSM called for white paper.	SPSM asked for some white paper.	SPSM asked for white paper.
18	scottish leader unveils agenda independence uk	It's the first time in a long time that you've had the opportunity to be a leader in the field.	The Scottish leader unveils his program of independence.	Scotland's leader unveils his independence program.
18	salmond attacked independence fiscal black hole	Salmond attacked the apo, fiscal independence, black hole.	So Salmond attacked the apo; fiscal independence black hole.	Salmond attacked the apo; black hole fiscal independence.
18	strong economic case scottish independence	Strong economic arguments argue in favour of Scottish independence.	There are strong economic arguments in favour of the independence of Scotland.	Scotland's independence is supported by strong economic arguments.
18	white paper scottish public	Scottish Public Scotland White Paper.	Scottish public Scottish White Paper.	Scottish public white paper.
18	english job risk scotland share sterling independence	The risk of sharing Scottish English employment with an independent Sterling Sterling.	The risk of Scottish English employment sharing the independence of sterling sterling.	The risk of losing; English use Scottish share an independence sterling sterling.
18	independent scot suffer tax hit country find	It's the only way to find a place to live and work.	The independent suffers from taxes hit country find country.	Independent suffers from poverty; tax hit country find country.
18	scotland independence day time march	The Day of the Apostles, Scotland's independence, is on the march.	Apos Day; Scottish independence, march.	This is the day of l' independence from Scotland, marching.
18	critic salmond case vote	Critical Vote on the Salmond case.	Critical vote on the Salmond case?	Critical vote on the case of Salmond.
18	watch live white paper scotland independence launched	Watch live the launch of l' Scottish Independence of l' Scotland in White Paper.	Watch the launch of the Scottish independence of Scotland in a white paper.	To watch live the launch of l' Scottish independence of l' Scotland in white paper.
18	headline scotland unveils independence blueprint	The Scottish headline will unveil the plan for independence.	The Scottish headline unveils the plan of independence.	The Scottish headline unveils the independence plan.
18	white paper education skill employment	It is important to note that this is not the case.	Use of white paper-related skills; education and training.	Skills employment related to white paper education and training.
18	scottish independence white paper childcare pledge save	Scotland's independence, the promise of child care, saves money.	The White Paper on Scotland's independence, the promise of the right to care for children, saves a lot of money.	The white paper on Scottish independence, the promise of child care, saves.
18	scotland government case independence	The Apos case; and the independence of the Scottish government.	This is a case of the independence of the Scottish Government.	Apos case; independence of the government of Scotland.
18	scottish independence edinburgh berth diplomat	Scottish Independence Edinburgh Berth is a diplomat.	Scottish Independence Edinburgh berth diplomat.	Scottish independence Edinburgh berth diplomat.
18	alex salmond launch blueprint independent scotland	Alex Salmond launches the Scottish Independent Plan.	And Alex Salmond launches the independent Scottish plan.	Alex Salmond launches independent Scottish plan.
18	scottish independence alex salmond blueprint future explained	Alex Salmond explained the Scottish independence.	The independence of Scotland was explained by Alex Salmond.	Scottish independence was explained by Alex Salmond.
18	scot urged seize future hand	It's the intention of us, a little help from the future.	Scotland at the beginning; intent to help; future.	The Scots have the foresight to help us out, and the future is bright and bright.
18	scotland unveils blueprint independence queen pound stay nuclear	L' Scotland unveils the plan of action of the Scottish Queen of Apos; independence.	Scotland unveils the plan of action of the Queen of Apos; independence.	L' Scotland unveils the plan d' action of the queen of l' independence.
18	scottish independence white paper key extract	Scottish White Independence Key Extract White Book Key.	White Scottish Independence key extract key white book.	Scottish independence white key key extract white book.
18	scottish independence alex salmond unveils white paper	L' Scottish independence Alex Salmond unveils his Scottish White Paper.	L' independence in Scotland Alex Salmond unveils his new white paper.	Scottish independence Alex Salmond unveils his white paper.
18	major business conference examining independence white paper	Dapos Conference; Business Cases; Independence White Paper; Independence.	Conference of experts; business; independence White Paper on independence; independence.	Conference; business; independence; white paper on independence; and independence.
18	independence vote class issue	Class problem voting for l' independence.	Class issue of voting for independence.	Class problem for independence voting.
18	paper nuclear weapon ban	It's got to be on paper, it's got to be a nuclear-weapons ban.	Paper on the map; prohibition of nuclear weapons.	Paper on the ban on nuclear weapons.
18	scottish independence voter view white paper	The voters of the independence movement in Scotland regard the White Paper as a White Paper.	Scottish independence voters see the White Paper as a White Paper.	Scottish independence voters regard the white paper as a white paper.
18	scottish independence oil firm fear tax	The Scottish Oil Company is afraid of taxes.	The oil company of l' Scottish independence fears taxes.	Scotland's independence oil company fears taxes.
18	scot propose independence pound passport	Scot offers independent book passport.	Scot proposes l' book independence delivers passport pound.	Scot proposes l' independence delivers passport pound.
18	brodies llp employment law independent scotland	Self-employment Scotland.	Brodies llp Self-employment Scotland Act.	Brodies llp loos law; self employment Scotland.
18	alex salmond claim winner referendum	Alex Salmond claims the result of the referendum.	Alex Salmond claimed the result of the referendum.	Alex Salmond claimed the referendum result.
18	scotland brave scotland free	Scots have defeated the Apostles; Scots have liberated the Apostles; Scots have liberated the Scots; Scots have liberated the Apos; Scots have liberated the Scots.	The Scots have braved the Apostles; the Scots... the Apostles; the Scots have liberated the Apostles; the Scots... the Apostles; the Scots have liberated the Apostles; the Scots.	It was the first time in the history of the United States that the United States had taken the lead in the fight against terrorism.
18	leader dundee ambition	The leader, Dundee ambition.	Leader Dundee ambition.	The ambition of leader Dundee.
18	scottish independence scotland independent march	Independence of Scotland: Independent walk of the Apos; Scotland.	Independence of the Apos; Scotland: Independent of the Apos.	Independence of the Apostles; Scotland: independence from the Apostles; Scotland.
18	scottish independence scotland warned tax rise year	Independence of Apostles; Scotland L' Scotland warned that taxes would increase on a yearly basis.	Independence from poverty; Scotland L' Scotland warned that taxes would increase every year.	Independence from poverty; Scotland L' Scotland warned that taxes would rise every year.
18	independence day scotland destiny harks history	Independence, Scotland's destiny haunts history.	On the day of the Apostles; independence, Scotland's destiny is haunting the Apostles; history.	On the day of the Apostles, independence, the destiny of Scotland haunts the history of Scotland.
18	slippery alex salmond unveils blueprint independent scotland	It's the first of its kind in the world.	Alex Salmond unveils the Scottish Independent Plan.	Alex Salmond unveils map of l' independent Scotland.
18	white paper speculative	Speculation on white paper, please.	Speculation on white paper.	It's called white paper speculation.
18	independent scot face yearly tax rise warns treasury	It is the responsibility of the Minister of Finance to ensure that the government's revenue is used.	The annual tax increase alerts the Consolidated Revenue Fund.	L' annual increase in taxes warns the treasury.
18	scottish independence high speed rail plan doubt	Scottish independence doubts the project.	A high-speed railway plan for l'apos; independence Scotland doubts the project.	High-speed rail plan for the island; Scottish independence doubts project.
18	guide independent scotland edinburgh unveils break uk blueprint	It's the first time you'll be able to see the world.	Independent Guide to and from Scotland Edinburgh unveils a break uk blueprint.	Independent guide d' Edinburgh Scotland unveils break uk blueprint.
18	scotland unveils blueprint independence	L' Scotland will unveil the apos; independence of the management plan.	L&apos, Scotland unveils the apos; independence of the management plan.	Scotland unveils the independence of the management plan.
18	scotland independent	Independently of Outer Space; Scotland.	Independent of the Apostles; Scotland.	It's independent of Scotland.
18	alex salmond vow bbc pound blueprint independence	It's a good thing that we have a lot of money in our hands.	Alex Salmond vowed independence from the pound sterling.	Alex took a vow of independence from the pound sterling.
18	salmond produce snp blueprint independent scotland	Salmond to produce an independent plan.	Salmond will produce snp independent Scottish plan.	Salmond produce snp independent Scottish plan.
18	scottish independence snp ducking big question	It's not just a question of how to deal with it, it's about how to deal with it.	The snp de l'apos; Scottish independence dodges the big question.	The snp de l'apos; Scottish independence skips big question.
18	scotland independence snp hail momentous day dundee	The Scottish Ice Age Glacier salutes Scotland's memorable Dundee Day.	Glacier de l'apos; Scottish independence salutes memorable Dundee Day.	The glacier of l' Scottish independence salutes the memorable day Dundee.
18	scottish independence white paper	Scottish independence.	White Paper on Portuguese; Scottish independence.	It's a white paper on l' Scottish independence.
18	scotland future guide independent scotland white paper	Scottish Independent Future Independent Scottish White Paper.	Scotland's Future Independent Guide Scotland's Future Independent White Paper.	Future independent Scottish guide Scottish independent white paper.
18	scotland release blueprint independence	Scottish Release; Independence of Management Plan.	Liberation from Scotland; independence of management plan.	Scottish release of assets; independence of management plan.
18	scotland business leader fight union	Businesses in Scotland.	Chef d'apos, enterprise de l'apos, Scotland.	He is the head of the company and the head of the company.
19	year disney war history	Disney year, story of war.	Disney year, story of the war.	Disney year, war story.
19	local animator kelly mcclanahan help craft disney frozen	L' Local Facilitator Kelly Mcclanahan helps with frozen disney crafts.	L' local animator Kelly Mcclanahan helps with apos; disney crafts frozen.	L' local animator Kelly Mcclanahan helps with frozen disney crafts.
19	review frozen disney best	I want to see the best frozen Disney movie ever.	To see the best frozen Disney.	Seeing the best frozen Disney.
19	frozen royal mythology larger point love	King Frozen Mythology bigger dot love.	Royal Frozen Mythology greater love point.	Frozen royal mythology greater love point.
19	frozen ice warm heart	Ice core is freezing and hot.	Uh, cold, hot ice core.	Freezing, warm ice core.
19	frozen heart ice	Ice cream with a cold, cold heart.	Frozen heart ice.	Uh, frozen heart ice.
19	frozen disney best movie	Best frozen Disney film ever.	Best frozen Disney movie ever.	The best Disney frozen movie ever.
19	frozen review	Freeze exam.	Freezing exam, sir.	Uh, frozen exam.
19	review frozen warms heart ice ice baby video	Review the heart-ice baby video.	Review the video of Baby Heart Ice Cream.	Okay, go over the baby heart-ice video again.
19	frozen manages recapture feel disney accomplishes	Gleaned to manage the recapture that is performed by disney.	Freeze-frozen recapture management that disney does perform.	Freeze recapture management that disney performs.
19	frozen disney classic lack diversity	Classic frozen Disney lacks diversity.	Classic frozen disney products lack diversity.	Well, classic frozen disney lacks diversity.
19	listen full version idina menzel frozen	Listen to the full idina version menzel frozen.	Listen to the full idina menzel frozen version.	Listen to the full version idina menzel frozen.
19	frozen review disney animated musical bold beautiful	Frozen magazine, disney, animated musical, daring, beautiful.	Frozen disney animated musical daring beautiful.	Frozen magazine disney animated musical daring beautiful.
19	solid frozen fresh sheen story	L' history of l' fresh, solid, frozen glaze.	L' l&apos history; fresh, solid frozen glow.	L' l&apos history; fresh solid frozen glow.
19	disney frozen makeover snow queen	Disney froze the Snow Queen to death.	Disney has frozen the Snow Queen.	Disney froze the snow queen.
19	frozen	Freezing.	It's frozen.	He's frozen.
19	review disney royal gain boost frozen	Review the frozen Royal Disney Winner Booster.	I want you to review the frozen royal disney gain booster.	I want you to review the disney royal gain booster frozen.
19	frozen pulling crowd	An ice-cold crowd that's drawing crowds all over the city.	An ice-cold crowd that's drawing crowds.	Ice-cold crowd drawing crowds.
19	cinderella star santino fontana frozen disney action	The movie star cinderella santino fontana action disney freeze action.	Cinderella star santino fontana action disney frozen action.	The cinderella star santino fontana action disney frozen action.
19	frozen disney latest princess debut tonight	Disney Frozen last appearance as a princess tonight.	Disney's last-ever frozen debut princess tonight.	Disney frozen last princess debut tonight.
19	frozen	Freezing.	It's frozen.	He's frozen.
19	review disney frozen delivers animated gift ice	Disney Magazine delivers ice cream and ice cream.	Disney Jell-O Magazine delivers animated ice cream.	Disney Jell-O magazine delivers animated gift ice.
19	week best dressed star kristen bell kate bosworth	This week's best-dressed star, Kristen Bell, Kate Bosworth.	The best-dressed star of the week, Kristen Bell Kate Bosworth.	Best-dressed star of the week, Kristen Bell, Kate Bosworth.
19	weekend kick holiday movie season	Christmas movie season-end, c&apos.	It's the season for the Christmas movies.	Weekdays @-@end, c' Christmas movie season.
19	movie review disney frozen independent ice princess root	Disney Film Review, Frozen Root of an Independent Ice Princess.	Disney film review frozen root of an independent ice princess.	Disney film review frozen ice princess root independent.
19	kristen bell realizes dream disney princess	Kristen Bell is fulfilling Princess Disney's dream.	Kristen Bell has fulfilled the dream of Princess Disney.	Kristen Bell fulfills the dream of Princess Disney.
19	movie review frozen chilling fairy tale turned superb film	The film review of the movie Frosty Tale film made superb movie.	Frozen fairy-tale movie review turned out great movie.	The movie review frozen fairy tale film made superb movie.
19	frozen killer song gorgeous animation disney fairy tale	Gel killer animation song beautiful fairytale animation Disney.	Gel killer animation song wonderful fairy tale Disney animation.	Gel killer song animation beautiful fairy tale Disney.
19	frozen disney double dip delight	Double dip frozen disney.	It's a double dip of frozen disney.	A double frozen disney dip.
19	frozen homefront black nativity open wednesday	Frozen Black Nativity on the Inner Front, open on Wednesday.	Frozen Black Nativity on home front, open Wednesday.	Frozen black nativity on the inner front, open Wednesday.
19	frozen disney latest animation solid	Disney froze last solid animation last solid animation.	Disney frozen solid animation last solid animation.	Disney frozen last solid animation last animation.
19	voicing disney newest princess kristen bell stamp role	The new Princess Kristen Bell, the part of the stamp-post.	Disney's Voice, the new Princess Kristen Bell, plays the role of the timbre,-poste.	Disney voice, new princess Kristen Bell, role of the timbre-poste.
19	disney royal makeover	Royal twist of Disney.	This is a royal Disney twist.	Disney's royal twist.
19	review easily distracted frozen	It's an easy-to-frozen, easy-to-frozen magazine.	Freezing easily distracted journal.	Read easily distracted frozen.
19	frozen cover familiar disney terrain surprise	Surprise of the familiar terrain of the ice-covered area.	Surprise of familiar frozen blanket terrain.	Frozen cover familiar terrain surprise.
19	frozen reminds disney pixar owner	Gelé disney disney is the proprietary disney pixar.	Gel disney disney disney pixar owner.	Gleaned disney disney pixar owner.
19	disney royal gain boost frozen review	Disney Royal Win boosting the Frozen Magazine.	Disney Royal gain boosting the Frozen Magazine.	Disney royal gain boost the frozen revue.
19	film review frozen	Critics of the movie are freezing to death.	The movie review is frozen.	The film review is frozen.
19	disney frozen dazzle	Disney froze the glare.	Disney froze the apos; dazzle.	Disney's frozen the apos; dazzle.
19	kristen bell princess worthy disney royal family	Kristen Bell a Disney Royal Family Princess.	Princess Kristen Bell worthy Disney Royal Family.	Kristen Bell princess worthy of Disney Royal Family.
19	review frozen prof heartwarmer	Revisit the cold-hearted warm-up teacher.	Review the apologies; warm up teacher's frozen heart.	Review teacher's frozen heartwarming.
19	frozen review stunning visuals strong musical number disney	Astonishing, visually powerful jelly magazine, musical number, disney.	Amazing visual amazing frozen magazine with powerful musical number disney.	Amazing frozen magazine visually powerful musical number disney.
19	hot movie frozen	Hot film, frozen.	Freezing hot film.	Uh, frozen hot film.
19	review frozen mix music animation create soaring holiday delight	Review the' musical animation of frozen mixing and create an enchanting vacation experience.	Revisit the animation of the music of the frozen mix and create a delightful vacation.	Review the frozen mix musical animation and create an enchanting holiday pleasure.
19	disney frozen composer talk unexpected influence gaga	Frozen Disney talk about l' unpredictable influence gaga.	Disney's frozen talk about the apos; unpredictable influence gaga.	Disney frozen talk about l' unpredictable influence gaga.
19	movie review disney royal gain boost frozen	Disney film review, Royal Gain Booster, frozen.	Royal Disney Win Win movie review frozen booster.	Film review disney royal gain booster frozen.
19	movie review fairytale frozen fun despite lukewarm tune	Fairy tales froze the apos, amusing even with a warm melody.	The fairy tales froze the apos; fun despite a warm melody.	The fairy tales froze; fun despite a warm melody.
19	review frozen enchanting traditional disney fairy tale feminist twist	Revise classic feminist twist twist-twist ice-cold fairytale.	Review the traditional feminist twist twist twist glittering classic fairy tale.	Revise the classic fairy tale glittering feminist twist twist twist.
19	complicated computer modeling animated snowball	Computer modelling is a complex and time-consuming process.	Complicated computer modelling animated snowball.	Complicated computer modeling animated snowball.
19	movie review frozen	Critics of the film have been frozen.	The review of the film's been frozen.	The movie review froze.
19	movie review frozen warms heart ice ice baby video	Jell-O movie magazine heats up the baby's ice-cream baby's ice-cream baby.	Jell-O magazine warms baby video ice baby's heart.	Jell-O magazine warms the heart ice baby video video baby ice cream.
19	frozen mix song wit heart magical winter tale	Ice-cold song blend with heart's tales of d' winter magic.	Frozen song blend with heart tales d' magical winter.	Mix frozen song with heart tales d' magical winter.
19	review frozen improves disney animation track record	Jell-O Magazine will improve the status of the album; Disney animation.	Jell-O magazine improves the overall picture; Disney animation.	Jell-O improves the balance sheet; animation disney.
19	familiar voice film opening today	The film is available in English, French, German, German, German, German, German, German, German and German.	The familiar voice film s' opens today; o.	The familiar voice film opens today.
19	review frozen start cold warm fuzzy	Re-start your car cold, cold, hot and fuzzy.	Take another look at the cold, cold, hot and fuzzy start.	Cold, cold, hot and fuzzy start again.
19	parent guide frozen disney princess power	The parental guide froze the power of the Disney princess.	Well, the parent guide froze the power of the Disney princess.	The parent guide froze the power of Princess Disney.
19	film review frozen	Critics of the movie are freezing to death.	The movie review is frozen.	The film review is frozen.
19	tale sister story song	Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song Song.	Conte sister story song song song song song song song song song song song.	Conte sister story song song song song song song song song song.
19	sloooowly improving gender politics disney frozen	The policy of equality between women and men is slowly improving.	The policy of equality between women and men is slowly improving.	It is also important to ensure that women's rights are respected and that they are respected.
19	josh gad method play olaf snowman frozen	The Josh-Gad method is like the Olaf Snowman-frozen method.	The Josh gad method plays at Olaf Snowman frozen.	Josh gad method plays frozen Olaf Snowman.
19	movie review frozen heart	Frozen Heart Film Review.	Frozen heart film review.	The frozen heart film review.
19	frozen review disney princess	Disney Princess Jell-O magazine.	Frozen magazine, Disney princess.	Frozen Disney princess magazine.
19	frozen galumphing adorable family flick	Frosty ice cubes, lovely home movies.	You know, ice cold, adorable family movies.	Frozen ice, adorable family films.
19	frozen review thing disney animated fairy tale	Disney's animated fairy-tale jelly-whatever revue animated.	Disney animated fairytale jellye thing revue animated.	The Jell-O magazine thing Disney animated fairy tale animated.
19	talking snowman tune frozen charm	I am talking about the air of the snowman.	I'm just talking about the snowman's air.	I'm talking about snowman air.
19	frozen cold	Freezing cold.	Cold ice.	Freezing cold weather.
19	frozen warm heart review	Freezing hot-heart review.	Here's a review of the warm, frozen heart.	Hot and frozen heart review.
19	brrrrrrr disney frozen wintry movie	It's a cold winter and it's a cold winter.	Brrrrrr disney film d' winter frozen.	Brrrrrr disney film d' frozen winter.
19	movie review frozen blockbuster waiting happen	The blocking review of Frozen Blockbuster is on.	The freeze blockbuster review is on.	The freeze blockbuster movie review waiting takes place.
19	magic making disney snow real frozen	Magic makes Disney's snow freeze.	The magic is what makes the Disney snow freeze.	Magic is making Disney's snow freeze.
19	movie review frozen warms heart classic disney fashion	The review of frozen movies will warm up the classic classic Disney fashion.	Classic fashion classic disney heartwarming with the review of frozen movies.	Critical frozen movies warms the classic classic disney fashion heart.
19	frozen life disney standard fun heart	It's a good way to get to know a lot of people.	The freeze life disney standard fun heart.	The frozen life disney standard fun heart.
19	kristen bell princess frozen scrappy awkward	Frozen, clumsy, clumsy Kirsten Bell Princess.	Kirsten Bell Frozen Princess clumsy fight.	Kristen Bell Frozen princess clumsy fight.
19	disney frozen pair royal sister center fairy tale	Disney Frozen Pair Fairy Tale Royal Sisters center-sister.	Disney Frozen Pair Royal Fairy Tale Centre-sister.	Frozen pair Disney Royal Sisters fairytale center-sister.
19	frozen wintry mix music fun	Mix of d&apos music; cool winter fun.	Mix of music d' winter frozen fun.	Fun frozen winter music mix d&apos.
19	kristen bell talk endearingly awkward princess frozen	Kristen Bell is talking about a frozen, clumsy princess.	Kristen Bell speaks of dapos; a clumsy frozen princess.	Kristen Bell spoke of a clumsy frozen princess.
19	ra widescreen animated disney movie	Wide-screen animation with Disney.	D&apos film; wide-screen animation with Disney.	A D&apos film; widescreen animation with Disney.
19	kristen bell frozen princess deliberately awkward	Kristen Bell, Princess Frozen, deliberately clumsy.	Kristen Bell, frozen princess, deliberately clumsy.	Kristen Bell, deliberately awkward frozen princess.
19	best disney sidekick time	It's the best time for you to get to know each other.	This is the best time for L' disney sidekick.	The best time for disney sidekick.
19	frozen pretty pointless	There's no point in freezing.	I froze, it's no use.	Well, frozen is no use.
19	disney frozen coldest heart	Disney just froze the coldest heart.	Disney froze the coldest heart.	Disney froze the coldest heart in the world.
19	frozen warms audience animation charming character	It's just that the frost warms up the audience's animation.	Frost warms the audience charming character animation.	It warms the audience animation charming character.
19	frozen review snow business business	Snow-frozen magazine company.	Frozen magazine company on the snow.	Magazine company frozen on snow.
19	icy frozen disney regains footing fun animation	Disney Jell-O gets back to a fun, fun, fun, fun game.	Disney Frozen returns to a fun animation at the base.	Disney frozen regained a fun animation at the base.
19	frozen songwriter working kristen bell idina menzel	Author @--working frozen composer at Kristen Bell idina menzel.	Author-frozen composer working at Kristen Bell idina menzel.	Author-a frozen composer working at Kristen Bell idina menzel.
19	kristen bell dish disney frozen	Kristen Bell, dish, frozen disney.	Kristen Bell, frozen dish disney.	Frozen kristen bell dish.
19	disney feisty frozen wicked good	Disney Feisty froze the good.	Disney Feisty froze the goods.	Disney feisty froze the good.
19	movie review frozen warm hearted disney tale	Hot-Heart Disney Fiction Gel Film Review.	Magazine of warm-hearted, Disney-themed, heartwarming gel film.	This is a review of Disney's tale of a warm-hearted gel-filled film.
19	frozen review disney latest princess rule	Last rule of Princess Disney.	Jell-O magazine, last rule of the princess.	Jell-o magazine last rule of princess.
19	somethin somethin boy girl	Like a boy, a girl.	Something about a boy,a girl.	You know, something like a boy, a girl.
19	coldfinger disney frozen retells classic andersen tale	Frozen Disney's cold fingers are reminiscent of classic Andersen tales.	The cold, frozen fingers of Disney are reminiscent of classic Andersen tales.	Disney's frozen cold fingers are classic Andersen tales.
19	frozen music family	Frozen musician family.	Family of frozen musicians.	You know, a family of frozen musicians.
19	disney frozen princess half heart tangled	Disney Frozen Princess half-corrupted heart.	Disney Frozen Princess half-heart entangled.	Disney Frozen Princess half-@ @ heartworm.
19	mania interview idina menzel	I don't know what to do about it.	Manic interview idina menzel.	Manic interview idina menzel.
19	review frozen instant disney classic	Check out the classic example of instantaneous jell-o disney.	Take a look at the classic instantaneous frozen disney.	Review the classic frozen instant disney.
19	animated feature frozen thaw heart	Animated characteristic of a frozen, thawed heart.	An animated characteristic of a frozen, thawed heart.	An animated feature of a thawed frozen heart.
19	thing kristen bell	Something Kristen bell.	Something kristen bell?	Something kristen bell.
19	josh gad frozen strong female character resonate daughter	Josh gad, frozen solid female character, resonates girl.	Josh gad froze strong female character girl resonates.	Josh gad frozen strong female character resonates girl.
19	frozen exclusive idina menzel ready	L' exclusive, frozen menzel idina is ready.	L' idina menzel exclusive frozen is ready.	L' idina menzel exclusive is ready.
19	frozen soundtrack featuring kristen bell idina menzel	The tape is jellied with Kristen idina menzel's bell.	The tape is jellied with the bell of Kristen idina menzel.	The tape is frozen with the Kristen idina menzel bell.
19	chilled perfection	Cool perfection.	To cool down perfection.	I want to cool down perfection.
19	movie review frozen fresh classic disney	Classic, fresh, freeze-frozen film review.	Classic frozen film review, fresh disney.	Classic frozen film review fresh disney.
19	frozen family affair married songwriter	Frozen family business married writer-composer.	A frozen family business has married l' author-composer.	A frozen family business married l' author-composer.
19	comedy king snow queen story frozen	Comedy on Frozen Snow Queen.	You know, the Frozen Snow Queen Comedy.	Frozen snow queen comedy.
19	buy frozen ticket	Buy yourself a frozen ticket.	Buy a frozen ticket.	You buy a frozen ticket.
19	frozen icy animated blast fun filled heart	It's just that it's a cold animation of the apos, and it's filled the heart.	L' icy animation of the apos; explosion has filled the heart.	L' frozen apo animation; explosion filled the heart.
19	meet olaf adorable snowman disney frozen	Meet Olaf, l&apos, the lovable, frozen, Disney-like snowman.	Meet Olaf, the adorable frozen snowman.	Meet Olaf, I' adorable snowman frozen disney.
19	frozen movie review kristen bell idina menzel dazzle disney latest	Crystal Critical Crystal Freeze Dazzle dazzle idina menzel last night.	Crystal film review ice cream idina menzel dazzle last night.	Crystal freeze review movie bell idina menzel dazzle last ditney.
19	ebiri frozen capture classic disney spirit	Frozen Ebiri capture classic classic Disney spirit classic spirit.	Frozen Ebiri capture classic Disney spirit classic mind.	Ebiri frozen capture classic Disney spirit classic mind.
19	frozen disney princess flick boy love promise video	Disney Frozen Girl Boy Princess movie promise to video-video promise.	Disney frozen movie princess love boy promise video promised.	Disney Jell-o movie princess boy love promise promised video video.
19	disney frozen heart redefines true love review	Disney's frozen heart... redefines the apos; true love.	The frozen heart of Disney redefines the apos; true love.	Disney's frozen heart redefines true love.
19	frozen movie review disney latest animated film find charm warmth	Frozen Film Review Disney is the latest film from D' animation and entertainment find the heat of charm.	Frozen film review disney last film d' animation find the heat of charm.	Frozen film review disney latest film from D' animation find the warmth of charm.
19	frozen songwriter share secret harmonious team	L' author-gelé composer shares a secret, harmonious team.	L' author-frozen composer shares a secret and harmonious team.	L' author-composer gelé shares a harmonious secret team.
19	disney frozen warm hearted family fun	Disney froze the family's warm and cordial pleasures to death.	Disney froze the warm and cordial family pleasure.	Disney has frozen warm and cordial family fun.
19	frozen reviewed disney coolest princess star caper sweeter	Disney's Coolest Sweetest Celebrity Cuddle Princess.	Disney's coolest, best-sweetest, sweetest-sweetest-star cuddly princess magazine.	Disney's sweetest celebrity cuddly princess frozen magazine.
19	disney frozen empowering magical fairytale age	Disney froze the apos; an age of fairytale magic that gives power to magic.	Disney froze the age of magic fairytale that gives magic power.	Disney froze the apos; magical fairytale age that gives magic power.
19	josh gad frozen daughter	Frozen girl Josh Gad.	Josh Gad is a frozen girl.	Josh gad frozen girl.
19	interview filmmaker jennifer lee chris buck frozen	Interview Jennifer Lee Frozen Chris Buck.	Interview filmmaker Jennifer Lee Chris Buck, frozen.	To interview filmmaker Jennifer Lee Chris Buck frozen.
19	oscar frozen disney invents princess secret software	Oscar Froide Disney has invented Secret Software Princess.	Oscar Cold Disney invents Princess secret software.	Oscar Cold Disney invents princess secret software.
19	frozen review buy album	The album was released in the U.S.A.	The Jell-O review buy album.	The frozen review buy album album.
19	omaha native preaches patience editor disney frozen	Omaha Native is preaching the patience of a frozen Disney editor.	Native Omaha preaches frozen Disney editor patience.	Omaha native preaches patience frozen Disney editor.
19	disney full renaissance mode frozen	Disney Fashion Full Frozen Renaissance.	Disney mode full revival frozen.	Disney full renaissance frozen mode.
19	movie	Movie.	It's film.	This is a movie.
19	jonathan groff cool kristoff disney frozen	"Jonathan Groff Kristoff says ""cool"" frozen."	Jonathan Groff kristoff frozen coolney.	Jonathan groff kristoff says cool frozen.
19	kristen bell talk frozen childhood return veronica mar	Kristen Bell talk about freezing as a kid back to Veronica Mar.	Kristen Bell talking frozen child back Veronica Mar.	Kristen Bell talk frozen kid back Veronica Mar.
19	cast frozen wore recording booth	It is not possible to determine if this is the case.	The casting took place in a cab d'apos; recording used and frozen.	The casting took place in a frozen and used recording booth.
19	frozen score traditional disney element	L' traditional elemental disney has been frozen.	L' traditional disney element has been frozen.	L' traditional disney element frozen.
19	listen song disney frozen hear written	Listen to the song; Disney Frozen &quot.	Listen to the song.	You can't just listen to the song.
19	disney frozen soundtrack song robert lopez kristen	Disney also froze the song from the Robert Lopez Kristen soundtrack.	Disney froze the Robert Lopez Kristen soundtrack song.	The song on Robert Lopez Kristen's soundtrack was frozen by Disney.
19	review frozen disney marketing meet camera	Review the Frozen Marketing Disney meet the camera.	Go back over the Frozen Dissney marketing footage and meet the camera.	Review the marketing frozen disney meet camera.
19	frozen star kristen bell identify disney princess	Kristen Bell, ice-cold movie star, I.D. Disney Princess.	Kristen Bell, ice-cold star, Disney Princess.	Kristen Bell, ice-cold star, identify Disney princess.
19	frozen room temperature	Temperature of the frozen room, please.	Temperature of frozen room.	Frozen room temperature.
19	review disney frozen crack ice	I want you to re-examine the ice from the frozen fissure, Disney.	Revise the frozen fissure ice disney.	Revisit ice frozen crack disney.
19	review frozen heart ice baby	Check out the ice cream and the ice cream.	Revise frozen-core baby ice cream.	Revise frozen heart ice baby ice.
19	video disney animator reveal painstaking detail virtual snow frozen	Video Disney animator carefully reveals the details of the frozen virtual snow.	L&apos, a video disney animator, will reveal the details of the frozen virtual snow.	L' video disney animator reveals the details of frozen virtual snow.
19	frozen reviewed animated disney film thrilling adventure	It's a great way to get a feel for your life.	Cold, Review, Animated, Disney thrilling adventure film.	Froid, revue, animée, disney film adventure thrilling.
19	frozen time	Freeze time.	It's freezing.	It was freezing.
19	rate musical disney	Just check out the Disney music.	Evaluate Disney music.	Please rate the Disney music.
19	kristen bell ring plucky princess video	Kristen Bell sounds like a very brave video princess.	Kristen Bell ringing courageous video princess.	Kristen Bell sounded brave video princess.
19	frozen movie review	Frozen film review.	Frozen film review.	Review of frozen movies.
19	frozen review flurry music heartwarming fun	Jell-O magazine Flurry Warm, Warm Funny Music.	Flurry Jell-O magazine warm fun music.	Frozen review Flurry warm fun fun music.
19	frozen visuals solid narrative thin ice	Visual freeze-frozen narration of thin ice.	Visuals frozen narrative solid ice thin.	Visuals frozen thin ice solid narrative.
19	disney frozen brings vocal duel holiday	And Disney Frozen brings you the holiday of the vocal duel.	Disney Frozen brings the holiday vocal duel.	Disney Frozen brings the vocal duel holiday.
19	flaw frozen icy treat	Frozen-frozen iced treatment by default.	Frozen frozen treatment by frozen default.	Frozen default frozen treatment.
19	silly snowman best frozen	Silly, best-frozen snowman.	L&apos, snowman idiot, best-frozen.	L' idiot of the snowman best frozen.
19	frozen disney princess movie thaw	The Frozen Disney Princess film thaws.	The film of the frozen Disney princess thaws.	The frozen Disney princess movie thaws.
19	prepare frozen classic disney winter scene warm	Preparing classic frozen foods in winter hot scene.	Prepare classic freeze disney winter warm scene.	Prepare frozen classic disney winter warm scene.
19	movie review frozen star	Jell-o movie-star review.	Frozen star film review.	Frozen star movie review.
19	despite girl trouble frozen nice musical walk snow	Despite the problem with the girls, the snow in the marching band froze.	Despite the girls' problem, the snow on the march has frozen over.	And despite the girls' problem, the snow in the music march has frozen over.
19	disney animation reveals tech rendering realistic snow frozen	L' animation of disney reveals a technology that makes frozen snow realistic.	L' disney animation reveals a technology that makes the frozen snow look realistic.	L' disney animation reveals technology that makes frozen snow realistic.
19	frozen review find solid water warm	It's a good place to stay, and it's a good place to stay.	The frozen magazine finds l'apos; solid hot water.	The frozen magazine finds solid water hot.
19	fun animated disney romp frozen leave cold	L' fun animation disneyp jell-o chill-out.	L' fun disneyp jelly break animation leave cold.	L' animation fun disneyp broken frozen leave cold.
20	ison comet century	C&apos is the Age of Comets.	C&apos is the century of comets.	C&apos is the comet age.
20	comet ison sign breaking close approach sun	The comet's approaching the sun.	Comet signal approaching sun.	The comet's signal is getting too close to the sun.
20	comet ison live blog	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Comet ison live blogger.	Comet ison live blog.
20	cloudy sky dubai block view comet ison	Sky cloud Dubai seen from the comet block ison ison.	The cloudy sky Dubai seen from the comet block ison ison.	Dubai cloudy sky from ison ison comet block.
20	comet nears sun offering planetary clue	It's close to the sun.	The comet is now close to the sun.	The comet is close to sun.
20	comet ison survives sun view spectacular	The comet survives the sight of the sun.	The ison comet survives the sight of the sunshine.	The comet ison survives the sight of the sun.
20	comet ison nears sun thanksgiving encounter nasa video	Comet ison near the sunshine of Thanksgiving meets nasa video.	Comet ison near the Thanksgiving sun meet nasa video.	Comet ison near Thanksgiving sun meeting nasa video.
20	comet ison particle provide cosmic time capsule moment truth	The ison particle of the comet provides the truth about the moment of the time capsule.	The ison particle of the comet provides the truth about the moment of the cosmic time capsule.	The comet's ison particle provides the truth about the cosmic time capsule's moment.
20	nasa best video comet ison hurtling earth	NASA's finest video comet is on Earth.	The best video comet in NASA is on Earth.	NASA's best video comet is on Earth!
20	comet ison dimmer expected broken apart	We're just waiting for the comet to be broken, you know?	We're just waiting for the comet to be broken.	We're waiting for the comet to break.
20	comet ison trouble	The comet's at risk.	It's a comet in danger.	The comet is endangered.
20	stereo spacecraft zoom comet ison	Stereo spacecraft.	Stereo spacecraft.	This is a stereo spacecraft.
20	watch thing live anticipated comet trouble video	Watch live the video of the disturbance of the anticipated comet.	To watch live the video of the anticipated comet disturbance.	Watch the anticipated comet disturbance video live.
20	glimpse comet ison thursday encounter sun	L' glimpse of the comet is on Thursday, the sunshine meets on Thursday.	L' preview of the comet is Thursday, the sun meets Thursday.	L' glimpse of the comet is Thursday, the sun meets Thursday.
20	uae astronomer lifetime glimpse comet ison brush	L&apos, the astronomer, sees the comet for his whole life on the top of a brush.	L' the astronomer sees the comet for his whole life on a brush.	L' astronomer sees the comet on a brush all his life.
20	death ison comet century fizzle break	Death is on the century comet fizzle break fizzle break.	Well, death is on the comet century fizzle break fizzle break.	Death is on comet century fizzle break fizzle break.
20	comet ison season	It's the middle of the season.	Well, the comet is in the middle of the season.	The comet is in season.
20	join nasa scientist live video chat comet ison round sun	Join NASA scientist on video live.	I want you to go live to the NASA scientist on the video.	And join the NASA scientist live on the video.
20	watch nasa latest video showing comet ison approaching sun	Check out the latest video from NASA showing that the comet is on its way to the sun.	Watch the latest NASA video showing the approaching comet.	Watch NASA's latest video showing the comet approaching the sun.
20	reuben fleet host comet ison viewing party	Reuben from the comet's fleet.	Reuben from the comet fleet.	Reuben from the fleet of the comet.
20	scientist closely watching thanksgiving comet	Scientist carefully observing the Thanksgiving comet.	I'm a scientist who's been watching the Thanksgiving comet.	Scientist watching Thanksgiving comet closely.
20	rare comet st pas sun	Rare Comet St not Sunshine.	Sunshine rare comet.	Rare comet st not sunshine.
20	qa comet ison	Comet ison.	Qua comet ison.	What comet ison.
20	skywatchers cross finger ison journey sun	The Skywatchers keep their fingers crossed on the sunshine journey.	Skywatchers cross their fingers is on the sun trip.	Well, skywatchers cross their fingers on the sunshine journey.
20	comet ison incredible sight behold survives sun	Comet is an amazing sight.	This comet is an amazing sight.	I mean, the comet is an amazing sight.
20	ison face epic cosmic battle comet century solar storm	C' is on the epic face of a cosmic battle comet, century solar storm, century solar storm.	C' is on epic face comet of cosmic battle century solar storm century.	C' is on the epic face of cosmic battle comet century solar storm century.
20	celestial visitor	Sky-visitor.	Heaven-seeing.	Hey, celestial visitor.
20	observer guide watching comet ison light sky	Observer Guide observing the comet over the starry sky.	Observer guide looking at the comet in the starry sky.	Observing guide watching the comet over the starry sky.
20	comet ison extrasolar visitor dinosaur dwarf rex week	Rex Dwarf Dwarf Dwarf Dinosaur Extrasolar Visitor Comet Rex week.	Extrasolar ison comet visiting midget Rex dinosaur week.	Comet ison extrasolar visitor dwarf dinosaur Rex week.
20	comet ison daredevil kamikaze	It's on break-kamikaze neck.	The comet is on break-kamikaze neck.	The comet is on break-kamikaze.
20	comet ison tracked spacecraft watch	It's in orbit.	The comet is now in orbit.	The comet is in orbit!
20	thanksgiving comet ison trouble	The Comet is in trouble.	The Thanksgiving comet's in trouble.	Thanksgiving comet in trouble.
20	comet century visible	Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com	Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com Com	The European Commission, the European Commission, the European Commission, the European Commission, the European Commission, the European Commission, the European Commission, the European Commission, the European Commission, the European Economic and Social Committee, the European Economic and Social Committee, the European Economic and Social Committee, the European Economic and Social Committee, the European Economic and Social Committee and the European Economic and Social Committee.
20	nasa host hangout comet ison	Nasa, host comet ison.	NASA host comet ison.	Nasa comet ison host.
20	comet dance sun death	Comet dancing death by the sun.	Comet dance, death by the sun.	The comet dance, death by the sun.
20	fortis flight mission analyze comet ison	Exploration mission.	Fortis mission d' exploration.	Fortis mission d' exploration site.
20	comet terminal sun	C&apos is the case of the comet.	C' is the case of comet.	C' comet is the case.
20	warning watching comet ison thanksgiving	Warning Watching the Comet is on its way; Thanksgiving.	Warning to watch the comet is now in place.	Warning watching the comet is at the moment; Thanksgiving.
20	comet astronomer wild ride day die better	The Day of the Apostle, the wild comet astronomer, will die better.	On the Day of Apostles, wild comet astronomer will die better.	The day of apos; wild comet astronomer will die better.
20	soho image comet ison	This is a picture of Soho's comet.	Image from Soho's comet.	This is the image of the comet of Soho.
20	comet lost tail	Comet has lost its tail.	This comet has lost its tail.	The comet lost its tail.
20	comet ison	There's the comet.	Hey, the comet's here.	The comet is here!
20	holiday comet ison visible sky thanksgiving christmas	The Christmas Comet is visible in the Christmas sky.	The Christmas comet is visible in the Christmas sky!	Christmas comet is visible in the Christmas sky.
20	comet ison set thanksgiving flyby sun nasa observer	The comet is now on the board of the D'apos; Action de grâce.	Comet is on the set of Apos; Thanksgiving.	The comet on the set of Apos; Thanksgiving.
20	nasa solar observing fleet watch comet ison journey sun	NASA is a solar observation of the comet's surveillance fleet on the traveling sun.	NASA solar observation of the comet's surveillance fleet on the traveling sun.	NASA solar observation of comet surveillance fleet is on the traveling sun.
20	cosmic gift ison comet cometh	C&apos is God's gift.	C&apos is God's gift to us.	C' is a gift from God.
20	comet ison nears sun	It's close to the sun.	The comet is now close to the sun.	The comet is close to sun.
20	comet ison solar probe sight storm coming	A thunderstorm from the Solar Probe is in sight.	The comet was in sight of a thunderstorm from the solar probe.	The comet is in sight of a solar probe storm.
20	flying close sun bad comet ison great science	Flying close to the sun's evil comet is the great science.	Flying by the sun's bad comet is about great science.	Flying close to the bad comet sun is great science.
20	comet ison thursday sun encounter thanksgiving feast nasa	The Comet is on Thursday in the sunshine and meets the festivity of the Festival of Apostles.	The comet is on Thursday in the sun meets the d' Thanksgiving Day.	The comet is Thursday in the sun meets the festival d' thanksgiving nasa.
20	comet ison head close encounter sun	It is in close contact with the sun.	And the comet is in close contact with the sun.	The comet is in close contact with the sun.
20	anticipated comet trouble	It's been destroyed.	Captain, the comet has been destroyed.	The comet was destroyed.
20	comet ison face brutal coronal mass ejection thanksgiving	Comet ison facing the epos; Thanksgiving brutal massive coronary ejection.	Comet ison facing the apos; brutal massive coronary ejection Thanksgiving.	Comet ison faces l'apos; mass ejection coronale brutal Thanksgiving.
20	nasa host nov teleconference nov hangout discus comet	Nasa host nov nov nov conference call nov release discus comet.	Nasa host nov teleconference nov release discus comet.	Nasa host nov teleconference nov release discus comet.
20	comet ison best view comet century november	Comet is on the best comet November century view.	Comet is on comet's best view century November.	Comet is on the best view comet century November.
20	scientist await comet ison encounter sun	Scientists are waiting for it to meet the sun.	Scientists are waiting for that comet to meet the sun.	Scientists are waiting for the comet to meet the sun again.
20	ison update comet streak sun loose	Comet update.	Comet update.	This is a comet update.
20	comet ison survives bring spectacular sky	L' the comet's quillwork is surviving.	Isoetes of the comet is still surviving.	Isoetes of the comet lives on.
20	stargazer hope comet ison sighting	Stargazer hopes to be spotted comet.	Captain Stargazer hopes the comet will be spotted.	Stargazer hopes the comet gets spotted.
20	thanksgiving day witness celestial feast	On Thanksgiving Day, we are witnesses to a special heavenly feast.	On Thanksgiving Day we witness a heavenly feast.	On Thanksgiving we witness the feast of heaven.
20	icy comet survive encounter sun	An ice-cream comet that survives the meeting sun.	Ice comet survives meeting sun.	Ice comet survive the sun encounter.
20	solar storm slam ison rip tail worse nasa	Solar Storm hits is on the worst shredded tail.	The solar storm hits is on the worst torn tail nasa.	The solar storm hits is on the tail torn worse nasa.
20	comet ison latest nasa thanksgiving video comet perilous path	This comet is on the last dangerous path of the NASA Thanksgiving Comet.	Comet is on the final perilous path of NASA Thanksgiving Comet.	The comet is on the final, perilous path to NASA's Thanksgiving comet.
20	incoming comet ison lose tail thanksgiving sun storm	Comet incoming Ison loses storm-sun Thanksgiving tail.	Comet Comet incoming Ison loses tail Thanksgiving sun storm.	Comet incoming Ison loses tail Thanksgiving sun storm.
20	comet fan psyched celestial feast thanksgiving day	The comet fan has prepared the heavenly feast on Thanksgiving Day.	The comet fan prepared Thanksgiving's celestial feast.	The comet fan prepared the celestial feast on Thanksgiving.
20	icy comet survive close encounter sun	An ice-cream cone survives near the meeting sun.	Surviving ice comet near the meeting sun.	Ice comet survive near the sunshine.
20	comet hurtling sun spectacular sky	Comet sunshine.	You know, the sunshine of the comet.	The sun of the comet.
20	comet ison survive brush sun thursday	Comet Ison survives the brushy sunrise on Thursday.	Comet Ison survived the brushy sun on Thursday.	Comet Ison survives the brush sun Thursday.
20	comet ison approaching sun	The comet is approaching the Sun, and the comet is approaching the Sun.	Comet s' approaching sun.	The comet is approaching the sun.
20	welcoming comet century	The Century of the Welcoming Comet.	You know, the century of the welcoming comet.	The century of the welcoming comet.
20	comet ison nail biter	It's biting the nails.	Well, the comet's biting the nails.	The comet is biting nails.
20	awaits fate ison streak destiny sun	Wait for-you in the sun.	In the meantime, you wait-in the sun.	And in the meantime, wait for-you in the sun.
20	comet ison photographed nasa messenger mercury probe picture	Image from the NASA Mercury Probe, photographed by the comet ison.	Image from the NASA mercury probe photographed by ison comet.	NASA mercury probe image photographed by ison comet.
20	reuben fleet science center host viewing party comet ison	It's the only way to get a good view of the planet.	Reuben scientific center of the d&apos fleet; reception of comet d' observation.	Reuben fleets science center d' comet reception d' observation.
20	holiday comet bring amazing	Holiday Comet bring you amazing.	This holiday comet brings amazing.	Holiday comet bring awesome.
20	happen ison watch	Let's see.	That's what we'll see.	I'm sorry, but I don't think we should.
20	comet century buffeted solar wind	The comet's century has swept away the solar wind.	The comet's century swept the solar wind.	The comet's century swept the solar wind away from us.
20	comet ison update survive thursday sun bath	Update of Comet Isons Survive Thursday's Sun Bath.	Update comet isons survive Thursday's sun-bathing.	Comet isons update survive Thursday's sunbathing.
20	nasa call comet ison time capsule solar system birth	Nasa refers to the comet, Ison, as the time capsule that is the birthplace of the solar system.	Nasa called the comet Ison time capsule the birth of the solar system.	Nasa calls comet Ison time capsule birth of the solar system.
20	day perihelion comet ison appears good hea	Perihelion comet seems to be a good hea.	Well, the perihelion comet seems to be a good hea.	The perihelion comet appears to be a good hea.
20	survives close encounter sun comet ison light morning	Survives near sunlight comet comet ison morning light.	Survive the near sun comet comet ison morning light.	Survives the close encounter sun comet ison morning light.
20	thanksgiving roast spaaace comet ison face fiery sun death	Thanksgiving's roast comet faces sun-drenched death.	Thanksgiving roast comet faces death in the sun.	The Thanksgiving roast comet faces death in the sun.
20	comet astronomer wild ride day die day	The day when the Astronomer of a wild comet dies.	The day when the wild comet astronomer dies?	The day the wild comet astronomer dies.
20	comet ison nov update watch comet approaching sun	Comet is about to be discovered.	The comet is about to be discovered.	The comet is now on the verge of discovery.
20	comet heading sun thanksgiving day disintegrate	Comet's on its way to the anniversary.	The comet is on its way to the anniversary.	The comet is heading towards the day of birth.
20	eye sky ison stellar drive tomorrow	It's on stellar propulsion tomorrow.	The skies are on stellar propulsion tomorrow.	The sky is on stellar propulsion tomorrow.
20	comet ison earth spectacular holiday	Comet is on Earth vacation, spectacular.	Comet is on Earth's spectacular vacation.	Comet is a spectacular holiday on Earth.
20	comet century ison hold clue life earth	It's the first time I've ever seen a comet.	The century of the comet is now waiting for a clue.	The century of the comet awaits apos; a clue.
20	crossroad big creek comet viewing dec weather comet cooperate	Crossing the comet from the big, cove view of the weather comet.	It's a long walk across the comet from the big creek view of the meteorite comet.	Cross comet from big creek view of weather comet.
20	comet ison nears sun	It's close to the sun.	The comet is now close to the sun.	The comet is close to sun.
20	experience comet ison encounter sun week	Comet ison Experiment meets the sun week.	Comet ison experience meets the sun week.	Experiment comet ison meets sun week sun.
20	comet ison update thing happen thanksgiving	Thanksgiving is the time to update the comet ison.	The ison comet update will take place at Thanksgiving.	Comet ison update is at Thanksgiving.
20	comet displaying erratic fluctuation hea	A comet, showing an erratic fluctuation... a hea hea hea.	A comet showing fluctuation erratic... a hea hea.	A comet showing erratic fluctuation a hea hea hea.
20	comet ison closest sun tomorrow	The comet is the closest sunshine tomorrow.	Tomorrow's closest sun is the comet.	Comet's the closest sun tomorrow.
20	ison burn bright flame	The isons are burning a bright, shining flame.	The isons will burn a bright, bright flame.	Isons burn a bright, bright flame.
20	comet ison going amazing thanksgiving day	Comet's having a great Thanksgiving.	The comet is having the best Thanksgiving ever.	The comet is having a great Thanksgiving.
20	icy comet ison thanksgiving day close encounter sun	The ice comet is at Thanksgiving on the day that we meet the sun.	Well, the ice comet is on Thanksgiving the day the sun meets.	The ice comet's on thanksgiving the day the sun meets.
20	researcher forego holiday comet slingshot sun	The scientist has given up the sunshine of the holiday comet.	The researcher renounces the sunshine of the holiday comet.	The scientist renounces the holiday comet sunshine.
20	stargazer catch comet ison closest sun nov	Stargazer catches the comet's closest sunshine.	Stargazer catches comet is closest sunshine Nov.	Stargazer catches comet is closest sun Nov.
20	comet ison nearing sun break apart	Comet is about to be destroyed.	The comet is about to be destroyed.	The comet is about to be destroyed.
20	three question comet ison	Three more questions about Comet Ison.	Three questions about the comet Ison.	Three questions comet Ison.
20	wherefore art ison quick guide comet named	For this we need a guide.	That's why we need a guide.	It's a good idea to have a guide.
20	brightest comet calling	It's the best.	C&apos, is what we're best at.	It's just that it's the best thing ever.
20	comet ison cliffhanger	It's on Cliffhanger.	The comet is now on Cliffhanger.	The comet is on Cliffhanger!
20	astronomer divided comet ison	L&apos, the astronomer, has divided the comet into two parts.	L' astronomer has divided the comet in two.	L' astronomer divided the comet.
20	comet ison survive brush sun	Comet Ison survives the brushy sun.	Comet Ison, survive the brushy sun.	Comet Ison, survive the sunshine.
20	celestial comet century beckons	The Celestial Comet century awaits us.	The century of the celestial comet is at hand.	The century of the celestial comet awaits.
20	comet ison survive trip sun	Comet Ison has survived the sun.	Comet Ison survives the sun!	The comet survives the sun.
20	astronomer view comet ison jupiter mar	It is the largest planet in the world and the second largest in the world.	View from below; comet astronomer ison jupiter mar.	Astronomer comet ison jupiter mar.
20	comet ison nov update sun destroy comet century	Comet nov sun update ison destroy the comet century.	Comet ison nov sun update destroy the comet century.	Comet ison nov update sunshine destroy the century comet.
20	comet ison thanksgiving encounter sun watch sun	Comet is at the apostle; Thanksgiving meets sun.	The comet is at the apos; Thanksgiving meets the sun.	The sun is the sun, and the comet is at the apostle, where it meets the sun.
20	comet ison beat odds watch superstar climactic scene	Comet Ison has beaten the odds.	Comet Ison beat odds.	Well, Comet Ison beat the odds.
20	comet dance sun death mixed signal	Comet-sun dance, dead mixed signal.	Mixed signal dead sun comet dance.	Comet sun death mixed signal dance.
20	increase chance comet ison	Increase the probability of a comet.	Increase the probability of a comet.	Increase the probability of a comet becoming a comet.
20	comet ison percent chance surviving encounter sun	Comet is one hundred percent more likely to survive the encounter sun.	Comet is a hundred percent chance of surviving the meeting sun.	Comet is ison percent chance of surviving the meeting sun.
20	comet ison happen reach sun	The comet is now on the point of reaching the sun.	Comet is about to reach the sun.	The comet is about to reach the sunshine.
20	scientist suspect comet ison fall apart	Scientist thinks comet s&apos is collapsed.	The scientist thinks the comet is s' it's collapsed.	The scientist thinks the comet is collapsed.
20	comet ison provide holiday treat sky	Comet ison offers you a vacation in the middle of the sky, right in front of you.	Comet ison gives you the perfect vacation in midair.	Comet ison offers you a sky holiday.
20	comet visible december	Visible in December.	It's called a comet.	This comet is visible in December.
20	comet dance sun spectacle dud	The Comet's Dancing, c&apos, is the sunshine.	The dance of the comet, c' is the sun.	The comet dance is the sun.
20	comet ison edge closer surface sun	L&apos, the angle of the comet, is closer to the surface.	L' angle of comet is closer to the surface.	L' angle of comet closer to surface.
20	comet ison fate clear thursday	Well, the comet's on a clear course on Thursday.	The comet is now on a clear course on Thursday.	The comet is on clear Thursday.
21	los angeles lakers washin wizard nba highlight	Los Angeles Lakers Wizard wash NBA peaking point.	Los Angeles Lakers is the highest level of NBA wizard washing.	Los Angeles lakers washing in the NBA wizard peak.
21	improve washin wizard bench	I want to upgrade the laundry magicians' bench.	You know, improving the laundry magicians' bench.	Improve the bench of laundry magicians.
21	gallery view basketball photo	Gallery see photo-basket-photoball.	Gallery see photo basketball-photo ball.	Photo Gallery see photo basketball game-photoball.
21	awaiting bryant return lakers fall wizard	Waiting for Bryant, magician of the fall.	While you wait for Bryant's return, the Wizard of Fall.	Waiting for Bryant's return, fall magician.
21	kobe bryant apologize contract	Kobe Bryant apologizes for the contract.	Kobe Bryant apologizes for the contract.	Kobe bryant apologizes for the contract.
21	contract kobe	Kobe contract.	It's a Kobe contract.	Uh, Kobe contract.
21	preview lakers wizard	Just predict the Laker magician.	Forewarn the Lakers magician.	Predict the wizard of the Lakers.
21	lakers finish wizard pau gasol contract	The Lakers are finishing magician Pau Gasol's contract.	And the lakers are finishing the magician's contract, Pau Gasol.	The lakers are finishing the contract with magician Pau Gasol.
21	lakers rally lose washin	The wash is lost at the laker rally.	The laker rally loses the wash!	The rally lakers lose the wash.
21	lakers net preview	Lakers net preview, please.	Lakers' net preview.	Lakers net preview.
21	kobe bryant lakers wall	Kobe Bryant Lakers Mur.	Kobe Bryant Lakers wall.	Kobe bryant lakers wall.
21	john wall stay hot wizard defeat lakers	John Wall, stay on top of the wizardry and defeat the lakers.	John Wall stay a wizard to defeat the lakers.	John wall stay hot wizard defeating lakers.
21	los angeles lakers washin wizard pm	Los Angeles Lakers wash the wizard.	Los Angeles Lakers will wash the magician.	Los Angeles lakers will wash the magician.
21	cup wednesday	Wednesday cup.	Cup, Wednesday.	Uh, cup on Wednesday.
21	loss continues season	The losses will continue into the season.	Losses continue during the season.	The season continues to lose.
21	nene feel wine career high	I don't get the impression that the wine's career is high.	I don't feel like wine's career is high.	I do not feel that the wine career is high.
21	kobe confident lakers money sign free agent	You know, Kobe trusting Lakers silver signing free agent.	Kobe trusting Lakers silver signing free agent.	Kobe trusting silver Lakers to sign free agent.
21	deal bryant wall lakers	Just do business with Bryant Wall Lakers.	Do business with Bryant Wall Lakers.	Do business with Bryant wall lakers.
21	lakers washin wizard live stream watch watch online	Lakers winnin wizard live monitor online.	Lakers washin wizard live stream watch online.	Lakers washin wizard live stream watch online.
21	wizard edge lakers	Witch-edge lakers.	The lakers on the witch's edge.	You know, lakers on the edge of witches.
21	nba tuesday highlight	Tuesday night's show, folks.	Tuesday night is the highlight of the show.	Tuesday night, the highlight of the show.
21	lakers wizard watch live stream online listen live coverage	Lakers wizard watching live stream live hear live coverage.	Lakers wizard watch live stream live and listen live to live coverage.	Lakers wizard watch live stream live listen live coverage live.
21	wall net wizard beat lakers	The Mural Net Wizard beats the lakers.	Well, the wall-net wizard beat the lakers.	The wall net wizard beat the lakers.
21	nba betting odds pick easy win wizard lakers hawk magic	Nba bet odds choose easily win wizard wizard hawkers hawk wizard magic.	Nba bet odds choose easy win wizard Lakers hawk magic.	Nba bet odds choose easily win wizard wizard lakers hawk magic.
21	gorman contract extension amount kobe bryant	Extension of the Kobe-Bryant Gorman contract.	Extension of the contract Gorman mounting kobe bryant.	Gorman contract extension for kobe bryant.
21	pau gasol counting contract extension lakers	Pau Gasol counts the number of extensions of the contract.	Pau Gasol counting the contract extension.	Pau Gasol counting contract extension.
21	rapid reaction wizard lakers	Lakers, Lakers, Lakers, Lakers, Lakers, Lakers.	Rapid reaction Lakers magician lakers.	Quick reaction Lakers magician lakers.
21	lakers wizard john wall time time	Lakers wizard John time-wall John time-wall.	Lakers wizard John time wall John time wall.	Lakers wizard John time wall John time wall.
21	washin wizard los angeles lakers dan free nba	I'd like to thank you very much for your time.	Washin wizard the angeles lakers in freebase.	Washin wizard the angeles lakers in free download.
21	lakers lose system working	Lakers lose the system while they're working, right?	The lakers will lose the system while they're working.	And lakers lose the system while they're working.
21	kobe bryant defends contract basketball	Kobe Bryant has been defending the-ball basketball contract.	Kobe Bryant defends a basketball contract-ball.	Kobe Bryant defends basketball contract-ball.
21	college football pick wmu niu nba pick college basketball pick	University football chose wmu niu nba choose the basketball-university ball choose.	University football choose wmu niu nba choose basketball-university ball choose.	University football choose wmu niu nba choose basketball-university basketball choose.
21	lakers john wall wizard	John Wall Wizard lakers.	Lakers, John Wall Wizard.	Lakers john wall wizard.
21	nene wall soaring revived wizard	Just don't worry.	Don't worry about it.	No, no, no, no, no, no, no.
21	instant analysis wizard lakers	L' instantaneous analysis, laker wizard.	L' instantaneous analysis laker magician.	L' instant analysis magician lakers.
21	lakers fan appreciate pau gasol	Pau gasol is popular with laker lovers.	Laker lovers enjoy pau gasol.	Laker lovers appreciate pau gasol.
21	lakers continue road trip brooklyn	The lakers are still on their journey to Brooklyn.	The lakers continue their journey to Brooklyn, New York.	The lakers continue their Brooklyn trip.
21	kobe bryant ink year extension	Extension of time; Year of Ink; Bryant Kobe Ink.	Extension of time; year of preparation; bryan kobe ink.	Extension of the year; year of application; kobe bryant ink.
21	lakers road struggle continue loss wizard	The lakers on the roadway are still fighting.	The lakers on the road are still fighting.	The lakers on the road keep fighting.
21	lakers wizard preview	Preview lakers wizard.	Lakers wizard preview.	Uh, lakers wizard preview.
21	game wizard lakers preview csn	The game's magicians give a glimpse of csn.	The magicians of the game will give you a glimpse of csn.	The magicians of the game give a glimpse of csn.
21	wizard hold lakers gif	The Lakers are being held on a platter by a warlock.	A wizard has the Lakers on a silver platter.	A wizard holds Lakers on a platter.
21	lakers wizard live stream tv schedule betting odds	Lakers live stream TV wizard program bets on the odds.	Lakers wizard live stream TV program the odds bets.	Lakers wizard live stream TV book odds bets.
21	lakers fail john wall wizard loss	The Lakers lose John Wall Wizard.	The lakers lose to John Wall Wizard.	The lakers lose John Wall Wizard.
21	lakers talked pau gasol extension	The Lakers have been talking about an extension of the original Pau Gasol.	The lakers spoke of the apos; an extension of Pau Gasol.	The lakers talked about an extension of Pau Gasol.
21	los angeles lakers streak snapped wizard	Between them is a sorcerer.	The apostles; a dapos; between them is a sorcerer.	It's not like we don't know what we're talking about.
21	wizard john wall thrill dunk lakers	The wizard John Wall makes the dunk lakers' fans shudder.	The wizard John Wall has made dunk lakers lovers shudder.	The wizard John Wall makes dunk lakers thrill.
21	kobe bryant lakers nba loya cost money	Kobe Bryant Lakers nba loyala was expensive; money.	Kobe Bryant Lakers nba loyala cost money.	Kobe Bryant Lakers nba loya cost money.
21	bryant defy odds comeback	Bryant defies the return odds.	Bryant defies the odds of getting back.	Bryant defies the odds back.
21	mailing enemy los angeles lakers	I want to send some of the enemy lakers to Los Angeles.	To send enemy lakers to Los Angeles.	Send enemy lakers to Los Angeles.
21	net lakers face night thanksgiving	Net lakers are facing Thanksgiving at night.	Net lakers face Thanksgiving night.	The net lakers face Thanksgiving at night.
21	john wall threw incredible degree dunk lakers gif	John Wall has launched an amazing new level of dunk lakers gif.	John Wall pitched an amazing degree of dunk lakers gif.	John Wall pitched an amazing degree of dunk lakers gif today.
21	pau gasol acknowledges financial sacrifice remain lakers	Pau gasol has acknowledged that financial sacrifices are still lakers.	Pau gasol recognizes that financial sacrifices are lakers.	Pau gasol recognizes that financial sacrifices remain lakers.
21	lakers wizard live stream watch online free tuesday	Lakers Wizard will be watching the live feed on Tuesday.	Lakers wizard watch live the feed online for free Tuesday.	Lakers wizard watch live stream online free Tuesday.
21	nba washin los angeles lakers	Los Angeles Lakers.	NBA washin Los Angeles Lakers.	Uh, nba washin los angeles lakers.
21	hilario wall score wizard beat lakers	Wizard Hilario Wall Score beating the lakers.	Hilario Wall Score sorcerer beating the lakers.	Hey, Hilario Wall Score wizard to beat lakers.
21	blo thought kobe extension	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Blo thought extension kobe kobe.	Blo thought kobe extension thinking kobe kobe.
21	wall nene lead wizard lakers	The walls are not made of witches made of lead.	The wall doesn't have lead witches in it.	The wall doesn't consist of lead witches.
21	tuesday sport	Tuesday's sport.	Tuesday sports.	The tuesday sport.
21	pau gasol slick layup gif	Pau gasol gif slick gif implementation gif.	Pau gasol slick gif setup gif.	Pau gasol slick gif setup.
21	preview lakers washin wizard	Preview wash Lakers Wizard.	Preview Lakers wash Wizard.	Preview lakers washing wizard.
21	game report wizard lakers	This is the Lakers Wizard Game Report.	Laker witches game report.	Lakers wizard game report.
21	kobe injury rehab relit fire	Kobe rehabilitates fire.	Kobe's fire rehabilitation.	Kobe rehab puts the fire back together.
21	wizard lakers	Wizard lakers.	They're magic lakers.	You know, magic lakers.
21	christmas day coded kobe bryant return los angeles	Kobe Bryant's Christmas Day returns to Los Angeles.	Kobe Bryant Christmas Day returns to Los Angeles!	Christmas Day coded Kobe Bryant returns to Los Angeles.
21	lakers week prediction	Laker Week prediction.	Forecast of Laker Week.	Lakers week prediction.
21	kobe bryant defends contract twitter rant	Kobe Bryant has defended the Twitter ranting contract.	Kobe Bryant defends Twitter ranting contract.	Kobe Bryant defends the twitter laughing contract.
21	nothin net kobe deal bad business	There is no network Kobe Kobe Kobe T' has quite a lot of business.	You don't have a Kobe Kobe Kobe T&apos network; you don't have a lot of business.	It's a good place to start, but it's a good place to start.
21	nene steal ball dunk gif	Nene steal dunk gif ball.	Nene steal ball dunk gif ball.	Nene steal ball dunk gif ball.
21	kobe bryant paid lakers explains twitter	Kobe Bryant has been paying lakers for Twitter.	Kobe Bryant has paid lakers for Twitter.	Kobe bryant paid lakers for Twitter.
21	lakers pau gasol concerned contract	Lakers pau gasol.com.	Lakers pau gasol contract concerned.	Lakers pau gasol contract concerned.
21	wizard lakers preview return bean burrito	Wizard Lakers has been previewing the return of the bean burrito.	Wizard Lakers predicts the return of the bean burrito.	Wizard Lakers predicts the bean burrito will return.
21	bryant secured lakers	Bryant secure the lakers.	Bryant's secured the lakers.	Bryant's secured the lakers now.
21	wall stay hot wizard beat lakers	Warlock wall beating lakers.	Wall stay hot sorcerer beating the lakers.	Wall stay hot wizard to beat the lakers.
21	john wall find trevor ariza jam gif	John Wall finding Trevor Ariza jam gif.	John Wall find Trevor Ariza's jam gif.	John wall find Trevor Ariza jam gif.
21	nba kobe braynt forward return	And Nba Kobe braynt back to the front.	Nba Kobe braynt braynt back to front.	Nba kobe braynt back to the front.
21	john wall speed athleticism throwing monster dunk	John Wall Speed Throw Monster dunk.	John Wall Speed Athletics throw monster dunk.	John Wall athletic speed throw monster dunk.
21	shootaround report lakers extend streak wizard	The elite snipers are witches.	The snipers of the elite are witches.	They're not the only ones.
21	los angeles lakers washin wizard live stream watch free online	Los Angeles Lakers lavage wizard will watch the free live feed online.	Los Angeles Lakers wash wizard watch the free live feed online.	Los Angeles Lakers wash wizard watch the free live stream online.
21	lakers net wednesday game preview tv schedule betting	Lakers net Wednesday preview game TV preview bet program.	Lakers net Wednesday game preview TV bet program.	Lakers net Wednesday game preview TV betting program.
21	kobe bryant defends los angeles lakers extension insists lakers plenty	Kobe Bryant is a champion of the Los Angeles Lakers Expansion.	Kobe Bryant defends the apos; Los Angeles Lakers expansion.	Kobe Bryant defends the apos; extension of Los Angeles Lakers.
21	kobe defending extension lakers cap strategy	Kobe defending Laker cap strategy.	Kobe defending the Lakers cap strategy.	Kobe defending the cap strategy of the Lakers.
21	video wizard john wall throw dunk transition lakers	Video magician John Wall throws transition lakers.	Video magician John Wall launches dunk transition lakers.	Video wizard John Wall throws dunk transition lakers.
21	brooklyn net los angeles lakers peter free nba basketball	Brooklyn net Los Angeles Lakers Peter-basketball NBA.	Brooklyn net Los Angeles Lakers Peter free basketball,-ball NBA.	Brooklyn net Los Angeles Lakers Peter free basketball-ball NBA.
21	lakers beat lose wall wizard	The Lost Wall Wizard is beaten by the Lakers.	Lakers beat the wizard of the lost wall.	The lakers beat the Lost Wall Wizard.
21	gasol contract extension talk	Talk about extending the gas contract.	Talk about the gas contract extension.	Talk about contract extension for gasoline.
21	lakers kobe bryant passionately defends contract extension	Lakers Kobe Bryant is a passionate supporter of the idea of extending the contract.	Lakers Kobe Bryant passionately defends the extension of this contract.	Lakers Kobe Bryant passionately defends the contract extension.
21	john wall breakaway dunk lakers video	Video of John Wall's Dunk Lakers game.	Video of John Wall's dunk lakers circuit breakers.	John Wall's dunk lakers breakers video.
21	john wall nene score apiece leading wizard lakers	John Wall nene, he scores one point per person.	John Wall nene gets one point for each person.	John Wall nene scores one point per person.
21	lebron james free agent rumor heat star dirk nowitzki pau gasol top	Lebron James free agent heat rumor star rider Nowitzki pau gasol top.	Lebron James free agent heat rumor star dirk Nowitzki pau gasol top.	Lebron James free agent heat rumor star nowitzki pau gasol top dirk Nowitzki.
21	carmelo anthony kobe bryant pinched	I got Carmelo Anthony Kobe Bryant pinched.	Carmelo Anthony Kobe Bryant pinched.	Anthony carmelo kobe bryant pinched.
21	kobe confident lakers money free agent	Kobe trusting Lakers to be a moneyless agent.	Kobe trusting Lakers money agent without money without agent.	Kobe trusting Lakers money agent without agent.
21	lakers fall wizard road	The lakers have fallen on the witch's road.	And the lakers fall on the witch's road.	The lakers fall on the road of witches.
21	kobe bryant driven winning nba title	Kobe won the NBA championship.	Kobe Bryant was the NBA Champion.	Kobe Bryant won the NBA championship at the 2010 Winter Olympics.
21	wall lead wiz lakers	Painted, magical lackeys.	Magical walled lead lackeys.	Magic wall lead lackeys.
21	john wall claim nba best point guard	John Wall is now claiming the NBA's top player.	John Wall wants to be the best point guard in the NBA, right?	John Wall claims the best point guard in the NBA.
21	nba news player news update	N.B.A.L. is the newest N.B.A. news player.	NBA news player news update.	NBA news player news update.
21	game recap late turnover cost lakers fourth straight victory	This was the fourth time the lakers had won the game, and the second time the lakers had won the game.	The delay in game renewal cost the fourth consecutive win at the Lakers.	To recap, the delay in renewing the game cost the lakers their fourth consecutive win.
21	lakers rumor kobe bryant return delayed lakers	Rumor has it that the return of Kobe Bryant has delayed the return of the Lakers.	Rumor has it that Kobe Bryant's return delayed the return of the Lakers.	Well, rumor has it that Kobe Bryant's return delayed the Lakers' return.
21	nba roundup golden state track	We are now in the process of scouring the runway.	This is the first time you'll be able to find out what's going on.	Nba rake track d' or d' state d&apos.
21	second thought	Done thinking.	Thinking about it.	On second thought.
21	lakers talk pau gasol contract extension	The Lakers are also talking about a further extension of the Pau Gasol contract.	"The lakers spoke of ""dapos""; an extension of the Pau Gasol contract."	The lakers talk about apos; an extension of Pau Gasol's contract.
21	john wall stay hot lead wizard lakers	John Wall stay warm Lakers magician hot lead.	John Wall stay hot Lakers wizard of hot lead.	John Wall stay hot Lakers hot lead magician.
21	nba john wall lead washin wizard win lakers	Nba John Washin Wizard winning Lakers.	Nba John Wall Washin Wizard winning Lakers.	Nba John Wall Washin Wizard to win Lakers.
21	kobe bryant aim critic contract extension	Kobe Bryant has been critical of the extension of the critical contract.	Kobe bryant was critical of the extension of the critical contract.	Kobe bryant is critical of the critical contract extension.
21	wizard lakers minus bradley beal washin defeat los angeles	Bradley Beal Lakers and Wizard Lakers defeated Los Angeles.	Wizard Lakers minus Bradley Beal Lavage, beating Los Angeles.	Wizard lakers minus bradley beal wash beat los angeles.
21	game preview washin wizard los angeles lakers key match	Preview gameplay of Washin Wizard Los Angeles Lakers Key Match.	Preview of the game Washin Wizard Los Angeles Lakers Key Match.	"Preview of the game ""Washin Wizard"" in Los Angeles."
21	los angeles lakers washin wizard free live stream	Los Angeles Lakers wash free wizard live stream.	Los Angeles Lakers washing wizard free live stream.	Los Angeles lakers washing wizard free live stream.
21	kobe bryant happy extension nears return	Kobe bryant-happy extension soon to return.	Kobe bryant happy extension soon to return.	Kobe bryant happy extension soon back.
21	john wall throw jam gif	John Wall, throws jelly gif.	John Wall is throwing gif jam.	John Wall throws gif jam!
21	kobe bryant twitter defend contract extension	Kobe bryant defends the apos; extension of the contract.	Kobe bryant twitter defends the apos; extension of the contract.	Kobe bryant twitter defends the contract extension.
21	kobe week return	We're back from Kobe Week.	Return from Kobe week.	Kobe week returns.
21	kobe bryant defends contract extension twitter	Kobe Bryant has been defending the apos; extending the contract on Twitter.	Kobe Bryant defends apos; extension of contract on Twitter.	Kobe Bryant defends apos; contract extension on Twitter.
21	los angeles lakers washin wizard tuesday game preview tv	L.A. Lakers Wizard Wash on Tuesday night.	Los Angeles Lakers Wizard Washing Tuesday game preview TV.	L.A. Lakers wash in wizard Tuesday game preview TV.
21	wall time los angeles lakers washin wizard live streaming	L&apos, when the Los Angeles Lakers were washing the magician live.	L&apos, a time when the Lakers of Los Angeles were washing the wizard's body.	L&apos, when the Los Angeles Lakers were live washing the magician.
21	nba wall nene help wizard edge lakers	N'ba mur n'en n'aider wizard edge lakers.	Nba mur nene help wizard edge lakers.	Nba mur nene help wizard edge lakers.
21	wizard beat lakers northern illinois unbeaten goal third lift star	Wizard defeated undefeated Lakers North illinois third ascent star.	Wizard defeated the undefeated Lakers North illinois to win the undefeated third ascent star.	Wizard beat Lakers North illinois undefeated to the third straight ascent.
21	nene best kobe bryant impression wizard sloppy win lakers	Nene best sloppy wizard imitation bryant kobe winning lakers.	Nene best kobe bryant wizard imitation sloppy win lakers.	Nene best kobe bryant imitation wizard sloppy win lakers.
21	lakers pau gasol talk contract extension	Lakers pau pom pom pom pom pom pom pom pom pom pom.	Lakers pau gasol talk about extension of contract.	Lakers pau gasol talk contract extension.
21	bryant happy extension nears return	Bryant's merry addition should be back soon.	Bryant's merry extension will be back soon.	Bryant's happy extension will be back soon.
21	pau gasol call season challenging difficu	Pau essence saison d' difficult call.	Pau essence season d' difficult call.	Pau essence season d' difficult call.
21	lakers gm belief team title contender kobe bryant	The Lakers won the gold medal in the Kobe Bryant team of believers.	The Lakers won the title of L&apos, a team of believers named Kobe Bryant.	The Lakers won the title of L' believing team Kobe Bryant.
21	wall magic lead wizard win	The Magus of Wall Magic wins.	The wizard of wall magic is the winner.	The wall magic magician wins.
21	lakers wizard pmet	Laker magician, Pmet.	The magician of the Lakers, Pmet.	Hey, Laker magician, Pmet.
21	wizard lakers final score john wall nene combine point	Wizard Lakers, final score, John Wall nene, combines point.	Wizard Lakers final score John Wall nene combines point.	Wizard Lakers final score John Wall nene combine point.
21	wizard john wall making statement play	John Wall, the magician who plays the statement.	Magician John Wall plays the statement.	The wizard John Wall plays the statement.
21	john wall throw monster dunk lakers	John Wall throws the world's monstrous dunk lakers.	John Wall throws dunk lakers monstrous.	John wall throws monster dunk lakers.
21	nene wall lead wizard lakers	Magician's head magic laker wall.	Nene wall of the magic lakers of the magician head.	Nene wall of magic wizard head lakers.
21	wizard lakers game open thread	Well, the witch lakers are opening the line.	The witches' lakers will open the line.	Witch lakers open the line.
21	nba wait week kobe bryant	It's Kobe Bryant Week for the NBA.	The NBA's expecting Kobe Bryant Week.	Well, the NBA is looking forward to Kobe Bryant Week.
21	polarizing kobe bryant contract extension	Extension of Kobe Bryant's Contract.	Extension of Kobe Bryant's contract.	Extension of contract for Kobe Bryant.
22	dancing star champ amber riley season journey	Amber Riley season's dance champion.	Amber Riley season's dance champion.	Dance champ of the season Amber Riley.
22	glee star amber riley win dancing star super chuffed	Glee club star, Amber Riley, wins the dance star, super-happy.	Glee star Amber Riley wins the dance star, super-happy girl.	Glee star Amber Riley wins the dance star super merry.
22	dancing star corbin bleu amber riley jack	Corbin Blue dancer Amber Riley Jack.	Uh, star dancer Corbin Blue Amber Riley Jack.	Rock star Corbin Blue Amber Riley Jack.
22	dancing star comedian bill engvall booted night final	Bill, the leading dance comedian, has just canceled tonight's finale.	Dance star Bill canceled the evening finale.	Bill, the star dance comedian, canceled the evening finale.
22	dancing star finale jack osbourne corbin bleu	This is the final dance star Jack Osbourne Corbin blue.	Final dance star Jack Osbourne Blue Corbin.	Final dance star Jack Osbourne Blue Corbin.
22	amber derek win dancing star	Derek Amber won the dance star.	Amber Derek won the dance star.	Amber Derek won the dance star today.
22	amber riley win dancing star	Amber Riley has won the dance star.	Amber Riley gets the dance star.	Amber riley wins the dance star.
22	glee amber riley fight pain win dancing star	Glee Amber Riley, fighting the pain, winning the dance star.	Glee Amber Riley fighting the pain win dancing star.	Glee Amber Riley fight pain win dancing star.
22	dancing star advancing final	We got a dancing star moving up to the finals.	A dancing star moving on to finals.	A dancing star advancing to the finals.
22	amber riley win dwts	Riley wins DTS.	Amber Riley's winning DTS.	Well, Amber Riley wins DTS.
22	dancing star reality set bill engvall eliminated	Bill Engvall, star of dance and reality, has just been eliminated.	Bill Engvall, star of dance and reality, got voted out.	Dance and reality star Bill Engvall has been eliminated.
22	glee amber riley win dancing star watch final performance	I mean, Glee Amber Riley wins the dance star, look at the final performance.	Glee Amber Riley wins dance star, look at the final performance.	Glee Amber Riley wins the dance star, watch the final performance!
22	dancing star recap finale winner	The dance star is the final wrap-up winner.	The dance star is the winner of the final recap.	Dance star is the winner of the final recap.
22	dancing star winner amber riley feel dream watch	The dance star's winner, Amber Riley, feels just like a dream.	The dance star winner, Amber Riley, feels like a dream.	Dance star winner Amber Riley feels like a dream.
22	amber riley feel immensely winning dancing star	Amber Riley feels like she's the world's greatest ballet star.	Amber Riley feels like the star of the winning dance.	Amber Riley feels she's the immensely winning dance star.
22	dancing star winner	Spinning dance star.	Winning dance star.	The star of the winning dance.
22	amber riley win dancing star season watch winning	Amber Riley wins the season's gold-winning dance stars.	Amber Riley wins the All-Star Shows season winner.	Amber Riley wins the dance star season showwinner.
22	dancing star eliminee bill engvall finalist deserve win	Dancer star Eliminee Bill, the world's finalist, deserves to win.	Dancer star Eliminee Bill engvall finalists deserve to win.	The dancing star Eliminee Bill engvall finalist deserves to win.
22	bill engvall boot dwts	Bill engvall bootstrap.	Bill engvall boot dwts.	Bill engvall boot dwts.
22	dancing star recap final scored bill engvall exit	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the first time I've seen it.	Review of the final dance stars marked Bill engvall out.	Final dance star recap says Bill engvall released.
22	monday tv glee actor poised dance floor victory	L&apos, part of Monday's TV choir, won the gold medal on the dance floor.	L&apos, the actor in Monday's TV choir, has won the dance floor.	L&apos, actor of Monday's TV choir won the dance floor victory.
22	sharon osbourne ditch factor finalist sam bailey comfort son jack	Sharon Osbourne, finalist factor sam bailey, comfort son Jack.	Sharon Osbourne finalist factor sam bailey comfort son Jack.	Sharon Osbourne finalist sam bailey comfort son Jack.
22	dancing star final mirrorball trophy	Final trophy of the Mirror Ball of the dance star.	Dance star's final mirror ball trophy.	The final trophy of the dance star's mirror ball.
22	dancing star finale amber riley bill engvall eliminated	The last, Amber Riley Bill Engvall, has been eliminated.	The last female dancer, Amber Riley Bill Engvall, has been eliminated.	And the last dancer, Amber Riley Bill Engvall, has been eliminated.
22	dancing star winner finale reveals winning contestant	The final of the winner of the dance star's final will reveal the winner of the contest.	The winner of the dance star announces the winner of the competition.	Dance star winner's final reveals the contest winner.
22	dwts bill engvall call competition enjoyable thing life	Dspts Bill engvall will call the competition the pleasant thing to live.	Dspts Bill engvall call the contest pleasant thing enjoyable life.	Dspts Bill engvall call the pleasant competition enjoyable thing to live.
22	dwts finale recap bill engvall competition	Final DL final draft law engvall eng engvall engvall competition.	DL final draft eng engvall eng engvall competition.	Last DL final draft law engvall competition engvall.
22	amber riley crowned winner dancing star	Amber Riley has just been crowned the star-winner dancer.	Amber Riley was crowned the winner of the prima ballerina.	Amber Riley was crowned star winner.
22	karina smirnoff dwts blog food sleep practice	Karina Smirnoff blogs about eating sleep.	Karina Smirnoff writes a blog about the practice of sleep eating.	Karina writes a blog about the practice of food sleep.
22	monday tv glee actor poised dance floor victory	L&apos, part of Monday's TV choir, won the gold medal on the dance floor.	L&apos, the actor in Monday's TV choir, has won the dance floor.	L&apos, actor of Monday's TV choir won the dance floor victory.
22	dancing star recap finale winner	The dance star is the final wrap-up winner.	The dance star is the winner of the final recap.	Dance star is the winner of the final recap.
22	dancing star final talk competing mirrorball	Dance star, final, competition, mirror ball.	The dance star, the final, the competition, mirror ball.	The star of the dance, the finals, the competition, the mirror ball.
22	dwts recap final three	Complete the three-point balance sheet.	Finish with three points.	Make the final three point balance.
22	dancing star joke bill engvall	It's Bill Engvall, a dance star.	Bill Engvall, a dance star.	Bill Engvall, a dancing star.
22	amber riley win dancing title	Amber Riley has won the title.	Amber Riley won the dancer's title.	She won the title of dancer.
22	abc dancing star season crown winner	Crown Winner of the Abb Dance Star Season.	Winner of the crown of the abc dance star season.	Abbott Dance Star season crown winner.
22	dancing star finalist open emotional finale journey	Final dance star, final emotional journey, open.	Finalist dance star, final emotional journey open.	Finalist dance star, open emotional final journey.
22	dancing star season finale review	Celebrity season finale.	Final review of the season for dance stars.	Final dance star season review.
22	dancing star crown amber riley derek hough champion	The dance star, crown d' amber Derek Hough Champion.	Dance star, crown d'apos, amber Derek Hough Champion.	It's the crowning jewel of the crown, the star of the dance, and the amber riley Derek Hough Champion.
22	season mirror ball trophy winner dancing star video	Video of the season's Mirror Ball Award-winning dance star.	Video of the dance star who won the season's mirror ball trophy.	Video of the dancing star winning the mirror ball trophy of the season.
22	dancing star night season	The Night Dance Stars Season.	This is the night dance star season.	Night dancing star season.
22	dancing star recap crowned season champion	The star of the dance sums up the title of Champion of the season.	The dance star recapitulates the title of the season's champion.	The dance star recounts the season's champion title.
22	dancing star season winner	Winner of the Dance Star Season.	Winner of dance star season.	Dance star season winner.
22	bill engvall emma slater booted dwts	It's the only way I'm going to be able to do that.	Bill engvall emmes slater boot dwts.	Bill engvall emma slater boot dwts.
22	dancing star winner amber riley glee actress win season	L&apos, starring dancer and dancer Amber Riley Glee wins the season.	L&apos, the winning actress of dance star Amber Riley Glee, won the season with a silver medal.	The season was won by L&apos, the winning actress of dance star Amber Riley Glee.
22	dancing star final insight contestant	The dance star will enter the final contest of insight.	The star of the dance enters the final insight contest.	Dance star enters final insight contest.
22	dancing star reveals final three	The last three are revealed by the dance star.	And the dance star reveals the last three.	Dance star reveals the last three.
22	dancing star recap final	Final recapitulation of dance stars.	Final recapitulation of the dance stars.	Dance stars final recap.
22	photo flash dancing star season finale	Final of the season stars of the flash dance photo.	Final of the season of the stars of the photo flash dance.	Celebrity season finale of the flash dance photo.
22	dancing star mirror ball trophy	Trophée de miroir étoile Dansante.	Star-dancing mirror ball trophy.	Mirror ball dancing star trophy.
22	carrie ann inaba white hot dancing star finale outfit detail	Carrie Ann Inaba, white hot-dancing star, keeps-final dress.	Carrie Ann Inaba, white hot dance star, has-final dress.	And Carrie Ann Inaba, star of the white hot dance, keeps-final dress.
22	glee amber riley win dancing star	Glee Amber Riley wins the dance star.	Glee Amber Riley's gonna win the dance star.	Glee Amber Riley is going to win the dance star award.
22	dancing star winner amber riley	Dance-star winner, Amber Riley.	The winner of the dance star, Amber Riley.	The winner of dance star Amber Riley.
22	dancing star season finale recap pain confetti rain	Final of the season's dance stars recapitulates pain, rainstorm confetti.	The finale of the season of dance celebrity pain recapitulates rain confetti.	Dance star season finale sums up pain rain confetti.
22	dancing star finale winner	The star of the dance is the winner of the finale.	Dance star is the winner of the final round.	The dance star is the finale winner.
22	dancing star watch winner	Winner of the dancing star's watch.	Winner of the dancing star watch, huh?	Dancing star watch winner.
22	rising hope helped lift riley dancing title	She is also a member of the Canadian Dance Hall of Fame, and a member of the Canadian Dance Hall of Fame.	The reawakening of the hope led to Riley winning the title of dancer.	Renewed hope helped Riley win the title of dancer.
22	bill engvall eliminated dancing star	Bill Engvall got rid of the dance star, right?	Bill Engvall has eliminated the dance star.	Bill Engvall eliminated star of the dance.
22	dancing star spoiler dwts season	Spoiler of the dance star is there for the season.	The dance star's spoiler hosts the season.	The spoiler of the dance star lodges the season.
22	tuesday tv pick dancing star finale abc	On Tuesday, we'll have a live-action pick-up.	Tuesday, pick-up dance star final abc.	Tuesday, tv pick dance star final abc.
22	dancing star champ crowned season	He's the best dancer of the season, he's the best.	Dance Champion of the season crowned champion.	This season's dancing champion crowned champion.
22	dancing star pick season champion amber riley corbin bleu	Champion of the peak dance season, Blue Amber Riley Corbin.	Blue Amber Riley Corbin, the champion of the peak dance season.	The peak dance season champion, blue Amber Riley Corbin.
22	dancing star season recap week eleven performance finale	A review of the season of the dance stars, at the end of the eleventh week.	Dance-star season review, end of week 11.	Review of the dance star season, week 11.
22	amber riley crowned dancing star winner	Amber Riley has just been crowned the star-winner dancer.	Amber Riley was crowned the winner of the prima ballerina.	Amber Riley was crowned star winner.
22	dancing star finale mirror ball	The Mirror Ball of the Final Dance Star.	The final dancing star's mirror ball.	The mirror ball of the dancing star finale.
22	dancing star recap packing ahead finale	Dance stars preparing for the finale.	Review of dance stars preparing for the finale.	A recap of the dance stars preparing for the finale.
22	dancing star recap winner revealed	Recap of Dance Star Revealed.	Well, the dance star's recap has been revealed.	Dance star recap revealed.
22	dwts champ amber riley better shape starting	Dreste champion d' best-looking Riley from the start.	Stay the champion of apos; amber Riley better shape from the start.	Dreste champion d' amber Riley better shape from the start.
22	dancing final boot	Last shoe dancing.	To dance the last shoe.	You know, dancing the last shoe.
22	dancing star finale final	Dance star's final, huh?	Dance star final.	Final dance star event.
22	glee star dancing star trophy	Trophy Glee Star Dance.	Glee Star Dance Star trophy.	Glee star dance star trophy.
22	bill engvall time dancing star set final	Bill Engvall, the time-saving dance star, ended his career.	Time dancing star Bill Engvall has put an end to his career.	Time dancing star Bill Engvall ended his career.
22	amber riley crowned winner dancing star	Amber Riley has just been crowned the star-winner dancer.	Amber Riley was crowned the winner of the prima ballerina.	Amber Riley was crowned star winner.
22	dwts determines winner season	L' address will determine the winning season.	Address determines the winning season.	L' address determines the season of winners.
22	dancing star top couple talk season finale	Final of the Couple Discussion Season with the Dance Star.	Spousal discussion season finale with the dance star.	Final of the couple talk season with the dance star.
22	amber riley win season dancing star	Amber Riley wins dance starring season.	Amber Riley wins the dance star season.	Amber riley wins the dance star season.
22	bill engvall emma slater tom bergeron monday night adam taylor	Bill engvall Emma Slater Tom Bergeron Monday night.	Bill engvall Emma Slater Tom Bergeron, Monday night Adam Taylor.	Bill engvall Emma Slater Tom Bergeron Monday night Adam Taylor.
22	dwts dancer reflect high low emotional season	The dwt dancer... reflects a high emotional low season.	The dwt dancer reflects a high emotional low season.	The dwt dancer reflects a high low emotional season.
22	tv recap dancing star episode recap tuesday nov	Review of the Apos; Dancer Star Episode Tuesday Nov.	Review of the apos; star dancer Tuesday Nov.	L'apos recapitulation; episode of the star dancer Tuesday Nov.
22	tv recap dancing star episode recap monday nov	It's the first time you'll be able to watch the game.	Go back to the apos; episode of the star dancer Monday Nov.	Go back to the apos; dancing star episode Monday Nov.
22	dancing star crown season winner	Winner of the Celebrity Dance Crown season.	Winner of the crown season of dance stars.	Dance-star crown season winner.
22	dancing star recap finale performance video	Video of the dance star's final performance.	Video of the final performance of the Dance Star.	This is a video of the final performance of the star of the dance.
22	dancing star win rating race	The winner of the race will be the winner of the race.	The dance star wins the race d'apos evaluation.	Dance star wins race d'apos; evaluation.
22	dancing star top talk finale video spoiler	Spoiler of the final video of the dance star's performance and final speech.	Spoiler of the final video of the dance star and of the final speech.	Spoiler of the final video of the dance star and final speech.
22	dancing star finale win season mirrorball trophy	The winner of this season's mirror ball trophy.	Well, the dance star wins the mirror ball trophy of the season.	Dance star wins the season mirror ball trophy.
22	glee star amber riley win dancing star season	Glee club star, Amber Riley, wins the dance star season.	Amber Riley, the star of the choir, wins the dance star season.	Glee star Amber Riley wins the dance star season.
22	carrie ann inaba call dancing star season final best	Carrie Ann Inaba called the season of dance stars the final.	Carrie Ann Inaba has called the dance star season the best final ever.	Carrie Ann Inaba called dance star season best final.
22	amber riley amber riley win dwts	Amber Riley, Amber Riley, wins dwts.	And Amber Riley Amber Riley wins dwts.	Amber Riley Amber Riley win dwts.
22	dancing star top talk finale video spoiler	Spoiler of the final video of the dance star's performance and final speech.	Spoiler of the final video of the dance star and of the final speech.	Spoiler of the final video of the dance star and final speech.
22	dancing star comedian bill engvall booted night final	Bill, the leading dance comedian, has just canceled tonight's finale.	Dance star Bill canceled the evening finale.	Bill, the star dance comedian, canceled the evening finale.
22	dwts finale amber riley win mirror ball trophy	Final say amber Riley win the Mirror Ball Trophy.	Said final amber Riley win the mirror ball trophy.	Said final amber riley win the mirror ball trophy.
22	video jack osbourne chat dwts mom sharon weep talk	Video Jack Osbourne D&apos chat; agreement Mother Sharon cry talk.	Video Jack Osbourne chat D' accord mommy Sharon weep talk.	Jack Osbourne video chat D' tune Sharon mom weep talk.
22	dancing star bill engvall booted night final	Bill, the ballet star, has just canceled tonight's finale.	Hey, Bill, the dance star, canceled tonight's finals.	Dance star Bill canceled the evening finale.
22	viewer vote leave dancing fan hot blue collar	Viewers are voting out of the fan-hot-blue-collar dance.	The viewers vote out of the fan dance warm blue collar.	The viewer vote is leaving the hot blue-collar fan dance.
22	bill engvall booted monday dancing star	Bill Engall fired the Monday dance star.	Well, Bill engvall fired the monday dance star.	Bill engvall fired the dancing star Monday.
22	dancing star recap eliminated final round	The recap dancers have eliminated the last round.	Dancing star recap has eliminated the final round.	The dancing star recap took out the last round.
22	amber riley win dancing star	Amber Riley has won the dance star.	Amber Riley gets the dance star.	Amber riley wins the dance star.
22	dwts karina corbin dance iconic michael jackson tribute	Dwts Karina Corbin iconic dance, Michael Jackson tribute.	Dwts Karina Corbin iconic dance Michael Jackson tribute.	Dwts Karina Corbin Michael Jackson tribute iconic dance.
22	dancing star season finale dance dance recap	Dance Celebrity Dance Recapulative of the Dance of the Season.	This is the last dance of the season for the dance stars, recapitulating the dance of the season.	Last dance of the dance star season Dance recap of the season.
22	dancing star finale elimination celebrity	It's the only way you're going to be able to do that.	The dance star is the celebrity of the album; final elimination.	The dance star is the celebrity finale.
22	dancing star crown champ	Crown Champion d' dance star.	She is the crown champion of d' star of dance.	D'apos crown champion; star of the dance.
22	dancing star season finale frontrunner win mirror ball	And the favorite of the dance-star season wins the mirror ball.	The favorite of the dancing season wins the mirror ball.	The favorite of dance star season wins mirror ball.
22	bill engvall emma slater eliminated dancing star	Emma Slater eliminated the prima ballerina.	Bill engvall Emma Slater has eliminated the prima ballerina.	Bill engvall Emma Slater eliminated the star dancer.
22	eliminated dancing star night week	Eliminating dance-star night week.	Knock off the night of dance star week.	Eliminate dance star night week.
22	dancing star finale dwts crown season winner	The star of the final dance wins the season of the crown.	The star of the final dance wins the crown season.	The crown season is won by the star of the final dance.
22	dancing fit life riley	Dancing was life, Riley.	Dancing was Riley's life.	Dancing, c' was life Riley.
22	dancing star recap freestyle credit report	The free style is summarized in the credit report of the dance star.	The credit report of the star of the ballet recapitulates the free style.	The dance star's credit report sums it up.
22	amber riley tweet shock dancing star victory	Amber Riley tweets on Twitter about the victory of a d&apos, a hit dancer.	Amber Riley tweets the victory from apos; a shock dancer on Twitter.	Amber Riley tweets apos's victory as a shock dancer on Twitter.
22	dancing star season winner	Winner of the Dance Star Season.	Winner of dance star season.	Dance star season winner.
22	amber riley win dancing star mirrorball thanksgiving	Amber Riley wins the Mirrorball Thanksgiving dance star.	Amber Riley wins the Mirrorball dance star Thanksgiving.	Amber Riley wins dance star Mirrorball's Thanksgiving.
22	dwts karina corbin dance iconic michael jackson tribute	Dwts Karina Corbin iconic dance, Michael Jackson tribute.	Dwts Karina Corbin iconic dance Michael Jackson tribute.	Dwts Karina Corbin Michael Jackson tribute iconic dance.
22	dancing star watch finalist perform	The dance and watch star's finalist is now performing.	The finalist of the watch and dance star performs.	Dance and watch star finalist performs.
22	fan encouragement helped power riley dancing title	Congrats from the fans have been a big part of Riley's success as a dancer.	Fan cheers helped Riley win the dancer title.	Well, fan cheering helped riley win the dancers title.
22	eliminated dancing star night week	Eliminating dance-star night week.	Knock off the night of dance star week.	Eliminate dance star night week.
22	dancing star fab hit floor door	Fab floor door dance star.	She's the star of the fab hit floor door dance.	The fab hit floor door dance star.
22	dancing star winner amber riley glee actress win season	L&apos, starring dancer and dancer Amber Riley Glee wins the season.	L&apos, the winning actress of dance star Amber Riley Glee, won the season with a silver medal.	The season was won by L&apos, the winning actress of dance star Amber Riley Glee.
22	dancing star mirror ball	Ball from the dance star's mirror.	The ball in the dancing star's mirror.	The dance star mirror ball.
22	dancing star crown amber riley partner derek hough	Dance star Crown Riley partner, Derek Hough.	Dance star Crown Riley partner Derek Hough.	And dance star Crown Riley partner Derek Hough.
22	bill engvall eliminated dancing star ripped shirt	Bill engvall took out the shirt that was torn by a dance star.	Bill engvall has eliminated the shirt that was torn by a dancing star.	Bill engvall eliminated the torn shirt by a dancing star.
22	dancing star finale amber riley bill engvall eliminated	The last, Amber Riley Bill Engvall, has been eliminated.	The last female dancer, Amber Riley Bill Engvall, has been eliminated.	And the last dancer, Amber Riley Bill Engvall, has been eliminated.
22	dancing star backstage scoop kelly osbourne busy miley	Scoop star Kelly Osbourne keeps Osbourne busy.	The scoop dance star Kelly Osbourne occupies Miley Osbourne.	Scoop dancing star Kelly Osbourne is busy with Miley Osbourne.
22	dancing star cut bill engvall pro partner emma slater leaving	Dancer Star Cut Bill engvall, partner pro Emma Slater will be leaving.	Star dancer Cut Bill engvall pro partner Emma Slater will be leaving.	Star dancer Cut Bill engvall pro partner Emma Slater will leave.
22	carrie ann inaba dwts finale	It's Carrie Ann Inaba in the finals.	Carrie Ann Inaba's in the finals.	Well, Carrie Ann Inaba is in the finals.
22	amber riley derek hough quickstep win dancing star	Derek Hough Quickstep wins the dance star.	Amber Riley Derek Hough Quickstep won the title.	Amber Riley Derek Hough Quickstep won the gold medal in the title.
22	dancing star finale winner	The star of the dance is the winner of the finale.	Dance star is the winner of the final round.	The dance star is the finale winner.
22	break dancing star final	This is the break-dance star's final.	Break-dance star final.	And final break-dancing star.
22	amber riley win dancing star season	Amber Riley wins the Dance Star Season.	Amber Riley wins the season of the dance stars.	Amber Riley wins the dance star season.
22	dancing star finale recap amber riley named season champion	Dance star Amber Riley has been named the season's champion.	Dance star recaptured Amber Riley named champion of the season.	Dance star recaptured Amber Riley named season champion.
22	dancing star final night review	Dance star's latest nightly revue.	This is the latest nightly review of the dance star.	It's the last night review of the dance star.
22	facebook weekly highlight brings jack osbourne making dancing	The Facebook highlight of the week brought Jack Osbourne to the dance business.	The highlight of this week's facebook is Jack Osbourne's dance moves.	The highlight of the facebook week is dancing with Jack Osbourne.
22	amber riley tweet shock dancing star win	Amber Riley tweets shock-dancing star wins.	Amber Riley tweets as a shock dance star wins.	Amber Riley tweets shock dance star wins.
22	amber riley dancing star win grab attention pitch	Amber Riley, prima ballerina, take it easy.	Amber Riley, star dancer, win the title; be careful.	Amber Riley, dancing star, win the apo; attention.
22	dancing star finale recap season winner	The season's re-opening was won by the dance star.	The dance star has won the rest of the season.	The dance star has won the season's comeback.
22	season mirror ball trophy winner dancing star video	Video of the season's Mirror Ball Award-winning dance star.	Video of the dance star who won the season's mirror ball trophy.	Video of the dancing star winning the mirror ball trophy of the season.
22	amber derek win dancing star	Derek Amber won the dance star.	Amber Derek won the dance star.	Amber Derek won the dance star today.
22	video amber riley snag mirror ball trophy dancing	Video footage of Amber Riley hanging a mirror ball from the mirror ball dance.	Video Amber Riley hang mirror ball from the mirror ball trophy dance.	Amber Riley video clip hanging mirror ball of mirror ball trophy dance.
22	happened finale dancing star	C' came the final dance star.	C&apos, has arrived the star of the final dance.	C' arrived the star of the final dance.
22	dancing star bill engvall booted night final	Bill, the ballet star, has just canceled tonight's finale.	Hey, Bill, the dance star, canceled tonight's finals.	Dance star Bill canceled the evening finale.
22	dancing star top couple talk season finale	Final of the Couple Discussion Season with the Dance Star.	Spousal discussion season finale with the dance star.	Final of the couple talk season with the dance star.
22	glee cast congratulates amber riley dancing win video	Glee Cast congratulates Amber Riley dancing winning video video.	Glee cast congratulates Amber Riley dancing winning video video.	Glee cast congratulates Amber Riley dancing win video video.
22	amber riley congratulated glee star dwts win video	Amber Riley praised Glee Star dwts for winning video.	Amber Riley congratulated Glee Star dwts on winning the video game.	Amber Riley praised glee star dwts for winning video.
22	amber riley win dancing star mirror ball trophy	Amber Riley wins the Dancing Mirror Ball trophy.	Amber Riley's gonna win the Dancing Mirror Ball trophy.	Amber Riley will win the dancing mirror ball trophy.
22	dancing star finale night top chosen season	Well, the last night of the dance star's party has been chosen for the peak season.	Dance star's last night has been chosen for the peak season.	The last night of the dance star has been chosen for the peak season.
22	bill engvall dancing star	It's Bill Engvall, dance star.	I'm Bill Engvall, star of the dance.	Bill Engvall, dancing star.
22	dancing star season winner	Winner of the Dance Star Season.	Winner of dance star season.	Dance star season winner.
22	corbin bleu amber riley jack osbourne season dancing	Blue Corbin has amber Riley Jack Osbourne dance season.	Blue Corbin amber Riley Jack Osbourne dance season.	Corbin blue amber Riley Jack Osbourne season dance.
22	corbin bleu mirror ball trophy amber riley crowned dwts winner	Corbin blue trophy mirror ball amber Riley crowned winning dwts dwts winner.	Blue Corbin amber trophy mirror ball Riley crowned winner dwts dwts.	Corbin blue mirror ball trophy amber Riley crowned winner dwts dwts win.
23	dallas star offense arrives late win anaheim duck	Dallas star offense is coming in late to win over Anaheim duck.	Dallas star offense arrives late to win Anaheim duck.	Dallas star offense arrives late win duck Anaheim.
23	nhl nbcsn pacific leading duck star	Duck star Nhl nbcsn in the Pacific.	Nhl nbcsn pacific duck star.	Nhl nbcsn duck star in the Pacific.
23	duck dallas depth	Depth of the Dallas duck.	The depth of the Dallas duck.	The depth of the dallas duck.
23	ryan garbutt score outstanding goal dallas star video	Ryan Garbutt scored an exceptional Dallas Star Video goal.	Ryan Garbutt scored an outstanding goal for the Dallas Star Video team.	Garbutt scored an outstanding goal for Dallas Star Video.
23	dallas star daily link nhl player file concussion lawsuit	Dallas Star every day link nhl player court action commotion file.	Dallas Star every day link nhl player concussion file legal action.	Dallas Star every day link nhl player file concussion suit.
23	star dump duck goal third period	Goal of the Star Diving Duck in the Third Period.	Star diving duck goal in the third period.	Star third period diving duck goal.
23	ray whitney return dallas star huge boost offensively	Ray Whitney is back in Dallas, starring in a huge, offensive boost.	Ray Whitney returns Dallas star massive boost offensive.	Ray Whitney comes back Dallas star huge boost offensive.
23	dallas star stun anaheim three goal second third period	Dallas Star stun Anaheim for the third period.	Dallas Star stun Anaheim for three goals in the third period.	Dallas Star stun Anaheim three goals in the third period.
23	allen join long list ailing duck	L' a d' between them is a distressed duck.	L' a d' between them is a duck in bad shape.	Between them is a duck in bad shape.
23	duck cruise coyote	C&apos is a smuggler of ducks.	C&apos is a duck smuggler.	C' is a duck runner.
23	star score three goal second beat duck	D&apos score, 3rd goal, 2nd goal, 2nd goal, 2nd goal.	Score d' star 3nd goal, 2nd goal, duck beat 2nd goal.	Score d' star 3nd goal, duck beat 2nd goal.
23	star explode goal third period including three second beat	L' star explodes in third goal period, three seconds of which beats.	L&apos is a star that explodes in the third period of goal, including three seconds of beat.	L' star explodes in third period goal, including three seconds of beat.
23	cbs online watch anaheim duck dallas star live streaming	Cbs Online Watch Anaheim ducky Dallas star streaming live streaming.	Online Cbs watch Anaheim duck Dallas star streaming live streaming.	Cbs online watch Anaheim duck Dallas live streaming star.
23	nhl video recap tuesday november	Nhl Video Review Tuesday November.	Nhl video wrap-up Tuesday November.	Nhh video recap Tuesday November.
23	duck dustin penner score settle	Duckstick penitentiary set the score.	Ducky dust penitentiary set score.	Dust penitentiary set the score of the game.
23	star gameday anaheim	Gameday Anaheim star.	Star gameday anaheim.	Hey, star gameday anaheim.
23	star activate whitney injured reserve	Star has Whitney activated, wounded reserve.	Star activated Whitney, wounded reserve.	Star's activated Whitney, a reserve of wounded.
23	dallas star huge third period power anaheim duck	Dallas is a huge star, the third power period of the Anaheim duck.	Dallas is a huge star, the third period of the power of the duck Anaheim.	Dallas star huge third period power of the Anaheim duck.
23	nhl score star rally duck huge third period	Huge third period star score rally duck.	Nhh score star rally duck huge third period.	Nhh score star rally duck huge third period.
23	dustin penner dustin penner collect goal duck defeat	Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary.	Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary Penitentiary.	Prisoner - Penitentiary - Penitentiary - Penitentiary - Penitentiary - Penitentiary.
23	observation win anaheim explain prime	I'm going to go to Anaheim, and I'm gonna go to Anaheim.	Observing win Anaheim explain the bounty first.	Watching Anaheim explain prime number one.
23	duck straight win extend best start	Right duck, right duck, right duck, right duck, right duck, right duck, right duck.	Right duck winning extend the best start.	Right duck winning extend best start.
23	duck star preview injury	L' Duck Star announces injury at l' before @-@plan.	The duck star announces the injury at l' before-plan.	L' duck star announces injury at the front-plan.
23	ryan garbutt blow cam fowler score star goal second	Ryan Garbutt blows Cam Fowler brand Star Goal Second.	Ryan Garbutt blows out Cam Fowler brand Star Goal Second.	Ryan Garbutt blows Cam Fowler star goal second.
23	duck hiller playing future	Duck-hiller acting the future.	Hiller duck playing the future.	Fancy duck hiller playing the future.
23	dallas star anaheim duck ryan getzlaf tyler seguin key	Dallas Star Anaheim Ryan Getzlaf Tyler Seguin Key.	Dallas Star Anaheim Duck Ryan Getzlaf Tyler Seguin Key.	Dallas Star Anaheim Duck Ryan getzlaf Tyler Seguin Key.
23	game note duck star	Game Game Game Game Game Game Game Game Note Star Ducks.	Game note duck star of the game note.	Game note duck star of the game note.
23	duck star sum	Sum of the stars of duck.	Sum of duck stars.	Duck star sum.
23	tuesday nhl roundup goal outburst lift star duck	L' Tuesday morning's gathering objective has broken out, and the starry duck s&apos is now up.	L' gathering objective on Tuesday morning burst and the s&apos starry duck is lifted.	L' gathering objective of Tuesday morning burst and the duck star s' is raised.
23	star beat duck	Star-beating duck.	Star-beating duck.	It's a duck beating star.
23	duck star sum	Sum of the stars of duck.	Sum of duck stars.	Duck star sum.
23	dallas star anaheim duck live stream team news nhl match	Dallas star Anaheim from the duck team's live news.	Dallas-star Anaheim duck news live from apo; team nhl match.	Dallas star Anaheim duck live News from l' team nhl match.
23	watch watch anaheim duck dallas star live stream	Watch Anaheim Dallas live streaming.	Watch the Anaheim Dallas live stream.	Check out the live stream of Anaheim Dallas.
23	yotes figure duck fall	There is a risk of falling from a duck?	You know, there's a risk of a fall from a duck?	There is a risk of a duck falling.
23	dallas star anaheim duck kyle free nhl hockey pick	Dallas star Anaheim duck kyle hockey peak nhl free of charge nhl duck.	Dallas star Anaheim duck kyle hockey peak nhl free nhl duck.	Dallas star Anaheim duck kyle hockey peak nhl free nhl duck.
23	final star duck	Starry last duck.	It's the last starry duck.	Last of the star duck.
23	nhl dallas star rally anaheim duck	It's Nhl Dallas Star Rally Anaheim Duck.	Nhl Dallas Star Rally Anaheim Duck.	Nhl Dallas star rally anaheim duck.
23	long time star rocked	For a long time, the apos; star has been shaken.	For a long time, the star was shaken.	For a long time the star has been shaken.
23	anaheim duck dallas star pm	It's Anaheim Duck, Dallas Star.	Anaheim Duck Dallas Star pm?	Anaheim Duck Dallas star pm.
23	hiller thriller	Hiller thriller.	What's the thriller?	Hiller thriller &quot.
23	dallas star score second beat duck	Dallas Star and Score 2nd Beat Duck.	Dallas Star Score 2nd beat duck.	Dallas star score 2nd beat duck.
23	lindy ruff ray whitney returning lineup	Lindy Ruff Ray Whitney taking over the formation.	Lindy Ruff Ray Whitney returning the formation.	Lindy Ruff Ray Whitney returning formation.
23	star blitz duck	Starry blitz.	Star-blitz duck blitz.	Starry duck blitz.
23	nhl dallas anaheim	This is Nhl Dallas Anaheim.	Nhl Dallas Anaheim!	Nhl dallas anaheim.
23	penner score duck defeat coyote	C&apos is a good shot for a coyote.	C&apos, it's a good move for a coyote.	C' is a good deal for a coyote.
23	duck star preview	L' before-premiere of l' Duck Star.	L' before-first of l' star of duck.	L' before-the duck star.
23	daily primer nov duck star	I'm a big fan of the game.	Daily's prime nov duck star.	Daily prime nov duck star for the first time.
23	star shoot duck strong third period	Strong starry duck, third period.	Strong starry duck in third period.	Starry duck strong in the third period.
23	penner thinking revenge garbutt tonight dallas	Penner thinking about payback tonight, Dallas.	Penner thinking about revenge tonight, Dallas.	Penner thinking revenge tonight Dallas.
23	star rally duck nhl news	It's a great way to keep track of the stars.	Rally stars nhl news nhl news.	Rally stars nhl news nhl news.
23	gameday preview dallas star host anaheim duck pm cst	The game features a glimpse of the starring host Anaheim Duck.	The game gives a glimpse of the star host of Dallas, Anaheim Duck.	The game gives a glimpse of Dallas star host Anaheim Duck pm cst.
23	star storm duck goal flourish	L' l&apos lens; blossoming duck storm star.	L' l' l' l' l' star storm duck but bloom.	L' lens; star storm duck but bloom.
23	star erupt three goal second duck	L' star erupts 3 goals second duck.	L' star erupted three goals second duck.	L' star erupted three second duck goals.
23	star stun duck rapid fire	The standard has been put in place.	L' the standard has been set.	This is the first time that a standard has been set.
23	anaheim duck dallas star live stream watch	Live water is monitored by the Anaheim Dallas Ducks.	The duck Anaheim Dallas star monitors the courses d'apos; water live.	The duck Anaheim Dallas star monitors the courses live water.
23	penner duck hand coyote st loss	It's a waste of time and money.	C&apos, is a waste of time and money.	C&apos is a waste of time and a waste of money.
23	dallas star daily link star blow division rival anaheim	Dallas Star Daily Link Star Division Anaheim would feud with him.	Dallas Star Daily Link Star would rival Anaheim with him.	Dallas Star Daily Link Star Division Anaheim would rival him.
23	star whitney activated ir	Star Whitney has ir activated, sir.	Star Whitney has activated ir ir.	Star Whitney activated ir ir.
23	year ray whitney dallas lineup	It was the year of the selection of Ray Whitney Dallas.	The year that Ray Whitney Dallas was selected.	L' year Ray Whitney Dallas was selected.
23	jonas hiller rough thing loss	Jonas Hiller grossly lost something.	Jonas Hiller's grossly lost something.	Well, Jonas Hiller's grossly lost something.
23	dallas star role player big win anaheim duck	Dallas' star, the big-time player, wins the Anaheim duck.	The big-time Dallas star wins the Anaheim duck.	Dallas star, the big shot, wins the duck Anaheim.
23	star duck	Fancy duck.	Duck star.	Uh, starry duck.
23	star fourth drive dallas win duck	Fourth drive-dallas wins duck.	The fourth drive-dallas wins the duck.	The fourth drive drive @-@dallas will win the duck.
23	star score three second win duck	S' it's apos; it's a duck; it's apos; star will be three seconds.	S' s' s' act d' a duck, the score of l' star will be three seconds.	S' it's a duck, the score of l' star will be three seconds.
23	anaheim duck dallas star live stream nhl	Anaheim Duck Dallas Living stream star nhlhl.	Anaheim dallas canard live stream star nhhhh.	Anaheim duck Dallas star live stream nhl.
23	nhl schedule star duck face dallas	Nhl program star facing duck dallas.	Nhl program star face duck dallas.	Dalla duck face nhl programmer star.
23	ray whitney set return lineup dallas star	Ray Whitney put the line-back up Dallas star.	Ray Whitney set up the line-up return Dallas star.	Ray Whitney set up the Dallas star line-up.
23	nhl preview confident improved star duck	Previsualization nhl, trusting, and improved starry duck.	Previsualization nhl, trusting, improved Starry Duck.	Confident preview of improved starry duck.
23	game absence whitney return dallas	The absent game, Whitney, turns on Dallas.	Missing Game Whitney flips Dallas.	Whitney's missing game flips Dallas.
23	duck star watch live stream online listen live coverage dallas	Canard star watch live streaming live streaming live listening live dallas coverage live.	Canard star watch live stream live live dallas coverage live.	Canard star watch live stream online listen live coverage dallas live.
23	preview duck star	Duck celebrity preview.	Duck star preview.	Uh, duck star preview.
23	dallas wave dunk duck third period	Dallas Wave Dunk Dunk Dunk Dunk Dunk Dunk Dunk Dunk Dunk Dunk Dunk.	Third period Dallas wave dunk duck duck.	Dallas wave dunk duck third period.
23	nhl star rally third top duck	Nhl star rally... third top duck on the list.	Nhl star rally third duck top of the list.	Nhl star rally third top duck.
23	dallas star big statement win anaheim duck	Dallas big-styled statement to win the game.	Dallas star big statement win Anaheim duck.	Dallas star big statement win duck Anaheim.
23	star score second beat duck	D&apos score; d&apos score; d&apos score; and d&apos score.	Score d' star, second duck beaten.	D' star, second beat duck.
24	hewlett packard earnings call whitman macroeconomic headwind live	The profits of Hewlett Packard call Whitman macro-economics opposite wind live.	Hewlett Packard's profits now call Whitman macro-economic headwind.	Hewlett Packard's profits call Whitman macro-economic headwind direct.
24	hp earnings weak pc demand macroeconomic climate add pressure	Low benefits hp requires macro-climate to add pressure.	Low hp benefits PC requires macro-climate add pressure.	Benefits of low hp PC requires macro-climate add pressure.
24	hewlett packard company receives positive analyst move	L' Hewlett Packard is receiving a positive message from the analyst.	Hewlett Packard receives a positive message from the analyst.	L' Hewlett Packard receives positive feedback from the analyst.
24	hewlett packard ceo meg whitman ordered defend security class action	Hewlett Packard ceo meg whitman has ordered the defence of a class action in the matter of security.	Hewlett Packard ceo meg whitman ordered to defend a class action on security.	Hewlett Packard ceo meg whitman ordered a class action security defense.
24	hp top estimate mixed bag	Hp, Hp, Hp, Hp, Hp, Hp, Hp.	Hp high estimate of bag mixture.	Hp high estimate bag mixture.
24	hp finish year better expected	The Year of End of PP is better expected.	The PP year-end is better expected.	L' PP year is better expected.
24	stock watch hewlett packard infoblox tilly	The Hewlett Packard is a freeware store in Hewlett Park.	Stock exchange watch Hewlett Packard infoblox tilly.	Hewlett Packard infoblox tilly stock market watch.
24	hp pushing window hybrid holiday ceo	HP pushes the hybrid window to this holiday PDG.	HP pushing hybrid window ceo PDG vacation.	HP pushing window hybrid ceo vacation PDG.
24	hp quarterly revenue beat share jump	Quarterly Hp recipes are now outperforming those of the action.	Quarterly Hp recipes beat the action.	The quarterly hp recipes beat those of the action.
24	hewlett packard company nyse hpq citigroup nyse	It's a good idea to have a little bit of fun.	Hewlett Packard Company nyse hpq citigroup nyse nyse.	Packard Company nyse hpq citigroup nyse nyse.
24	hewlett packard top estimate share hour trading hpq	Hewlett Packard is the highest estimate of the time of the year; it is the highest estimate of the number of shareholders.	Hewlett Packard is the highest estimate of time; hour; negotiated shareholder.	Hewlett Packard is the highest estimate of gap time; hpq negotiated shareholder.
24	hp enterprise revenue rise	Increase in revenues of the company hp.	Increase in revenue; company hp.	Increase in company revenue hp.
24	hewlett packard earnings analyst expectation sale beat street	Hewlett Packard, a profit analyst, is looking for a street-beating sale.	Hewlett Packard, a profit analyst, is expecting a sale that's hitting the streets.	Profit analyst Hewlett Packard is expecting a sale that's hitting the streets.
24	hp surprise stock gain	Surprise actions of hp.	Gain d' action surprise of hp.	Gain d' hp surprise actions.
24	hewlett packard buy organovo punchline	Hewlett Packard buy chuteline organovo.	Hewlett Packard buy organovo chuteline.	Hewlett Packard buy organovo chuteline.
24	hewlett packard hpq issue fy earnings guidance	Earnings directives are issued by Hewlett Packard Hpq.	Hewlett Packard Hpq issues pay instructions.	Hewlett Packard Hpq will issue pay instructions.
24	hp bos face class action autonomy	L' autonomy of hp boss' collective redress system vis-à-vis collective action.	L' autonomy of hp bos collective redress vis-à-vis collective action.	L' autonomy of hp bos class action against collective action.
24	hewlett packard sale top estimate corporate demand	Hewlett Packard provides the best estimate of the level of demand.	Hewlett Packard offers the best estimate of demand.	Hewlett Packard has the best estimate of corporate demand.
24	hewlett packard company ceo face class action	Hewlett Packard, President and CEO of the company, is facing a legal challenge to his rights.	Hewlett Packard, the CEO of the company, faces a class action lawsuit.	Hewlett Packard, CEO faces a class action lawsuit.
24	hewlett packard post profit despite revenue slip	Hewlett Packard made a profit in spite of the apos; a loss of profits.	Hewlett Packard made a profit despite the loss of profits.	Hewlett Packard made a profit despite losses.
24	market mover nov hpq blox adi	Nov hpq blox adi blox adi market engine.	Marketplace engine nov hpq blox adi blox adi.	Movie engine nov hpq blox adi blox adi.
24	enterprise unit boost hp	D&apos unit; booster company hp.	Unit d' business booster hp.	Unit d' hp booster company.
24	server business help boost hewlett packard share	Servers are helping to boost Hewlett Packard's share.	Servers help boost Hewlett Packard's share.	Servers help boost the share of Hewlett Packard.
24	hewlett packard company hpq earnings beat street stock surge	Profits from Hewlett Packard Hpq have beaten those on the street.	The profits of the Hewlett Packard Hpq company beat those of the street.	Profits from the Hewlett Packard Hpq company beat street profits.
24	hp earnings sag stock rise report beat expectation	However, it is not surprising that the increase in the profits curve of the hp exceeded expectations.	L' inventory increase in the hp profit curve exceeded expectations.	L' stock increase in the hp earnings curve has exceeded expectations.
24	hp share set open percent higher revenue surprise	The share of hp has established a higher percentage share of the higher income surprise.	The share of hp established a higher open percentage of the higher income surprise.	The hp share set a higher percentage of the higher income surprise.
24	uneven complicate hp turnaround effort	It's the only way you can get it back on track.	Unequal complication of l' effort to correct hp.	Unusual complication of hp and hp; effort to correct the hp.
24	hewlett packard hpq announces quarterly dividend	Hewlett Packard hpq has announced a quarterly dividend.	Hewlett Packard hpq announces a quarterly dividend.	Hewlett Packard hpq announces quarterly dividend.
24	tech stock hp surge earnings	HP techno's inventory over-supply benefits.	The benefit of the HP techno inventory overflow.	Benefit from HP techno stock overflow.
24	hewlett packard spike sale fall feared	Dirty Hewlett Packard Spike was feared.	Hewlett Packard Spike dirty was feared.	Hewlett Packard Spike was feared dirty.
24	cet hp quarterly revenue fall	Quarterly revenues are plummeting.	This HP's quarterly revenues are falling.	This HP's quarterly revenue plummets.
24	hewlett packard hpq climbing	Hewlett Packard Hpq climbing.	Hewlett Packard Hpq climbing.	Hewlett packard hpq climbing.
24	hewlett packard hpq pt estimate raised bmo capital	Hewlett Packard hpq hpq hpq hp pt pt pt pt pt pt pt pt pt pt pt pt pt.	Hewlett Packard hpq hpq hpq pt estimate raised bmo capital.	Hewlett Packard hpq pt estimate raised bmo capital.
24	hewlett packard company hpq earnings watch printing help tech	Hewlett Packard Company hpq wins show dapos; printing techno d' help at printing.	Hewlett Packard company hpq gains show dapos; printing help techno d' help to print.	Hewlett Packard company hpq earnings show dapos; technical help printing; printing.
24	hewlett packard company hpq hewlett packard earnings thing	Hewlett Packard company, hpq Hewlett Packard, all profits.	Hewlett Packard company hpq Hewlett Packard something of the profits.	Hewlett Packard company hpq Hewlett Packard thing profits.
24	hpq buy spread ahead hewlett packard earnings	Buying staggered at the time; advances Hewlett Packard gains.	Hpq Buying staggered at Hewlett Packard wins.	Hpq buy staggered at l' advances Hewlett Packard winnings.
24	hp sale lackluster stock swing	Selling hp mediocre balancing of shares.	Poor stock balancing hp sales.	Mild hp sale swings actions.
24	update hp enterprise sale pickup stir turnaround hope	This is the first time that the company has been able to offer a new product.	Update hp resumption of sales of apos; company stimulate l' hope of recovery.	Updating hp resumption of sale of apos; company stimulate l' hope of recovery.
24	hewlett packard earnings watch	Hewlett Packard watches the winnings.	Hewlett Packard sees to the winnings.	Hewlett packard looks after the winnings.
24	investor autonomy lawsuit hewlett packard company nyse hpq	L' Investor Autonomy pursues Hewlett Packard, nyse hpq.	L' autonomy of investors pursues the company Hewlett Packard, nyse hpq.	L' investor autonomy pursues Hewlett Packard, nyse hpq.
24	hewlett packard ceo whitman ordered defend security class action	Hewlett Packard Ceo Whitman has ordered the defense of a class action in the matter of security.	Hewlett Packard Ceo Whitman has ordered to defend the security class action.	Hewlett Packard Ceo Whitman ordered a class action security defense.
24	hewlett packard earnings top estimate	Hewlett Packard is the company's highest estimate of earnings.	Hewlett Packard was the highest estimate of earnings.	Hewlett-Packard is the highest estimate of total earnings in the country.
24	hewlett packard beat market expectation	Hewlett Packard beat the odds in the market.	Hewlett Packard beat the market expectations.	Hewlett Packard beat market expectations.
24	earnings news hewlett packard company hpq tivo tivo analog	Winning news Hewlett Packard hpq tivo analog tivo company.	Earnings News Hewlett Packard company hpq tivo analog tivo tivo.	Hewlett Packard company hpq tivo analog tivo win news.
24	hewlett packard company hpq earnings tech giant beat estimate	Hewlett Packard company hpq gigantic technical earnings estimation beat.	Hewlett Packard company hpq gigantic techn earnings estimate beat estimate.	Hewlett Packard company hpq gigantic estimated beat estimate techn earnings.
24	hp enterprise sale pickup stir turnaround hope	In addition, the company has made a number of changes to its business plan.	The resumption of the sale of the company generates hope for a turnaround.	The reopening of the hp company's sale creates hope for a turnaround.
24	hp profit top estimate stock	It is not possible to estimate the total cost of the project.	Benefit of profits; highest estimate of hp stocks.	Apo benefits; highest estimate of hp stocks.
24	hot stock hp analog device active late trading	Analog hp device with hot stock, which is active on late transactions.	Analog device hp hot stock active on late transactions.	Hot stock hp analog device active on late transactions.
24	hp share set open pc higher revenue surprise	The sharing of hp has opened up many more surprises of higher income.	Hp sharing opened pc more income surprise higher.	Sharing hp has opened pc more income surprise higher.
24	hp infoblox stock watch wednesday	I'll be back in a few days.	Hp infoblox stock watch on Wednesday.	Hp infoblox stock watch Wednesday.
24	slight boost better pc sale	I'll give you a little something to help you sell a better PC.	A little push to better PC sales.	It's just a little boost to better PC sales.
24	hewlett packard quarterly boosted corporate demand	The Hewlett Packard quarter stimulated business demand.	Hewlett Packard has boosted business demand.	The quarterly Hewlett Packard has boosted business demand.
24	hewlett packard hpq release earnings guidance	Hewlett Packard publishes a guide to winnings.	Hewlett Packard hpq publishes a guide to earnings.	Hewlett Packard hpq publishes earnings guide.
24	hewlett packard climb infoblox tank apple nearing year high	Hewlett Packard is escalating infoblox apple tank approaching the apos; high year.	Hewlett Packard climbing infoblox apple tank approaching l' high year.	Hewlett Packard climb infoblox tank apple approaching the' high year.
24	hp tough year high note	This is the highest point of the year.	High note of the year hp difficult.	The high note of the year hp difficult.
24	hewlett packard company hpq earnings preview surprise expected	Hewlett Packard company hpq is expected to be able to forecast start-up profits.	Hewlett Packard company hpq preview of start-up profits.	Hewlett Packard company hpq predicting expected surprise profits.
24	hp revenue gain challenge remain	L' increasing PC revenues continues to be a challenge.	L' increasing PC revenue remains a challenge.	FP revenue increases remain a challenge.
24	hewlett packard sale exceed expectation	Expectations are exceeded for Hewlett Packages.	The sale of the Hewlett Packages exceeded expectations.	Hewlett Package sales exceed expectations.
24	hp share jump enterprise division sale rise	Hp shares will boost sales in the d&apos divisions.	Hp shares boost the company's divisional sales.	The company's share of hp boosts sales of its divisions.
24	hp sale profit top estimate corporate demand	The company's sales revenues are estimated to be the highest in the world.	Sales profits hp high estimate of company demand.	Sales Profits hp high estimate of demand of the company.
24	hewlett packard company hpq hp hit homerun	Hewlett Packard, hpq hp, hit homerun.	Hewlett Packard, company hpq hp, has hit homerun.	Hewlett Packard, company hpq hp, hit homerun.
24	hp boosted revenue surpass estimate	Increases in revenues have exceeded estimates.	The increase in revenue generation exceeded the estimate.	L' revenue increase surpassed estimate.
24	hp enterprise sale spark recovery hope	The company is proud to announce that it will be able to take over the company.	The company hp sells sparkle hope of recovery of the apos; hope.	The company's sales spark hope for recovery.
24	stock watch november	This is the November Stock Exchange.	Stock market watch in November.	November stock exchange.
24	whitman hp enter printing acquisition	Whitman HP is now in the process of acquiring print.	Whitman HP is entering the market; acquisition of printing.	Whitman HP enters the market; acquisition of printing equipment.
24	hp profit data centre gain pc competition hurt	Hp profit center data center to win pc injured competition.	Hp profit center to win pc competition injury.	Hp profit data center win pc competition hurt.
24	hewlett packard earnings beat estimate share jump trade	Hewlett Packard has beaten the apos; the stock market's estimated earnings.	Hewlett Packard beat the apos; estimate of the gains of the stock market.	Hewlett Packard beat the stock market earnings estimate.
24	earnings preview hewlett packard post	Prediction of Hewlett Packard Post's Earnings.	Forecast Hewlett Packard Post winnings.	Forecast earnings Hewlett Packard Post.
24	hewlett packard shock street share jump	Hewlett packard street-share-share-jump.	You know, hewlett packard street shock share jump.	Hewlett packard shock street share jump.
24	hp tivo spotlight hour session	Spotlight time in the morning.	Hp tivo session at the time of the spotlight.	Session hp tivo à l'apos; projector time.
24	hp tivo climb analog device hour	Hp tivo tivo climbing an analog device.	Hp tivo climb analog device at hour hour.	Hp tivo climb analog device hour hour.
24	sale forecast dim hp pin hope business service	We are proud to announce the launch of our new company, Hope.	Anticipated sale of pinewood service d' Hope Company.	Planned sale dim hp pine service d' Hope company.
24	hp earnings short revenue better expected	Hp winnings are more likely to be missed.	The hp winnings are much more likely to be missed.	Hp's earnings are expected to be lower.
24	hp report fourth quarter fiscal	The hp's reporting the fourth fiscal quarter.	The hp brings in the fourth fiscal quarter of the year.	The hp reports fourth fiscal quarter.
24	hewlett packard report earnings beat	Hewlett Packard states that he earned more than Hewlett Packard.	Hewlett Packard says that his earnings were higher than Hewlett Packard's.	Packard stated that his earnings were higher than Hewlett Packard's.
24	hewlett packard tivo report palo workday move earnings	Hewlett Packard reports the gains from the day's work in Palo.	Hewlett Packard tivo reports the gains from the day's work in Palo.	Hewlett Packard tivo reports earnings from the day's work in Palo.
24	buy hp turnaround plan	Buy your hp-plane recovery.	Buy hp recovery plan.	To buy hp recovery plan.
24	hp whitman face investor suit autonomy	Hp Whitman to face down to independence of investors costume d' autonomy.	Whitman Hp facing apo, investor autonomy disguised as autonomy.	Hp Whitman face the apo; investor autonomy disguised as autonomy.
24	hewlett packard company hpq beat earnings sale	Hewlett Packard hpq has beaten the sale of the profits.	Well, Hewlett Packard hpq beat the sale of the profits.	Hewlett Packard hpq beat the sale of profits.
24	earnings hewlett packard hpq expected fall	Revenues Hewlett Packard hpq s' he was waiting for a fall.	Revenues Hewlett Packard hpq s' was waiting for a fall.	Revenues Hewlett Packard hpq s' expected fall.
24	hp enterprise revenue rise earnings sale beat	Increases in revenues for the company; sales of profits break the sales record.	L' increase in income of the company; hp the sale of profits beat the sales record.	L' increase in revenue generation; company hp the sale of profits beat the sales record.
24	hewlett packard sale drop top expectation	Sale Hewlett Packard lowers the highest expectations.	Hewlett Packard Selling brings down the highest expectations.	Hewlett Packard Selling lowers the expectations of your customers.
24	cost cutting effort lead strong earnings	It's a good idea to save a lot of money by trying to reduce costs.	Cost reduction efforts lead to significant gains.	L' cost reduction effort leads to significant gains.
24	share leap battle ready hp	Sharing leap ready hp.	Sharing leap battle ready, hp.	Sharing leap battle ready hp.
24	hewlett packard sale exceed estimate share rise	The sale of Hewlett Packard is estimated to have increased from the previous year.	The sale of Hewlett Packard exceeds the estimated increase in the share.	The sale of Hewlett Packard is expected to exceed the market share of Hewlett Packard.
24	hewlett packard post fiscal fourth quarter profit	Hewlett Packard, a post-tax profit of the fourth quarter.	Hewlett Packard fourth quarter after tax.	Hewlett Packard post tax fourth quarter profit.
24	hp share price soar beat estimate	Hp s&apos stock prices are skyrocketing.	The price of hp s&apos shares will skyrocket.	The price of hp s&apos shares; skyrockets.
24	hewlett packard fyq beat year eps view	Hewlett Packard Fyq breaks the record of the year.	Hewlett Packard Fyq set the record for the year.	Hewlett Packard Fyq beat the record of l' year.
24	hp hpq estimate raised needham company	This is the first time that the company has been able to do this.	L' estimation of hpq hp raised Needham company.	Hpq hp estimate raised Needham company.
24	hewlett packard earnings hpq stock comeback story continue	Hewlett Packard win hpq stockback story continue.	Hewlett Packard wins hpq stockback story continues.	Hewlett Packard wins hpq stockback story continue.
24	expect revenue stabilize grow hp whitman	S' expect income to stabilize whitman hp growth.	Expect income to stabilize growth hp whitman hp.	S' expect revenues stabilize hp whitman growth hp.
24	hp meg whitman ordered face autonomy charge	Hp meg whitman has ordered a d&apos loader; facial autonomy.	Hp meg whitman ordered a load of facial autonomy.	Hp meg whitman ordered a facial autonomy charge.
24	hewlett packard beat street estimate	Hewlett Packard has beaten the odds; the estimate of the street.	Hewlett Packard beat the estimate of the street.	Hewlett Packard beat the street estimate.
24	hp ceo whitman lot work	This Whitman H.P. works a lot.	H.P. Ceo Whitman works a lot.	H.P. This guy Whitman does a lot of work.
24	hewlett packard earnings top expectation revenue fall	With Hewlett Packard earning more than expected, revenues are plummeting.	Hewlett Packard wins more than expected, revenue drops sharply.	Hewlett Packard's earnings are higher than expected, and revenue is plummeting.
24	hp making progress turnaround plan del prete	Hp advancing the recovery plan.	Hp advancing the recovery plan.	Hp advancing the plan of recovery.
24	sprint corp downgraded sector perform pacific crest	It is located in the heart of the region, in the heart of the Pacific Ocean.	A decommissioned sprint company in the area is building the Pacific flagship.	A sprint company has been decommissioned from the sprint sector and is building the Pacific flagship.
24	hp close book better	Close the ship's log.	Better close the ship's log!	We'd better close the ship's log.
24	hp share surprise soar	It's a great way to share the news.	Sharing your hp surprise s&apos is skyrocketing.	Sharing surprise hp s' skyrocketing.
24	hewlett packard beat analyst estimate	Analyst Hewlett Packard Beat analyst.	Apos estimation; Analyst Hewlett Packard Beat analyst.	Estimation of time; Beat analyst Hewlett Packard Analyst.
24	investor expect hewlett packard earnings tomorrow	Investors are expecting Hewlett Packard to make a profit tomorrow.	The investors s' expect Hewlett Packard to make a profit tomorrow.	S&apo investors expect Hewlett Packard to make tomorrow's profits.
24	update advisory surprise	E-mail address: http://www.wipo.int/english/news/news.htm.	Unannounced update of the website; advisory opinion.	Surprise update of l' advisory opinion.
24	hp beat revenue forecast	HP's revenue forecasts are beating revenue forecasts.	HP's revenue forecast trumps its revenue forecast.	HP's revenue forecasts beat revenue forecasts.
24	hewlett packard hold rating thestreet hpq	Hewlett Packard has Hpq security clearance thestreet.	Hewlett Packard has been granted Hpq thestreet security clearance.	Hewlett Packard has thestreet Hpq security clearance.
24	news analysis printer acorn ailing hp	Dapos printer; new acorns parsing mal hp.	Printer d' analysis of new bad acorns.	Dapos printer; analysis of new mal hp acorns.
24	update hp enterprise sale pickup stir turnaround hope	This is the first time that the company has been able to offer a new product.	Update hp resumption of sales of apos; company stimulate l' hope of recovery.	Updating hp resumption of sale of apos; company stimulate l' hope of recovery.
24	hewlett packard cut cost satisfy investor	Hewlett Packard reduces the investor's cost.	Hewlett Packard reduces the cost to the investor.	Hewlett Packard reduces cost satisfies the investor.
24	hewlett packard profit top estimate fy outlook	Hewlett Packard is estimated to be the highest of the financial perspectives.	Hewlett Packard is the highest estimate of the fiscal outlook.	Hewlett Packard is the highest estimate of the financial outlook for Canada.
24	hewlett packard company hpq hewlett packard	Hewlett Packard Company hpq Hewlett-Packard.	Hewlett Packard Company hpq Hewlett Packard.	Hewlett Packard Company hpq Hewlett Packard.
24	hp expects printing opportunity clearer	Waiting for the possibilities to be clearer.	The hp s' waits for the possibilities of the impression to be clearer.	The hp s' waits for them to be able to make a clearer impression.
24	hewlett packard company nyse hpq turnaround track	Hewlett Packard Company Nyse hpq.	Hewlett Packard Company Nyse hpq channel to redress.	Hewlett Packard Company nyse hpq redress channel.
24	hewlett packard beat forecast sending share	Hewlett Packard sent out shares to beat the forecasts.	Hewlett Packard beat the odds by sending in some shares.	Hewlett Packard beat the forecast by sending shares.
24	hewlett packard company nyse hpq revival gain fourth quarter	Hewlett Packard nyse hpq wins fourth quarter.	The Hewlett Packard nyse hpq company wins in the fourth quarter.	The company Hewlett Packard nyse hpq wins in the fourth quarter of the year.
24	hewlett packard company hpq earnings expect	Hewlett Packard, hpq, s&apos, waiting for its profits to be high.	Hewlett Packard, company hpq, s' waits for its profits to be high.	Hewlett Packard, hpq company, s' expects profits to be high.
24	halfway meg whitman hp turnaround time working	At half @-@path, the response time for Whitman H.P. is now working.	At mid @-@path, Whitman H.P. response time is working.	At mi-chemin, Whitman H.P.'s response time works.
24	hewlett packard earnings beat wall street expectation	Hewlett Packard has exceeded Wall Street's expectations.	The gains from Hewlett Packard exceeded Wall Street's expectations.	Hewlett Packard's earnings have exceeded the expectations of the New York City market.
24	hp profit bit better expected	Hp's better-expected profit.	Hp's profit better expected.	The hp profit better expected.
24	hewlett packard post profit	Post-profits Hewlett Packard.	Hewlett Packard post-profits.	Hewlett Packard post profit.
24	hp share rise better expected	It's a good idea to have a little bit more hp in the future.	The share of hp increases better if you're se' waits to increase.	The hp share increases better if you save it; waits to increase.
24	hewlett packard outperform rating reaffirmed fargo hpq	The superior performance of Hewlett Packard has confirmed the superior performance of the hpq fargo.	Hewlett Packard's superior performance confirmed the hpq fargo.	Hewlett Packard's superior performance rating confirmed the hpq fargo.
24	meg whitman talk turnaround hp fourth quarter	Meg Whitman speaks of a change of heart.	Meg Whitman talks about apos; a turnaround in the fourth quarter.	Meg Whitman speaks of a fourth quarter turnaround.
24	hewlett packard company hpq earnings preview	Hewlett Packard Company hpq.	Hewlett Packard company hpq preview of profits.	Hewlett Packard company hpq earnings forecast.
24	hewlett packard enterprise sale pickup stir turnaround hope	The @-@up Hewlett Packard pick for the sale of apos; company offers some hope of getting back on track.	The @-@up Hewlett Packard pick for the sale of D' company provides hope for recovery.	The pick @-@up Hewlett Packard for sale of' company gives hope of redress.
24	post bn profit strong enterprise growth confirms printing plan	The company's profitability is estimated to have grown by more than 25 per cent in the second quarter.	The company's strong growth after profits have come to an end confirms the impression.	The strong growth of companies after the end of profits confirms the plan d'apos; impression.
24	hewlett packard company hpq beat earnings expectation	Hewlett Packard, hpq, beat the prediction of profits.	Hewlett Packard hpq beat profitability forecasts.	The company Hewlett Packard hpq beat the odds.
24	money minute hp fails disappoint bag tailers	It's a good idea if you don't like it.	Minute d' money hp does not disappoint the bags to tail.	Apos time; hp money doesn't disappoint the tailpads.
24	hewlett packard sale top estimate corporate demand	Hewlett Packard provides the best estimate of the level of demand.	Hewlett Packard offers the best estimate of demand.	Hewlett Packard has the best estimate of corporate demand.
24	hp post weak pc sale rise profit	The post post low selling PC increases profits.	The post post hp low-sale PC will increase profits.	The hp post low sale PC increase the profits.
24	hp earnings beat street share rise	The hp's profits have beaten the profits of the street.	And the profits of the hp beat the profits of the street.	Hp profits beat street profits.
24	hp boosted corporate demand revenue exceeds estimate	Corporate demand-side revenues have increased faster than expected.	Business demand revenues grew faster than expected.	Revenues from corporate demand have grown faster than expected.
24	judge rule investor sue meg whitman hp autonomy	Investors continue to pursue self-sufficiency.	Judgement of the investor; investor will continue to pursue self-sufficiency.	Judgment of the company; investor pursue meg whitman hp autonomy.
24	hp report fourth quarter revenue profit top analyst estimate	The company's profits are estimated by the company's fourth-quarter earnings analyst.	The company reported an estimate of its fourth quarter earnings.	Hp reports an estimate of fourth quarter profit analyst.
24	hewlett packard quarter sale drop top street	Hewlett Packard auction on the main street.	Hewlett packard, auction on the main street.	Hewlett Packard, main street auction.
24	channel focus remains key plank hp turnaround plan	It is important to remember that the canal is a key part of the city's cultural heritage.	The focus on the canal remains the recovery plan for the project; the plan plan for the project; key action.	The canal focus remains the recovery plan for the project; the plan plan for the project; key action.
24	hewlett packard hpq announces quarterly earnings beat estimate	Hewlett Packard hpq announced a quarterly estimate of profits.	Hewlett Packard hpq reports a quarterly earnings estimate.	Hewlett Packard hpq announces a quarterly earnings forecast.
24	hewlett packard top street view swing profit	Hewlett Packard Top Street View Benefit swing.	Hewlett Packard Top Street View profit swing.	Hewlett Packard Top Street View profit swing.
24	hewlett packard share jump enterprise division profit	Hewlett Packard, a shareholder, jumps to divisional profit from Hewlett Packard.	Hewlett Packard shareholders jump divisional profit from the company.	Hewlett Packard shareholding jump division profit of the company.
24	hp chief meg whitman hope buy convertible laptop tablet	Hp chef meg whitman hopes to buy portable convertible tablet portable convertible tablet.	Hp chef meg whitman hopes to buy portable tablet convertible tablet.	Hp chief meg whitman hope to buy portable convertible tablet portable tablet.
24	hewlett packard share pop wednesday	Hewlett Packard Sharing Pop Wednesday.	Hewlett Packard shares pop on Wednesday.	Hewlett Packard shares pop Wednesday.
24	hewlett packard earnings preview analyst	Hewlett Packard gave an overview of the Earnings Analyst for the company.	Hewlett Packard gave an overview of the company's earnings analyst.	Hewlett Packard gave an overview of the earnings analyst of the company.
24	hewlett packard overweight rating reaffirmed morgan stanley hpq	Hewlett Packard has confirmed that Morgan Stanley Hpq has been overweight.	Hewlett Packard confirmed Morgan Stanley Hpq's overweight.	Morgan Stanley Hpq's overweight was confirmed by Hewlett Packard.
24	hp beat prediction drop	Uh, H.P. Beat prediction drop.	H.P. Beat prediction drop.	H.P. Beat prediction drop it.
24	hp post profit	Profit and loss-hp hp.	Profit-hp hp.	The-hp hp post profit.
24	hp breather company beat analyst expectation	Hp respiration entreprise beats waiting for analyst.	Hp respiration entreprise beats waiting of the apos; analyst analyst.	Hp company respiration beats waiting for the apos; analyst analyst.
24	hewlett packard company hpq bull bet earnings induced upside	Profits from the Hewlett Packard hpq spin-off have driven up profits.	Profits from Hewlett Packard hpq's bull bet have boosted profits.	Profits from the Hewlett Packard hpq bull bet have driven up profits.
24	hp barnes noble stock watch tuesday	H.P. Barnes, noble, animal man, yesterday.	H.P. Barnes, noble animal man, day before Tuesday.	H.P. Barnes, noble pet, early Tuesday.
24	hewlett packard earnings revenue beat street estimate	Hewlett Packard's income is estimated to be up to US$10,000 a year.	Hewlett Packard returns beat the estimate of the street.	Hewlett Packard returns back beat the street estimate.
24	hewlett packard fourth quarter sale top estimate	Hewlett Packard, the fourth quarter of sales, is the highest estimate of the value of the product.	Hewlett Packard, fourth quarter sales, is the highest estimate.	Hewlett Packard, fourth quarter sales, is the highest estimate ever.
24	hp whitman lose bid dismiss investor suit autonomy	Hp whitman lose the apos; offer to reject the apos; autonomy of prosecution of investors.	Hp whitman lose the apos; offer to reject the apos; investor prosecution autonomy.	Hp whitman lose apo; offer to reject apo; autonomy of investor prosecution.
25	climate change help kiribati man stay nz	Climate change is helping to keep the people of Kiribati alive.	Climate change helps kiribati man stay on track.	Climate change will help kiribati man stay nz.
25	kiribati man refused climate change asylum plea	He was a member of the Council of Europe's Committee of Experts on Climate Change.	It's because of climate change that the man in Kiribati refused asylum.	The Kiribati man refused asylum because of climate change.
25	pacific islander ioane teitiota fails bid climate change refugee	The U.S. Department of Homeland Security and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS) are also investigating the issue.	Ioane teitiota, a Pacific islander, also fails to apply for refugee status because of climate change.	Pacific islander ioane teitiota fails to apply for refugee status because of climate change.
25	islander loses climate change refugee bid	The island community is losing the opportunity to offer refugees on climate change.	The island is losing the offer of climate change refugees.	Islanders lose access to climate change refugees.
25	climate refugee loses appeal	Climate refugees, they're losing their appeal.	Climate refugees lose their appeal.	Well, climate refugees are losing their appeal.
25	judge decision flawed kiribati climate change case	The judge's decision vitiated the Kiribati Climate Change case.	The decision of the judge vitiated the case of Kiribati on climate change.	The judge's decision vitiated the climate change case of Kiribati.
25	climate change asylum plea denied	This is the first report on the state of the environment in Canada.	Application for asylum denied on grounds of climate change.	Application for a rejected climate change asylum.
25	climate change refugee coming country	Climate change refugees are on their way to the country.	Climate change refugees are coming to the country now.	And climate change refugees are coming to the country.
25	man fails climate change refugee bid	It's a great opportunity for people to learn about climate change.	Man fails to deliver climate change refugees.	L'apos; man fails the climate change refugees offer.
25	climate refugee bid asylum rejected zealand court	Asylum for climate refugees has been rejected by the Zealand court.	The asylum granted to the climate refugees was rejected by the court in Zeeland.	The zealand court rejected the asylum granted to climate refugees.
25	pacific man fails bid climate refugee	L&apos, a peaceful man, fails at the apos; offer of the climate refugee.	L' peaceful man fails at the apos; offer of climate refugee.	L' pacific man fails at the apos; climate refugee offer.
25	kiribati climate refugee considering appeal zealand ruling	The decision was appealed to the Supreme Court of the United States of America.	Kiribati climate refugee considering the apos; zealous appeal of the decision.	Kiribati climate refugee considering the appeal zealand the decision.
25	people dying resu climate change	People are dying as a result of Resu's changing climate.	People are dying from resu's climate change.	People are dying from climate change in Resu.
25	judge reject climate refugee plea	Climate refugees appeal dismissed.	The judge dismisses the appeal of the climate refugees.	The judge dismissed the climate refugees appeal.
25	zealand court reject climate change refugee	Climate change refugees are rejected by the zealand court.	The Zeeland court rejects climate change refugees.	The zealand court rejects climate change refugees.
25	pacific island man loses appeal stay nz climate refugee	It's the first time I've heard of the island of the Pacific.	L' man of the Apos; island of the Pacific Ocean loses his call.	L' man of the Pacific island loses his call.
25	kiribati man bid climate change refugee	Kiribati man proposed the refugee climate change.	Kiribati man proposed climate change as a refugee.	Kiribati man proposed climate change refugee.
25	islander loses climate change asylum bid	This is the first time that an islander has been granted asylum on the grounds of climate change.	The islander loses its claim to asylum because of the climate change.	The islander loses his application for a climate change asylum.
25	zealand denies climate change asylum bid	It's the only way we're going to be able to do that.	Zeland refuses asylum because of climate change.	The zealand population denies asylum because of climate change.
25	zealand reject climate refugee appeal bid	Rejecting the Climate Refugee Application.	Rejecting the application from the climate refugees.	Denial of appeal of climate refugees.
25	rejecting man bid refugee status court rule climate change	Dismissed; Application for asylum Court Climate Change Rule.	Rejection of an application for asylum; Court ruling on climate change.	Rejection of a request for asylum Court's climate change rule.
25	campbell nz obligation victim climate change	Canada's Climate Change Plan for the 21st Century.	Campbell nz obligation victim of climate change.	Campbell nz obligation victim of climate change.
25	refugee group onus nz help neighbour	C&apos, is the responsibility of the group of refugees who are responsible for helping the neighbour.	C' is to the group of refugees whom it is necessary to help the neighbor.	C&apos is the group of refugees we need to help the neighbor.
25	nz judge reject man plea climate refugee status	The judge rejects the argument of the man on the status of refugee from the climate.	The judge rejects the apos; argument of the apos; man on climate refugee status.	The judge rejected the man's argument about climate refugee status.
25	climate change refugee bid denied zealand court	The offer of climate change refugees was also rejected by the Zealand City Court.	The offer of climate change refugees was rejected by the Zealand court.	The climate change refugee offer was rejected by the Zealand City Court.
25	zealand court reject climate refugee appeal bid	The Zelande court rejects the apostles; the appeal of the refugees from the climate.	The Zelande court rejects the apos; climate refugees appeal.	The Zeland court rejects the appeal of the climate refugees.
25	zealand reject kiribatian man bid climate change refugee status	The zealot rejects the apology; a man from Kiribati who is applying for refugee status on the grounds of climate change.	The zealot rejects the apos, a Kiribati man applying for refugee status because of climate change.	The zealot rejects the Kiribati man claiming refugee status on climate change grounds.
25	man bid climate change refugee rejected	It was decided that the proposal should be submitted to the European Parliament.	A climate change refugee has been rejected as a candidate.	A climate change refugee has been rejected.
25	zealand climate change refugee rejected high court	The High Court has been overruled by the climate-change refugees.	The pro-climate refugees have rejected the idea of the High Court.	The climate change zealous refugees rejected the High Court.
25	kiribati citizen asylum request climate change refugee denied	Kiribati is asking for asylum; citizen denied refugee climate change.	Kiribati seeks asylum citizen seeks refugee climate change denied.	Kiribati seeks asylum; citizen seeks climate change refugee denied.
25	refuse pacific islander climate change refugee status	Denying Pacific islanders refugee status.	Denying refugee status to Pacific islanders.	Denying refugee status to the Pacific islanders.
25	climate change refugee bid fails zealand	It's a good thing that we're not able to do.	The offer of refugees from climate change fails.	L' climate change refugees offer fails.
25	zealand dismisses climate change refugee case	Zealous rejection of the plight of climate change refugees.	Zealous rejects the case of the climate change refugees.	Zealous rejection of climate change refugees.
25	south pacific islander loses climate change asylum plea zealand	The island of the South Pacific is losing its claim to asylum due to the effects of climate change.	The islander of the South Pacific loses its claim to asylum due to climate change.	South Pacific islander loses claim to asylum due to climate change.
25	kiribati climate change refugee rejected zealand	Kiribati Refugee from Climate Change rejected Zeeland.	Kiribati shelter from climate change rejected zealand.	Kiribati climate change refugee rejected Zeeland.
25	pacific islander fails bid climate refugee	L&apos, the island of the Pacific, failed by proposing the status of a climate refugee.	L' Pacific Islander fails by proposing climate refugee status.	L' Pacific islander fails by proposing climate refugee status.
25	islander refused refugee status appeal	The Committee asks for up-to-date information on this issue.	The islander refused to accept the application for refugee status.	The islander refused the request for refugee status.
25	kiribati man loses appeal bid refugee status nz	In the case of a foreigner, the foreigner is entitled to the same treatment as the foreigner.	Immediately, the Kiribati man loses the right to petition for refugee status.	The kiribati man loses the right to petition for refugee status.
25	judgment climate refugee claim appeal refused	The Refugee Protection Division of the Department of Foreign Affairs and International Trade appealed this decision.	The decision in Climat dismissed the appeal of the application for refugee status.	The appeal of the refugee claim was dismissed in the Climat judgement.
25	zealand judge reject climate refugee plea	Zealand Judge rejects the climactic refugee's argument.	The judge zeland rejects the apos; argument of the climate refugee.	The zealand judge rejects the climate refugee's argument.
25	climate change argument denied zealand court man request	It's been a long time, but it's been a long time, and it's been a long time.	Climate change argument denied the request of the court.	The climate change argument denied the court's request.
25	climate refugee islander fails bid	The climatic refugees of the island are now failing in their offer.	Climate refugees from l'apos; island fail in their offer.	The climate refugees of the island fail in their offer.
25	climate change refugee bid fails	It's a good thing that we're not able to do.	The offer of refugees from climate change fails.	L' climate change refugees failed.
26	warren buffett dish ndamukong suh dan gilbert newspaper	Warren Buffett has a flat ndamukong suh in gilbert newspaper.	Warren Buffett's flat ndamukong suh in gilbert newspaper.	Warren Buffett flat-feet ndamukong suh in gilbert newspaper.
26	detroit small business loan access	Access to Small Business Loans in Detroit.	Access to loans to Detroit-based small businesses.	Access to Detroit small business loans.
26	goldman sachs brings small business program detroit	Goldman Sachs has brought the Detroit program to small business.	Goldman Sachs brings the Detroit program to small business.	Goldman Sachs brings small business the Detroit program.
26	warren buffett invest detroit call great city	Warren Buffett invests in the City of Detroit.	Warren Buffett invests in the city of Detroit, Michigan.	Warren Buffett invests in the city of Detroit.
26	goldman sachs ceo warren buffet bring small biz program detroit	Goldman Sachs ceo Warren buffet brings small business program to Detroit.	Goldman Sachs ceo Warren buffet bring Detroit small business program.	Goldman Sachs ceo Warren buffet bring small business program to Detroit.
26	warren buffet goldman sachs ceo lloyd blankfein speak goldman	Warren Buffet Goldman is the name of Lloyd Flushfein speaking Goldman.	Warren buffet goldman knows what Lloyd flushfein speak goldman.	Warren buffet goldman knows what lloyd flushfein speak goldman.
26	blankfein buffett assures detroit ny recovered	Buffett claims that Detroit has not been found.	Buffett claims that Detroit was never found.	Buffett claims that Detroit has not been found.
26	detroit small business loan access	Access to Small Business Loans in Detroit.	Access to loans to Detroit-based small businesses.	Access to Detroit small business loans.
26	goldman sachs bet help detroit bounce	Goldman Sachs has bet that he'll help us get Detroit back on its feet.	Goldman Sachs bet that he'd help Detroit bounce.	Goldman Sachs bet that he'd help Detroit bounce back.
26	warren buffett goldman sachs ceo detroit tuesday small business	Warren Buffett Goldman Sachs Ceo Detroit Tuesday Small Business.	Warren Buffett Goldman Sachs Ceo Detroit Tuesday Small Business.	Warren Buffett Goldman Sachs Ceo Detroit Tuesday small business.
26	duggan focused improving detroit service	Diggan s' focuses on the Detroit area; improving Detroit's service.	Diggan s' is focused on outreach; improving Detroit service.	Diggan s&apos is focused on improving service in Detroit.
26	warren buffett brings small business cash mich	Warren Buffett has been bringing money to small businesses.	Warren Buffett brings money to small businesses.	Warren Buffett brings money to the small business community.
26	lessenberry talk abortion coverage small business detroit	Abortion is the most common form of violence against women and children.	Less discussion about abortion covers small businesses in Detroit.	Abortion covers the small business community in Detroit.
26	warren buffett detroit huge potential invest	Warren Buffett Detroit has tremendous investment potential.	Warren Buffett Detroit has huge investment potential.	Warren Buffett Detroit has huge potential for investment.
26	warren buffett call detroit land huge potential	Warren Buffett calls Detroit Land tremendous potential.	Warren Buffett called Detroit Land a huge potential.	Warren Buffett calls Detroit Land huge potential.
26	goldman sachs provide loan maine small business	In addition, they are able to take advantage of the opportunities offered by the project.	The knowledge of WD researchers provides loans to many small businesses.	The knowledge of university researchers provides small business loans.
26	warren buffett michigan praise detroit announces investment local	Well, Warren Buffett Michigan praises Detroit for announcing local investments.	Warren Buffett Michigan praises Detroit for his local investment in Detroit.	Warren Buffett Michigan praises Detroit announces local investments.
26	buffett led panel detroit people investor spirit foster successful	Investment encourages success through a Buffett-led group of experts.	Investor promotes success through a panel of experts led by Buffett.	L' investor fosters success through a panel of experts led by Buffett.
26	tom walsh billionaire investor buffett brings michigan small business	Tom Walsh, a billionaire investor, Buffett is bringing a small business to Michigan.	Well, Tom Walsh, billionaire investor, Buffett brings a small business to Michigan.	Tom Walsh, billionaire investor, Buffett brings a small business to Michigan.
26	snyder bing goldman sachs small business initiative	Snyder bing goldman sachs s'initiative.	Snyder bing goldman sachs small business initiative.	Snyder bing goldman sachs small business initiative.
26	detroit chosen goldman sachs program	Detroit just chose the Goldman Sachs program.	Detroit has chosen the Goldman Sachs program.	The Goldman Sachs program was chosen by Detroit.
26	warren buffett detroit huge potential	Warren Buffett straddles tremendous potential.	Warren Buffett straddles huge potential.	Warren Buffett straddles a huge potential here.
26	warren buffett better detroit	Warren Buffett had better start straightening out.	Warren Buffett better get straits.	Warren Buffett better straight.
26	detroit mayor elect duggan optimistic comeback	Detroit Mayor Duggan returns as a hopeful newcomer.	The mayor of Detroit elects duggan back as an optimist.	The mayor of Detroit elected duggan back optimistic.
26	wall street heavyweight weigh detroit bankruptcy	The heavyweight of Wall Street weighs heavily on the failure of Detroit.	Wall Street's heavyweight weighs heavily on Detroit's bankruptcy.	Wall Street's heavyweight weighs heavily on the bankruptcy of Detroit.
26	buffett dish detroit sport newspaper	Buffett platter, Detroit Sports Journal.	Detroit sports journal with buffett platter, please.	Detroit sports journal with buffett platter.
26	goldman sachs provide loan detroit small business	In addition, there are a number of projects funded by the Government of Canada.	In addition, the company's research team has been able to provide loans to the small business in Detroit.	The researchers in Detroit provide loans to small business in Detroit.
26	warren buffett praise detroit announces investment local small business	Warren Buffett rents out Detroit by announcing that he has invested in a number of small, local businesses.	Warren Buffett rents out Detroit, announcing investments in local small businesses.	Warren Buffett rents Detroit by announcing local small business investments.
26	tom walsh warren buffett detroit alive kicking	Tom Walsh Warren Buffet Detroit in great shape.	Tom Walsh Warren buffet Detroit in tip-top shape.	Well, Tom Walsh Warren Buffet Detroit is in tip-top shape.
26	video warren buffet real love detroit	Warren Video Buffet, true Detroit love.	Warren's Video Buffet, he's a real Detroit sweetheart.	Warren video buffet, real love of Detroit.
26	goldman sachs brings small business initiative detroit	Goldman Sachs is bringing in the Detroit Small Business Initiative.	Goldman Sachs brings the apos; initiative of the small company Detroit.	Goldman Sachs brings the apos; Detroit small business initiative.
26	billionaire agree detroit solid investment	Billionaires are disappointed; Detroit Accord Strong Investment.	The billionaires are out; Detroit deal sound investment.	Billionaires are a big deal, and the Detroit Accord is a solid investment deal.
26	buffett plan restore market detroit debt	Buffalo plan restores Detroit's market debt.	Well, the buffett plan restores Detroit's market debt.	The buffett plan restores Detroit's market debt.
26	warren buffett plan restore market detroit debt	The Warren Buffett Plan restores the debt of the Detroit market.	And the Warren Buffett plan restores the debt of the Detroit market.	Warren Buffett's plan restores Detroit market debt.
26	buffet blankfein hand tuesday detroit goldman sachs small	The breakfast is served in the bar or in the bar.	The all-you-can-eat buffet on Tuesday detroit goldman sachs petits sachs.	All-you-can-eat tuesday detroit goldman sachs mini sachs.
26	blankfein buffett bring small business initiative detroit	Challenging bring in the initiative of Detroit-based small business.	It's overwhelming bringing Detroit's small business initiative.	Shocking bringing small business initiative from Detroit.
26	walsh time move talking detroit dead	Walsh Time is all about the death of Detroit.	This is Walsh Time talking about the death of Detroit.	Walsh Time's talking about Detroit's death.
26	detroit small business growth job creation	It is also important to note that there is a need for more information.	Creation of jobs; jobs for small enterprises.	Creating jobs for small business entrepreneurs.
26	detroit small business loan access goldman sachs	Detroit Small Loans to Business Access Goldman sachs sachs.	Detroit small loans to companies access Goldman sachs sachs.	Detroit small business access Goldman sachs sachs.
27	space charles student speak astronaut	I have a student from Space Charles speaking as an astronaut.	One Space Charles student speaks as an astronaut.	Space Charles student speaks astronaut.
27	astronaut chase turkey meal thanksgiving	L' Astronaut Hunts Turkey Thanksgiving Meal.	Astronaut hunts Thanksgiving turkey dinner.	L' astronaut hunts turkey Thanksgiving dinner.
27	nasa advance commercial crew program	NASA Advanced Program (APS); NASA Commercial Crew.	NASA Advanced Program; commercial crew.	D&apos advance program; NASA commercial crew.
27	astronaut eat thanksgiving dinner space	Astronauts are eating the apos; Thanksgiving dinner space.	The astronauts eat the apos; Thanksgiving dinner space.	Astronauts eat Thanksgiving dinner space.
27	student talk live astronaut space station	Live coverage of the Astronaut Space Station by students.	Students are speaking live from the Astronaut Space Station.	Students talk live about the space station astronaut.
27	nasa launch second phase commercial crew program	NASA Launch of a Commercial Phase 2 crew program.	Launch by NASA of a second phase crew commercial program.	NASA launched a second phase commercial aircraft program.
27	newman ferrarra llp space	I'm sorry, but Newman Ferrarra llp.	Newman Ferrarra llp space.	Newman Ferrarra llp space.
27	meet sar russian astrobot working aboard	Meet Sarusse Astrobot, who works on board.	Meet Russian Sar Astrobot working on board.	I want you to meet Sarusse Astrobot working onboard.
27	nasa astronaut chat live space station student	L' NASA Astronaut chats live with Space Station student.	L&apos, a NASA astronaut, chats live with a space station student.	NASA astronaut chats live with a space station student.
27	international space station enjoy thanksgiving dinner	The International Space Station will be enjoying Thanksgiving dinner.	The International Space Station is enjoying Thanksgiving dinner.	International space station enjoying Thanksgiving dinner.
27	nasa astronaut chat live space station maryland student	NASA Astronaut chats live with Maryland Space Station student.	NASA Astronaut chats live with a student at Space Station Maryland.	NASA astronaut chats live with a student from Space Station Maryland.
27	nasa astronaut talk thanksgiving space watch live	NASA Astronaut talks about Thanksgiving Live from the Space.	NASA Astronaut talks about Thanksgiving live from Space.	NASA astronaut talks about Thanksgiving live from space.
27	thanksgiving message space station crew	Thanksgiving Message, I' Space Station crew.	This is the message of Thanksgiving, the crew of the space station.	Thanksgiving message, space station crew.
27	thanksgiving space lot dehydrated green bean casserole	This is the dehydrated Thanksgiving space lot, green bean stew.	Thanksgiving Space Lot dehydrated green bean stew.	Thanksgiving space lot dehydrated green bean stew.
27	astronaut celebrate thanksgiving space	Celebration of Thanksgiving in space.	It's the first time I've had a chance to do this.	L' astronaut celebrates Thanksgiving in space.
27	sky longer limit	"""C&apos"" is-to-say."	C&apos, is-@-@.	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
27	irradiated turkey yam thanksgiving dinner space	Irradiated turkeys yam, Thanksgiving, dining room.	Irradiated turkeys, yam, thanksgiving, dining room.	Irradiated turkeys, yam, Thanksgiving, dinner party.
27	space station benefit humanity plain sight video feature	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of people.	The space station is benefiting from humanity thanks to the clear video.	The space station benefits from the clear video; humanity.
27	american prepare celebrate thanksgiving orbit	Preparing for U.S. Orbit to Celebrate Thanksgiving.	Prepare to celebrate Thanksgiving in the American orbital.	Prepare l' American orbit to celebrate Thanksgiving.
28	impact flu pandemic	Influenza pandemic.	Impact of influenza pandemic.	Impact of an influenza pandemic in Canada.
28	swine flu death toll time higher thought	Death of Swine Flu more time to think higher.	I mean, death from swine flu means more thought time.	Swine flu death more thought time higher.
28	death toll pandemic flu higher official worldwide estimate	It is estimated that the number of people living with HIV/AIDS in Canada will increase by about 10 per cent in the next decade.	The toll of the influenza pandemic is higher than the global official estimate.	The toll of the flu pandemic is higher than the world's official estimate.
28	swine flu death toll time higher thought	Death of Swine Flu more time to think higher.	I mean, death from swine flu means more thought time.	Swine flu death more thought time higher.
28	swine flu pandemic killed ten time people originally	Ten times as many people died from the swine flu pandemic.	Swine flu pandemic killed ten times as many people in the region.	The swine flu pandemic killed ten times as many people at the origin.
28	flu pandemic killed time thought	Thinking time was killed by the flu pandemic.	The flu pandemic has killed thought time.	The flu pandemic killed thought time.
28	flu death toll worldwide	There are many deaths from influenza worldwide.	The number of influenza-related deaths worldwide is high.	Influenza-related deaths worldwide are high.
28	study swine flu killed time estimated	It's been a long time since the outbreak.	The swine flu study killed the estimated time of death.	The study of the swine flu killed the estimated time.
28	swine flu death toll time higher estimate	Swine flu deaths are higher.	The number of deaths due to swine flu virus is higher.	Deaths due to swine flu are higher.
28	swine flu death toll higher thought	The number of thoughts increases as a result of death from swine flu.	And the death caused by swine flu is increasing the number of thoughts.	Swine flu death increases the number of thoughts.
28	influenza virus killed time estimated	The estimated time of death was the flu virus.	The flu virus killed the estimated time.	Flu virus killed estimated time.
28	pandemic flu death toll higher official worldwide estimate	The number of deaths due to influenza is higher than the estimated number of deaths due to the pandemic worldwide.	The number of deaths due to the pandemic influenza is higher than the official global estimate.	The number of deaths due to pandemic influenza is higher than the official estimate for the world.
28	flu epidemic killed study	It's been a long time since the outbreak.	The flu epidemic has killed the apos; study.	The flu epidemic killed people; study.
28	swine flu death toll higher actual count	There are more deaths due to swine flu.	The actual number of deaths due to swine flu is higher.	The actual swine flu deaths are higher.
28	pandemic death number season flu year life lost higher	Number of deaths due to a pandemic, influenza season, year in which mortality was highest.	Number of deaths due to pandemic illness, influenza season, year of highest mortality.	Number of pandemic deaths, influenza season, year of greatest mortality.
28	smartphone apps lack proven strategy help smoker quit	It's a good idea to have a smartphone application that doesn't have a lot of experience.	The applications of the smartphone lack a proven strategy.	There is a lack of proven strategy for smartphone applications.
28	study estimate pandemic death	Estimated Pandemic Mortality in the Study.	Canadian Institute for Health Information.	Estimation of estimated pandemic mortality.
28	swine flu death toll higher thought	The number of thoughts increases as a result of death from swine flu.	And the death caused by swine flu is increasing the number of thoughts.	Swine flu death increases the number of thoughts.
28	flu epidemic killed time people thought	The flu epidemic has been killing people for as long as they thought.	The flu epidemic killed people as long as they thought.	The flu epidemic killed the time people thought.
28	pandemic death number season flu study suggests	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the case in the future.	Pandemic influenza studies during the flu season suggest a number of pandemic deaths.	L' study of pandemic influenza during the flu season suggests a number of pandemic deaths.
28	swine flu risk inflated	There's been an increased risk of swine flu.	The risk of swine flu has increased.	The swine flu risk has increased.
28	influenza pandemic killed american	It's been a long time since the flu pandemic hit America.	The flu pandemic has killed the Apos; America.	The flu pandemic killed America.
28	america hard hit swine flu study find	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse reactions to swine flu.	The swine flu study in the United States found swine flu to be hard hitting.	The U.S. swine flu study found that swine flu hits hard.
28	global death toll influenza pandemic high	The number of deaths caused by the pandemic is high in the world.	The number of deaths caused by pandemic influenza is high worldwide.	The number of deaths from the global influenza pandemic is high.
28	death outbreak higher estimated analysis	Estimated time of death; fatal epidemic is higher.	L' estimated death toll is higher.	L' estimated analysis of onset; fatal outbreak is higher.
28	death toll swine flu outbreak time higher thought	It is also important to keep in mind that this is a major threat to human health and the environment.	The swine flu epidemic is deadly at a time when we think above.	The swine flu epidemic is fatal at a time we think about.
28	swine flu death time higher official estimate	The time of death due to swine influenza infection is higher than the official estimate.	Death time due to swine flu is higher than the official estimate.	Swine flu death time is higher than the official estimate.
28	study estimate swine flu death toll time higher	Estimates from the study suggest a higher number of deaths due to swine influenza.	According to estimates from the study, the number of deaths due to swine flu is higher.	The study estimated a higher number of swine flu deaths.
28	swine flu update forget talk hype	Update on Swine Flu, forget all the media hype.	Update on swine flu, forget the media hype.	Update on swine flu news, forget the media hype.
28	estimate swine flu death rise sharply	Swine flu mortality is estimated to increase dramatically.	Death due to swine flu is estimated to be increasing dramatically.	Death due to swine flu is estimated to increase dramatically.
28	swine flu death toll time higher thought	Death of Swine Flu more time to think higher.	I mean, death from swine flu means more thought time.	Swine flu death more thought time higher.
28	pandemic death number seasonal flu	Seasonal influenza pandemic deaths.	The number of deaths due to an influenza pandemic in Canada.	Number of deaths due to a seasonal flu pandemic.
28	flu pandemic time deadly thought	Pandemic period of influenza virus thought to be fatal.	Pandemic period of influenza thought fatal.	Pandemic flu period thought fatal.
29	black friday iphone deal cyber monday sale review	Black Friday of l&apos iPhone agreement cyberlundi balance of sales.	Black Friday of l' iPhone cyberlundi agreement sales balance.	Black Friday of l' agreement iPhone cyberlundi sale balance sheet.
29	cyber monday tablet deal best price ipad galaxy note	Monday's tablets give you the best price, iPad Galaxy Note.	The monday tablets give you the best price of the iPad Galaxy Note.	Monday's tablets give the best price ipad Galaxy Note.
29	shopyourworld association axis bank celebrates black friday	Shop Your World, the Bank of L' D&apos axis; famous Black Friday association.	Shop your world, the bank of l' axis d' famous Black Friday association.	Shop your world, the axis bank of the d' association celebrates Black Friday.
29	difference thanksgiving black friday cyber monday	Difference Black Thanksgiving e-Monday.	Black Thanksgiving difference Friday cyber Monday.	Different black thanksgiving friday cyber monday.
29	black friday cyber monday travel deal guidebook	Black Friday, e-Monday, travel guidebook.	Black Friday night, cyberday, travel guide.	On Black Friday, on the e-London, a guidebook for travelers.
29	find best deal cyber monday	Find best agreement cyberlundi.	I want to find the best deal on the Internet.	Find the best deal on cyberlundi.
29	best black friday deal	Best Fridays ever.	Best Black Friday.	The best black Friday ever.
29	laptop cyber monday deal score best sale computer	Best selling laptop on Monday's best selling computer.	Laptop NetMarket Monday score best selling computer.	E-marketable laptop computer Monday score best selling PC.
29	find best cyber monday deal	Find the best way to close a Monday deal.	Find the best way to close a deal by Monday.	Well, find the best way to close a deal by Monday.
29	best time buy holiday gift	Best time to buy a holiday gift.	It's the best time to buy a holiday gift.	The best time to buy a holiday gift is now.
29	top cycling gps unit best deal black friday cyber monday	L&apos, the top cycling unit of the GPS, is best placed to offer the Black Friday of the Cyber Fridays.	L&apos, the top cycling unit of GPS is best placed to offer Cyber Friday Black Friday.	L&apos is GPS's top cycling unit best placed to offer the Black Friday E-Friday.
29	black friday cyber monday vacation deal	Monday's holiday e-market is Black Friday.	On Black Friday, the holiday e-market Monday.	On Black Friday, the online holiday market on Mondays.
29	best black friday cyber monday buy	Best Net Black Friday-buy on Monday.	Best Black Friday cyber-buy Monday.	Best Black Friday online @-@Monday Buy black Friday.
29	deal online monday	Online transactions Monday.	Making online transactions on Monday.	Make online transactions Monday.
29	galaxy black friday cyber monday deal sale detail	Galaxy Black Friday e-market Monday retail retail sale.	Galaxy Black Friday e-market Monday retail sale.	Galaxy Black Online Marketplace Friday retail sale Monday.
29	leappad ra black friday cyber monday deal sale detail	Leappad ra noir Friday e-market Monday retail d' business.	Leappad ra noir Friday e-market Monday sales retailing business.	Leappad ra black Friday e-market Monday retail of sale d' business.
29	gamestop cyber monday deal game sale monday	Gamestop Online Marketplace Monday Game Sell Monday Game Sell.	Gamestop Online Marketplace Monday game sale Monday game sale.	Gamestop e-marketplace Monday game sale Monday's game sale.
29	best fujifilm digital camera deal black friday cyber monday	Best Fujifilm Digital Camera Sell Black Friday Online Monday.	Best digital camera Fujifilm sell black Friday, online Monday.	Best digital camera Fujifilm sell black friday cyber monday.
29	best samsung channel soundbar deal black friday cyber	This week's edition will be available in English and French.	Best Samsung channel Soundbar deal black Friday cyber.	Best Samsung channel Soundbar deal black Friday cyber Friday.
29	cyber monday deal best deal apparel tv	You know, on Monday, we do the best clothing deal on TV.	On Monday, we do the best TV clothing deal ever.	On Monday night, we do the best deal in clothes on TV.
29	safety cyber monday	E-commerce security.	Cyber-security.	I mean, cyber-security.
29	cyber monday amazon offer deal week long	An Amazon cyber-on Monday runs for one week.	L' offers d' a cyber-Amazon Monday lasts one week.	L' offers d' an amazon Monday-cyber takes one week.
29	black friday tv deal cyber monday tv deal	Black Friday on TV, Monday on TV, Monday on TV.	I mean, a black Friday on TV, a Monday on TV, a Monday on TV.	A black Friday on TV, a Monday on TV, a Monday on TV.
29	top led tv cyber monday black friday deal	Top Dark Cyberday TV leader Friday deal.	Top-ranked Internet TV black Monday Friday deal.	Top of the line on Friday's black market deal.
29	black friday google nexus deal cyber monday sale review	Google Nexus Black Friday deals on Electronic Sales Review Monday.	Black Friday google nexus deals online sales reports on Monday.	Monday's google nexus black Friday deals online sales report.
29	super saver black friday cyber monday deal top theater	E-mail address: http://www.dfait-maeci.gc.ca/electronic/e-mail/e-mail_e-mail_en.asp.	Super Black Economizer Friday cyberday deal with the theater of high level.	This is a great black economizer Friday cyber Monday deal with the theater of high level.
29	best cyber monday saving deal discount code	Better e-mail account to save on transactions.	Best d&apos code; online Monday discount to save on transactions.	Better code d' discount from e-Monday to save on transactions.
29	black friday samsung galaxy note deal cyber monday sale	Black Friday Samsung Galaxy sale deal online sale.	Black Friday Samsung Galaxy note deal sale cyberlundi sale.	Samsung Galaxy black Friday note deal sale cyberlundi sale.
29	travel deal black friday cyber monday	D&apos Travel; Black business Friday e-Monday.	Voyage d' business black Friday e-commerce.	D&apos trip; black business Friday cyber Monday.
29	black friday cyber monday good travel deal	Cyber Black Friday Monday good business of travel.	Dark Friday cyber Monday good deal to travel.	Cyber Black Friday Monday good travel deal.
29	cyber monday tv deal best sale television	Cyber Monday tv make best television TV sale.	Cyber monday tv make best sell TV-TV.	Cyber monday tv make best sale television television.
29	top juicer black friday cyber monday deal	Black Juicer Top Friday e-market Monday.	Top Black Juicer Friday Internet Monday market.	Top Juicer black Friday e-market Monday.
29	best black friday deal amp cyber monday deal tech year	Best Black Friday Amplified Internet market Monday technology market year-year.	Best Black deal Friday amplified cybermarket Monday market technology year-round.	Best black deal Friday amplified cybermarket Monday market technology year-year.
29	cyber black friday cyber monday sale canadian shopper	Cyber Black Friday Online Sale of Canadian Products on Monday.	E-mail address: e-mail address: e-mail address: e-mail address: e-mail address: e-mail.com.	Cyber Black Friday cyber sale of Canadian products on Monday.
29	cyber monday black friday buy skip shop	Buy the Skip Shop on Black Friday.	On Black Friday of e-Monday, buy your Skip Shop.	On Black Friday, buy the Skip Shop.
29	best energy power base tv sound system deal black friday cyber	It's the first time in the world that you're going to be able to watch TV on Friday.	It's the best base of its TV distribution system on Friday cyber.	Better base of TV energy its distribution system black Friday cyber.
29	top black friday sale cyber monday deal collected leawo	The top of online sales on Monday Black Fridays has been collected leawo.	The top online sale of Monday black Friday has been collected leawo.	The top black Monday Fridays online auction was collected leawo.
29	xbox holiday bundle super saver deal cyber monday	Xbox Holiday bundle is a great way to save money online.	Xbox Holiday bundle super save online transaction on Monday.	Xbox Holiday bundle super save cyber transaction Monday.
29	cyber monday deal gamestop best buy amazon	The best way to do this is to buy the Amazon logo on the Internet on Monday.	The best way to buy EPOS; Amazon is to make a deal with the Internet on Monday.	The best way to buy l' Amazone is to make an online deal on Monday.
29	microsoft publishes black friday cyber monday xbl game store deal	Microsoft releases the Xbl Black Friday Online Game Store Deal Monday.	Microsoft publishes the cyber Black Friday Monday Xbl game store deal.	Microsoft releases the new Xbl game store deal on Monday.
29	stay safe thief fraud cyber monday	Stay safe, cyber theft fraud.	Stay safe from cyber theft fraud.	I want you to stay safe from cyber theft.
29	super saver cyber monday black friday deal nintendo wii	It's a good thing you're doing, but it's a good thing.	Super Internet economizer Monday Black Friday deal nintendo wii wii.	Super e-savvy Monday Black Friday deal nintendo wii wiii.
29	best turtle beach ear force px gaming headset black friday cyber	The Best Beach Turtle Px Atrial Power Game Black Game Helmet Friday cyber.	The best beach turtle atrial force Px game black game helmet Friday cyber.	The best turtle beach force earpiece PX game black game helmet Friday cyber friday.
29	prepare successful cyber monday	Preparing for success-cybermayday mercenary.	Preparing for the success of cybermayday mercenary.	Prepare the success of the cyber Monday-mercenary.
29	find great discount deal black friday shopping anycodes	Finding a Big Discount Business Black Friday Shop n' no matter what code.	Find a big discount deal Friday Black Shopping n' it doesn't matter what code.	Find a big discount deal Friday black shop n' no matter what code.
29	top lego set deal black friday cyber monday christmas	Top Lego Set Black Deal Friday cyber Christmas Monday.	This week's Top Lego set deal is going down on Friday.	Top Lego set deal black Friday cyber Christmas Monday.
29	shopaholic paradise	Shopper's paradise.	Shopper's paradise.	The paradise of the shopping addicts.
29	best samsung nx camera deal black friday cyber monday	Samsung Nx Best Camera Sell Black Friday Online Monday.	Best Samsung Nx camera sell black Friday, online Monday.	Samsung Nx best camera sell black Friday cyber Monday.
29	black friday faves	Black Friday is preferred.	Black Friday's favored Black Friday.	Black Friday is better than black Friday.
29	best olympus om csc deal black friday cyber monday	Best black deal csc Olympus on cyberday friday.	The best Olympus for the black deal csc on Cyber Friday.	The best Olympus for the black deal csc on cyber Friday.
29	appliance sunpentown rf ft compact refrigerator	Compact refrigerator, Sunpentown ff ft.	Apparatus Sunpentown ff ft compact refrigerator.	Sunpentown appliance ff ft compact refrigerator.
29	iphone black friday cyber monday deal sale detail	Black Iphone Friday Internet market place Monday retail sales.	Black Iphone Friday retail e-market Monday of sale sale.	Iphone black Friday cybermarket Monday retail of the sale sale.
29	cyber monday sale best buy online deal price electronics	Monday Sale the best online purchase e-commerce price.	Sale of the best online purchase price of the e-commerce transaction.	Monday sale best online purchase electronic transaction price.
29	tech wire black friday cyber monday	Tech Wire, Black Friday, E-Monday.	Black Tech Wire Friday cyber Monday.	Tech Wire black friday cyber monday.
29	time retire cyber monday	E-Monday retirement time.	Retreat cywonday.	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.
29	black friday htc mini deal cyber monday sale review	Black Friday mini agreement cyberlundi sale balance htc.	The black Friday htc mini sales balance agreement cyberlundi.	The black Friday htc mini deal cyberlundi sale update.
29	low tech black friday cyber monday	Low-tech Black Friday e-Monday.	Low-tech Black Friday cyberday.	Low-tech black Friday e-monday.
29	best cyber monday video game deal coming	The best video-game deal on Monday's coming up.	The best video game deal on Monday is coming up.	The best Monday video game deal is coming up.
29	post black friday deal	After the Black Friday chord.	After the Apos; Black Friday agreement.	After Christmas; black Friday deal.
29	dealsdip bestselling computer graphic card black friday deal	Sale of Dip best @-@sell Black graphics cards on Friday.	Sale of graphics cards Dip best-seller Black on Friday.	Dip best graphics card sales @-@sell Black on Friday.
29	black friday shopping resource	This is Black Friday Shopping Resources.	Black Friday shopping resources available.	Black Friday shopping resources.
29	best turtle beach ear force px deal black friday cyber monday	This week's edition will be available in English, French, Spanish and Spanish.	The best beach turtles of the strength of l' ear px black deal Friday cyber-Monday.	The best beach turtles of the force of l' ear px black deal Friday cyberneurday.
29	online shopper encounter fraud	Online shopping is also subject to fraud.	Online shopping faces fraud.	The online shopping industry is facing a number of challenges.
29	help shop safely cyber monday	Check out the latest e-commerce news on Monday.	Help securely shop online on Monday.	Be safe and help shop online Monday.
29	computer savvy shopper find best black friday amp cyber	A computer-savvy magazine finds the best amplifier on Black Friday.	A magazine that's experienced in computers finds the best cyber amp on Black Friday.	Computer-savvy magazine finds the best cyber amp on Black Friday.
29	online protection holiday	Protection Vacations Online.	Protection vacations online.	Holiday protection online.
29	black friday ad round	Black Friday Advertising Advertising.	Black Friday announcement around the commercial.	Advertising black Friday announcement.
29	cyber monday black friday best day year buy	Cyber Monday Black Friday Best Friday from l' year to buy.	Cyber Monday Black Friday is the best day of the year to buy.	E-Monday black Friday best day of l' year buy.
29	best black friday deal cyber monday deal tech year aboutdeals	Wednesday Cloudy with 60 percent chance of showers and 60 percent chance of showers.	Black market best Friday e-market Monday e-market year technology about transactions.	Best black market Friday e-market Monday e-market year trading technology.
29	iphone black friday cyber monday deal sale detail	Black Iphone Friday Internet market place Monday retail sales.	Black Iphone Friday retail e-market Monday of sale sale.	Iphone black Friday cybermarket Monday retail of the sale sale.
29	nation apps brighten black friday	Black Friday is illuminated by national apps.	The national apps illuminate Black Friday.	National apps bring black Friday to life.
29	black friday iphone deal cyber monday sale review	Black Friday of l&apos iPhone agreement cyberlundi balance of sales.	Black Friday of l' iPhone cyberlundi agreement sales balance.	Black Friday of l' agreement iPhone cyberlundi sale balance sheet.
29	computer savvy shopper find best black friday cyber monday	A client with experience in computers finds the best Black Friday on Monday.	An experienced computer client finds the best Black Friday on Monday.	A computer-experienced customer finds the best black Friday on Monday.
29	walmart cyber monday sale includes xbox ipod touch	This is the first time you'll be able to check out the Xbox ipod.	Walmart cyber sale on Monday includes xbox ipod touch xbox ipod.	Walmart cyber sale Monday includes xbox ipod touch xbox ipod.
29	black friday cyber monday sale offer better deal tv	On Black Friday, the Monday e-sale offers a better TV offer.	On Black Friday Monday's e-sale offers a better offer on TV.	And on Black Friday, Monday's e-sale offers a better deal on TV.
29	top external hard drive deal black friday cyber monday	On the external hard drive, on Black Friday, on the Monday of the cyberday, it's Monday.	On the external hard drive, Black Friday, Cyber Monday, c' is Monday.	On the external hard drive Black Friday, Cyber Monday, c' is Monday.
29	black friday surface pro deal cyber monday sale review	L&apos' Pro Pro Surface Black Friday; online Monday sales agreement-sales review.	Black Friday of the pro surface of l' Monday sale agreement cyber-sales review.	The black Friday of the pro surface of l' sale agreement of the cyber Monday-review of the sales.
29	nintendo black friday cyber monday deal sale detail	Nintendo Black Friday e-London retail sales details.	Nintendo black Friday cyberlundi retail sales details.	Nintendo black Friday cyberlundi detail of the sale of the sales.
29	shopyourworld celebrates black friday cyber monday india	Celebrate India's Dark Friday E-Monday.	Shop your world famous Black Friday Indian cyberlundi.	Shop your world celebrates Indian Internet Fridays.
29	bag bargain black friday	Black Friday's cheap.	Oh, cheap bag on Black Friday.	Cheap bag on a black Friday.
29	best black friday coming	Best Black Friday ever.	The best Black Friday ever.	The best friday ever.
29	time spent black friday versus	From black Friday to black Friday.	Black Friday versus black Friday.	From time spent on Black Friday to Black Friday.
29	cyber monday tech deal best sale web	On Monday, we will sell our products on the web.	On Monday we sell our products on the web.	We sell our products on the web on Monday.
29	ipad air ipad mini cyber monday black friday deal	Ipad mini cyber air ipad Black Monday Black Friday business Friday.	Ipad air ipad mini cyber Monday black Friday business Friday.	Ipad air ipad mini cyber monday black Friday business.
29	online shopper poised early cyber monday deal sunday	Online customer prepares to make a transaction on Monday morning.	The online customer prepares to make a transaction on the Monday morning.	The online customer prepares to make a Monday morning transaction.
29	online cyber monday deal find best sale virtually	Online e-marketplace Monday find virtual best-seller.	Online shopping Monday find the best virtual sale.	Online Marketplace Monday find best seller online.
29	best cyber monday deal black friday sale asus laptop	Best Internet Monday Sell Black Friday Sale of apos; laptop asus.	The best Internet Monday sell black Friday sale of apos; laptop asus.	The best Internet Monday sell black Friday sale of laptop asos.
29	black friday deal cyber monday sale galaxy note dealsdip	Black Friday Agreement cyberlundi sell ticket Galaxie traitedipdip.	Black Friday deal cyberlundi sell ticket Galaxie traitedipdip.	On Friday black deal cyberlundi sell ticket Galaxie traitedipdip.
29	ipad mini ipad air hd tv black friday deal best bunch	Best Black TV mini ipad air hd Friday night.	Ipad mini ipad air hd TV black Friday best bunch.	Ipad mini ipad air hd black TV best Friday.
29	halfdiscount offer super black friday deal sale increasing mobile	It's the first time you'll be able to take a look at the gameplay of the game.	Half-discount super black Friday sale d' business increasing mobile increase.	Half-discount offer super black Friday sale d' business increasing mobile increase.
30	low cost motorola moto arrives early	This cheap bike is coming sooner than expected.	Well, the cheap bike's coming sooner than I thought.	Cheap bike arrives earlier than expected.
30	moto order start shipping december support	Motorcycle orders are now starting to send from December support.	Motorcycle orders are starting to send support from December.	Motorcycle orders start sending from December support.
30	motorola moto buy	Motorola motorcycle buy.	Motorola motorcycle buy.	Motorola buy motorcycle.
30	moto gsm model start	Gsm motorcycle starts.	Start-up model motorcycle Gsm starts.	Gsm motorcycle model start-up.
30	motorola moto htc spec price comparison australia	Price Comparison of Htc Spec Motorcycles in Australia.	Comparison of Australian htc spec motorcycle prices.	Australian price comparison for htc spec motorcycles.
30	motorola unlocked moto smartphone head ahead schedule	Motorcycle Motorcycle Motorola unlocked before the scheduled time.	Motorola unlocked smartphone motorcycle before the scheduled schedule.	Motorola unlocked motorcycle smartphone before scheduled time.
30	moto	Moped.	Motorbike.	I'm on a motorcycle.
30	moto release place december	Moto release place, December.	Moto release place December.	E-mail: moto release place December.
30	moto wood backing option arrive thanksgiving slated holiday	L&apos option; back of wood motorcycle arrives at the Apos; Thanksgiving planned.	L' option d' back bike arrives; planned vacation thanksgiving.	L' option d' backwood motorcycle is now arriving; planned holiday thanksgiving.
30	unlocked motorola moto released start	Motorcycle lockdown has been released.	Motorcycle unlock released departing.	Unlocking motorcycle motorcycle motorcycle released departing.
30	google moto release time holiday unlocked super cheap	It's a great way to keep track of what's going on.	Google moto release time holiday release unlocked very cheap.	Google motorcycle release time holiday unlocked super cheap.
30	moto start selling ahead schedule	Sale begins at l' advance before the calendar of the bike.	Start of the sale at l' advance before the bike calendar.	This is the first time you'll be able to buy a new bike.
30	motorola selling unlocked moto	Motorola selling motorcycles that are unlocked.	Motorola selling unlocked motorcycles.	Motorola selling unlocked motorcycles.
30	motorola moto order shipping week	Motorola orders the Week of Apos; shipping.	Motorola motorbike orders during the week of apos; shipping.	Motorola motorbike orders shipping week.
30	moto surprise debut	Surprise motorcycle start.	Surprise motorcycle start.	Start a surprise motorcycle.
30	motorola selling unlocked contract free moto smartphone	Motorola selling motorcycles without lock and key.	Motorola selling unlocked contract Free Motorcycle Smartphone.	Motorola selling unlocked contract free motorcycles smartphone.
30	moto unlocked contract	The deal's off the bike.	The bike's the one that unlocked the contract.	The bike unlocked the contract.
30	google attack budget android market moto	Google attacks the budget and cold market motorcycle.	Google attacks android budget motorcycle market.	Google attacks motorcycle budget android market.
30	moto release merry christmas happy year	Happy Moto Release Happy Christmas year.	Merry Christmas Moto release Happy New Year.	Moto release merry happy Christmas year.
30	motorola moto motorola starting	Motorola motorbike starts now.	Motorola motor motorola is starting.	Motorola motorola starts up.
30	motorola moto sale online	Online motorcycle sales.	Selling motorcycles online.	You know, selling motorcycles online.
30	motorola announces launch moto smartphone	Motorola announces the release of the Motorcycle Smartphone.	Motorola announces the launch of the Smartphone Motorcycle.	Motorola announces the launch of the smartphone motorbike.
30	moto arrives early purchase ahead dec ship	It's a good idea to buy a bike at the same time.	The bike arrives early to buy at l' advance dec @-@ship.	The bike arrives early to buy at l&apos.
30	moto launch early contract	Motorcycle pre-contract launch.	Launch of motorcycle early contract.	Motorcycle early contract launch.
30	motorola contract moto starting	It's time for the motorcycle contract.	This motorcycle motorcycle contract is starting.	The motorcycle contract starts.
30	moto launch unlocked pursuit budget market	Launch of the Market Motorcycle Pursuit budgets released.	Launch of the motorcycle market of unblocked pursuit budgets.	Launch of the unblocked prosecution budget market motorcycle.
30	motorola surprise bringing moto time holiday	I'll be right back. - I'll be right back.	Surprise motorola bringing motorcycle time holiday.	Surprise motorola bringing moto time holiday.
30	low cost moto hit market early	The introduction of the low-priced motorcycle was earlier than expected.	The low-priced bike entered the market much earlier than expected.	The low-priced bike hit the market earlier than expected.
30	motorola moto smartphone hit early	Smartphone motorcycle hit earlier.	The smartphone motorcycle struck earlier.	Motorcycle smartphone hit earlier.
30	cheap motorola smartphone moto	Cheap motorcycle Motorola Smartphone.	Motorola Smartphone is a cheap motorcycle.	Motorola Smartphone cheap motorcycle.
30	motorola moto listed sim free uk retailer	Motorola motorbike listed here for free uk reseller.	Motorola motorcycle listed sim free uk reseller.	Motorola motorcycle listed sim free uk reseller.
30	motorola moto release smartphone	Motorola word motorcycle in fashion smartphone.	Motorola motorcycle word in the smartphone mode.	Motorola smartphone word motorcycle.
30	moto arrives slave juror survey airport train station street	The motorcycle arrived slave swearing to investigate station of l' airport street of the station.	The motorcycle arrives sworn slave investigating station of l' airport street of the station.	The bike arrives slave sworn investigation on the station of l' airport street of the station.
30	moto smartphone	Smartphone motorcycle.	Motorcycle smartphone.	Uh, motorcycle smartphone.
30	motorola launch cheap smartphone moto	Motorola launches low-priced motorbike smartphone.	Motorola launch cheap smartphone motorcycle.	Motorola launch cheap smartphone motorcycle.
30	moto smartphone surprise early debut	Surprising newbie motorcycle smartphone.	Moto smartphone surprise beginners.	Moto smartphone surprise beginners.
30	surprise moto hit early	It's the first time I've seen a motorcycle.	C&apos, is the first time I've seen a motorcycle.	C' is the first time that I see a motorbike.
30	motorola moto sale uk start outright gb variant	Motorola motorbike sale uk starts with a new version of gb.	Motorola uk sale uk starts out gb variant.	Motorola motorbike sale uk starts straight gb variant.
30	christmas surprise moto shipping week	Holiday weekend surprise; Christmas motorcycle expedition.	Surprise of Christmas week; Christmas motorcycle expedition.	Surprise of the week d' Christmas motorbike expedition.
30	moto smartphone unlocked starting	Unlocked Smartphone motorcycle starting.	Smartphone motorcycle unlocked and running.	Smartphone motorcycle unlocked starting.
30	moto booking buy	It's a motorcycle reservation.	Motorcycle reservation buys.	Motorcycle booking is buying.
30	moto availability today set ship early month	It's a good idea to have the bike ready for the first time this month.	The availability of the motorcycle today; hui has put the ship at the beginning of the month.	The availability of the bike today put the ship at the beginning of the month.
30	moto earns rave review solid build performance great price	Rave rave rave rave rave, rave rave rave rave, rave rave rave rave rave rave, rave rave rave rave rave rave.	Motorcycle wins rave solid construction performance high price.	Motorcycle wins rave solid construction construction performance high price.
30	motorola moto release moved spec price	Motorola motorcycle has been released and has moved the spec price.	Motorola released motorcycle moved the spec price.	Motorola motorcycle released moved spec price.
30	tesco motorola moto stock quick	I'll be back in a few days.	Tesco motorola motorcycle fast stock motorcycle.	Tesco motorola motorcycle quick stock.
30	moto review affordable smartphone	Smartphone motorcycle magazine, affordable.	Motorcycle magazine smartphone affordable.	This is an affordable smartphone motorcycle magazine.
30	photo courtesy motorola	Photo courtesy, motorola.	Photo courtesy motorola.	Photo courtesy of the photo motorola.
30	moto sale	Motorcycle sales.	It's a motorcycle sale.	Uh, motorcycle sales.
30	motorola low cost smartphone hit early	L' Sticker of L' Cheap and Low Cost Automobile; Smartphone Purchase at L' Before-garde.	L' bumper sticker; low-cost, low-speed car; smartphone purchase at home; before-garde.	L' sticker of l' car low cost and at l' purchase of smartphone at l' before-garde.
30	motorola moto land	Motorola landing motorcycle.	Motorola motorcycle landing.	Motorola, motorbike, motorbike.
30	motorola moto early entry time holiday rush	Motorola motorcycle early start holiday rushes vacation time.	Motorola early entry into holiday dailies vacation time.	Motorola motorcycle early entry vacation time holiday dailies.
30	moto wood gold option tipped arrive thanksgiving	L' option d' or wooden overturned motorbike will be on sale at Thanksgiving.	L' option d' overturned wooden motorcycle gold will arrive at Thanksgiving.	L' overturned motorcycle gold option will arrive at Thanksgiving.
30	motorola moto early release christmas	It's Motorola before Christmas.	Motorola bike before Christmas.	Motorola motorbike before the christmas release.
30	motorola selling cheap smartphone month early	Sales word word word word word word word word at the end of the words; before-about the apos; before-about the apos; before-about the apos; before-about the apos; before-about the apos; before.	Sale of word word word mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot mot at the end of the site; before-about the site; before-about the site; before-about the site; before-about the site.	Selling word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word word.
30	cheap motorola smartphone early	The word at the end of the word; car at the front @- @ custodian; before @- @ custodian; before @- @ custodian; before @- @ custodian; before-custodian.	The word at the end of the word; car at the beginning; before-keeps the word; before-keeps the word; before-keeps the word; before-keeps the word; before-garde.	The word at the end of the word; car at the beginning; before-keeps the word; before-keeps the word; before-keeps the word; before-keeps the word; before-keeps the word.
30	att moto sale	Sale of motorcycle att att att att att att att att att att.	Sale of motorcycle att att att att att att att att.	Sale of motorbike att att att att.
30	moto order shipping week	Week-long motorcycle order; expedition.	Order the bike week from' shipment.	Motorcycle order week d' expedition.
30	unlocked motorola moto finally hit	Unlocked motorcycle finally hit.	An unlocked motorcycle finally struck.	An unlocked motorcycle finally hit him.
30	moto pre order	Moto pre-command.	Moto pre-command.	Moto pre @--command.
30	moto usa availability today contract gsm	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Word Usa available today; the contract is signed today.	Word Usa available today; gsm contract today.
30	moto phone price motorola surprise customer offering device	Motorcycle phone is available for sale in France, France, France, France, Italy, Italy, Spain, Spain, Spain, Portugal, Portugal, Portugal, Portugal, Portugal and Spain.	Phone moto price motorola surprise customer offering a device of l' offer.	Motorcycle phone price motorola surprise customer offering an offer.
30	wood moto variant debut thanksgiving	It's a good idea to have a bike that doesn't have a bike.	WHAT; Wood motorbike variant start thanksgiving&quot.	Wood motorbike variant debut thanks&quot.
30	moto wooden option week	Wooden motorcycle option, week.	This is a week-long wooden motorcycle option.	Week-old wooden motorcycle option.
30	motorola moto arrives early carrier	Motorola motorcycles arrive ahead of schedule.	And the motorola bike comes in early from the carrier.	The motorola bike arrives early from the carrier.
30	motorola gift public unlocked moto	This is a public gift motorola that is unlocked.	Public motorola gift unlocked motorcycle.	Motorola gift public unlocked motorcycle.
30	screw motorola moto mobe sale month early	Motorola mobe motorcycle sales ahead of schedule one month.	Sell of motorola motorbikes mobe in advance of a month.	One month early sale of motorola mobe motorcycles.
30	moto wood tipped skip thanksgiving going straight holiday season	It's been a long time since we've been able to get to the bottom of it all.	"The wood of the motorbike was the reason for the ""Grandpa"" action at the end of the holiday season."	Motorbike wood toppled the thanksgiving at the end of the holiday season.
30	moto sale early	Motorcycle sales are anticipated.	I'm talking about an early sale of a motorcycle.	Motorcycle sale anticipated.
30	gee moto early	Early morning bike.	Moto early in the morning.	Uh, early morning bike.
30	motorola cheap unlocked moto debut	Cheap Motorola first motorcycle unlocked.	Cheap Motorola unlocked the first motorbike.	Motorola cheap unlocked early motorcycle.
30	motorola launch moto early	Early morning motorcycle launch.	Motorcycle launch in the early morning hours.	Motorcycle launch early in the morning.
30	moto review roundup cheap competitive wonderful	Motorcycle revue takes in cheap, marvelous competition.	The bike revue will take away cheap and wonderful competition.	The motorcycle revue wins cheap wonderful competition.
30	motorola accepting pre order moto ship december	Motorola accept pre-order boat Motorcycle December.	Motorola accept pre-order motorbike boat.	Motorola accept pre-motorbike order boat December.
30	moto price tow	Motorcycle Rate Moto trailer motorcycle rates.	Moto trailer trailer price motorcycle price trailer.	Motorcycle price trailer trailer.
30	motorola low cost smartphone hit market	C&apos is just like it is; a low-cost, inexpensive smartphone has hit the car and car market.	C' is as such; an inexpensive and cheap smartphone has hit the market of the car.	C&apos is just that; a cheap and inexpensive smartphone hit the car market.
30	moto order shipping starting	Shipping the motorcycle from the date of arrival; shipping.	Ordering from home; motorcycle shipment from date of arrival; shipment.	Ordering from abroad; shipping the motorcycle from the date of arrival; shipping.
30	moto wood option finally coming week	L' option wood motorbike engine finally arrives next week.	L' option wood motorcycle finally arrives next week.	L' motorcycle wood option finally arrives next week.
30	google owned motorola mobility shake thing	Motorola belonged to Google.	And the motorola motility belonged to Google.	The motorola mobility device belonged to Google.
30	cheap awesome moto early	The bike's early.	Cheap, motorcycle early.	Cheap, the bike's early today.
30	motorola moto pre order ship dec	Motorola bike pre-ship command dec.	Motorola bike pre-ship dec order.	Motorola motorbike pre @-@, order ship dec.
30	motorola moto shipping start monday	Motorcycle shipment starts on Monday.	L' motorcycle shipment starts Monday.	L' shipping of motorcycles will start on Monday.
30	moto purchase starting	Beginner motorcycle purchase.	Buying motorbike beginners.	You know, just started buying motorcycles.
30	moto unlocked amazon uk	Unlocked motorcycle Amazone uk.	Moto unlocked Amazone uk.	Moto unlocked amazone uk.
30	moto review motorola bridge gap cheap good	I liked the location of the hotel, the staff were friendly and helpful.	Motorcycle review motorola bridge gap not cheap at all.	Motorcycle review motorola bridge gap cheap.
30	google moto gb quad core hd	Google motorbike, gb, quad-core hd.	Google motorcycle gb quad core hd.	Google gb quad core hd gb motorcycle.
30	android phone moto display quad core processor	Android Motorphone quad-processor display base quad.	Android mobile phone motorcycle display quad-core processor.	Android phone motorcycle display quad processor basic.
30	motorola moto early release	Motorola motorcycle early-release.	Motorola motorcycle early release.	Motorola early release motorcycle.
30	motorola offering gb moto contract gb	Motorola offers gb gb gb.	Motorola offering gb gb gb motorcycle contract.	Motorola offering gb gb motorcycle contract gb gb.
30	moto arrives ahead schedule	The motorbike will arrive before the scheduled time.	The bike arrives before its scheduled time.	The bike arrives before the time fixed.
30	motorola selling moto starting shipping	Motorola selling motorcycle beginning to ship goods.	Motorola selling motorbike starting to ship goods.	Motorola selling motorcycle starting shipping.
30	motorola selling unlocked moto aws support	Motorola selling motorcycles unlocked.	Motorola selling unlocked bikes.	Motorola selling unlocked motorcycles for sale.
30	moto release motorola move debut smartphone	Moto release motorola make its debut in the field of smartphone.	Motor release motorola make its debut smartphone.	Moto release motorola making smartphone debut.
30	affordable moto ship december preorders start today	We are proud to announce that we are pleased to announce that we are pleased to announce the launch of our new product line.	The meadows-December orders for motorcycles start today; oil at an affordable price.	The December orders for motorcycles start today at an affordable price.
30	motorola selling unlocked moto	Motorola selling motorcycles that are unlocked.	Motorola selling unlocked motorcycles.	Motorola selling unlocked motorcycles.
30	surprise motorola selling gb gsm moto	This is the first time you'll be selling gb gsm.	Surprise motorola selling gb gsm motorcycle gb.	Surprise motorola selling gb gsm moto.
30	unlocked moto directly motorola	The motorbike is not connected to the motorbike.	The motorcycle unlocked directly motorola.	The motorcycle is directly motorola unlocked.
30	moto launch early incredible contract	Moto has an amazing early start contract.	Moto's early launch amazing deal.	Moto launch early contract amazing.
30	motorola start selling moto handset website	Motorola begin to sell the web site of the motorphone.	Motorola begin selling the website of the motorphone.	Motorola start selling the website of motorphone.
30	sooner moto ship december	Motorcycle boat early December.	Earlier, the motorbike boat December.	I'll be back in a few days.
30	moto review	Motorcycle review.	The motorcycle review.	Uh, motorcycle review.
30	motorola moto sale	Motorized motorcycle sales.	Sale of motorcycles.	Uh, motorized motorcycle sales.
30	unlocked moto order start shipping december	The order for the unlocked motorbike begins to be shipped in December.	The unlocked motorcycle order begins shipping December.	The unlocked motorbike order will start shipping in December.
30	moto pre order shipping december	Moto pre-order expedition December.	Moto pre-shipping order December.	Moto pre-will order shipping December.
30	moto wood finish arrive time holiday	It's the perfect place to spend your holidays.	The wood finish motorbike arrives on holiday.	The motorcycle wood finish arrives holiday time.
30	moto launch motorola site ahead schedule	It is expected that the project will be completed by the end of the year.	Launch of motorcycles ahead of schedule.	Launch of motorcycles ahead of schedule and schedule.
30	cheap unlocked version moto launch	Cheap version-launches motorcycle unlocked.	Cheap version unlocked motorcycle-launches.	Cheap, unlocked version of the bike-launches.
30	critic google discount smartphone moto	Motorcycle Smartphone Discount Google Critique.	This is a good way to reduce the price of a motorcycle smartphone.	Google critics discount smartphone motorcycle.
31	spd leader confident backing german coalition deal	The SPD leader is confident of his support for the German Coalition Agreement.	The SPD leader is confident in his support of the Apos, a coalition agreement.	SPD leader is confident in his support of the German coalition agreement.
31	german party clash spending agree minimum wage	The German government's budget is set at US$1 billion per year.	The expenditure of the German party is deferred; agreement on minimum wage.	German party expenses are deferred; minimum wage agreement.
31	german govt wrangling hit crunch stretch	The German government is quarrelled and has reached a critical point.	The government of Germany s' is quarrelled and has reached a critical point.	The German government was in a state of conflict and had reached a critical point in its history.
31	germany set tone euro finance minister	It was the first time in the history of the euro that the German government had adopted the euro.	L'apos; Germany set the tone for the finance minister of the euro.	Lapos; Germany set the tone for the euro finance minister.
31	merkel spd clinch coalition deal	Merkel has reached a new coalition agreement.	Merkel's reached a coalition agreement.	Merkel has a coalition deal in place.
31	germany step path government	In Germany, the S&apos government is now on the road to progress.	In Germany, the government is on the road to progress.	In Germany, the government is committed to the path of progress.
31	update spd chief confident party vote merkel coalition	Update Chief Spd trust voting merkel coalition party.	Update boss spd trusting party vote merkel coalition.	Update chief spd confident vote merkel coalition party.
31	german chancellor angela merkel agrees coalition social democrat	German Chancellor Angela Merkel is a member of the Socialist Group.	German Chancellor Angela Merkel stands down; agreement with social coalition @-@democrate.	German Chancellor Angela Merkel agrees with the social coalition @-@democrate.
31	merkel germany fall eu data retention rule	Please note that this is not the case.	Merkel germany Fall Fall has a data retention policy.	Merkel germany Fall Fall a data retention policy.
31	german party agree motorway toll foreigner	The German party s' agrees to the German foreign motorway toll.	The German party agrees to the foreign motorway toll.	German party s' approves foreign motorway toll.
31	analysis german business count cost merkel led coalition	This is the case in the United States, where there is a large number of companies.	Analysis of the figure d' German business counts Merkel cost coalition conducted.	Analysis of the figures; German business cost merkel conducted coalition.
31	german coalition concession merkel	Merkel is a concession of the German coalition.	Merkel, concession by the German coalition.	Merkel, German coalition concession.
31	anton troianovski	Troianovsky.	Anton troianovsky.	That's right.
31	refile merkel spd battle reach coalition deal dateline	This is the first time I've had a chance to work with you.	Refile merkel spd battle reach coalition deal dateline line.	Refile merkel spd battle reach coalition deal dateline line.
31	angela merkel agrees coalition social democrat source	Angela Merkel is a member of the Socialist Group.	Angela Merkel is off; agreement with social coalition-democrat source.	Angela Merkel is out; agreement with the source social coalition-democrat.
31	germany merkel agrees coalition social democrat	Merkel is a member of the Socialist Party of the European Union.	Merkel is out; agreement with social coalition @-@democrate.	Merkel agrees with the social coalition @-@democrate.
31	german coalition agreement emerging	There is a German coalition agreement.	And a German coalition agreement emerges.	There's a German coalition agreement emerging now.
31	german party edge warily grand coalition deal	The German party has been very cautious in its efforts to conclude a new coalition agreement.	Germany's party entered into a coalition agreement with great caution.	The German party concluded a coalition deal with great caution.
31	merkel reach government deal social democrat	Getting Merkel to social government-democrat social agreement democrat.	Merkel reach social government-democrat social democratic agreement.	Merkel reach social government-democrat social democrat agreement.
31	forming german government bumper car bundestag	Forming the German Bundestag from the German government's-bumper cars.	The Bundestag was formed from the autos-buffers of the German government.	Forming the Bundestag from-German government bumper cars.
31	merkel reach coalition deal social democrat	Merkel reach coalition, social-democratic agreement.	Merkel reach coalition, social democratic agreement social accord.	Merkel reach coalition, social democrat social agreement.
31	merkel spd reach coalition accord	It's not a big deal, it's a big deal.	Merkel spd is reaching the apos; coalition agreement.	Merkel spd reached a coalition agreement.
31	german rival reach coalition agreement	German rivals have reached a coalition agreement.	The rival German has reached a coalition agreement.	A coalition agreement was reached between the German rivals.
31	german coalition deal confirmed	L' the agreement of the German military coalition was confirmed.	L' agreement of the German coalition was confirmed.	L' German coalition agreement confirmed.
31	detail german coalition government deal	Detail below; Coalition Agreement with the German Government.	Detail the coalition agreement with the German government.	Detail list; coalition agreement with the government of Germany.
31	angela merkel conservative strike coalition deal center left social	Angela Merkel Conservative Strike Coalition social center left.	Angela Merkel is a conservative strike coalition social center left.	Angela merkel conservative strike coalition center social left.
31	merkel center left reach deal german govt	Merkel center-left to sign a German government deal.	Merkel center left to conclude a German government deal.	Merkel center left to conclude a German deal go.
31	german party reach coalition government deal	The German party has signed a coalition agreement with the German government.	A coalition government agreement was signed by the German party.	The German party concludes a coalition government agreement.
31	german party sign coalition agreement provisionally	For the time being, the German party is signing a coalition agreement.	The German party provisionally signs l'apos; coalition agreement.	The German party will provisionally sign a coalition agreement.
31	tymoshenko daughter germany chance mother	Tymoshenko German girl, lucky mother.	Tymoshenko daughter germany lucky mother mother.	Tymoshenko daughter germany lucky mother.
31	germany angela merkel sign grand coalition deal social democrat	Angela Merkel signs a Grand Social Coalition Agreement-German Democrat.	Angela Merkel signs a great social coalition agreement.	Angela Merkel signs grand social coalition agreement-German Democrat.
31	coalition deal	L' Coalition Agreement, c' is-@-@ say l' Coalition Agreement, has been concluded.	The coalition agreement is-@-@ to say l' coalition agreement has been concluded.	L' coalition agreement, c' is-@-@ say l' coalition agreement.
31	german spd leader warns anti euro party european vote	The leader of the German SPD is warning against the anti-euro vote-euro party.	The leader of the German SPD warns against the anti-euro vote.	German SPD leader warns against anti European vote-euro party.
31	merkel german cabinet spd vote	Merkel German votes for government Spd.	Merkel German voted for the Spd government.	Merkel German votes for the government.
31	german coalition talk enter nighttime countdown	The German coalition's speech is now entering the night countdown.	The night countdown begins with the speech of the German coalition.	The German coalition's speech enters the night countdown sequence.
31	angela merkel agrees form coalition social democrat	Angela Merkel is a member of the Democratic Party of the United Nations.	Angela Merkel is dead; agreement to form a social coalition-democrat.	Angela Merkel is dead; agreement to form a democrat social coalition.
31	factbox german coalition watch talk enter final stretch	Now, the German coalition's speech is in the final stretch.	The speech of the German coalition is entering the final stretch.	The German coalition's speech is in the final stretch now.
31	germany edging closer grand coalition deal	From germania to apostles; before-keeps d' a coalition agreement that is larger and closer.	From germania to apostles; before-guard d' a larger and closer coalition agreement.	From german to apo; before-custodianship; larger and closer coalition agreement.
31	german coalition merkel party reach deal spd	The German coalition of the Merkel Party is concluding a special agreement.	The German Merkel coalition is making a spd deal.	The German Merkel party coalition concludes a spd agreement.
31	coalition deal matter german	L&apos, a coalition agreement between the German government and the German coalition, was signed.	L&apos was a coalition agreement between the German government and the coalition.	L&apos, a coalition agreement between the German government and the coalition.
31	refile german conservative social democrat final coalition push	Redoing the Final Social Coalition-German Conservative Democrats.	Redo Germany's final social coalition-German Conservative Democrats.	Redo the final coalition of social-German conservative democrats.
31	german coalition reach deal face tough party vote	The German coalition has come to an agreement in the face of the party's difficult vote.	The German coalition reaches an agreement in the face of the party's difficult vote.	The German coalition arrives at an agreement in the face of the party's difficult vote process.
31	rpt german party edge warily grand coalition deal	The German party has been cautious in its conclusion of a coalition agreement.	The German party entered into a coalition agreement cautiously.	The German party made a coalition deal cautiously.
31	german coalition opposes cancelling permit permanently	The German coalition is opposed to the idea of a permanent cancellation of the permit.	The German coalition has s' opposes the final cancellation of the permit.	The German coalition opposes the cancellation of the licence.
31	european stock higher german accord	German-European Agreement on Higher German Shares.	German-Mania Agreement @-@European on Higher German Actions.	Germanmano agreement @-@europa on higher German shares.
31	canada stock tsx open higher germany coalition deal support	Canada and the United States will continue to work together on this issue in the near future.	Canada stock tx open higher Germany support coalition to l' agreement.	Canada stock tx open higher Germany support coalition agreement.
31	angela merkel agrees german power sharing deal rival	Angela Merkel agreed that Germany was in competition with Spain; Germany was in power-sharing.	Angela Merkel agrees that Germany is in competition with Spain; Germany is in power-sharing.	Angela Merkel agrees that Germany rivals Spain in terms of power sharing.
31	merkel form coalition social democrat	Merkel forms a social-democrat coalition.	Merkel is forming a social coalition-democrat.	Merkel forms a social coalition @-@democrat.
31	germany crunch coalition talk merkel rival	Germany crunch coalition to talk about merkel rival talk.	Germany crunch coalition talk rival merkel talk.	Germany crunch coalition talk merkel rival talk.
31	merkel party social democrat agree deal set stage forming	The Merkel Party Social-Democrats have agreed to prepare the ground for an agreement.	The social-democrats of the Merkel party are d'apos; agreement to prepare the ground for an agreement.	Social-democrats of the Merkel party are d' agreement to prepare the ground for an agreement.
31	coalition compromise	Coalition compromise.	Coalition compromise.	You know, coalition compromise.
31	ishares msci germany fund etf ewg merkel secures coalition deal	He is also a member of the International Council of Science and Technology Advisors.	Sharing the fund of German science and merkel s' ensuring d' a coalition agreement.	He shares the fund of German science and merkel s' secures d' a coalition agreement.
31	ld writethru german party reach agreement coalition	J&apos wrote that the German political party had concluded a coalition agreement.	J&apos wrote that the German party had concluded a coalition agreement.	J&apos wrote that the German party had entered into a coalition agreement with Germany.
31	germany open dual citizenship	The German citizenship is governed by the German Constitution.	German dual citizenship is now open.	German dual citizenship is open.
31	coalition deal reached germany	The coalition has signed an agreement with the government of Germany.	The coalition has made a deal with l'apos; Germany.	The coalition reached an agreement with Germany.
31	merkel seal deal germany prepares coalition government	The German government is preparing for the end of the Cold War.	The German Merkel Seal agreement prepares the coalition government.	L' German Merkel Seal agreement prepares coalition government.
31	merkel conservative spd reach coalition deal	Merkel, a conservative, spd, to reach a coalition agreement.	Conservative Merkel spd to reach a coalition deal.	Merkel conservative spd reach coalition agreement.
31	angela merkel secures left german coalition deal	Angela Merkel has secured the apos; a left-wing German coalition agreement.	Angela Merkel secures the left-wing German coalition agreement.	Angela Merkel secures the apos; German left coalition agreement.
31	german coalition seek stricter labelling gmo fed meat	The German coalition is calling for stricter labelling of gmo meat that is fed meat.	The German coalition calls for stricter labelling of meat-fed gmo.	The German coalition calls for stricter labelling of gmo meat fed with meat.
31	german party reach coalition deal	The German government has signed a coalition agreement with the German government.	The German party is concluding a coalition agreement.	The German party concludes a coalition agreement.
31	spd expands labor demand talk german coalition	L' expansion of the demand for hand-d' work increases the strength of the German coalition.	L' expansion of demand for hand-d' work increases the German coalition.	L' main demand expansion-d' works increases German coalition.
31	german conservative spd final coalition push	L' conservative final coalition spd Germany push.	L' Germany conservative spd final coalition push.	Germany conservative spd final coalition push.
31	germany reach deal coalition government	An agreement was reached between the Germans and a coalition government.	And the Germans made a deal with a coalition government.	The Germans struck a deal with a coalition government in the city.
31	protester gather coalition negotiation	There's a protester who's trying to bring together the negotiations of the coalition.	There's a protester gathering the coalition negotiations.	A protester convenes coalition negotiations.
31	merkel spd breakthrough coalition talk	Merkel has moved the discussions on the coalition movement forward.	Merkel moved the coalition talks forward.	Merkel moved coalition talks forward.
31	spd win concession merkel coalition agreement	Spd wins the Merkel Concession Coalition Agreement.	Spd wins the merkel deal coalition deal.	Spd wins the merkel coalition deal.
31	german coalition seek stricter labeling gmo fed meat	The German coalition calls for stricter labelling of meat-fed gmo.	The German coalition is calling for stricter labelling of gmo meat that is fed meat.	The German coalition calls for stricter labelling of gmo meat fed with meat.
31	merkel agrees pact german govt	Merkel is a member of the German government.	Merkel has agreed to the pact with the German government.	Merkel signed a pact with the German government.
31	merkel agrees german power sharing deal rival	Merkel agreed that Germany was in competition with Spain; Germany was in power-sharing.	Merkel agrees that Germany is rivalling Germany in terms of power-sharing.	Merkel agrees that Germany competes with Spain; Germany in power-sharing.
31	merkel center left reach deal german government	Merkel center-left get an agreement with the German government.	Merkel center left get an agreement German government government.	Merkel center left get a German government deal government.
31	german coalition talk head final scheduled day	The last day of the conference of the German coalition is planned.	The last day of the German coalition conference is planned.	The final day of the conference of the German coalition is planned.
31	euro month high hope german coalition	L' Hope for a Month of a Grand German Coalition.	L' hope for the future; a month of European grand German coalition.	L' hope of apos; a month of apos; euro great German coalition.
31	merkel spd ready night showdown german coalition	Merkel was prepared for the night challenge of the German coalition.	Merkel was ready for the German coalition's final night test.	Merkel was ready for the German coalition night test.
31	germany merkel agrees form coalition social democrat	Germany Merkel is now a member of the Social Coalition-Democrat.	Germany Merkel is d' agreement to form social coalition @-@democrates.	Germany merkel is d' agreement to form a social coalition @-@democrate.
31	merkel rival strike deal german government	L' Strike Agreement of Merkel rivals, German government.	L&apos, strike agreement of rivals merkel, the German government.	L' German government Merkel rivals strike agreement.
31	italy pm lauds german coalition deal stren hen eu	It is the largest city in the world and the second largest city in the world.	L' Italy has signed a coalition agreement with l' Germany.	L' Italy has signed a coalition agreement with Germany.
31	german negotiator deal coalition	The coalition of German negotiators is now negotiating a deal.	The coalition of German negotiators is negotiating a deal.	A deal is being negotiated by the coalition of German negotiators.
31	merkel quest consensus	What's-what's there?	What' is-what' there?	What are you doing?
31	merkel conservative agree coalition social democrat	Merkel Conservative d' Social Coalition Agreement (SCA) @-@democrates.	Merkel Conservative d' social coalition agreement, @-@democrate.	Merkel conservative d' social coalition agreement @-@democrate.
31	tymoshenko daughter asks merkel help release mother	Tymoshenko's daughter is asking Merkel for help to free her mother.	Tymoshenko's daughter asks Merkel for help to free her mother.	Tymoshenko's daughter asks Merkel to help release her mother from prison.
31	german coalition draft power eu foreign service	I'm a member of the German Coalition, and I'm a member.	German Coalition power project had foreign service.	German coalition foreign service power project.
31	chancellor merkel deal spd forming grand coalition	Chancellor Merkel is eager to form a great coalition.	Chancellor Merkel s&apos is eager to form a coalition.	Chancellor Merkel s&apos, eager to form a grand coalition.
31	update merkel spd narrow difference final coalition push	Update merkel spd final narrow difference thrust narrow difference coalition.	Update merkel spd narrow difference final thrust of the coalition.	Update merkel spd narrow difference final coalition push narrow difference.
31	germany grand coalition derail upturn	The recovery is derailed by the great German coalition.	And the great German coalition derails the recovery.	Great German coalition derails recovery.
31	german government christmas merkel seal deal spd	The German government has signed a new Christmas agreement with Merkel.	The German government signed the Apos; Christmas agreement with Merkel.	The German government signed the Apos, a Christmas deal with Merkel.
31	tymoshenko daughter asks germany help free mother	Tymoshenko's daughter is now asking Germany to help the free mother.	Tymoshenko's daughter asks in Germany to help the free mother.	Tymoshenko's daughter asks Germany to help the free mother.
31	german coalition plan billion spending	Billions of dollars are being spent by the German coalition.	The German coalition plans to spend billions of dollars.	The German coalition is spending billions.
31	market eye usd inr hit week low tracking euro rally oil demand limit fall	It was also the first time in the world that the price of crude oil fell in the second half of the 1990s.	The market's eye has shown that it hit the bottom of the week followed euro rally demand for limiting oil fall.	The market's eye has shown that the inr hit the bottom week followed euro rally demand limit oil fall.
31	crucial week german coalition talk	A very important week for the German coalition.	And it's a crucial week for the German coalition.	A crucial week for coalition Germany.
31	cdu csu spd coalition contract	CSU has a signed deal with the coalition.	C.S.U. signed a contract with the coalition.	CSU signed a coalition contract.
31	merkel reach deal coalition	Merkel has reached an agreement with the coalition.	So Merkel made a deal with the coalition.	Merkel made a deal with the coalition.
31	talk german government enter decisive phase	Talk about the German government entering a decisive phase.	Talk about German government entering a decisive phase?	Talk German government enter a decisive phase.
31	german coalition talk hinge spd referendum	The German coalition-Canadian has been talking about the apos; auto @-@defense.	The German Coalition-Canadian talked about l' auto-defense.	Auto @-@defense was mentioned by the German coalition @-@Canadian.
31	merkel bloc spd assign eu unity top priority coalition draft	It is also important to note that there are a number of issues that need to be taken into account.	Merkel Bloc gave unity the highest priority in the development of the coalition project.	The Merkel bloc has given unity the highest priority in the development of the coalition project.
31	german coalition treaty pro business agenda	The Germano Coalition-Canadian has signed a pro-business treaty.	The germano coalition-canada. has signed a pro @-@business treaty.	The Germano-Canadian coalition signed a pro-business treaty.
31	spd merkel conservative agrees coalition term form germany	It is the largest city in the world and the second largest city in the world.	Spd Merkel is a German-German coalition agreement.	Spd merkel conservative is dapos; German coalition term agreement.
31	merkel agrees coalition social democrat raise spending tax	Merkel agreed that the social coalition, @-@democrate, would raise taxes on spending.	Merkel agreed that the social coalition @-@democrates would raise taxes on spending.	Merkel agreed that social coalition @-@democrates raise spending taxes.
31	german grand coalition talk enter tense final phase	The speech of the Great German Coalition enters a final tense phase.	The speech of the Great German Coalition entered a tense final phase.	The speech of the Great German Coalition enters a tense final phase of the debate.
31	german coalition treaty mixed business reaction	The German coalition of the Treaty has mixed up the reactions of the various sectors of the industry.	The German treaty coalition has mixed reactions from the business community.	The German treaty coalition mixed business reactions.
31	germany social democrat leader expects party coalition deal	Social leader-German Democrat S&apos is waiting for a coalition agreement between the parties.	Social leader-German democrat s' waits for a coalition agreement between the parties.	German social leader-democrat S&apos is waiting for a party coalition agreement.
31	extra german spd cdu agree dual nationality minimum wage	The cdu spd extra-German will accept the minimum wage for dual nationality.	The extra German spd cdu accepts the minimum wage of the dual nationality.	The cdu spd extra German accepts the dual nationality minimum wage.
31	german grand coalition agreed awaiting referendum spd	S&apos germano coalition-canada; d' accord.	The German coalition-canada s' d' agreement.	Canada's contribution to the fight against HIV/AIDS.
31	factbox highlight german coalition agreement	L' boxed text illustrates the apos; German Coalition Agreement.	L' box illustrates the apos; German coalition agreement.	The German coalition agreement is illustrated in the box below.
31	german rival party meet govt formation	The German government is the governing body of the German political party.	The rival German party meets the government.	The German rival party meets the formation of the government.
31	germany graco	Graco germany, graco.	Graco germany graco.	Hey, graco germany graco.
31	merkel coalition seek greater control renewables	The Merkel coalition is looking for a better control of renewable energies.	The Merkel coalition seeks greater control over renewable energy sources.	Merkel's coalition seeks greater control over renewable energy.
31	merkel spd narrow difference final coalition push	Merkel has put an end to the last push of the narrow-difference coalition.	Merkel has put an end to the coalition's latest push on narrow difference.	Merkel ended the last push of the narrow difference coalition.
31	merkel social democrat work coalition deal	Merkel Social Coalition Agreement-democrat.	Social coalition agreement @-@democrate Merkel.	Agreement on social coalition @-@democrate Merkel.
31	merkel spd breakthrough coalition talk conservative	Merkel spd pierced from the coalition to talk about conservatives talk about coalition.	Merkel spd pierced from the coalition talk conservative talk coalition.	Merkel spd pierced coalition talk conservative talk coalition.
31	german party work hammer deal	The German party is working with a hammer @- @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ pike.	The German party has a hammer-picker.	German party working in hammer-piqueur.
31	german party pledge compensation ghetto laborer	The German party s' commits to compensate the workers of the ghetto.	The German party s&apos has pledged to compensate the ghetto workers.	The German party s&apos, calls for compensation to the ghetto workers.
31	german party set high hurdle direct bank aid esm	The German government has put a high barrier in the way of direct financial assistance.	The German party has put a high barrier to direct financial assistance.	The German Party put a high barrier to direct bank assistance esm esm es.
31	merkel party green eye german state alliance	The Green Eye of the Merkel Party, the Alliance of the Apostles, the German state.	Merkel Party has green eye, apo alliance, German state.	Merkel's party has green eyes and the alliance of the apostles; the German state.
31	forming german government bumper car bundestag	Forming the German Bundestag from the German government's-bumper cars.	The Bundestag was formed from the autos-buffers of the German government.	Forming the Bundestag from-German government bumper cars.
31	highlight german coalition agreement	The meeting was attended by a large number of delegates from France, Germany and the United Kingdom.	The update on the coalition agreement with Germany is highlighted.	The coalition agreement with Germany was highlighted.
31	german draft coalition deal drop idea nuclear shutdown fund	The German project of d' coalition agreement drop by drop nuclear closure fund idea.	The German project d' coalition agreement drop by drop idea of nuclear closure fund closure fund.	Germany's planned nuclear shutdown fund coalition agreement is a drop in the bucket.
31	germany grand coalition agreed pending approval spd base	The Great German Coalition agreed to wait for the Apos; approval of the Spd base.	The great German coalition agreed while waiting for the approval of the Spd base.	The great German coalition agreed pending the approval of the Spd database.
31	merkel clinch coalition deal early morning talk	Early in the morning, the Merkel coalition reached an agreement.	The Merkel coalition reached an agreement early morning.	The Merkel coalition struck an early morning deal.
31	eurusd rise merkel hammer coalition deal spd	Evaluering (november 2001) De kan kan kan kan kan kan.	Eurusd lever merkel hammer d&apos coalition.	Eurusd lift merkel hammer coalition d' agreement spd.
31	german coalition pledge billion spending	Billions of dollars are pledged by the German coalition.	And the German coalition is pledging billions in spending.	The German coalition is pledging billions.
31	merkel concedes minimum wage spending coalition accord	Merkel concedes a coalition agreement on spending on the minimum wage.	Merkel concedes a coalition agreement on minimum wage expenditures.	Merkel concedes a minimum wage spending coalition agreement.
31	germany grand coalition key player	Key player in the great German coalition.	The key player in the Great German Coalition.	The key player in the great German coalition.
31	german leader sign grand coalition agreement	The German leader signs a Grand Coalition Agreement.	The German leader signs a grand coalition agreement.	The German leader signed a grand coalition agreement with Germany.
31	read wednesday november	Wednesday, November.	Read Wednesday November.	Read wednesday november.
31	german onshore face fit scrutiny	There was a German on land going through the faces.	Some German on dry land went through the faces.	And a German on dry land went through the faces.
31	merkel clinch coalition agreement spd	L' Merkel clinch spd coalition agreement.	Coalition agreement merkel clinch spd.	L' coalition agreement merkel clinch spd.
31	merkel spd clinch coalition deal month vote	Last month, Merkel made a deal with the coalition.	And Merkel made a deal with the coalition last month.	Merkel made a deal with the coalition last month.
31	german press unenthusiastic grand coalition	L' Germany presses a large reluctant coalition.	L' Germany presses for a reluctant grand coalition.	L' Germany presses for a grand coalition with little enthusiasm.
31	germany national minimum wage agreed coalition deal	In addition, there are a number of other countries, such as the United Kingdom, France, Germany and the United Kingdom.	The minimum wage in Germany was the subject of a coalition agreement.	Germany's minimum wage was the subject of a coalition agreement.
31	germany biggest party agree form grand coalition	Germany's largest party, S&apos, agrees to form a great coalition of its own.	The largest German party agrees to form a great coalition.	Germany's largest party s&apos agrees to form a grand coalition.
31	turk germany dual citizenship	Turkey Germany Dual Citizenship.	Turkey Dual citizenship Germany.	Turkey Germany dual citizenship.
31	update merkel spd clinch coalition deal month vote	Update on the Monthly Vote; Merkel Coalition Agreement spd clinch.	Update on the vote of the month d' agreement of the coalition Merkel spd clinch.	Update on month-end vote; Merkel spd clinch coalition agreement.
31	germany future foreign policy stay course	The European Union is the world's most important trading partner.	Germany's foreign policy stance; the future holds its course.	Germany's foreign policy will stay the course.
31	merkel reach deal coa ion	Reaching the age; agreement cost.	The European Union is the world's largest trading partner.	Merkel reach age; accord cost.
31	market preview merkel agrees form coalition spd	In addition, there are a number of bilateral agreements between the EU and Japan.	Overview of the Merkel market is imminent; coalition agreement sp.	L' Merkel market overview; coalition agreement sp.
32	kickoff falcon packer moved noon	L&apos, a hawk-packing company, moved out at noon.	Hawk packer moved out at noon.	L' falcon packer moved at midday.
32	nfl note packer aaron rodgers practice play thursday	L' NIF score packer Aaron Rodgers s' coached NIF score packer Aaron Rodgers on Thursday.	L' FNI score packer Aaron Rodgers s' plays Thursday.	L' NIF score packer Aaron Rodgers s' trains to play Thursday.
32	green bay packer aaron rodgers slim chance play detroit	Green Bay Packer Aaron Rodgers plays Detroit game.	Aaron Rodgers, bay green packer, plays the game of Detroit.	Aaron Rodgers, green bay packer, plays the Detroit game.
32	packer unsure qb game lion	It's a good game, but it's a good game.	L' packer n' is not sure of game's lion qb.	L' packer n' is unsure of the lion of the game qb.
32	aaron rodgers suit tuesday	Aaron Rodgers in costume on Tuesday.	Aaron Rodgers, in a suit on Tuesday.	Aaron Rodgers in a suit Tuesday.
32	packer viking play tie matt flynn lead green bay	Viking packer plays at the same speed as lead lead lead berry.	The viking packer is equal mat flynn lead berry green.	The viking packer plays equal mat flynn lead green bay.
32	backup qbs essential	It's the reserve qbs that are essential.	Reserve qbs are critical.	Reserved qbs are essential to the game.
32	aaron rodgers return sends strong message	It's a good thing that you've got a lot of money.	The return of the Aaron Rodgers sends a strong message.	The return of Aaron Rodgers sends a strong message.
32	nfl thanksgiving day green bay packer face detroit lion live sky sport	On Thanksgiving, the Green Bay Lion plays sports live.	On Thanksgiving Day, the Detroit Green Bay Lion plays live sports.	On Thanksgiving, the lion from the green bay of Detroit plays live sports.
32	ponder play job	Just think about the game work.	Let's think about the gameplay.	Well, think about the gameplay.
32	preview viking packer	Packer Packer Preview viking.	Preview viking packer packer.	Preview viking packer packer.
32	detroit lion note matt flynn stranger	I've got to go to the airport.	Detroit lion note matt flynnn foreign note.	Detroit lion note matt flynnn foreign.
32	packer rb eddie lacy left sunday game asthma flared overtime	It's the first game of the season, and it's the second game of the season.	Eddie Lacy, packer, has left the Sunday game due to an asthma attack.	Packer Eddie Lacy left the Sunday game due to an asthma attack.
32	viking peterson active packer	Viking Peterson, packer, active.	Viking Peterson, active packager.	Viking Peterson, active bagger.
32	offensive continuity foremost mccarthy hold qb decision	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea, but it's a good idea.	The offensive continuity above all mccarthy hold qb decision qb.	First offensive continuity mccarthy hold qb decision qb.
32	greg jennings injury viking wr questionable fantasy low	Greg Jennings wounded, viking, dubious fantasy, weak.	Greg Jennings, hurt, viking, dubious fantasy, weak.	Greg Jennings, wounded, Viking, questionable fantasy, weak.
32	aaron rodgers injury packer qb making throw practice	Aaron Rodgers, damage packer qb, s&apos, pitching.	Aaron Rodgers, s&apos, wound packer qb, throwing coach.	Aaron Rodgers, injury packer qb, s' throwing coach.
32	randall cobb pack season	Pack season, Randall Cobb.	Hey, Randall Cobb, Pack season.	Randall Cobb, pack season.
32	packer rodgers play	The game is-cache.	The ships are playing a game of cache-cache.	The ships play cache-cache.
32	packer sitton lion scum injure rodgers	Packer's riffraff from the sitton lions hurt the Rodgers.	Packer's sitton lion scum is hurting the Rodgers.	Packer's sitton lion scum hurt Rodgers.
32	aaron rodgers optimist cleared	Optimistic Aaron Rodgers has been cleared.	Optimistic Aaron Rodgers has been cleared.	Aaron Rodgers, optimistic, has been cleared of all wrongdoing.
32	football feast	Football feast.	Football feast.	Well, football feast.
32	aaron rodgers rodgers confirms cleared	Aaron Rodgers Rodgers confirmed that this was clear.	Aaron Rodgers Rodgers confirms that these are clear.	Aaron Rodgers Rodgers confirms it's clear.
32	adrian peterson peterson jennings active viking	This is Adrian Peterson Peterson Peterson Jennings Viking active.	Adrian Peterson Peterson Jennings viking, active viking.	Adrian Peterson Peterson Jennings viking active.
32	win packer turn differently	There's a different spin for the winning packer.	The winning packer spins differently.	Winning packer spins differently.
32	viking three peterson packer takeaway stopping	Viking 3 Peterson Packer Takeaway s&apos stopping.	Viking 3 Peterson Packer Takeaway s' quitting.	Viking 3 Peterson Packer Takeaway s' quitting.
32	green bay packer teamreport	Green Bay Packer team report.	Report of the Green Bay Packer team.	Canadian Wildlife Service, Fisheries and Oceans Canada.
32	christian ponder ponder solid game tie packer	Christian ponders the question of s' he can s' act d' a strong game.	Christian thinks about the question of s' he can s' act d' a solid game.	Christian ponders the question of s' he can act d' a solid game.
32	packer qb rodgers thanksgiving return	L' thankgiving qb rodgers packer to return to.	L' packer qb rodgers thanksgiving return.	L' packer qb rodgers thanksgiving return.
32	packer trust tolzien win	Trust of the Apos; Tolzian packer win.	Confidence of packer Tolzian win.	L'confidence de l'apos; packer tolzien gagner.
32	detroit lion cb chris houston mri green bay packer qb aaron	Chris Houston Mri Green Bay Packer qb Aaron.	Detroit Lion cb Chris Houston Mri Green Bay Packer qb Aaron.	Detroit Lion cb Chris Houston Mri Green Bay Packer qb Aaron.
32	tim mike team win thursday	Team Tim Mike wins on Thursday.	L' Tim Mike team wins on Thursday.	Tim Mike's team wins Thursday.
32	viking packer game preview injury inconsistency highlight	The Viking Packer gives a glimpse of the apos; incoherence of injuries.	The Viking Packer game gives you a glimpse of the Viking Packer injury.	The Viking Packer game gives a glimpse of the incoherence of injuries.
32	green bay packer josh sitton blast lion dirtbags	Josh Sitton, l' packer of the green bay, set up bags of shit of lions.	Josh Sitton, the green bay packer, set up bags of lion shit.	Josh Sitton, the green bay packer, set up lion scumbags.
32	viking packer preview	View from below @-@first d' a Viking packer.	View d' before-first d' a packer viking.	Preview-first d' a viking packer.
32	worst quarterback match viking packer history	History of the Viking packers.	The worst quarterback game in the Viking packers history.	The worst quarterback match in the history of Viking packers.
32	viking pathetic packer	Pathetic Viking packer.	Pathetic packer viking.	You know, pathetic viking packer.
32	green bay packer josh sitton blast detroit lion coach	Green Bay Packer Josh Sitton Explosion Detroit Lion Coach.	Green Bay Packer Josh Sitton explosion Detroit Lion Coach.	Green Bay packer Josh Sitton explosion Detroit lion coach.
32	packer aaron rodgers thanksgiving day game lion	Aaron Rodgers, Thanksgiving Day lion.	Packer Aaron Rodgers, Thanksgiving lion.	Packer Aaron rogers, thanksgiving lion.
32	adrian peterson greg jennings active viking packer	Adrian Peterson Greg Jennings Viking packer, active.	Adrian Peterson Greg Jennings, an active Viking packager.	Adrian Peterson Greg Jennings active viking packer.
32	packer lion pick prediction detroit favored expert	The prediction of Packer's lionspeck was aided and abetted by a Detroit expert.	Packer's lionspeck prediction was aided by an expert from Detroit.	Packer's lionspeck prediction was favored by an expert from Detroit.
32	matt flynn start thursday	Matt Flyingn starts Thursday.	Matt Flyingn starts Thursday.	Matt Flyingn will start on Thursday.
32	packer lineman rip lion jim schwartz	L' Line Packer tearing lion Jim schwartz.	L' lineman tear up lion Jim schwartz.	L' line packer tear lion jim schwartz.
32	adrian peterson shine viking week tie packer	Adrian Peterson sparks viking week of the week of the tie packer.	Adrian Peterson sparks viking tie packer week week.	Adrian Peterson sparkles viking week tie packer week.
32	tolzien step big shoe aaron rodgers replacement	Tolzien no great shoe Aaron Rodgers replacement.	Tolzien not big shoe Aaron Rodgers' replacement.	Tolzien not big shoe Aaron Rodgers replacement shoe.
32	matt flynn packer starter aaron rodgers	Aaron Rodgers, Matt Flynn Packer packaging package thrower.	Aaron Rodgers, a Matt Flynn Packer package thrower.	This is Aaron Rodgers, the Matt Flynn Packer packaging launcher.
32	green bay packer playerwatch	Green Bay Packer Playerwatch &quot.	What about Green Bay Packer Playerwatch?	Canadian Institute of Health Information.
32	packer josh sitton lion bunch dirtbags	Josh Sitton, the lion, the pile of shit, the scumbags.	Packer Josh Sitton, the lion, the dirtbag, the dirtbags.	You know, Packer Josh Sitton, the lion, the pile of shit, the scumbags.
32	football note rodgers practice play thursday	The Rodgers are playing on Thursday.	The Rodgers s&apos, train to play on Thursday.	The Rodgers s' train to play Thursday.
32	cobb unsure return packer season	Cobb doubts the backpackers season.	Cobb has doubts about the packer season back.	Cobb doubts the packer season back.
32	viking packer play tie	Viking Packer playing tie.	Viking Packer plays in a tie.	Viking packer plays tie.
32	mike mccarthy packer finish defense	Mike McCarthy finishes the defense.	Mike McCarthy Packer finishes the defense.	Mike mccarthy packer finishes the defense.
32	bradshaw johnson split view mccarthy	Bradshaw Johnson shared McCarthy's vision.	Bradshaw Johnson shared the view of McCarthy.	Bradshaw Johnson shared the view of McCarthy.
32	double coverage packer lion	The Lion of the Cover doubles.	Double the lion on the cover.	The cover lion doubles.
32	packer defense rush answer struggle persist	The response of the @-@defender's packager to the state-of-the-art-response crisis persists.	L' packager-defender to the peak response crisis persists.	The response of the-defender packer to the peak response crisis persists.
32	call viking green bay	Viking Green Bay, please.	Get Viking Green Bay on the phone.	Call viking green bay.
32	minute drill packer viking	Viking mini-drill viking.	Mini-viking viking drill.	Mini-viking viking viking drill.
32	packer qb scott tolzien spin move score td	Packer qb scott turzien td.	Packer qb tolerzien spin move score td.	Packer qb scott tolzien spin move score td.
32	aaron rodgers play packer thursday	Aaron Rodgers playing at Packer Thursday.	Aaron Rodgers plays Packer on Thursday.	Aaron Rodgers plays at packer on Thursday.
32	rodgers slim play thursday	It's Rodgers Slim on Thursday.	Rodgers Slim plays Thursday.	Rodgers slim plays on Thursday.
32	adrian peterson start viking fantasy owner	Adrian Peterson begins fantasizing about the owners of Vikings.	Adrian Peterson began to fantasize about the Viking owners.	Now Adrian Peterson is starting to fantasize about the Viking owners.
32	aaron rodgers play week	Aaron Rodgers plays the week.	Aaron rogers plays the week.	Well, Aaron Rodgers plays the week.
32	flynn spark packer offense comeback victory	Victory winner, flying sparks offensive.	Winner of the Victory of the Flying Sparks.	Winner of the victory of l' offensive flying sparks.
32	viking cordarrelle patterson unimpressed lambeau field	Viking patterson cordarrelle flap field, unimpressed.	Viking cordarrelle patterson cordarrelle flap field not impressed.	Viking cordarrelle patterson flap field not impressed.
32	packer lion holiday provided plenty action	The Feast of the Bearer Lions has been a great source of action.	The Feast of Carrier lions provided a lot of action.	The bearer lion festival provided a lot of action.
32	packer defense deny lion big play	The lion's great game is rejected by the packer.	The defense of the apos; packer rejects the great game of the lion.	The packer defense rejects the lion's great game.
32	hartman blown lead dims viking season	Hartman's blowing lead in the middle of the Viking season.	Hartman has blown lead shot during the Viking season.	Hartman blew lead dim viking season viking.
32	force fed lion thanksgiving	Force has fed the lions Thanksgiving.	Force fed Lions Thanksgiving.	I mean, force fed the lions Thanksgiving.
32	live blog big comeback packer tie	Live blogger great return packer tie.	Live blog great return packer tie.	Live blog back packer tie great return.
32	green bay minnesota ot matt flynn help packer rally tie	Green Bay Minnesota and Matt Flynn Help Packer Rally tie.	Green Bay, Minnesota and Matt Flynn Help Packer Rally tie.	"Green Bay, Minnesota, and Matt Flynn, ""Help Packer Rally."""
32	ponder tolzien qbs packer viking contest	I want you to think about how much you want to win.	Think about tolerze qbs packer viking contest.	Think about qbs packer viking contest tolerance.
32	green bay player packer viking tie	The player of green bay packer viking tie.	Green Bay player packer viking tie.	The green bay player packer viking tie.
32	lion packer	Packer.	The lioness packer.	Hey, hey, hey, hey.
32	matt flynn packer thanksgiving starter	Thanksgiving pitcher Matt Flyn Packer.	I'm Matt Flyn Packer, thanksgiving pitcher.	Matt Flyn Packer, thanksgiving pitcher.
32	packer lion betting odds preview thanksgiving pick	The lions get a taste of the choice of thanksgiving.	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of people.	The betting lions get a taste of Thanksgiving.
32	scott tolzien bust amazing spin move touchdown	Scott Tolzien scored an unbelievable touchdown.	Scott Tolzien scored an amazing touchdown.	Scott tolzien scored an amazing touchdown.
32	peterson season best yard	Best year of Peterson's season.	This is the best class of Peterson's season.	The best class of Peterson's season.
32	viking lament lost late lead	It took a while for the Vikings to lose their lead.	The complaining Vikings lost their lead late in the game.	Viking lament lost its lead late in the game.
32	aaron rodgers mccarthy rodgers thursday	On Thursday, Aaron Rodgers McCarthy Rodgers.	Aaron Rodgers McCarthy Rodgers Thursday.	Aaron rogers mccarthy rogers thursday.
32	loss packer beat lion	Loser beats lion.	The loser's beating the lion.	And the loser beats the lion.
32	packer win nfc north playoff pretender	The Packer won the playoffs in the NfC north.	The Packer won the playoffs in the NfC's northern playoffs.	The Packer won the NfC playoffs in the first round of the season.
32	notebook mccarthy stand defensive staff	Mccarty notebook, personal stand defenses.	McCarthy notebook, personal stand defensive stand.	McCarthy notebook personal stand defensive stand.
32	matt flynn replaces scott tolzien packer	Matt flynn, replacing Scott Tolzien Packer.	Matt flynn will replace Scott Tolzien Packer.	Matt flynn replaces Scott tolzien packer.
32	rodgers sidelined packer seek answer game slide	The liners on the keyboard are looking for answers.	Cruise liners on the key are looking for answers to the Diapo answer set.	The answer slides on the key look for answers.
32	female green bay packer fan brave degree weather green bikini gif	Green Bay Packer Girl, gif green bikini time bachelor.	Daughter of Green Bay Packer fan brave diploma time bikini green gif.	Green Bay Packer girl fan brave diploma green bikini time gif.
32	adrian peterson surpasses barry sander rushing yard game	Adrian Peterson outnumbered Barry Sander in the court game.	Adrian Peterson outsets Barry Sander in court.	Adrian Peterson surpasses Barry Sander in the court game.
32	viking packer fight stalemate lambeau	Viking packers are fighting in the apo; dead end, flap.	The Viking packers will fight in the apo; dead end, flap.	Viking packers fight in the apo; dead end, flap.
32	adrian peterson eddie lacy going	That's where Adrian Peterson Eddie Lacy is going.	Adrian Peterson Eddie Lacy's going.	Adrian Peterson Eddie Lacy's going in.
32	tiebreaker meaningless packer better record	Breeze-impellerless nodes better record.	Breeze-noeuds sans sens empacer better save.	Breeze-nodes meaningless packer better save.
32	lion gab jim schwartz seat warmer	Big Bear Jim Schwartz sits warmer.	And the gab lion Jim Schwartz sits warmer.	The lion gab Jim Schwartz sits warmer.
32	green bay packer aaron rodgers playing thursday huge stretch	L' Green Bay Packer Aaron Rodgers plays on Thursday in a huge straight line.	Green Bay Packer Aaron Rodgers plays Thursday on a huge straight line.	L' green bay packer Aaron Rodgers plays on Thursday on a huge straight line.
32	eddie lacy left viking game asthma flareup	It's not a game, it's not a game, it's a game, it's a game.	Eddie Lacy left the game because of an outbreak of asthma.	Eddie Lacy left the game due to an asthma outbreak.
32	viking packer settle tie	Friendship is the bond between the Vikings.	The Vikings bond with each other.	It's a pleasure to meet you.
32	viking packer fit tied	The viking-packet was tied.	The viking portal-package was knotted.	The viking door-packet was tied.
32	nfl news roundup aaron rodgers jay cutler week	The NF News brings Aaron Rodgers together for Jay Cutler Week.	The NF news brings together Aaron Rodgers in Jay Cutler Week.	The news from the NF brings together Aaron Rodgers for the week of Jay Cutler.
32	matt flynn return left	Matt Flynn back left.	Matt Flynn came back left.	Matt Flynn went left again.
32	packer ol josh sitton detroit lion scumbags start jim	The Old Packer Josh Sitton Detroit Lion Scumbags, he's starting Jim.	Old Packer Josh Sitton Detroit Lion Scumbags starts Jim.	The Old Josh Sitton Detroit Lion Scumbags packer starts Jim.
32	matt flynn practice packer starter	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.	Matt flynnntraining packer starter.	Matt does not practice pack starter starter.
32	tom oates tie unsatisfactory packer playoff hunt	Tom oates is equal to the hunt for the semi-satisfactory playoffs of the Packers.	Tom oates equals the Packers' unsatisfying playoff hunt.	Tom oates has tied the hunt for the Packers' unsatisfactory playoff game.
32	audio packer josh sitton call lion dirtbags ahead thanksgiving day	Audio packeur Josh Sitton calling the fucking lions at the trailer park, approaching Thanksgiving.	Audio packeur Josh Sitton calling the lion fuckers at the apo; Thanksgiving coming up.	Audio hacker Josh Sitton calling lion fuckers at the apos, approaching Thanksgiving.
32	packer qb scott tolzien benched matt flynn	Packer qb scottzien banct flynnn matt.	Tolzian banct flynnn'm qb scott packer.	Tolerzien banct flynnn mat qb scott packer.
32	tolzien join select company packer	The Tolzian joins the D&apos Packer; selected company.	The Tolzian joins packer d' selected company.	The Tolzian joins the packer d' company selected.
32	eddie lacy asthma forced game	Eddie Lacy Asthma made the move.	And Eddie Lacy Asthma forced the game.	Eddie Lacy Asthma forced the game on him.
32	flynn rally green bay tie	Green tie from the flynall rally bay.	The green tie from the flynall rally bay.	Flynall rally bay green tie.
32	reviewing rivalry	Examine rivalry.	To examine rivalry.	You know, looking at rivalry.
32	viking packer play tie	Viking Packer playing tie.	Viking Packer plays in a tie.	Viking packer plays tie.
32	minnesota viking green bay packer play rare tie	Minnesota Viking Green Bay Packer playing rare tie.	Minnesota Viking Green Bay Packer play rare tie.	Minnesota viking green bay packer play rare tie.
32	chart fourth time viking lose fourth quarter lead	Vikings are losing momentum; advantage to the fourth quarter-time.	Vikings lose momentum; advantage to the fourth quarter-time.	The Vikings lose the fourth quarter advantage-time.
32	aaron rodgers play thursday	Aaron Rodgers plays on Thursday.	Aaron rogers is playing thursday.	Well, Aaron Rodgers plays on Thursday.
32	aaron rodgers injury packer qb chance playing slim	Aaron Rodgers is the packager of injuries who has a chance to play the game.	Aaron Rodgers is the injury packer who has a slim chance of playing.	Aaron Rodgers is the injury packer with a slim playing chance.
32	packer josh sitton call lion defensive dirtbags	Packer Josh Sitton calling the motherfuckers of the lions.	Packer Josh Sitton calling defensive bastard lions.	Packer Josh Sitton, call the lion defensive bastards.
32	nfl green bay rodgers return practice play	Nfl Green Bay Rodgers will go back to playing at the track.	Nfl Green Bay Rodgers returns to the apos to play the game.	Nfl Green Bay Rodgers return to play at the Apos; training.
32	packer secondary banged viking game	Secondary Viking Packer fucked Viking game fucked.	Secondary viking packer fucked the viking game fucked.	Viking secondary packer fucked viking game fucked.
32	matt flynn replaces scott tolzien qb packer	Matt flynn will replace Scott Tolzien qb packer.	Matt flynn replaces Scott Tolzien qb packer.	Matt flynn replaces Scott Tolzien qb packer at the same time.
32	packer lion qa pride detroit	Packer Lion is the pride of Detroit.	Well, the packer lion is the pride of Detroit.	The packer lion is Detroit pride.
32	preview packer viking	This is Preview Packer Viking.	Preview packer viking.	Preview packer viking.
32	eddie lacy solid fantasy game week tie viking	Eddie Lacy solid game fantasy weekend viking tie tie.	Eddie Lacy solid fantasy game week viking tie tie.	Eddie Lacy solid fantasy game week tie viking tie.
32	wisconsin sport round rodgers packer practice	Wisconsin Sports Round Rodgers s&apos train as packers for packers.	Wisconsin Sports Round Rodgers s' train as packers for packers.	Wisconsin Sports Round Rodgers s' train as packers for the packers.
32	aaron rodgers practice playing packer fantasy	Aaron Rodgers s' training to play Packer Fantasy.	Aaron Rodgers s' trains to play Packer Fantasy.	Aaron Rodgers s' coaches to play the game of Packer Fantasy.
32	aaron rodgers chance playing thanksgiving slim green	Aaron Rodgers, he plays Thanksgiving in green.	Aaron Rodgers plays green Thanksgiving.	Aaron Rodgers is playing green Thanksgiving.
32	review packer sport panel	Expert group on sports packaging.	Group of experts on sports packaging.	Group of experts in the field of sports packaging.
32	packer qb rodgers lion	I'm a packer, Rodgers lion.	Payer qb Rodgers lion.	Buyer qb rogers lion.
32	viking packer tie summed emotionless photo	The cravat, Viking Packer &quot, encapsulated the photograph without emotion.	Viking Packer &quot summarized the photo without emotion.	The tie, Viking Packer &quot, summed up the emotionless picture.
32	detroit lion proceed carefully calvin johnson sits walk	Calvin Johnson s&apos, the Detroit lion, proceeds cautiously; seated marches.	The Detroit lion proceeds cautiously Calvin Johnson s' assied march.	The Detroit lion cautiously proceeds Calvin Johnson s' sits down and walks.
32	packer flynn credible comeback green bay tie viking	Packer flynnn creditable comeback Green Bay Viking tie.	Packer flynn credible comeback Green Bay Viking tie tie.	Green Bay Viking tie packer flynn credible comeback tie.
32	breaking game nfc north race	Break the gameplay NfC Northern Race.	Breaking NfC game running from the north.	Break the game NfC north run.
32	packer stage furious rally settle tie viking	Packer's stagecoach is rallying to set up a viking tie.	Packer's stagecoach is mad rally to set viking tie.	Packer's coach is furious rally to set viking tie.
32	detroit lion notebook team panicking matt flynn start	Detroit Lion notebook team freaking out about the whole Matt flynnst start.	Detroit Lion notebook team freaking Matt flynnst start.	Detroit lion notebook team freaking out Matt flynnst start.
32	packer find spark flynn answer tie game	Packer find that sparkle flutter match match match draw.	Packer find sparkle flutter response match draw.	Packer find spark spirited match match match draw.
32	mike mccarthy press conference highlight	Highlight of Mike McCarthy's press conference.	The highlight of Mike McCarthy's press conference!	Mike McCarthy's press conference highlight.
32	deandre levy lion packer qb matt flynn paid	Deandre lion packer flynnn paid.	Deandre lion packer qb matt flynnnn paid.	Deandre lion packer qb matt flynnn.
32	injured packer player return	The player d'apos; packing wounded is back.	The player d' injured packaging is back.	The injured package player returns.
32	adrian peterson active viking packer	Adrian Peterson, Viking bagger, active.	Adrian Peterson, active Viking packager.	Adrian Peterson, viking packer active.
32	calvin johnson chris houston detroit lion practice	Calvin Johnson Chris Houston practices the Detroit Lion.	Calvin Johnson Chris Houston, practicing the Detroit Lion.	Calvin Johnson Chris Houston practiced the sport of the Detroit Lion.
32	cordarrelle patterson increase target boost fantasy football	Cordarrelle Patterson will increase the target booster fantastic football.	Cordarrelle Patterson increase target booster fantasy football.	Cordarrelle patterson increase target boost fantastic football.
32	week scouting report green bay packer	Green Bay Packer Weekly Reconnaissance Report.	A Weekly Reconnaissance Report from the Green Bay Packer.	Green Bay packer weekly reconnaissance report.
32	entire nfc north winless despite divisional game packer viking	In spite of the Viking packer division, the entire north of the NfC is defeated.	The whole north of the NfC is defeated despite the division of the game packer viking.	The whole north of the NfC is defeated despite the viking game packer division.
32	matt flynn sanity andy reid basketball skill top week	Matt has lost his mind, and Andy Reid has been the number one basketball player of the week.	Matt lost his mind and Andy Reid was the best basketball player of the week.	Matt's out of his mind, and Andy Reid has been the best basketball player of the week today.
32	aaron rodgers return green bay packer practice	Aaron Rodgers returns to Green Bay Packer.	Aaron Rodgers goes back to Green Bay Packer.	Aaron Rodgers goes back to green bay packer.
32	viking packer capsule	Viking Capsule Packer, please.	Viking packer capsule.	Viking packer capsule.
32	people greet playing tie usatsi	People salute by tying usatsi.	People salute by playing tie usatsi.	Playing tie usatsi greets people.
32	tyler dunne packer chat	This is Tyler Dunne Packer chat.	Tyler Dunne Packer cat.	Tyler dunne packer cat.
32	detroit lion winless thanksgiving decade packer game win	The Detroit Lion wins the Thanksgiving Decade Packer Game.	The lion from Detroit wins the Thanksgiving decade packer game.	The Detroit lion wins the Thanksgiving decade packer game.
32	lion opponent packer battle viking stalemate	L' lion packer opponent fighting Viking Stalemate.	L' opponent lion packer combat viking deadlock.	L' lion opponent packer fight viking deadlock.
32	viking packer tie father day	It's the Feast of the Viking Packs.	Father's Day is Viking Pack Day.	Father's Day is the day of the Viking packs, right?
32	packer coach mike mccarthy slim chance aaron rodgers play	L' Coach Packer Mike McCarthy has a miniscule chance; Rodgers plays.	Coach Packer Mike McCarthy has a miniscule chance that Aaron Rodgers will play the game.	L' coach Packer Mike McCarthy has a slim chance that Aaron Rodgers plays.
32	detroit lion note aaron rodgers doubtful thursday matt flynn	Aaron Rodgers is in doubt Thursday morning.	Detroit lion notes Aaron Rodgers on Thursday morning suspicious flynnnn.	Detroit lion notes Aaron Rodgers dubious Thursday morning flynnnnn.
32	packer josh sitton lion dirtbags	Josh Sitton Packer, son of a lion.	Packer Josh Sitton, son of a lion.	Packer Josh Sitton, you lion son of a bitch.
32	hartman blown lead dims viking playoff chance	Hartman has been blowing up Vikings odds of playoff.	Well, Hartman blew some Vikings luck playoff pellets.	Hartman blew the viking playoff luck pellets.
32	detroit lion green bay packer preview number	Detroit Lion Green Bay Packer Preview Number.	Detroit Lion Green Bay Packer, preview number.	Detroit Lion Green Bay Packer preview number.
32	packer quarterback quandary scott tolzien matt flynn	Quarterback packer quandary scott, tolzien tv flynnn.	Quarterback packer quandary scott tolzien tv flynnnn.	Quarterback packer quandary scott tolzien tv flynnnn.
32	viking packer week live coverage score update	Update of Viking Packer Week Online Cover Score.	Update of Viking Packer Week live coverage score.	Update viking packer week live coverage score.
32	nfl odds viking packer green bay favored lambeau	Nfl luck viking Packer Green Bay would have preferred flap.	Nfl luck viking Packer Green Bay favored flap.	Nfl luck viking Packer Green Bay favored flap.
32	viking big lead tie packer	Vikas tall tie packer, lead.	Big lead tie packer.	Vikas big lead tie packer.
32	nfl packer rodgers play	The game is played by the Packer Rodgers of the NFL.	The game is currently played by the Packer Rodgers of the NFL.	The NFL Packer Rodgers play this game.
32	packer sitton label lion scumbags	Packer Sitton Label Lion scoundrel bastards.	Packer Sitton Label Bastards.	Packer Sitton Label rogue lion bastards.
32	fantasy football projection week viking packer featuring adrian	The Week of Fantastic Viking Packer Football Projection starring Adrian.	The viking packer fantasy football screening week with Adrian as the star attraction.	The week of viking packer fantasy football projection with Adrian as the star.
32	football note packer rodgers	Football bearer Rodgers.	The football holder, Rodgers.	Hey, football player Rodgers.
32	gb packer call lion bunch dirtbags	Packer gb calls fucking lions.	I mean, the packer gb is calling the fucking lions.	The gb packer calls the fucking lions.
32	sport short rodgers packer	Rodgers Packer sportsman.	Short sports Rodgers Packer.	Sportive short rodgers packer.
32	flynn win	It's the pilot winning.	The pilot's winning.	Well, the pilot wins.
32	matt flynn help packer rally rare tie rival viking	Matt flynnnn assist Packer rally rare match rival viking.	Matt flynnnn help Packer rally rare match rival viking.	Matt flynnnn help packer rally rare match viking rival match.
32	scouting opposition green bay packer dinged time	It's the first time you've been able to see the world, and it's the first time you've seen it.	By tracking the opposites, the green bay packer has swallowed up the time.	By tracking the opposition green bay packer has ingested time.
32	performance grade flynn creates spark	Sparks are created by the performance flynn.	And the performance flynn creates sparks.	The performance flynn creates sparks.
32	nfc north injury week jonathan franklin suffers concussion	CNP Northern Injury Week Jonathan Franklin has a severe concussion.	CNP Northern Injury Week Jonathan Franklin suffers from concussion.	The injury week north of CNP Jonathan Franklin suffers from apos; concussion.
32	packer seek slide beat viking	Packer is looking for a viking slide beat.	Packer is looking for slide beat viking.	Packer is looking for slide beat viking now.
32	matt flynn help packer salvage tie viking	Matt flynnnn to help you pack a Viking tie recovery packer.	Matt flynnnn help recovery packer viking tie.	Matt flynnnn help salvage viking tie packer.
32	rodgers return practice flynn expected start	The rodgers go back to the training and the training, and they wait for them to get started.	Rodgers return to training and sn&apos, wait for them to begin.	The rodgers return to the apos; training and s' wait for them; they begin.
32	nfl preview green bay detroit	Detroit Green Bay premiere-front view.	Forward view-Detroit Green Bay premiere.	A preview-of Detroit's green bay premiere.
32	aaron rodgers throwing pain	Aaron Rodgers throws pain.	Aaron Rodgers throws pain.	Aaron Rodgers is throwing the pain.
32	nfl grade week nfc north bad sunday	Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc Nfc.	North Nfc Week bad Sunday.	Nfc North Week is a bad Sunday.
32	packer josh sitton blast lion coach defense bunch	Packer Josh Sitton - Lion's Explosion Defence Coach.	Packer Josh Sitton Lion explosion defense coach.	Packer josh sitton explosion lion defense coach.
32	aaron rodgers ready matt flynn practice starter	This is the first time I've seen Aaron Rodgers, and he's ready.	Aaron Rodgers is ready Matt Flynn in the beginning of his training.	Aaron Rodgers is ready Matt Flynnnn start of training.
32	viking green bay game replay	Replay of Viking Green Bay Game.	Viking green bay game replay, please.	Viking green bay game replay.
32	lion dirty team video packer ol josh sitton call detroit bunch	Video rapper Josh Sitton, formerly known as the Dirty Lion Team, calls Detroit.	Video rapper Josh Sitton calls Detroit, a team of dirty lions.	L&apos's dirty lion team video rapper Josh Sitton calls Detroit.
32	three biggest thing questioning green bay packer jason	Three important issues are challenging Green Bay Packer Jason.	There are three important issues that raise the question of Green Bay Packer Jason.	There are three important questions about Jason's Green Bay Packer.
32	packer quarterback scott tolzien spin rushing touchdown	Packer quarterback Scott Tolzien spin-touchdown Scott Tolzien has precipitated.	Packer quarterback Scott Tolzien spin touchdown precipitated.	Scott Tolzien spin touchdown quarterback packer precipitated.
32	viking packer game rare tie	The Viking packer rare game tie.	The viking packer game game rare tie.	The viking packer game rare tie.
32	scott tolzien matt flynn replaces benched scott tolzien	Scott Tolzien Matt flynnn has replaced Scott Tolzien.	Scott tolzien matt flynnn replaces Scott tolzien.	Scott tolzien matt flynnn replaces Scott tolzien.
32	packer turn qb matt flynn	It's a good idea if you don't like it.	L' packer rotates qb flynnnn.	L' packer turns qb matt flynnn.
32	lion calvin johnson practice field stretching	Lion training Calvin Johnson s' stretch.	The field d' Lion training Calvin Johnson s' stretch.	Lion's Calvin Johnson training field s' stretch.
32	scott tolzien tough belongs league	Scott Tolzien Dur is now a member of the league.	Scott Tolzien Dur is in the league now.	Scott Tolzien Dur belongs in the league.
32	opposing view lion expect packer qb matt fynn	Opposite view waiting for Fynn Fynn Packer qb matt.	Opposed view lion expecting Packer qb matt Fynn Fynn.	Opposite view lion expecting packer qb matt Fynn Fynn.
32	mccarthy responds sitton scumbags comment	McCarthy responds to the comments of the bastards at the sitton.	McCarthy responds to the commentary from the sitton bastards.	McCarthy responds to the sitton bastards comment.
32	packer lead	Packer lead.	This is lead from the packer.	The lead packer.
32	adrian peterson eddie lacy feeling	That's how Adrian Peterson Eddie Lacy felt.	Adrian Peterson Eddie Lacy felt like that.	Adrian Peterson Eddie Lacy was feeling that way.
32	packer defense good beat lion	It's a good game, it's a good game and it beats the lion.	The defense of the apos; packer is good and defeats the lion.	The defense of the apos; packer is good and lion beats.
32	green bay packer guard call detroit lion defense scumbags	The guard at the Green Bay Packer is calling Detroit Lion the bastards of the defense.	The guard at Green Bay Packer, he calls Detroit Lion the defense bastards.	The Green Bay Packer guard calls Detroit Lion defense bastards.
32	viking defense control packer	Viking packer... defense control.	Viking packer of defense control.	Viking defense control packer.
32	packer viking golden age nfl tie	Packer ages old; or nf tie.	Packer age viking; or nf tie.	Packer viking age d' or nfl tie.
32	class action lacking packer draftee	Having no packers involved.	Collective action has not yet been taken.	Collective action has no built-up packers.
32	detroit lion note paid deandre levy packer matt flynn	The Detroit Lion ticket has paid the Packer Matt flynnnn tax.	The Detroit lion ticket paid Andre Packer tax on Matt flynnn.	The Detroit lion ticket paid Matt flynnnn's andre packer tax.
32	packer matt flynn aaron rodgers set start lion	Packer Matt flynnn Aaron Rodgers started starting lion.	Packer Matt flynnn Aaron Rodgers started starting lion.	Packer Matt flynnn Aaron Rodgers started as a lion at the start of the game.
32	matt flynn replaces scott tolzien fantasy	Matt flynn's replacing Scott Tolzien fantasy.	Matt flynn is replacing Scott Tolzien fantasy.	Matt flynn replaces Scott Tolzien fantasy.
32	debating best packer qb	Debating the Best Packager qb qb.	Discuss the best packager qb qb.	Discuss best packer qb qb.
32	aaron rodgers injury packer qb chance play slim	Aaron Rodgers wound-wrapping guy, he's got a slim chance.	Aaron Rodgers wound packer qb chance play slim.	Aaron Rodgers injury packer qb chance play thin.
32	matt flynn full circle packer scott tolzien benched	Matt Flyingn Full Circle Packer Scott Tolzien on the bench.	Matt Flyingn Full Circle Packer Scott Tolzien to the bench.	Matt Flyingn Flyingn Full Circle Packer Scott Tolzien is on the bench for the first time.
32	nfl pick prediction week viking packer	Prediction of Viking Packer Weekly Gathering.	This is a prediction of the Viking Packer Weekly Collection.	Forecast of viking packer collection week.
32	notebook lacy break stacked viking defense	Notebook Lacy Break stacks up Viking defense.	Notebook Lacy Break piles Viking defense.	Notebook Lacy Break stacks up the viking defense.
32	viking packer ot	Viking Packer is not a packer.	Not a packer.	Not packer viking packer.
32	rodgers play thursday	Rodgers playing on Thursday.	Rodgers is on Thursday.	Well, Rodgers is playing on Thursday.
32	aaron rodgers thursday	This is Aaron Rodgers on Thursday.	Aaron rogers on Thursday.	Uh, Aaron Rodgers on Thursday.
32	nelson playmaking rock banged packer	Nelson Playmaking hit Packer.	Well, Nelson Playmaking Rock hit Packer.	Nelson playmaking rock hit packer.
32	packer viking lombardiave prediction	Packer viking viking lombardiave.	Packer viking lombardiave prediction.	Packer viking lombardiave prediction viking.
32	sunday win packer	Win Packer on Sunday.	And on Sundays, win Packer.	Sunday win Packer.
32	james jones continues battle leg injury	James Jones has continued to injure his combat leg.	James Jones continues to hurt his combat leg.	James Jones continues to injure his combat leg as well.
32	flynn rally packer tie viking	Flynn rally viking viking tie packer.	Flynn rally packer viking tie viking.	Flynn rally rally packer tie viking viking.
32	schwartz responds packer sitton calling scumbag	"Schwartz answers to the ""Packer Sitton"" by calling the phone."	Schwartz responds to the Sitton Packer by calling the Sitton Packer; motherfucker.	Schwartz responds to the packer sitton by calling the etapos; motherfucker.
32	thing viking packer tie	"""Viking Packer"" is the name of the game."	What about Viking Packer?	It is also important to keep in mind that this is not the case.
32	rodgers practice limited mccarthy chance playing closer	Rodgers had a chance to play the game more closely.	Rodgers practice McCarthy limited chance to play up close.	Rodgers practice McCarthy limited chance to play closer to home.
32	aaron rodgers practice long shot play week	Aaron Rodgers practices Game Week big shots.	Aaron Rodgers practices big-game game week.	Aaron Rodgers is in the big-game game week now.
32	nfl news aaron rodgers throw michael crabtree ready return	Breaking news, Aaron Rodgers throws Michael Crabtree back in the game.	And breaking news Aaron Rodgers throws Michael crabtree ready to go home.	News Aaron Rodgers throw Michael crabtree ready to roll.
32	flynn replaces tolzien qb packer	Flynn is the name of the company.	Flynn replaces the tolzien qb packer.	Flynn replaces tolzien qb packer.
32	frazier ponder ous plan green bay	Frazier, weigh more weight Green Bay plan.	Frazier weigh heavier plan Green Bay plan.	This is the first time I've ever seen a green bay plan.
32	packer coach mike mccarthy worried josh sitton scumbags comment	Coach Mike McCarthy was concerned about Josh Sitton's comments on garbage.	Coach Mike McCarthy was worried about Josh Sitton's comments on garbage.	L' coach Mike McCarthy s' worried about Josh Sitton's comment on the garbage.
32	david price offer free holiday travel advice lady	David Price offers free vacation advice.	David Price has offered free advice to vacation women.	David Price offers free advice to vacation women.
32	packer viking ot packer fit tied viking	Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper.	Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper Viper.	Viper, viper, viper, viper, viper, viper, viper, viper, viper.
32	packer qb rodgers throw play	L' Rodgers Boxer launches the game.	L' packer qb Rodgers launches the game.	L' packer qb Rodgers launches game.
32	aaron rodgers packer thanksgiving	This is Aaron Rodgers Packer Thanksgiving.	Aaron Rodgers Packer Thanksgiving.	Aaron Rodgers packer thanksgiving.
33	update france boost central african force backing	Update France Booster Central African Support Force.	Update France booster central African support force.	Update France boost central African support force.
33	france send troop central african republic	France sends troops in Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sent troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	The French are sending troops to the north of the country, to the south of the country.
33	africa president france supply extra troop	The French President of Africa provides additional troops.	The African President France provides additional troops.	And the African president, France, is providing additional troops.
33	africa crisis	Crisis in Africa.	It's an African crisis.	Uh, African crisis.
33	official sound alarm car france draft resolution	Motion for a resolution Paragraph 1 Motion for a resolution 1.	Draft resolution on the d&apos car; official sound alarm France.	Draft resolution on the official sound alarm in France.
33	central african republic pm france increase troop	It's a good idea to be able to do that.	Republic of Djibouti; Central Africa to increase troops.	Republic d' Central Africa to increase troops.
33	considers option central african republic	Consider this option: Central African Republic.	Consider the option Central African Republic.	Consider l' option Central African Republic.
33	top official central african republic descending chaos	It is the capital of Central Africa and the capital of the region.	Official high of the republic d' Central Africa descending chaos.	High official of the Republic of Apos; descending chaos in Central Africa.
33	france sends troop central african republic growing chaos	This was the first time that France had sent troops to the Central African Republic, where the chaos had set in.	France sends troops in the republic of d'apos; Central Africa where the chaos sets in.	France sends troops to the republic of central Africa, where chaos sets in.
33	central african republic descending chaos	Central Africa descends from chaos.	The Republic of Apos; Central Africa descends chaos.	The republic of d' central Africa brings down chaos.
33	central african republic force	Central African Republic force.	Strength of the Central African Republic.	Force of the central African republic.
33	education fa er amid conflict car	Education is done in a combat car.	L' education is done in a combat car.	L' education in a combat car.
33	france intervene car boil	The car is being boiled by the French government.	France steps in to boil the car!	France boil the car.
33	france increase force central africa backing	It increases the strength of l' Central Africa.	France increased the strength of l' Central Africa.	This is the first time in the history of Africa that France has increased its strength.
33	france reasserts africa fresh troop troubled central african	The French were the first to re-affirm the unity of the continent.	France reasserts the newly-discussed Africa of Central Africa.	France reasserts the newly troubled Africa troop of l'apos; Central Africa.
33	senior official urge force curb horrific situation central african republic	Senior officials are eager to put an end to the appalling situation in the Central African Republic.	The senior officials are eager to put an end to the horrible situation in the republic of Apos, Central Africa.	Senior officials urge an end to the horrific situation in the Apostle Republic of Central Africa.
33	central african republic descending anarchy	Central Africa descends from anarchy.	The republic of Apostles; Central Africa descends Apostles; anarchy.	The republic d' central Africa descends the apos; anarchy.
33	france send troop warns chaos africa bangkok post news	France sends troops from' african bangkok chaotic warnings news post.	France sends troops from' warnings chaotic African bangkok news post news.	France sends troops from' warnings chaos African bangkok news post news.
33	fled car	Runaway car.	Runaway car.	We got a car on the run.
33	france boost central africa force backing	France Booster Central African support force.	France boost central African support force.	France boost central African support force.
33	crisis central african republic william daniel	William Daniel, Central Crisis of the African Republic.	Crisis in the center of the African Republic William Daniel.	A crisis in the centre of the Republic of Africa.
33	update central african republic france boost troop	Reinforcement troops of the Central African Republic of France.	Update of reinforcement troops of the Central African Republic of France.	This is an update of the reinforcements of the Central African Republic of France.
33	deputy chief car falling complete chaos	It's a deputy car, and it's going into chaos.	The car of l' deputy falling in utter chaos.	The backup car falling into chaos.
33	france send troop central african republic violence spread	France has sent troops to the centre of the African Republic to spread violence.	France sends troops to the center of the African Republic to spread violence.	France sends troops to the center of the republic to spread violence.
33	africa hope speedy arrival extra french troop	L' Africa expects more French troops to arrive soon.	L' Africa looks forward to the early arrival of more French troops.	Africa hopes for a rapid arrival of additional French troops.
33	france send troop central african republic descends complete	France sends troops in Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sent troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	The French are sending troops to the north of the country, to the south of the country.
33	security council considering sanction central african republic	The Security Council is considering the possibility of imposing sanctions on the Republic of Central Africa.	The Security Council is considering penalising the republic of Apos; Central Africa.	Security council is considering sanctioning the republic of d' Central Africa.
33	france troop car	French car.	Car de France!	Hey, car from France.
33	france sending troop central african republic prevent collapse	This was the first time in the world that the United States had taken the lead in the fight against terrorism.	France, which sent troops to the republic of Apos, prevented the collapse.	France sending troops to the republic of Apos; Central Africa prevents collapse.
33	central african republic senior official urge force curb horrific	The high-ranking officials of the Republic of Apostolos, Central Africa, are insisting that the horrors be repressed.	It is also important to ensure that the people of the region are able to take advantage of the opportunities offered by the project.	The high officials of the republic of central Africa are urging that horrors be repressed.
33	violence increase central african republic	Violence has increased the Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	It is also the capital of the region of Central Africa.	The violence increases the republic of d' central Africa.
33	france send troop head car civil war	France has sent its troops to lead the civil war.	And France sent troops to lead the civil war.	France sent troops to lead the civil war there.
33	french troop central african republic	Republic of Senegal; Central Africa of French troops.	Republic d' Central Africa of French troops.	French troops in central Africa.
33	france sending troop central african republic	France sends troops in Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sends troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	France is sending troops to Central Africa.
33	analysis intervention car short detail time	It's a great place to get to know a lot more about your car than any other car.	Car analysis from D' intervention of little time detail of the car.	Car analysis from the car; little detail time intervention of the car.
33	living fear central african republic awaits foreign intervention	It is a country in the north of the world, with a population of about 3 million.	Central Africa awaits foreign intervention.	The republic of d' central Africa awaits foreign intervention.
33	additional french troop car situation descending complete chaos	Another situation of a French troop car... descending into complete chaos.	Another situation of a French troop car descending into complete chaos.	Another French troop car situation descending into total chaos.
33	call mount force central african republic	Calling for the force in the center of the African Republic.	Call for force in the center of the African republic.	To call for force in the center of the African Republic.
33	france sends troop central african republic	France has sent troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	The French are sending troops to the north of the country, to the south of the country.	France sends troops to Republic of Haiti; Central Africa.
33	france send troop central african republic amid genocide warning	France sends troops to the Republic of Apostles; Central Africa in the middle of the world; a warning of genocide.	France sends troops to the republic of Apos; Central Africa in the middle of a genocide warning.	The French send troops in the republic of d' central Africa in the middle of d' a warning of genocide.
33	france plan intervention central african republic	Plan France intervention, République d' and Central Africa.	Plan France intervention Republic d' Central Africa.	Plan France intervention Republic d' Central Africa.
33	france boost central african republic force amid chaos	France stimulates the strength of the Republic of Apos; Central Africa is a region in the midst of chaos.	France stimulates the strength of the republic d'apos; Central Africa in the midst of the chaos.	France stimulates the strength of the republic of central Africa in the midst of chaos.
33	france boost central african force backing	France is the driving force behind the African Central Force, which supports Africa.	France invigorates the central African force that supports l'apos; Afrique.	France energizes Africa's central force that supports Africa.
33	france sending troop central african republic	France sends troops in Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sends troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	France is sending troops to Central Africa.
33	update central african republic france boost troop	Reinforcement troops of the Central African Republic of France.	Update of reinforcement troops of the Central African Republic of France.	This is an update of the reinforcements of the Central African Republic of France.
33	france send troop conflict hit central african republic	France sends troops to the Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sends troops into conflict in the republic of Apos, Central Africa.	France sent troops in conflict to the republic of d'apos; central Africa.
33	france increase force central african republic	The Central African Republic was augmented by France.	The French increased the strength of the Central African Republic.	France increased the central African republic force.
33	france sending troop central african republic prevent collapse	This was the first time in the world that the United States had taken the lead in the fight against terrorism.	France, which sent troops to the republic of Apos, prevented the collapse.	France sending troops to the republic of Apos; Central Africa prevents collapse.
33	france send troop warns chaos africa	France is sending soldiers to warn African chaos.	And France sends soldiers to warn Africa of the chaos.	France sends soldiers warn the chaos of Africa.
33	report rebel decimate african republic town	The rebels have just decimated the city of the African Republic.	Rebels decimated the city of the African Republic.	The rebels decimated the town of the African Republic.
33	france backing boost car force week	France supports the Propulsion Force Week of cars.	France supports the Vehicle Propulsion Force Week.	France supports car propulsive force week.
33	central african republic france plan send troop central african	The Plan of the Republic of Apos; Central Africa in France sends troops from Apos; Central Africa.	The plan of the republic d' Central Africa in France sends troops from d' Central Africa.	The plan of the republic d' central Africa in France sends troops from; central Africa.
33	central african republic descending complete chaos	The Republic of Apostles; Central Africa s&apos, sunk into a state of total chaos.	The republic of Central Africa s&apos, plunges into complete chaos.	The republic of d' central Africa, s&apos, sinks into complete chaos.
33	france sending troop central african republic	France sends troops in Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sends troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	France is sending troops to Central Africa.
33	france sending troop central african republic	France sends troops in Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sends troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	France is sending troops to Central Africa.
33	france sending troop ravaged central african republic	France sends troops to the Republic of Apos, which is devastated in Central Africa.	France sends troops to the devastated republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sends troops in the republic of d' central Africa devastated.
33	france presence car matter bargain nii akuetteh	French presence at the market of the Nii Akuetteh cars.	Nii Akuetteh car market presence in France.	French presence at Nii Akuetteh car market.
33	france send troop central africa	France sends troops to Central Africa.	France sent troops to Central Africa.	The French are sending troops to the region of Central Africa.
33	france send troop central african republic	France sends troops in Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sent troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	The French are sending troops to the north of the country, to the south of the country.
33	france add troop central african republic	In addition, there are a large number of troops from France, France, and Central Africa.	France add troops of the republic of d' Central Africa.	France add troops from republic d' Central Africa.
33	france ready send troop central african republic	France is prepared to send troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	France was ready to send troops to the Republic of Apostles; Central Africa.	France is ready to send troops to Central Africa.
33	considering imposing arm embargo central african republic	It is important that the Council of Europe and the Council of Europe work together on this issue.	Consider an arms embargo in Central Africa.	Consider imposing an arms embargo in Central Africa.
33	france send troop central africa help restore stability	France sends troops from Senegal and Central Africa to help restore the country's stability.	The French are sending troops to help restore the stability of the region.	France sends troops to help restore the stability of Central Africa.
33	central african republic wait international help	It is a country in the region of Central Africa that is waiting to receive international assistance.	The Republic of Apostles; Central Africa awaits international assistance.	The republic of Central Africa awaits international assistance.
33	central african republic france send troop central african republic	In the Central African Republic, France sent troops from the Central African Republic.	The France of the Central African Republic sent troops from the Central African Republic.	The French of the Central African Republic are sending troops from the region.
33	france triple car troop presence	The location is perfect for sightseeing, sightseeing and sightseeing.	The presence of apos; a troop of three French cars.	The presence of a troop of three French cars.
33	france send troop car	They're sending a police car.	France's sending a police car.	France is sending a police car now.
33	considers central african republic arm embargo	The Central African Republic is regarded as an arms embargo.	He views the Central African Republic as an arms embargo on Africa.	He considers the central African republic to be a weapons embargo.
33	france deploy troop central african republic	France deploys troops to the Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France deployed troops in the republic of d' Central Africa.	France deploys troops in the republic of d' central Africa.
33	central african republic france boost troop	The Republic of Central Africa reinforces the troops in France.	The Republic of Apos; Central Africa reinforces troops in France.	The republic of d' Central Africa strengthens the troops in France.
33	paris boost contingent central african republic	Paris stimulates the Central African Republic's contingent.	Paris stimulates the republic's contingent of d' Central Africa.	Paris stimulates the contingent of the republic of d' Central Africa.
33	action needed central african republic chaos	It was the first time in the history of the world that the people of Central Africa had been in a state of chaos.	The apostles; action required the chaos of the republic of d' Central Africa.	L' action required the chaos of the republic of Central Africa.
33	member asked france central african republic	The Council of Europe had a major role to play in the fight against terrorism.	The member asked France for a republic of Apos; Central Africa.	The member asked France for the republic of Central Africa.
33	france send troop central african republic	France sends troops in Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	France sent troops to the Republic of Senegal; Central Africa.	The French are sending troops to the north of the country, to the south of the country.
33	avoid complete chaos central africa	Avoiding total chaos in the Central African region.	To avoid total chaos in Central Africa.	Avoid complete chaos in Central Africa.
33	france plan troop african state	Plan France, State of D' Africa.	Plan France, state d' Africa.	Plan France, state d' Afrique.
33	france send troop african republic kwwl	France has sent troops to the African Republic.	France sends troops to the African Republic.	The French send troops to the African republic.
33	humanitarian fear amid car turmoil	The humanitarian fear... in the turmoil of cars.	Humanitarian fear in car trouble.	The humanitarian fear in the car trouble.
33	warning central african republic	The Republic of Apos; Central Africa.	Warning the Republic of Central Africa.	Warning the republic of d' central Africa.
33	france send troop african republic	France has sent troops to Africa.	France sends troops to Africa.	The French send troops to Africa.
33	france send troop african republic news weather	France reports from the African Republic.	France is sending weather reports from the Republic of Africa.	France sends news from the African Republic.
34	pakistan moderate army commander	Pakistan Commander de l' Moderate Army.	Pakistan Commander of the moderate army.	Pakistan Commander, moderate army.
34	pm nawaz lay foundation stone nuclear plant today	Pm nawaz is laying the groundwork for the construction of the nuclear power plant.	Pm nawaz is laying the foundation for nuclear power today.	Pm nawaz lays the foundation for the nuclear power plant today.
34	pakistan prime minister military chief	Prime Minister, leader of the army.	Prime Minister of Pakistan, leader of the army.	Prime Minister of Pakistan, leader of the armed forces of Pakistan.
34	nawaz card close chest	Nawaz near the chest.	This is a Nawaz card near the chest.	Nawaz card near chest.
34	pakistan pm ignores seniority gen raheel sharif army chief	Pakistan has been a leader of the armed forces of the United States for years.	Pakistan pm ignores the age of the head of the army.	Pakistan pm ignores the apos; age of the sharif chief of the army.
34	islam democracy danger	There is a danger of Islamic democracy.	Islamic democracy is a danger.	Islamic democracy is dangerous.
34	pakistan build power plant karachi	Pakistan Construction of a Karachi Power Plant.	Pakistan to build a karachi power plant.	Pakistan build a power plant karachi.
34	sharif third time lucky picking coas	Three-time lucky Sharif picking coas.	Sharif three times lucky picking up coas.	Sharif three times lucky picking coas.
34	nawaz sharif chooses gen raheel sharif pakistan army chief	The head of the Pakistani army Gen Raheel Sharif is chosen by Nawaz Sharif.	Nawaz Sharif chooses leader of Pakistani Gen Raheel Sharif army.	Nawaz Sharif chooses leader of the Pakistani army Gen Raheel Sharif.
34	pakistan appoints raheel sharif army chief	Pakistan names Raheel Sharif leader of the army.	Pakistan appoints Raheel Sharif as the head of the army.	Pakistan appoints Raheel Sharif chief of the army.
34	pakistan army chief	Pakistani army.	He's the leader of the Pakistani army.	He is the head of the army of Pakistan.
34	change guard pm nawaz army chief tomorrow	It's time for a change of duty after-midi, the leader of the Nawaz army.	Changing shift tomorrow after-midi, leader of the Nawaz army.	Change of guard tomorrow after-midi, the leader of l' army Nawaz.
34	pakistan launch largest nuclear power project cost estimated	Pakistan launches the largest-ever nuclear energy project estimated to cost.	Pakistan launches largest nuclear energy project estimated cost.	Pakistan launches the largest nuclear power project in the world.
34	pakistan launched construction country largest nuclear power project	Pakistan has launched the largest nuclear energy project in the country of construction.	Pakistan has launched its largest nuclear power project in the country of construction.	Pakistan has launched the largest nuclear power project in the world.
34	pakistan prime minister announces army chief spymaster retires	The Pakistani Prime Minister announces the retirement of the leader of the Spymaster army.	The Prime Minister of Pakistan announces that the head of the Spymaster army is retiring.	The Prime Minister of Pakistan announces that the leader of the Pakistani military spymaster army is retiring.
34	heinous crime offender karachi prime minister order ppo	Prime Minister Karachi's hateful criminal orders ppo.	The criminal hate Karachi Prime Minister orders ppo.	The criminal, the hateful Karachi Prime Minister, orders ppo.
34	pakistani premier chooses army chief	The Prime Minister of Pakistan has chosen the head of the army.	The Prime Minister of Pakistan chooses the head of the army.	The Prime Minister of Pakistan chooses the army's leader.
34	pakistan work mw nuclear power plant	Pakistan work mw. nuclear power plant.	Pakistan work mw nuclear power plant.	Pakistan work mw nuclear power plant.
34	low profile general named pakistan army chief	He was the commander of the Pakistani army.	Discreet general named leader of the Pakistani army.	Discret general named head of the army of Pakistan.
34	pakistan break ground big nuclear plant	Pakistan is in the process of inaugurating a large nuclear power plant.	Pakistan is opening a large nuclear power plant.	Pakistan is inaugurating a large nuclear power plant in the country.
34	sharif appoints gen raheel sharif pak army chief	Sharif also appoints the head of the army of the sharif pak.	Sharif appoints the Chief of the Army of Gen raheel sharif pak.	Sharif appoints leader of the army of gen raheel sharif pak.
34	pakistan pm open construction largest nuclear power project	The project will be completed in the fall of 2008.	Pakistan Open construction larger project of nuclear power plants.	Pakistan Open construction largest nuclear energy project.
34	pakistan break ground nuclear plant	A Pakistani nuclear revolution.	Pakistan's revolutionary nuclear power plant.	Revolutionary nuclear power plant in Pakistan.
34	nawaz launch country largest nuclear power project	Nawaz launches the biggest nuclear energy project in the country.	Nawaz has launched the country's largest nuclear power project.	Nawaz launches the largest nuclear power project in the country.
34	gen raheel sharif appointed army chief	Gen Raheel Sharif named Chief of the Army.	Gen raheel sharif appointed as head of the army.	Gen raheel sharif appointed head of army.
34	indefinite operation treat criminal criminal affiliation	It's a long-term commitment, and it's a long-term commitment.	L' Undefined Operation deals with criminal affiliation.	Operation indefinite deals with criminal affiliation.
34	posted imaduddin	Addicted imaduddin.	Displayed imaduddin.	It's posted imaduddin.
34	raheel sharif pak army chief	Raheel Sharif Pak, leader of the army.	Raheel Sharif Pak, the leader of the army.	I'm Raheel Sharif Pak, leader of the army.
34	indo pak dgmos speak loc	Indo-pak dgmos talk loc.	Indo pak dgmos talk loc.	Indo pak dgmos speak loc.
34	pm order ppo implementation deal crime	Pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pm-pig.	Order pm po implementation criminal transaction crime.	Criminal transaction crime execution order pm po.
34	govt determined achieve load shedding free pakistan pm	Determined GOUVT to reach the Pakistan free unloading load pm.	GOUVT determined to reach the free load of unloading Pakistan pm.	GOUVT determined to reach Pakistan free unloading load pm.
34	karachi operation continue objective met sharif	The Karachi operation continues.	The Karachi operation continues.	Karachi's operation is still in progress.
34	raheel sharif pakistan army chief	Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pakistani National Army.	Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pakistani army.	Raheel Sharif, leader of the army of Pakistan.
34	pakistan pick raheel sharif army chief	Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pakistani army.	The leader of the Pakistani army, Raheel Sharif.	The leader of the Pakistani army Raheel Sharif.
34	nawaz sharif arrive karachi	Nawaz Sharif arrives in Karachi.	Nawaz Sharif arrives in Karachi.	Nawaz sharif is coming to Karachi.
34	pm meet top military official coas cjcsc expected	I'm meeting with the senior military officer, Coas cjcsc.	Mind meeting with senior military officer Coas cjcsc scheduled.	Not to meet senior military officer Coas cjcsc scheduled.
34	gen raheel sharif named pakistan army chief	Gen Raheel Sharif was appointed as the new leader of the Pakistani army.	Gen Raheel Sharif appointed head of the apos; Pakistani army.	Gen Raheel Sharif named leader of the Pakistani army.
34	gen sharif appointed coas gen mahmood cjcsc	J.C.M.C.	Gen sharif named coas gen mahmood cjcsc.	Gen sharif named coas gen mahmood cjcsc.
34	pak pm sharif order tough action karachi unrest	The pm sharif pak orders a difficult karachi agitation action.	The pak pm sharif directs a difficult action karachi agitation.	The pak pm sharif commands a difficult action karachi agitation.
34	pm meet gen rashid gen raheel	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	I want to meet with gen rashid gen raheel.	Can meet gen rashid gen raheel.
34	pm early completion karachi coastal project	Early completion of the Coastal Karachi Project.	Early completion of this coastal karachi project.	Early completion of coastal karachi project.
34	pakistan break ground nuclear plant project china	Pakistan Advanced Nuclear Power Plant Project in China.	The project is a state-of-the-art nuclear power plant in Pakistan.	Pakistan's advanced nuclear power plant project in China.
34	pakistan sharif pick general apolitical army	Pakistan Sharif choose General Non-Political Army.	Pakistan sharif choose general army as apolitical.	Pakistan sharif choose general army apolitical.
34	pakistan build civil nuclear plant pm sharif	Pakistan build a nuclear civilian pm sharif pm sharif pm sharif.	Pakistan to build a civilian nuclear power plant pm sharif pm sharif.	Pakistan build civilian nuclear power plant pm sharif pm sharif.
34	pakistan army chief	Pakistani army.	He's the leader of the Pakistani army.	He is the head of the army of Pakistan.
34	nuclear armed coup prone pakistan appoints powerful army chief	The Pakistani nuclear-armed state named the most powerful leader of the Pakistani military.	The coup d'apos; Pakistani nuclear state appoints the powerful leader of the Pakistani military.	The coup d'apos; Pakistani nuclear state appoints the army's powerful leader.
34	general raheel sharif chief pak army	General Raheel Sharif Chief of the Army Pak Pak Pak.	General Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pak Pak Pak army.	General Raheel Sharif Chef de l'apos; army Pak Pak.
34	gen raheel sharif pakistan army chief	Gen Raheel Sharif Chief of the Pakistani Army.	Gen raheel sharif head of the apos; Pakistani army.	Gen raheel sharif leader of the army of Pakistan.
34	nawaz kick work nuclear power plant today	The Nawaz Nuclear Power Plant is under construction today.	The nuclear power plant in Nawaz is under construction today.	The Nawaz nuclear power plant is under construction.
34	pakistan build power plant sharif	Pakistan building a central Sharif power plant.	Pakistan will build a central sharif power plant.	Pakistan build a central Sharif power plant in Pakistan.
34	raheel sharif appointed pak army chief	Raheel Sharif has been appointed as the new leader of the Pak army.	Raheel Sharif was appointed leader of Pak army.	Raheel Sharif was appointed leader of the army of Pak.
34	pakistan army chief	Pakistani army.	He's the leader of the Pakistani army.	He is the head of the army of Pakistan.
34	pakistan civil nuclear power project	Pakistani Civil Nuclear Project.	Pakistan civil nuclear project.	Pakistani civil nuclear power project.
34	raheel sharif chosen pakistan army chief govt official	Raheel Sharif chose the government head of the Pakistani army.	Raheel Sharif chose the head of government of the army of Pakistan.	Raheel Sharif chose the head of the Pakistani army government.
34	nawaz rajapakse discus regional situation	Nawaz is one of the few cities in the world.	Nawaz rajapakse regional situation discus.	Nawaz rajapakse discus regional situation.
34	raheel sharif named pakistan army commander	Raheel Sharif was appointed as Commander of the Pakistani Army.	Raheel Sharif appointed commander of the Pakistani army.	Raheel Sharif named commander of the Pakistani Army.
34	pakistan premier chooses brother dead war hero army chief	The Prime Minister of Pakistan chooses his brother, who is dead, a war hero, a leader of the army, a leader of the army.	The prime minister of Pakistan chooses his dead brother, war hero, leader of the army, leader of the army.	Pakistan's prime minister chooses his dead war hero brother, leader of the army, leader of the army.
34	karachi businessmen anti crime operation	Karachi's cases are fighting crime.	The men of Karachi are fighting crime.	The men of the city are fighting against the crime.
34	sharif call visa free travel india pakistan	Sharif call without Visa India Pakistan Travel.	Call without a travel visa India Pakistan.	Sharif call without travel visa India Pakistan.
34	nawaz sharif appoints pakistani army chief	Nawaz Sharif appointed the head of the Pakistani army.	Nawaz Sharif appoints the leader of the Pakistani army.	Nawaz Sharif appoints head of the army of Pakistan.
34	sharif pakistan army chief superseding senior general	Chief Sharif of the Apos; Pakistan Army replacing the General in Chief.	Sharif leader of the apos; Pakistan army replacing the general in command.	Sharif leader of Apos; Pakistan army replacing general in chief.
34	vision load shedding free pakistan pm inaugrates work largest nuclear	Free Pakistani ingrates unleash the biggest nuclear core vision.	Free, ungrateful Pakistanis liberate the world's largest nuclear core vision.	Free Pakistani ingrates free the vision of the largest nuclear nuclei.
34	speculation rise successor pakistan army chief	Speculation raises the leader of the Pakistani army.	Speculation raises the successor of the leader of the Pakistani army.	The speculation raises the successor of the leader of the Pakistani army.
34	profile general raheel sharif	General Profile Raheel Sharif.	General profile, Raheel Sharif.	A general profile of Raheel Sharif.
34	general raheel sharif appointed pakistan army chief	General Raheel Sharif has appointed the head of the Pakistani army, the Pakistani army.	General Raheel Sharif appointed the head of the Pakistani army.	General Raheel Sharif appointed the head of the army of Pakistan.
34	loadshedding history nawaz	Nawaz story.	Overflow of the apos; nawaz story.	Spillover, nawaz story.
34	pakistan chooses moderate army chief	The Pakistani government chose a leader of the moderate army.	Pakistan chooses a moderate leader.	Pakistan chooses a moderate army leader.
34	newly appointed chief army staff profile	He is a member of the National Assembly of the League of Nations.	Profile of Chief d' state-major de l' newly appointed army.	Profile of the head of the newly appointed army.
34	pm nawaz sharif arrives karachi	Nawaz Sharif has arrived in Karachi.	And Nawaz Sharif is coming to Karachi.	Nawaz Sharif arrives in Karachi.
34	gen raheel sharif chosen pak army chief	Gen. Raheel Sharif has chosen the leader of the Pak army.	Gen Raheel Sharif chose the leader of the pak army.	Gen Raheel Sharif has chosen leader of the pak army.
34	gen raheel sharif appointed pak coas	It's called a pak coas.	Gen raheel sharif called pak coas?	Gen raheel sharif called pak coas.
34	pak work mw nuke power plant	Pak working mw nuclear power plant.	Pak work mw nuclear power plant.	Pak work mw nuclear power plant.
34	nawaz sharif saudi poodle nuclear button	Nawaz sharif of Saudi Arabia nuclear poodle button.	Saudi Nawaz sharif nuclear poodle button.	Nawaz sharif saudi nuclear poodle button.
34	govt develop karachi dubai kuala lumpur hong kong pm	The government is developing karachi dubai kuala lumpur kong pm.	The government is developing dubai kuala lumpur hong kong pm karachi.	Government is developing dubai kuala lumpur hong kong pm karachi.
34	pakistan appoints army chief	The Pakistani government appoints the head of the army.	Pakistan appoints the head of the army.	Pakistan appoints leader of the army.
34	general raheel sharif appointed pakistan army chief	General Raheel Sharif has appointed the head of the Pakistani army, the Pakistani army.	General Raheel Sharif appointed the head of the Pakistani army.	General Raheel Sharif appointed the head of the army of Pakistan.
34	pakistan army commander	Commander of the Pakistani Army.	Commander of Pakistani Army.	Pakistani army commander.
34	pakistan army chief	Pakistani army.	He's the leader of the Pakistani army.	He is the head of the army of Pakistan.
34	pak pm break ground nation largest nuclear power project	Pak Pm inaugurates the biggest nuclear energy project in the country.	Pak Pm is proud to announce the opening of the largest nuclear power project in the country.	Pak Pm inaugurates the largest nuclear power project in the country.
34	raheel sharif pakistan army chief	Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pakistani National Army.	Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pakistani army.	Raheel Sharif, leader of the army of Pakistan.
34	pm appoints rashid mehmood cjcsc raheel sharif coas	Pm is called rash mehmood cjcsc raheel sharif coas rashid.	Pm name rash mehmood cjcsc raheel sharif coas rashid.	Rash mehmood cjcsc raheel sharif coas rashid.
34	pakistan building mw nuclear power project	The project is expected to be completed by the end of 2008.	Pakistan build mw project of nuclear power plants.	Pakistan build mw nuclear power project.
34	bitten sharif appoint pakistani army chief	Sharif Bitu make Chief of the Pakistani Army.	Sharif's the new leader of the army of Pakistan.	Sharif bitten to make chief of the army of Pakistan.
34	megawatt nuclear project prime minister performs groundbreaking	The Prime Minister of Megawatt's Nuclear Project is doing groundbreaking work.	The first Minister of Megawatt's nuclear project performs revolutionary work.	The prime minister of the megawatt nuclear project is doing groundbreaking work.
34	gen raheel appointed coas gen rashad cjcsc	C.J.C.E.D.	Gen raheel named coas gen rashad cjcsc.	Gen raheel named coas gen rashad cjcsc.
34	pakistan form anti terrorism force spearhead fight militant	Pakistan anti-terrorism, the strength of the fighting force, militant.	Pakistan has anti @-@terrorism, the force of the fighting force, the militant.	Pakistan is anti @-@terrorism, the militant fighting force.
34	speculation rife key appointment	Speculation abounds at-key.	Speculation abounds make-you key.	The speculation abounds make-you key.
34	rasheel sharif pak army chief	Rasheel Sharif Pak, leader of the army.	Rasheel Sharif Pak, the leader of the army.	I'm Rasheel Sharif Pak, leader of the army.
34	prime minister nawaz sharif tuesday directed authority concerned	On Tuesday, Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif ordered the relevant authority.	The government's government has announced that it intends to launch a new nuclear power plant.	Prime Minister nawaz sharif ordered on Tuesday the relevant authority.
34	raheel sharif named pakistan army chief	Raheel Sharif was appointed as the new leader of the Pakistani army.	Raheel Sharif appointed head of the apos; Pakistani army.	Raheel Sharif named leader of the Pakistani army.
34	gen raheel sharif chosen army chief	Gen Raheel Sharif chose the leader of the army.	Gen Raheel Sharif has chosen the head of the army.	Gen Raheel Sharif chose the army leader.
34	pm nawaz sharif launched power project	Pm nawaz sharif has launched an energy project.	The pm nawaz sharif has launched an energy project.	The pm nawaz sharif launched an energy project.
34	pakistani army chief chosen	The leader of the Pakistani Army has been chosen.	The commander of the Pakistani army has been chosen.	The leader of the Pakistani army was chosen.
34	pakistan work largest nuclear power plant	Pakistan is working on the biggest nuclear power plant.	Pakistan is working on the largest nuclear power plant.	Pakistan works on the largest nuclear power plant.
34	pm meet general rashid mahmood raheel sharif separately	Can't meet rashid mahmood general raheel sharif separately?	May meet general rashid mahmood raheel sharif separately.	Can meet general rashid mahmood raheel sharif separately.
34	nawaz share nov military secret	Nawaz is a member of the Nawaz family.	Nawaz shares Nov military secret.	Nawaz shares nov military secrets.
34	pak break ground nuke plant	Pak Pak launches nuclear power plant.	Pak Pak's launching a nuclear power plant.	Pak Pak is starting a nuclear power plant now.
34	pakistan kayani leaf mixed legacy reform army chief	Pakistan Kayani Sheet mixed heritage reform leader of the Reform Army.	Pakistan kayani sheet mixed heritage reform head of the apo; army reformer.	Pakistan kayani leaf mixed heritage reform leader; army reformers.
34	general raheel sharif appointed army chief	General Raheel Sharif has appointed the head of the General Army.	General Raheel Sharif appointed the head of the army.	General Raheel Sharif appointed leader of the army.
34	pm meet top army general ahead key appointment	Meet the Chief General of the Army before the key appointment.	To meet with the Chief General of the army before the key appointment.	To meet the General in Chief of the Army before the key appointment was made.
34	case heinous crime proceeded province nawaz	A heinous crime has been committed here in Nawaz Province.	We have a heinous crime in Nawaz province.	A heinous crime was committed in Nawaz province.
34	raheel sharif appointed army chief	Raheel Sharif has been made head of the army.	Raheel Sharif has been appointed leader of the army.	Raheel Sharif was appointed leader of the army.
34	raheel sharif succeed kayani army chief pakistan	Raheel Sharif takes over from the Pakistani leader of the Pakistani kayan army.	Raheel Sharif succeeds the Pakistani leader of the kayan army.	Raheel succeeded the Pakistani leader of the kayani army.
34	pm visit karachi today	Please visit-in Karachi today.	Go to-in Karachi today.	Go to Karachi today @-@; hui.
34	graffiti pm	Pm graffiti.	Graffiti pm.	Uh, graffiti pm.
34	shah appointment coas cjcsc	Shah return-coas cjcsc coas.	Shah give-you coas cjcsc coas.	Shah-you coas cjcsc coas.
34	pakistan general raheel sharif army chief	Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pakistani army.	Pakistani General Raheel Sharif, leader of the army.	The Pakistani general Raheel Sharif, leader of the army.
34	pm meet general rashid mahmood raheel sharif	I want to meet rashid mahmood general raheel sharif.	I want to meet general rashid mahmood raheel sharif.	Can't meet general rashid mahmood raheel sharif.
34	pm lay foundation stone nuclear power project	It's the first time you've had the chance to do this.	Install the foundation stone for the project of nuclear energy.	Install foundation stone for nuclear power project.
34	nuclear powerhouse bui nawaz	The Bui Nawaz Nuclear Power Plant.	This is the bui nawaz nuclear power plant.	The bui nawaz nuclear plant.
34	update pakistan chooses moderate army chief	Update Pakistan selects the Moderate Leader of the Army.	Updating Pakistan chooses the moderate leader of the army.	Update Pakistan chooses moderate leader of army.
34	pak pm bypass favourite chooses gen raheel sharif army chief	Pak pm bypass favori selects the head of the army's army.	Pak pm bypass favorites chooses general manager of the army.	Pak pm bypass favori chooses gen raheel sharif chief of the army.
34	karachi operation continue till achievement objective pm	This is the only way to achieve the goals of the project, and it is the only way to achieve them.	Continue operations from karachi to adjacent areas; achieve target pm.	Pursue the exploitation of karachi until it reaches its destination; objective pm.
34	profile pakistan army chief lieutenant general raheel sharif	General Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pakistani army.	Profile of Lieutenant @-@General Raheel Sharif, Pakistani Army Chief of the Apostles.	Lieutenant profile @-@General Raheel Sharif, leader of the Pakistani army.
34	top army general retire	The General in Chief of the Army Command is retiring.	The General of the Army is retiring from the service.	The general in charge of the army is retiring.
34	energy leap breaking ground nuclear energy	L' Energy Leaps Forward; Revolutionary Nuclear Energy.	L' energy leaps ahead; revolutionary nuclear energy.	L' energy leaps ahead; nuclear energy revolutionary.
35	meningitis outbreak college unrelated cdc	Outbreak of Meningitis not related to CDC University.	Outbreak of meningitis not related to CDC University.	CDC University non-associated meningitis outbreak.
35	meningitis outbreak confirmed university	Meningitis has been reported in the United States.	Meningitis outbreak confirmed at the university.	Meningitis outbreak confirmed at university.
35	dose meningitis vaccine	Meningitis vaccine.	Meningitis vaccine dose.	You know, meningitis vaccine dose.
35	princeton announces receiving meningitis vaccine	Princeton announces that he receives meningitis vaccine.	Princeton announces that he is receiving the meningitis vaccine.	Princeton announces they are receiving meningitis vaccine.
35	wake meningitis outbreak princeton hea official reassure	Princeton meningitis is officially confirmed.	Outbreak of meningitis in Princeton officially reassured.	A meningitis outbreak in Princeton, officially confirmed.
35	princeton meningitis vaccine gloucester county luring warning	Princeton Meningitis Vaccine, gloucester county.	Princeton meningitis vaccine, Gloucester County, U.S.	Princeton meningitis vaccine gloucester county.
35	princeton meningitis case confirmed uncommon type strain	Princeton meningitis confirmed a rare strain.	The case of Princeton meningitis confirmed a rare strain.	The Princeton meningitis case confirmed a rare strain.
35	princeton student wary meningitis threat	Princeton student fears meningitis.	Princeton student who fears meningitis.	Princeton student who fears meningitis.
35	university offer meningitis vaccine recommended group	It is recommended that the group be vaccinated against meningitis at the university.	The university offers the recommended meningitis vaccine for the group.	University offers meningitis vaccine recommended for the group.
35	cdc approves meningitis vaccine princeton university	CDC approves Meningitis Vaccine at Princeton University.	The CDC approves meningitis vaccine at Princeton University.	CDC approves meningitis vaccine at Princeton University.
35	cdc approves princeton meningitis vaccine set administration	CDC approves Princeton Meningitis Vaccine Package.	The CDC approves the administration of a series of vaccines against meningitis in Princeton.	CDC approves administration of vaccines; Princeton meningitis vaccine package.
35	princeton meningitis vaccine	Princeton Meningitis vaccine.	Princeton meningitis vaccine.	Princeton meningitis shot.
35	cdc princeton university student safe travel thanksgiving	Princeton University Student CDC Safe Trip Thanksgiving.	Princeton University Student CDC Safe Trip Thanksgiving.	CDC princeton university student travel safe thanksgiving.
35	cdc working import vaccine fight college meningitis outbreak	The CDC is working on the importation of vaccines to combat the epidemic of meningitis at the college.	CDC is working on the importation of a vaccine to combat meningitis; a meningitis epidemic in the college.	The CDC is working to import a vaccine to combat the meningitis epidemic at the college.
35	curham princeton history tough condition nats	Curham Princeton History - Tough nats.	Curham Princeton History Tough condition nats.	Curham princeton history harsh condition nats.
35	eighth case meningitis confirmed princeton university	The case of meningitis has been confirmed by the University of Princeton.	Eighth case of meningitis confirmed at Princeton University.	The eighth case of meningitis confirmed Princeton University.
35	princeton student question vaccine	Princeton Student Questionnaire.	Vaccinations; interviews with Princeton students.	Immunization; Princeton student interrogation.
35	meningitis campus bar holiday travel	I'm going on a trip to the campus bars for meningitis.	Trip to the campus bars for meningitis.	Meningitis travel to campus bars.
35	princeton university offer meningitis vaccine	The vaccine is available at the University of Princeton.	Princeton University offers a meningitis vaccine.	Princeton University has meningitis vaccine.
35	region eighth meningitis case diagnosed university	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.	Region Eighth case of meningitis diagnosed at the University.	Region eighth case of meningitis diagnosed at the university.
35	princeton university student st dose meningitis vaccine	A student at Princeton University was vaccinated with the meningitis vaccine.	One student from Princeton University received meningitis vaccine.	A dose of meningitis vaccine was given to a student at Princeton University.
35	princeton student safe travel despite meningitis outbreak cdc	Princeton University student, travel safely through the world of meningitis; CDC meningitis outbreak.	Princeton Student, travel safely through CDC meningitis outbreak.	Princeton student, travel safely despite the meningitis outbreak at the CDC.
35	princeton eighth case meningitis university	Princeton Eighth Case of Meningitis at University.	Princeton, 8th case of meningitis at Princeton University.	Princeton eighth case of meningitis at university.
35	meningitis update unlicensed vaccine stay vigilant	Update on Meningitis Unregistered Vaccine Stay Alert.	An update on meningitis An update on meningitis Non-registered vaccine remains vigilant.	Meningitis update Unregistered vaccine remain vigilant.
35	council reassured meningitis outbreak	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case for meningitis.	The council re-assured the outbreak of meningitis.	The meningitis outbreak was reassured by the council.
35	cdc urge vigilance college meningitis outbreak	CDC is recommending vigilance in the event of a meningitis epidemic at the university.	The CDC recommends vigilance in the event of an outbreak of meningitis at the university.	CDC recommends vigilance in the event of a localized meningitis outbreak at the university.
35	meningitis case hit college expert urge awareness	The case of meningitis also struck the apos expert at the university.	The case of meningitis hit the apos; expert from the university.	The meningitis case hit the apos expert from the university.
35	update meningitis princeton university	Update of Meningitis at Princeton University.	Update of meningitis infection at Princeton University.	Princeton University, meningitis update.
35	meningitis vaccine princeton week	Meningitis vaccine, meningitis, Princeton week.	Meningitis vaccine, Princeton week.	Princeton week meningitis vaccine.
35	cdc meningitis vaccine undergoing review estimated arrival	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case for meningococcal vaccines.	Meningitis vaccine is the subject of an investigation; expected arrival.	The meningitis vaccine is the subject of a scheduled arrival.
35	meningitis outbreak	Meningitis outbreak.	Meningitis outbreak.	Uh, meningitis outbreak.
35	cdc princeton student overseas vaccine	Princeton D.C.D. Student vaccine; foreign vaccine.	D.H.I.E.L.D. (D.H.I.E.L.E.E.L.D.E.I.E.L.E.D.E.D.	DCD Princeton vaccine studying abroad.
35	cdc expert unlicensed vaccine bexsero highly unusual	Very unusual unlicensed bexsero vaccine expert.	Expert in the field of CDC for the highly unusual unlicensed bexsero vaccine.	DCC expert for the highly unusual unlicensed bexsero vaccine.
35	campus confront infectious disease	Campus has to deal with infectious diseases.	This campus has to deal with infectious diseases.	The campus must deal with infectious diseases.
35	princeton meningitis shot start dec	I don't know what you're thinking.	Princeton meningitis shot commence dec.	Princeton meningitis shot start dec.
35	cdc expert talk princeton uc santa barbara meningitis case	C.D.C. Expert on Princeton Meningitis Uuc santa Barbara.	Speech by a CDC expert on the Princeton Meningitis case Uuc santa Barbara.	Dr. Uuc santa Barbara, a CDC expert on the case of meningitis in Princeton.
35	vaccine meningitis	Meningitis vaccine.	Meningitis vaccine.	You know, meningitis vaccine.
35	princeton university announces emergency meningitis vaccination	Princeton University is announcing immunization against meningitis.	Princeton University announces vaccination against meningitis.	Princeton University is announcing an emergency meningitis vaccination program.
35	princeton offer unlicensed meningitis vaccine student	Princeton offers an unlicensed vaccine to a student who is vaccinated against meningitis.	Princeton offers an unlicensed meningitis vaccine to a student who is being vaccinated against the disease.	Princeton offers an unlicensed meningitis vaccine to a vaccinated student.
35	eighth case meningitis reported princeton	Princeton has received reports of eight cases of meningitis.	Eight cases of meningitis have been reported from Princeton.	There have been eight cases of meningitis reported at Princeton.
35	cdc princeton student quarantined thanksgiving	One of the Princeton students quarantined Thanksgiving.	Well, a student at Princeton quarantined Thanksgiving.	A Princeton student quarantined Thanksgiving.
35	princeton university announces vaccination	Princeton University will announce immunization.	L' Princeton University announces vaccination.	Princeton University announces immunization.
35	cdc princeton student safe travel despite meningitis outbreak	The CDC Princeton students travel safely despite the ongoing epidemic of meningitis.	CDC Princeton students travel safely and efficiently despite the meningitis epidemic.	CDC Princeton students travel safely despite meningitis epidemic.
36	nigella lawson alleged gui secret drug revealed london court	Nigella Lawson claimed that the secret drugs had revealed the London courtyard.	Nigella Lawson claimed that the secret drug had revealed the London court.	Nigella Lawson claimed that the secret drug revealed the court of London.
36	lawson head drug	Lawson's in charge of the drugs.	Lawson's the head of drugs.	Lawson's head of drugs.
36	nigella lawson fan support dessert recipe	Nigella Lawson fan supports the recipe for the dessert.	Nigella Lawson fan supports the dessert recipe.	Nigella Lawson fan will support the dessert recipe.
36	nigella lawson pa court accused chef credit card	N.L.S.N.L.L.L.L.L.L.L.N.L.L.L.L.N.L.L.N.L.L.S.N.L.L.N.L.N.L.L.N.L.N.L.N.L.N.L.N.L.N.N.L.N.I.N.N.A.L.L.N.N.L.N.N.N.L.N.N.N.L.N.N.N.N.N.A.L.N.N.N.N.N.A.L.N.N.N.L.N.N.N.L.N.N.N.N.N.L.N.N.N.N.N.N.N.N.N.N.	Nigella Lawson court-martial accused of credit card fraud.	Nigella Lawson court pa charged credit card head.
36	nigella lawson promo season taste air hour	Nigella Lawson Promotional Season Taste Time; Air.	Nigella Lawson season flavor time promotion; air.	Nigella Lawson season promotion taste time; air.
36	email saatchi lawson read court	Saatchi Lawson e-read the court @-@mail.	Saatchi Lawson read the court via e-mail.	Saatchi Lawson read court via e-mail.
36	nigella lawson allegedly cocaine regularly court told	Nigella Lawson claims cocaine's been said in court all the time.	Nigella Lawson claims that the cocaine regularly said in court.	Nigella Lawson claims cocaine regularly said in court.
36	row nigella decade daily cocaine ended charles saatchi	Nigella row ten years of cocaine daily ended Charles Saatchi saatchi.	The row nigella ten years of daily cocaine was ending Charles Saatchi saatchi.	The row nigella ten years of daily cocaine ended Charles Saatchi saatchi.
36	nigella lawson head drug approving spending spree	Nigella Lawson took the lead in drugs by approving wild spending.	Nigella Lawson took the lead in drugs by approving some crazy spending money.	Nigella Lawson took the head of the drug approving crazy spending.
36	nigella lawson told trashed daughter life husband charles	Nigella Lawson told her daughter her life was over, her husband, Charles.	Nigella Lawson told her daughter that her life was over, her husband Charles.	Nigella Lawson told her daughter her life was over, her husband Charles.
36	nigella called habitual criminal	Nigella calls the usual criminal.	Nigella called the regular criminal.	Nigella called the usual.
36	nigella assistant face fraud trial	Nigella Assistant is looking at a lawsuit for fraud.	Nigella assistant is looking at a fraud suit.	You know, nigella assistant could be suing for fraud.
36	uk court hears celebrity chef nigella lawson hard drug everyday	The famous Nigerella Lawson is heard every day by the court of the United Kingdom.	The court of the Kingdom-United hears the famous chief nigella Lawson every day.	The UK court-United hears celebrity chef nigella Lawson everyday.
36	charles saatchi claim nigella lawson head drug	Charles Saatchi claims Nigella Lawson is a junkie.	Charles Saatchi claims that Nigella Lawson is a drug addict.	Charles Saatchi claims Nigella Lawson is a drug addict.
36	nigella lawson head drug	Nigella Lawson drugged her head.	Nigella Lawson was drugged on the head.	Nigella Lawson's head was drugged.
36	court told cu ure secrecy nigella marriage charles saatchi aide	Court declared Charles Saatchi's marriage a secret.	The court has declared Charles Saatchi's marriage a secret.	The court declared the marriage of Charles Saatchi a secret.
36	nigella lawson cooking teaser released hour higella drug	Nigella Lawson teaser cooking released higella hour drug.	Nigella Lawson cooking teaser teaser release higella drug hour.	Nigella Lawson cooking teaser released higella drug hour.
36	nigella head drug charles saatchi	Dr. Nigella Head Drug Charles Saatchi.	Nigella Head Drug Charles Saatchi.	Nigella head drug charles saatchi.
36	live nigella lawson personal assistant trial accused fraud drug	L'apos; personal assistant to nigella Lawson has been charged with fraud in the field of drugs.	Nigella Lawson's personal assistant has been charged with drug fraud.	L' personal assistant to nigella Lawson was accused of drug fraud.
36	nigella lawson husband alleges trashed daughter life drug	Nigella Lawson's husband claims her daughter's been on drugs for life.	Nigella Lawson's husband claims that her daughter was drugged for life.	The husband of nigella Lawson claims that her daughter was drugged for life.
36	charles saatchi alleges nigella lawson cocaine cannabis grillo	Charles Saatchi claims that nigella Lawson Cocaine Cannabis Grillo.	Charles Saatchi claims that nigella Lawson cocaine cannabis grillo.	Charles saatchi claims that nigella lawson cocaine cannabis grillo.
36	tv chef nigella lawson branded habitual criminal court	Chief Tv nigerella Lawson has branded the usual criminal court.	Chief tv nigella Lawson branded the usual criminal court.	Well, chief tv nigerella lawson branded the usual criminal court with a red iron.
36	nigella lawson break silence drug accusation teamnigella	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Nigella Lawson break the silence of the indictment of drugs teamnigella.	Nigella Lawson break the silence of the apos; accusation of teamnigella drugs.
36	crack appear domestic goddess nigella lawson pedestal	The cracks appear to be the domestic goddess, Nigella Lawson's pedestal.	The cracks appear as the domestic goddess nigella law her pedestal.	Cracks appear domestic goddess nigella law her pedestal.
36	claim nigella lawson heavy drug user	Claiming to be a drug-consuming nigella Lawson.	Claiming for nigella Lawson, a major drug user.	Claim nigella Lawson, heavy drug user.
36	mimi lawson daughter marriage drug	Mimi Lawson's daughter's wedding drug.	Mimi Lawson's daughter's wedding drug.	This is the drug from Mimi Lawson's daughter's wedding.
36	nigella lawson cocaine pot daily decade court doc	Nigella Lawson Daily Cocaine Abuse 10 Years, court doc.	Nigella Lawson, daily cocaine addiction, 10 years old, court reporter.	Nigella Lawson daily cocaine addiction 10 years, court doc.
36	charles saatchi claim nigella lawson drug married	Charles Saatchi claims that Nigella Lawson married an addict.	Charles Saatchi claims that Nigella Lawson married a drug addict.	Charles Saatchi claims Nigella Lawson married a drug addict.
36	nigella lawson charles saatchi star witness fraud case	Nigella Lawson Charles Saatchi... star witness fraud.	Nigella Lawson Charles Saatchi star witness fraud case.	Nigella Lawson Charles Saatchi star witness fraud case.
36	assistant claim nigella lawson abused drug	His assistant claims Nigel Lawson has been abusing drugs.	His assistant claims Nigel Lawson was a drug addict.	His assistant claims Nigel Lawson's drug abuse.
36	nigella lawson accused drug husband charles saatchi	And Nigella Lawson blamed drug-related husband Charles Saatchi.	Nigella Lawson has accused drug-using husband Charles Saatchi.	Nigella Lawson accused drug husband Charles Saatchi.
36	nigella lawson head drug	Nigella Lawson drugged her head.	Nigella Lawson was drugged on the head.	Nigella Lawson's head was drugged.
36	nigella lawson dubbed higella charles saatchi claim snorted	"Nigella Lawson nicknamed ""higella charles saatchi"" claims to have been sniffed."	Nigella Lawson nicknamed higella charles saatchi claims sniffed.	Nigella lawson nicknamed higella charles saatchi claim sniffed.
36	nigella lawson court hears drug claim	The court in Nigella Lawson, they're hearing drug claims.	Nigella Lawson's court hears drug claims, okay?	The lawson court hears drug claims.
36	nigella lawson allegedly drug day decade court told	Nigella Lawson was reportedly informed by the court about the Drug Decade.	Nigella Lawson was reportedly informed by the court of the decade of drugs.	Nigella Lawson was reportedly informed about the drug decade by the court.
36	nigella lawson head drug saatchi	Nigella Lawson Head of Satchi Drugs.	Nigella Lawson, head of the saatchi drugs.	Nigella Lawson head of saatchi drugs.
36	court hears nigella lawson alleged drug problem ahead trial	The court heard nigella Lawson allege drug-related problems before the trial.	The court heard nigella Lawson allege she had a drug problem before the trial.	The court hears nigella Lawson alleging a drug problem before trial.
36	nigella lawson secret daily drug habit court hears	The defendant, Nigella Lawson, a secret drug addict, is heard by the court.	Nigella Lawson, daily drug addict secret, is heard in court.	Nigella Lawson, secret daily drug addict, is heard in court.
36	saatchi lawson head drug	Saatchi Lawson drugs his head.	Saatchi Lawson gets high on his head.	Saatchi Lawson's head is on drugs.
36	nigella lawson drug day decade court hears	The Nigella Lawson City Court hears the drug-decade trial.	The court in Nigella Lawson hears the trial of the drug decade.	Nigella Lawson's court hears the drug decade trial.
36	charles saatchi claimed nigella lawson head drug daughter	Charles Saatchi has claimed that nigella Lawson is a drug girl.	Charles Saatchi claimed Nigella Lawson head drug girl.	Charles Saatchi claimed nigella Lawson head drug girl.
36	nigella lawson accused secret drug habit	Nigella Lawson was accusing the drugs of being a secret habit.	It was a secret habit that Nigella Lawson blamed the drug d'apos.	Nigella Lawson claimed that the drug d'apos was a secret drug habit.
36	peter peter bcl burton copeland stand saatchi lawson	Peter Peter Bcl Burton Copeland booth saatchi-Lawson.	Peter Peter Bcl Burton Copeland stand saatchi Lawson.	Peter Peter Bcl Burton Copeland stand saatchi lawson.
36	nigella lawson charles saatchi assistant court fraud	Nigella Lawson Charles Saatchi Court Fraud D'apos; Assistant.	Nigella Lawson Charles Saatchi fraud in the court of apos; assistant.	Nigella Lawson Charles Saatchi court fraud d' assistant.
36	nigella lawson cocaine day decade	Nigella Lawson ten years of cocaine.	Nigella Lawson, ten years of cocaine.	Nigella Lawson day ten years of cocaine.
36	nigella husband accuses drug	Husband nigella blames the drugs on her.	Husband nigella blames drugs.	The husband nigella blames the drugs.
36	nigella head drug court hears	The Nigella Head Drug Court is hearing about this case.	Well, the drug court in Nigella Head is hearing about this case.	The Nigella Head drug court hears about this case.
36	pm pledge action eu benefit	Action has had a positive impact.	L' commitment to the project; and action has had a positive impact.	L' commitment of the participants; action had positive results.
36	newspaper review nigella claim plebgate scotland blurry blueprint	Nigerella press review plebgate Scotland blurry blueprint.	Press review nigella claim plebgate Scotland vague blueprint.	Press review nigella claim plebgate Scotland vague blueprint.
36	nigella lawson loved drug day decade	Nigella Lawson was a big fan of the drug decade.	Nigella Lawson loved the decade of drugs.	Nigella Lawson loved the drug decade.
36	nigella lawson nigella lawson face drug claim ahead assistant fraud	Nigella Lawson nigella Lawson is facing a drug-related claim prior to the fraud.	Nigella Lawson, nigella Lawson, faces a drug claim before the fraud.	Nigella Lawson nigella Lawson faces a drug claim before assistant fraud.
36	nigella lawson accused cocaine pill popping ten year	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.	Nigella Lawson accused the pill of smoking for ten years.	Lawson accused the pill of cocaine d'apos; smoking for ten years.
36	saatchi claim wife nigella lawson head drug	According to Saatchi, the Nigerella Lawson woman is drugged on her head.	Saatchi claims that the Nigerella Lawson woman is head-drugged.	Saatchi claims Nigerella Lawson's wife is drugged on her head.
36	nigella lawson habitual cocaine user trashed daughter life court	Cocaine habituated Nigella Lawson ruined her daughter's life.	Nigella Lawson's cocaine habit ruined her daughter.	Well, Nigella Lawson's cocaine habit ruined her daughter's life.
36	charles saatchi nigella lawson head drug court hears	Charles Saatchi Nigella Lawson, Head of the Drug Court, hears the trial.	Charles Saatchi Nigella Lawson, head of the city's drug court, hears the trial.	Charles Saatchi Nigella Lawson, head of the drug court, hears the trial.
36	nigella lawson accused daily cocaine marijuana prescription pill	Nigella Lawson blamed the daily use of cocaine, prescription pills marijuana.	Nigella Lawson blamed the daily use of cocaine, the prescription pill for marijuana.	Nigella Lawson blamed daily cocaine use, the marijuana prescription pill.
36	nigella lawson alleged abused drug daily	Nigella Lawson claimed that she was abusing drugs every day.	Nigella Lawson alleged that she was daily substance abuse.	Nigella Lawson alleged that she was a daily drug user.
36	nigella lawson cocaine cannabis allegation court case totally	Nigella Lawson, Cannabis Allegation, Cocaine, Court Case.	Nigella Lawson case, cannabis allegation, cocaine, court case.	Uh, nigella lawson case, marijuana allegation, cocaine, court case.
36	nigella lawson allegedly drug day decade court	"It's called ""Nigella Lawson"" and it's supposed to be the center of the drug decade."	Nigella Lawson, purportedly the center of the drug decade.	Nigella Lawson, allegedly court of the drug decade.
36	nigella lawson charles saatchi loggerhead marriage marked	Charles Saatchi, Nigella Lawson, will mark her wedding with a wooden head.	Nigella Lawson Charles Saatchi will wear a wooden head on his wedding day.	Nigella Lawson Charles Saatchi will mark her marriage with the wooden head.
36	nigella lawson cocaine day decade	Nigella Lawson ten years of cocaine.	Nigella Lawson, ten years of cocaine.	Nigella Lawson day ten years of cocaine.
36	abc air taste despite nigella lawson drug allegation	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.	Taste of air abc despite the apos; drug claim nigella Lawson.	The taste of air abc despite the drug claim nigella Lawson.
36	nigella lawson fan support midst drug allegation tweet	Nigella Lawson fan among drug-related allegations tweet.	Fan of nigella Lawson among drug allegations tweet.	Nigella Lawson fan among the tweet drug allegations.
36	nigella lawson drug accusation	Nigella Lawson, this is a drug charge.	Nigella Lawson, a drug charge?	Nigella Lawson, drug charges.
36	nigella assistant turn tattle tale	Nigella's assistant becomes a gossip.	L' assistant nigella becomes a gossip.	L' assistant nigella becomes gossip.
36	saatchi higella drug claim	Higella saatchi allegation.	Satchi higella claim, please.	This is a higella saatchi allegation.
36	nigella tweet supporter	Twitter's support for nigella.	Supporters of nigella on twitter.	Support nigella on twitter.
36	nigella lawson cocaine year	Nigella Lawson Year of Cocaine.	Nigella Lawson, year of cocaine.	Nigella Lawson cocaine year.
36	francesca elisabetta grillo stand trial accused blowing	Francesca Elisabetta Grillo is being charged with blowing.	Francesca Elisabetta Grillo has been accused of blowing.	Francesca Elisabetta Grillo is accused of blowing.
36	saatchi drug jibe nigella	I don't know.	Saatchi is a jibe nigella drug.	Saatchi jibe nigella drugs.
36	nigella lawson case deal alleged drug	Nigella Lawson, suspected drug sale.	Uh, Nigella Lawson case, alleged drug sale.	Nigella Lawson case, alleged drug deal.
36	judge nigella lawson case deal alleged drug	Nigerella Lawson, suspected drug trafficking case.	Uh, Judge nigella Lawson, suspected drug trafficking case.	Judge nigella Lawson, suspected drug trafficking case.
36	nigella called habitual criminal	Nigella calls the usual criminal.	Nigella called the regular criminal.	Nigella called the usual.
36	nigella lawson abused drug year assistant claim court	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Nigella Lawson abused the apos; assistant of the year of the drugs.	Nigella Lawson abused the apos' assistant drug year.
36	nigella lawson head drug claim charles saatchi	Nigella Lawson takes credit for Charles Saatchi's drugs.	Nigella Lawson has claimed responsibility for Charles Saatchi's drug use.	Nigella Lawson claims the drug at the head of Charles Saatchi.
36	nigella lawson assistant spend credit card	L' assistant nigella Lawson spends the money on the credit cards.	L' assistant nigella Lawson spends the credit cards.	L' assistant nigella Lawson will spend the credit cards.
36	lawyer claim sister pawn legal battle	The lawyer says that her sister, a pawnbroker, is in a legal battle.	The lawyer claims that sister pawnbroker is in a legal battle.	The lawyer claims that sister pawnbroker has a legal battle.
36	tv chef nigella lawson drug habit court told	Chief Nigella Lawson informed the drug court.	Chief Tv nigella Lawson informed the drug court.	Chief tv nigella Lawson informed the drug court.
36	nigella lawson hit drug allegation teamnigella twitter	Nigella Lawson touched the tweet from teamnigella twitter.	Nigella Lawson touched the twitter d' allegation of teamnigella twitter drug.	Nigella Lawson touched the twitter d' drug allegation teamnigella twitter.
36	nigella habitual criminal drug habit secret court told	Nigella criminal drug habit, secret courtroom said.	Narcotics criminal habit nigella the secret court said.	"""Nigella habitual criminal drug ""the secret court said."
36	nigella lawson cocaine cannabis prescription drug day	Nigella Lawson Cocaine, Cannabis, Prescription, Prescription Day.	Nigella Lawson Cocaine, cannabis, prescription drug, prescription day.	Nigella Lawson Cocaine, cannabis, drug prescription, prescription day.
36	uk court hears celebrity chef nigella lawson drug report	Nigerella Lawson's celebrity leader reports on drugs to the UK court-United.	The U.K. Court-United will hear celebrity leader nigella Lawson report on drugs.	The UK court-United hears celebrity chef nigella Lawson reporting on drugs.
36	nigella lawson cocaine drug day year court told	Nigella Lawson, the year of cocaine, was brought to the attention of the court.	Nigella Lawson, on the same day as the year of the cocaine, was informed by the court.	Nigella Lawson, the year of cocaine addiction, was reported by the court.
36	domestic goddess dubbed higella alleged drug	Domestic goddess, nicknamed Higella, believed to be drugs.	Domestic goddess known as Higella, believed to be a drug addict.	So, maid goddess known as Higella, alleged drug addict.
36	nigella lawson head	Lawson nugella face.	You look like a nigella Lawson.	Nigella lawson face.
36	nigella lawson called habitual criminal	Nigella Lawson, known as the usual criminal.	Nigella Lawson, nicknamed the usual criminal.	"It's called ""Nigella Lawson,"" the common criminal."
36	charles saatchi threatened sue nigella lawson failed testify trial	Charles Saatchi threatened to sue Lawson.	Charles Saatchi threatened to take Nigella Lawson to court.	And Charles Saatchi has threatened to sue Nigella Lawson.
36	nigella lawson accused abusing drug	Nigella Lawson was charged with substance abuse.	Nigella Lawson's been charged with drug abuse.	Nigella Lawson accused of drug addiction.
36	nigella lawson head drug	Nigella Lawson drugged her head.	Nigella Lawson was drugged on the head.	Nigella Lawson's head was drugged.
36	assistant testify celebrity chef nigella lawson drug daily	Assistant testifies that the famous Nigerella Lawson chef drugs every day.	The assistant witness testifies that the famous chef nigella Lawson is a drug addict every day.	The assistant testifies that celebrity chef nigella Lawson drugs daily.
36	nigella lawson drug court hears	Nigella Lawson's Drug Court is hearing testimony.	The drug court in Nigella Lawson hears testimony.	Nigella Lawson's drug court hears testimony.
36	nigella lawson fan support family rally round	Nigella Lawson fan supports family reunion.	Nigella Lawson's fan supports this family gathering.	The nigella lawson fan supports the family gathering.
36	shock court claim tv chef nigella lawson cocaine marijuana daily	The court of shock claims that chief chief nigella Lawson cocaine marijuana every day.	Well, the shock court claims chief nigella Lawson cocaine marijuana TV every day.	The shock court claims chief nigella Lawson cocaine marijuana every day.
36	nigella lawson face explosive drug abuse accusation	It's not a crime, but it's a crime.	Nigella Lawson faces charges of abuse of explosive drugs.	Nigella Lawson faces an explosive drug abuse charge.
36	charles saatchi accuses nigella lawson habitual criminal	Charles Saatchi has accused Nigella Lawson of the usual crimes.	Charles Saatchi accuses Nigella Lawson of usual crimes.	Charles saatchi accuses Nigella Lawson of common crimes.
36	drug claim introduced nigella fraud case	The drug claim brought in a case of nigella fraud, didn't it?	Drug claim brought in a nigella fraud case.	The drug claim brought in a nigella fraud case.
36	nigella lawson assistant claim nigella drug daily decade	Nigella Lawson's assistant claims that she uses drugs every day for 10 years.	Lapos, an assistant to nigella Lawson, claims that she uses drugs every day for 10 years.	L'apos; nigella Lawson's assistant claims that she is a drug user every day for 10 years.
36	nigella lawson abused drug claim assistant	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Nigella Lawson abused her drug claims assistant.	Nigella Lawson abused her assistant drug claims.
36	celebrity chef head drug	Famous chief of drugs.	Famous head of drugs.	Hey, celebrity head of drugs.
36	nigella lawson cut pale figure black outfit stressful year	Nigella Lawson s&apos is light silhouette black, a stressful year.	Nigella Lawson s&apos is cut in light black silhouette, which is a stressful year.	Nigella Lawson s' is cut black with light silhouette, a stressful year.
36	nigella lawson drug allegation tv cook habitual criminal marriage	You know, Nigella Lawson's drug claim tv cooks habitual criminal marriage.	Nigella Lawson drug claim tv cooks habitual criminal marriage.	Nigella Lawson drug claim tv cook cook habitual criminal wedding.
36	nigella lawson dubbed higella charles saatchi accused	Nigella Lawson nicknamed Higella Charles Saatchi is accused.	"It's called ""Higella Charles Saatchi"" by Nigella Lawson."	The accused Nigella Lawson, known as Higella Charles Saatchi.
36	nigella lawson domestic goddess image risk	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Nigella lawson domestic goddess risks l'apos; image of goddess risk.	Nigella lawson domestic goddess risked apos; goddess image risk.
36	nigella lawson higella head drug claim charles saatchi	Nigella Lawson Higella Head is calling for drugs against Charles Saatchi.	And Nigella Lawson Higella Head is calling for a drug against Charles Saatchi.	Nigella Lawson Higella Head wants a drug against Saatchi.
36	charles saatchi accused nigella lawson habitual criminal court hears	Charles Saatchi, charged with the crime of nigella Lawson, is heard in the regular criminal court.	Charles Saatchi, accused of the crime of nigella Lawson, is heard in the usual criminal court.	Charles Saatchi, accused of nigella Lawson, is heard by the regular criminal court of the United States.
37	huffpo auerbach fed created inflation time bomb	The Huffpo auerbach Fed has created an inflationary time bomb.	And the huffpo auerbach fed has created an inflationary time bomb.	The huffpo auerbach fed created an inflationary time bomb.
37	bank consider charging customer saving account deposit	The bank is considering depositing the d&apos account; savings@-@ client.	The bank is considering charging for the deposit of the d' savings@-@ client account.	The bank is considering charging the customer for the deposit.
37	economic forecast federal reserve start taper	Economic forecasts predict that federal reserves will begin to decline in the future.	According to economic forecasts, the federal reserves will begin to decline.	According to economic forecasts, the federal reserve stock will begin to decline.
37	bank charge customer hold money fed lazy	Money from customers' bank charges has fed the lazy.	The money from the bank charges of the customers fed the lazy ones.	Customer bank charges money fed the lazy.
37	market fed balance sheet	Balance sheet, supplied by the market.	Market powered balance sheet.	The balance sheet is supplied by the market.
37	fed punchbowl easy money	It's been a long time since I've been in the business.	He fed easy money punchbowl easy money money.	He fed punchbowl easy money from apos; silver.
37	fed raise rate	Rates of malnutrition increase.	Nourished rates increase.	Nourished rate of death; increase.
37	monetary policy week review nov chile cut south africa	Nov chile South Africa Weekly Monetary Policy Review.	Weekly review of South Africa's nov chile monetary policy.	Weekly review of monetary policy nov chile cut South Africa.
37	fed policy meeting ado	Federal Policy Teenage Meeting.	Canadian Council on Social Development.	Teenage federal policy meeting.
37	taper wolf door	Gate-wolf-@-@ l' eye.	Portal-wolf typed-@-@ l' eye.	Door-wolf typed-@-@ l' Eye.
37	bond yield economic condition affect metlife prudential	Economic conditions of bond yields affect the life of the bonds.	The economic conditions of the bond yield affect the life of the bond prudentially.	Economic bond yield conditions affect the life of prudential bonds.
37	qualified fed chair history	Qualified Federal Chair history.	History of Qualified Federal Chair.	History of the qualified federal chair.
37	parting shot	Separation shots fired.	There's a separation shot.	It's a firefight.
37	regional fed bank split discount rate cut hike	Regional banks have reduced the increase in the deposit rate.	The regional banks have reduced the increase in the interest rate.	Regional banks have reduced the shared discount rate hike.
37	bank start charging hold deposit	Waiting deposits are charged by the bank.	The bank starts charging for the deposits on hold.	The bank will start charging for the pending deposits.
37	bank charge customer deposit fed policy	Client fees have been a major factor in the bank's deposit policy.	Customers' bank charges fed into the bank's deposits.	The bank's deposit policy has been informed by customer bank charges.
37	fed official signal policy battle	The federal government is officially engaged in a political battle.	The federal government, s&apos, was officially engaged in a political battle.	The federal government is now officially engaged in a political battle with the U.S. government.
37	state election key driver	Key driver of l' d&apos election; state.	The key driver of l' election of d' state.	The key driver of l' state election.
37	federal reserve considering negative interest rate	Federal reserve taking into account interest; interest rate; interest.	Federal reserve taking into account foreign exchange; negative interest rate.	Canada's interest rate on the U.S. dollar.
37	federal reserve ben bernanke set mission explain	Federal Reserve Ben Bernanke's mission is to explain, together.	Federal Reserve Ben Bernanke to explain together.	Ben Bernanke's mission is to explain together.
37	investor prefer money trail fed pledge	Investor prefers to follow footsteps; pawn money.	Investor prefers to follow the trail of the money pawned.	L' investor prefers to follow the trail of money pawned.
37	taper low rate longer key fed theme	Low-speed clamp, plus long keypad, powered.	Low-speed clamp longer theme key powered.	Closing low speed plus longer theme key powered.
37	fear taper bond indicate rate boost	Fear of browse indicates an increase in growth rate.	The fear of browse indicates an increase in the rate of growth.	The fear of bond scrolling indicates a growth rate.
37	day coming pay bank hold money	On the day of your arrival at the bank, please pay-you; money in the bank.	On the day of birth; arrived at the bank pay-you from there; money in bank.	On the day of arrival at bank Pay-you from abroad; money in bank.
37	bank start charging deposit	The bank is starting to charge deposits now.	So the bank starts charging the deposits.	The bank will start charging for deposits.
37	bank charge fee deposit	Bank charges are payable.	Deposit bank charges.	Deposit of bank charges.
37	monday economic report november	Economic Report, Monday, November.	Monday-November economic report.	Economic report Monday, November.
37	dollar trade sideways taper taper chart	Conical Scroll Chart of Lateral Dollar Exchanges.	Conical scrolling chart of the lateral dollar exchange.	Conical taper chart of side dollar exchanges.
37	fed policy hurt prudent saver	The Government of Canada is committed to ensuring that Canadians have access to safe drinking water.	The federal policy has hurt us; careful saving.	Federal policy hurt the economy; prudent saving.
37	baptism financial crisis	Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap baptis	Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism baptism Baptism Baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism Baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap bap	Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism Baptism baptis baptis baptis baptism baptis baptis baptism baptis baptis baptism baptis baptism baptis baptism baptism baptis baptism baptis baptism baptis baptism baptism baptism baptism baptis baptis baptism baptism baptis baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptism baptis baptis baptis
37	long fed raise rate	Long-fed increase in birth rate; increase.	Long time nurtured to increase the rate of death; increase.	Long fed increase the rate of increase.
37	bank charging customer money fed taper qe	The decline was fueled by the fact that banks billed their customers' money.	The fact that banks billed their customers' money fueled the downturn.	Banks charging their customers' money was fuelling the decline.
37	bank start charging interest hold saving	Interest is starting to be charged to banks on savings.	Banks are beginning to charge interest on savings.	Banks start charging interest on savings.
37	financial time fed move force bank charge consumer deposit	Financial time fueled by the movement forces bank charges deposit of consumers bank deposits.	The financial time fueled by the movement forces bank charges deposit consumers bank deposit.	The financial time fed by the movement forces the bank charges deposit of consumers bank deposit.
37	blackrock taper derail bull market	The increase in the Blackrock derailment market is also decreasing.	Blackrock's booming derailment market is shrinking.	The bull market for Blackrock derailment is shrinking.
37	interview rb chief economist michelle girard growth	Michelle Girard, Chief Economist, Royal Bank.	Interview with Michelle Girard, Chief Economist, Royal Bank.	Interview with Michelle Girard, chief economist at the Royal Bank.
37	taper talk fed	Conversation was fuelled by the use of caution.	Talking carefully kept the conversation alive.	Prudence fed the conversation.
37	bank forced charge hold deposit	Forced Deposit of Bank Security.	Forced bank deposit deposit.	Forced deposit of bank guarantee.
37	bank consider charging customer saving fed reserve cut	The bank plans to bill its customers for the savings from the cut-off reserves.	The bank plans to charge customers savings from cut-off reserves.	The bank is considering the possibility of charging customers for savings from cut-off reserves.
37	future pay bank hold money	Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay@ Pay-Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay-Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay-@ Pay@ Pay.	The Future of Pay Bank Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay@ Pay@ Pay-Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay@-@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay@-@ Pay@ Pay@-@ Pay@ Pay@@ Pay.	The future of Pay Bank Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay-Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay-@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay-@ Pay@ Pay@ Pay.
37	taper talk direction market	Market management talk.	Talk about market leadership.	To talk about market management.
37	powerful weapon fed arsenal	Arsenal-powered weapon.	Powerful weapon powered by arsenals.	A powerful weapon powered by armor.
37	taper tightening bond rate boost	Interest rates on bonds have increased.	The tightening of interest rates on government bonds has increased.	Bond interest rate tightening has increased.
37	obama ideological person overspending	Ideological Personality obtains too much expense.	Ideological personality overspends.	This ideological personality has been overstretched.
37	taper caper	Cave caperon.	Caperon conique.	Uh, conical caperon.
37	big fail bank charge deposit	Bankruptcy, bankruptcy, bankruptcy, bankruptcy.	Heavy bank charges filed in bankruptcy.	Bankrupt deposit of large bank charges.
37	bank warn fed interest cut force charge depositor	Bank Warning Fed interest cuts charges on depositors.	Bank Warning Fed interest cut deposit charges.	Warning from the bank Fed interest cut charge depositors.
37	fed quantitative easing policy play	Quantitative easing.	Furnished policy game; Quantitative easing.	Fed policy game d' quantitative relaxation.
37	december taper reason easy money continue	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of people.	December s' easy reason reduction; continuous money from the apo; easy money.	December s' reduced reason easy l' continuous money from l' easy money.
37	fed move lower interest rate reserve	The reserve of lower interest rates will be replenished by the lower reserve.	The lower interest rate reserve is fed by the lower interest rate reserve.	The lower interest rate reserve is fed by the lower reserve.
37	peso trade flat fed accommodative stance	Peso nurtured an accommodating position.	Well, the peso gave us an accommodating position.	The peso nurtured an accommodating position.
37	bank lead housing market slows	The market for leaded housing in banks is slowing down.	The banks' lead housing market is slowing down.	The bank lead housing market is sliding.
37	homebond vigilante outmanoeuvre fed	The outside vigilante-la-law of the house has been fed.	The vigilante outside-la-the law of the house has been fed.	The vigilante outside-la-house law has been fed.
37	heritage action opposition yellen key vote	It's not just a question of the environment, it's also a question of the environment.	L' opposition to the heritage action is screaming a key vote.	L' opposition to heritage action screams key vote.
37	report bank start charging deposit	Point out that the bank has started to charge for the deposits.	Please note that the bank has started charging deposits as well.	The bank has started charging deposits.
37	ftse rebound yellen calm taper nerve	The gentle rebound of Yellen eases the tension of the scroll nerve.	The calm Yellen rebound eases the scrolling nerve.	Yellen's calm rebound calms the scrolling nerve.
37	fed stimulus continue yellen	The screams of the nourished stimulus continue.	The stimulus feeding continues to howl.	Fueled stimulus keeps howling.
37	heritage foundation opposes yellen score vote	The S&apos Heritage Foundation is opposed to the vote on the partition of the Yellen.	The foundation patrimonial s' opposed the vote of the partition of the yellen.	The s&apos heritage foundation opposed the yellen partition vote.
37	bernanke exit strategy stock investor rushing exit	Bernanke stock exit strategy investor has hasty exit strategy.	Bernanke exit strategy stock hashish investor exit.	Bernanke exit strategy stock investor rushed out.
37	yellen expect challenge early tenure	Yellen s' waits for the question of early tenure.	Yellen s' waits for early tenure to be called into question.	Yellen s' waits to challenge early tenure.
37	reserve bank set stance rate rise	The Bank of Canada's interest rates are expected to increase in the coming years.	Interest rates on reserve banks are rising.	The interest rate on reserve banks will increase.
37	analyst fed virus learns adapts	Analyst of virus fuelled by the virus s' adapts.	L' analyst of virus fuelled by virus s' adapts.	L' virus analyst fed by the virus s' adapts.
37	bank read fed minute freakout	The bank said that it was a panic.	The bank read that it was panic-stricken.	The bank read that it was panic.
37	thanking fed reservedly investor bounty	Special thanks from the federal government to investors.	Federal acknowledgements reserved for investors.	Federal investor thanks only.
37	mortgage rate rose prospect earlier qe	Mortgage rates have been rising faster than expected.	Mortgage rates rose sooner than expected, however.	Mortgage rates rose sooner than expected.
37	janet yellen clear senate banking committee democrat joe manchin vote	Janet Yellen of the Senate Committee on Democratic Banking, Joe Manchin, votes.	Claire Janet Yellen of the Senate Democratic Banking Committee Joe Manchin votes.	Janet Yellen clear of the Senate Committee Joe Manchin Democratic Bank votes.
37	bank charge holding customer money fed counter lazy behavior	Client fees have changed the behaviour of the lazy.	The bank charges that hold back the money of the customers have changed the behaviour of the lazy.	The bank charges that hold back customers' money have changed lazy behavior.
37	peter schiff market wonder misguided	Peter Schiff s&apos is deceived in the market.	Peter Schiff s' is wrong on the market.	Peter Schiff s&apos is misled in the market place.
37	bank customer pay deposit easy money fade	It's a great way to make money, but it's a good way to make money.	L' money easy deposit client of the bank to pay the money disappears.	Money easy deposit bank customer to pay money; money disappears.
37	talk early federal reserve taper rattle market	Talk from the beginning of the Federal Reserve.	Talk about the Federal Reserve from the beginning.	Talk right from the start of the federal reserve.
37	afraid big bad taper wolf	Afraid of the big, bad wolf.	Scared of the big bad wolf?	I'm afraid of the big bad wolf.
37	banking byte	Bank byte.	Bank byte.	A byte from the bank.
37	janet yellen vote leading federal reserve	Janet Yellen votes Chief of the Federal Reserve.	Janet Yellen votes chief of the Federal Reserve.	Janet Yellen votes federal reserve chief.
37	navigating great monetary unknown	Sail large sums unknown.	Sailing on large unknown sums.	You know, navigating large amounts of unknown money.
37	dollar slip euro ahead bernanke speech	Euro exchange rate depreciation before Bernanke's speech.	The euro exchange rate depreciation before Bernanke's speech.	The depreciation of the euro prior to the speech by Bernanke.
37	fed scale bond buying program coming month report	Federal Program Monthly Report; purchase of assets; obligations for the upcoming month.	Monthly report of federal program; purchase of assets; obligations for next month.	Federal program monthly report; purchase of assets; obligations for the coming month.
37	federal reserve secret revealed	Secrecy of the Federal Reserve revealed.	This is the secret of the Federal Reserve.	Secrecy of the federal reserve revealed.
37	repeat analysis yellen face tough pol commun challenge	L' analyse yellen repeatedly to face difficult challenges common pol pol.	L' repeated analysis yellen face difficult common challenge difficult common pol difficult challenge.	Repeated analysis yellen face difficult common pol difficult challenge.
37	analysis taper low rate longer key fed theme	Low-speed, longer-themed, key-powered challenge analysis.	Longer theme low-speed challenge analysis powered key.	Longer theme low-speed challenge key fed analysis.
37	taper	S&apos scrolling increases.	S&apos scrolling increases.	The taper s' intensifies.
37	bank threaten charge saving money	Bank's threatening to bribe them; save money.	The bank threatened to bill the bank for the money saved.	The bank is threatening to charge money.
37	taper happen	It is a big challenge.	That's a big challenge.	Well, it's a big challenge.
37	fed treasury purchase rate low amid taper	It is also important to note that the federal government's spending on health and social services is not as high as it should be.	The interest rate on the Fed is low in the context of tightening.	The Treasury purchase rate is low in the context of tightening.
37	bank screw depositor fed force	Banker's Banker's Banker's Banker's Feeding Strength.	Fed depositors' bank notes, please.	Fed depositor bank clothes force.
37	fed nix regional bank request raise lower disc	Nix Powered Request Regional Bank Raise the Lower Disc.	Nix fed demand regional bank to raise the lower disc.	Nix fed regional bank request raise the lower disk.
37	fed talk market move	J&apos talked about the market, j&apos talked.	J' talked about the market, j' talked.	J' spoke of the market place, j' spoke.
37	australian zealand dollar recover	The Australian dollar, it's recovering.	The Australian dollar is recovering again.	The Australian dollar rebounds.
37	state poll turning point market	The Market Point of the Dapos Survey; Status.	State of the market at the tipping point of the survey.	The market at the turning point of the survey d' state.
37	thestreet cd rate grind ha fed considers lower interest rate	The rate of interest has been adjusted to take account of lower interest rates and lower interest rates.	The interest rate is the rate at which interest is paid.	A lower interest rate is taken into account when calculating the interest rate.
37	minute fed plan trimming stimulus coming month	Minute for the reduction of the stimulus package next month.	Minute next month for stimulus reduction.	Minute stimulus plan reduction plan next month.
37	inflation	Inflation.	L'apos; inflation.	L&apos, l&apos.
37	talk family taper thanksgiving	I'm talking about family cutting Thanksgiving down.	Talk family down to Thanksgiving.	To talk family down Thanksgiving.
37	proposed fed policy push bank consider charging deposit	The proposed federal policy encourages banks to consider billing their deposits.	The proposed federal policy will encourage banks to consider charging deposits.	The proposed federal policy encourages banks to consider charging deposits.
37	bank handout fed	Bank-issued.	From the bank.	Uh, hand-delivered by the bank.
37	finally case money mattress	It's a good idea if you don't like it.	Finally mattress d' money d' business.	Finally case mattress d'apos; money d'apos; business.
37	weekly money market review ibq committee taper coming	Money Market Weekly Ibq Upcoming scrolling committee.	Money Market Weekly Review ibq Upcoming Scrolling Committee.	Weekly money market review ibq Upcoming scrolling committee.
37	conservative group urge senator vote yellen	Conservatives are urging the Senator to vote with a shout.	The Conservative is urging the senator to vote screaming.	The conservative group urged the senator to vote screaming.
37	qe harm economy	It's bad economics.	What's wrong with economics?	And what's wrong with economics?
37	american fed trillion going	Americans fed billions.	The American people fed billions of them.	Americans fed billions of them.
37	ben rocket peter schiff	Peter Schiff.	Ben Rocket peter Schiff.	Ben rocket peter schiff.
37	bank money charge	Bank charges.	Bank charges.	It's bank charges.
37	fed reverse robin hood ron paul	Reverse Robin Hood feed, Ron Paul.	Fed by Robin Hood inverted, Ron Paul.	Uh, Robin Hood's on the other side, Ron Paul.
37	cd rate grind ha fed considers lower interest rate bank	The interest rate on the CD grind has been reduced by the interest rate on the CD grind.	The CD grind rate has fed considers the interest rate bank d' lower interest.	CD Rate grind ha fed considers rate bank d' lower interest.
37	yellen indicator future	I'll be back in a few minutes.	Yell indicator for l' future.	Yell indicator for the future yell.
37	citigroup suntrust fargo decline comment fee	Citigroup suntrust fargo is a free drop-down comment.	Citigroup suntrust fargo fresh declining comments.	Citigroup suntrust fargo drop-down comment fee.
37	leadership janet yellen telling quote	The leader, Janet Yellen, says what she has to say.	Janet Yellen, the leader, says what she has to say.	It's a great way to make a difference in the world.
38	irs proposes guideline politicking tax exempt group	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it is a matter of public policy.	Irs is proposing a guideline on politicization of the tax exempt group.	Irs proposes a guideline on politicization of tax exempt group.
38	obama secretive group	Obama secret group.	Obama secret group.	Classified group obama.
38	irs limit political activity post tea party flap rule	It's the only thing that makes it easy for people to get involved in politics.	It limits l' political activity after the rule of flap-joy.	It limits l' political activity after the-joy flap rule.
38	obama administration proposes rule limit political activity profit	It's a good thing, but it's a good thing, and it's a good thing.	Obama's administration proposes a rule that limits profit-making political activity.	The Obama administration proposes a rule limiting political activity profits.
38	gov crackdown spending tax exempt group	The federal government is also responsible for the administration of the program.	The government represses expenses of the exempt group.	The government represses exempt group expenditures from tax.
38	limiting big money group	It is important to keep in mind that this is not the case.	Limiting the large group of dollars is limiting the large group of dollars.	Limiting the large group of money is limiting the large group of money.
38	expert irs guidance restrict free speech	The freedom of expression is restricted by the experts' guidelines.	The expert's guidelines restrict the freedom of expression.	Expert guidelines restrict freedom of expression.
38	proposed irs rule political nonprofit divide party	The Non-Profit Political Parties Bill divides the party.	The party is divided by the bill on non-profit political parties.	The non-profit political party bill divided the party.
38	irs mull allowing employee bring device	It's a good idea to have your own car.	We'll allow the employees to bring the equipment.	Mould irs allowing employees to bring the appliance.
38	irs suggests guideline politicking tax exempt group	Suggests a Guideline for the Exempt Group of Taxes.	Suggest a guideline for the exempt group of taxes.	Suggest a guideline for tax exempt group.
38	administration proposes rule spending group	L' l' l' l' l' l&apos.	L' administration proposes a group of expenses based on the rules.	L' administration proposes a rules-based group of expenses.
38	irs paying maintain retired hardware case ig	Payment up to the decommissioning of the equipment.	The payments will extend to the decommissioning of the equipment.	They will also be able to pay for the cost of the equipment.
38	dramatic	It's dramatic.	C&apos, it's dramatic.	C&apos, is a tragedy.
38	irs move clean scandal tea party targeting	It is a real scandal.	He's acting out of character; a real scandal.	It's a scandal, a scandal, a scandal, a scandal.
38	report irs fixed security weakness	Security Vulnerabilities Report corrected.	Report on all security vulnerabilities corrected.	Report on fixed security vulnerabilities.
38	restriction proposed nonprofit political work	Proposed Restriction Non-profit Political Work Proposed.	Proposed Restriction not-for-profit political work proposed.	Proposed restriction not-for-profit political work proposed.
38	irs program allows employee access irs data personal smartphones	The program will allow employees to access personal smartphone data.	The program allows employees to access data from personal smartphones.	The program allows employees to access data from personal smartphones.
38	obama administration proposes rule rein political activity nonprofit	The Obama administration is proposing the rule rein non-profit political activity.	The Obama administration has proposed the rule of rein political activity not for profit.	The Obama administration proposes the rule rein political activity not for profit.
38	fewer robo call future election	Fewer robots will announce the upcoming elections.	Fewer robots announce upcoming elections.	Fewer robots announce future elections.
38	proposed rule flow political money nonprofit	The proposed rule would allow the circulation of money; political money, not for profit.	The proposed rule circulates non-profit political money.	The proposed rule circulates political money not for profit.
38	irs proposes curb profit political activity	It is a bill.	He's acting on a bill.	It is not a bill; it is a bill.
38	ig report irs leaving taxpayer info vulnerable hacker	Reports do not leave any information on taxpayers.	The report does not leave any information about the taxpayers.	The report does not leave taxpayer information.
38	irs proposes rule tax exempt political group	In addition, the tax exemption for political groups is set at the same level as for political groups.	L' Ireland proposes a tax exemption for political groups.	L' Ireland proposes a tax exemption rule for political groups.
38	irs define political activity tax exempt group	In addition, the federal government is responsible for the administration of the Canada Elections Act.	Exempt groups of political activity taxes are defined in the legislation.	Tax-exempt political activity tax groups are defined in legislation.
38	obama administration launch pre emptive strike tea party	The Obama administration is calling a pre-emptive strike.	The Obama administration launches a pre-emptive strike tea.	The Obama administration launches a pre-emptive strike tea party.
38	irs urged ti weakness system security	Irs stressed the security system's weakness.	Mr. Irs stressed the weakness of the security system.	Irs stressed the weakness of security system.
38	library congress	Library convention.	Library conference!	Uh, library convention.
38	irs move curb tax exempt group political activity	Income Taxes; Applies to charitable organizations; Exempt Collective Political Activities; Taxes.	Income tax applies to tax-exempt collective political activity; tax.	Income tax applies to the income tax; collective political activity exempt from tax.
38	irs pushing limit tax exempt group election	In the case of a corporation, the amount of the capital must be equal to the amount of the capital.	Taxation; imposition of limits; exemption from tax; election of members; group.	Taxation; waiting limits; tax exemption; election of a group.
38	treasury irs issue guidance tax exempt social welfare	In addition, the Ministry of Labour and Social Affairs is responsible for the administration of the social security system.	The State Treasury issues directives exempting taxes and social benefits.	The treasury issues directives exempting taxes and social benefits.
38	irs issue proposed rule curtail political nonprofit	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case with respect to political activities.	It is a proposal for a regulation to restrict non-profit political activities.	It proposes regulations to restrict non-profit political activities.
38	aclj proposed irs regulation free speech american	ALCJ has proposed a North American freedom of expression regulation.	ALCJ has proposed a regulation on freedom of expression in North America.	ALCJ proposed a regulation on freedom expression in North America.
38	obama administration proposes limit tax exempt political group	The Obama administration has proposed to limit the tax exemption for political groups.	The Obama administration proposes to limit the tax exemption for political groups.	The Obama administration proposes to limit political group tax exemption.
38	news irs proposes curbing political activity social	The latest news is about the need to slow down social and political activity.	The news suggest to slow down the social political activity.	The news suggests that social political activity should be curbed.
38	obama clarify role tax exempt group politics	Obama clarifies the exempt roles of the group policy tax exemption.	Obama clarifies the exempt roles of exempt group policy tax.	Obama clarifies exempt roles of exempt group policy tax.
38	levin common sense criterion needed weed group	The test of Levin's common sense needed to be met by a group of weeds.	Levin's common sense test needed a bunch of weeds.	The criterion of Levin's common sense needed weeds.
38	irs target dark money political spending	It targets politicians' spending; dirty money.	It targets the political spending of money; dirty money.	He's targeting the political spending of money.
38	rule rein nonprofit political role	Rule over the Nonprofit Role of Politics.	Just rule over the non-profit political role.	Rule the nonprofit political role.
38	treasury irs propose nonprofit rule	The U.S. Treasury Department is proposing a no-profit rule.	You know, the U.S. Treasury has a non-profit rule.	The treasury proposes a non-profit rule.
38	irs placing employee taxpayer risk attack	Information about employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees and employees.	There's information on employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees and employees.	There are a lot of information about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees and employees.
38	irs move limit tax exempt group targeting scandal	The Act restricts the tax exemption for those groups that target a particular scandal.	The law limits tax exemption for groups that target scandals.	The law limits tax exemptions for groups targeting scandals.
38	irs proposes rule tax exempt organization	For more information, see our Web site at www.cra.gc.ca.	L' IRS proposes a special rule for tax-exempt organizations.	L' IRS proposes a rule for exempt organizations.
38	irs treasury push clamp tax exempt political group	Treasury encourages tax-exempt political groups.	In addition, the public purse encourages political groups that are exempt from taxes.	The Treasury encourages tax exempt political groups.
38	obama attempt define politics irs leaf question	Obama's approach to policy-making is an important one.	This is the first time that Obama has made an effort to define a policy.	Attempts by Obama to define the policy.
38	obama admin move attempt silence critic	The Obama administration is trying to silence the voices of critics of silence.	The Obama administration is trying to silence criticism of silence.	The Obama administration tries to silence criticism of silence.
38	irs limit tax exempt group political activity	Taxes limit the amount of money that can be spent on political activities.	Taxes restrict business; group political activity exempt from tax.	Taxes limit group political activity exempt from tax.
38	qa reining social welfare group	Social assistance.	Restricting the group of volunteers; Social Assistance.	What's wrong with social assistance?
38	kpmg international proposed regulation tax exempt social welfare	Kpmg international settlement proposal d&apos exempt from taxes the good @-@social being.	Kpmg proposal for international regulation d' exempt from tax the good @-@social being.	Kpmg proposed international regulation d&apos exempt from taxes the social good.
38	congress introduces bill change irs review tax exempt organization	Congress introduces tax exemption bill.	Congress is introducing a bill on tax exemption.	The congress presents a bill on tax exemption.
38	irs proposes rule	L' IRS provides a rule.	L' IRS proposes a rule.	L' IRS proposes rule.
38	irs front war administration critic	He also criticised the administration of the front-line war.	He criticizes the administration of the war from the front.	He criticizes the war administration from the front.
38	irs prevent tea party scandal	It prevents tea scandal.	He's preventing the tea scandal.	Keeps the tea scandal from happening.
38	irs proposes curb campaigning tax exempt group	Ireland is proposing to end the campaign of tax-exempt groups.	In addition, Ireland is proposing an end to the campaign of tax exempt groups.	Ireland proposes to end the tax exempt group campaign.
38	obama curb political activity shadowy social welfare nonprofit	Obama is slowing it down; social-good obscure nonprofit political activity.	Obama puts the brakes on l' obscure nonprofit political activity of good @-@social be.	Obama hamstrings; obscure nonprofit political activity of good-social be.
38	treasury dep proposes overhaul dark money guidance	The Treasury is proposing a review of the guidelines for the black currency.	The Treasury is proposing a review of black money guidelines.	The Treasury proposes to review the black money guidelines.
38	obama tax exempt crackdown easy skirt	Obama exonerated from wearing a skirt; taxed the repression of the skirt easy skirt.	Obama exonerated from apos; tax the repression of the skirt easy skirt easy.	Obama exonerated from apos; tax easy skirt repression.
38	irs target dark money profit	It's all about money; it's about profits; it's money.	It's a profit; it's a profit from the money.	It's a dirty money business.
38	campaign rule proposed tax exempt nonprofit	For more information, see our Web site at www.cra.gc.ca.	Tax exempt proposed non-profit campaign rules.	Proposed non-profit campaign rule exempt from tax.
38	sen whitehouse nonprofit campaigning	Non-profit campaigning.	The not-for-profit campaign.	The nonprofit campaign.
38	obama administration proposes rule curtailing political activity	The Obama administration has proposed a rule limiting political activity.	The Obama administration proposes a rule limiting political activity.	The Obama administration proposes a rule limiting political activity in the country.
38	tax return safe irs	Safe income statements.	Income reporting secured.	I'm sorry, but it's safe to report.
38	obama administration proposes curb campaigning tax exempt	Obama is proposing to put a stop to the tax-exempt campaign.	The Obama administration is proposing to put a stop to the Obama campaign; tax exemption.	The Obama administration proposes to slow down the campaign.
38	irs target secret campaign cash	He's got a lot of money in his pocket.	He is targeting the campaign's secret money.	He's targeting them, secret campaign money.
38	update obama administration proposes limit tax exempt political	It's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal, but it's a big deal.	Update of apo; Obama administration proposes to limit apo; tax exemption; political.	Obama administration proposes to limit apo; tax exemption; political tax.
38	irs treasury issue political spending guidance	In addition, the Treasury issues directives on political spending.	Treasury issues directives on political spending.	The Treasury issues political spending guidelines.
38	obama admin proposes rule reign nonprofit group	Obama admin is proposing the rule group nonprofit rule.	Obama admin proposes the rule group nonprofit rule.	Obama admin proposes rule group rule nonprofit.
38	dark money nonprofit political spending restricted proposed irs rule	In the case of the latter, it is not clear whether this is the case, but rather whether it is the case.	The non-profit political spending of the black money limited the bill.	Non-profit political spending of the black money limited the proposed legislation.
38	tax politics irs proposes rule tax exempt organization	Tax policy provides rules for tax-exempt organizations.	Tax policy proposes rules for charities that are exempt from tax.	Tax policy proposes rules for tax exempt organizations.
38	revenooer rant lacking return investment analysis	It's a return-on-investment analysis.	A return on investment (ROI) that does not have a return on investment.	A returooer who has no return on investment analysis.
38	irs proposal curb profit campaigning	It's a good thing that we have a lot of money, but it's a lot of money.	The proposal d' a draft law before-keeps the campaign profit.	The proposal d' a draft law on l&apos before-keeps the profit campaign.
38	treasury department crackdown dark money group	The U.S. Treasury Department has been cracking down on d*apos groups; black money.	The Treasury Department cracks down on black money.	The treasury department represses d&apos groups; black money.
38	irs move limit dark money enforcement question	It is a matter of law enforcement; dirty money.	It's a question of how to enforce the law; it's a matter of how to make money.	It is a matter of law enforcement; money laundering.
38	president obama proposes rule rein tax exempt group	President Obama is proposing a new rule for the group that is exempt from paying taxes.	President Obama proposed a new rule for the tax exempt group.	President Obama proposes a new rule for tax exempt group.
38	conservative group worried latest campaign finance	The Conservative Group was concerned about the funding of recent election campaigns.	The conservative group was also concerned about the funding of recent election campaigns.	The conservative group was concerned about campaign financing in recent elections.
38	irs start setting limit nonprofit group politics	The Irs are now beginning to set limits on not-for-profit group politics.	The Irs are starting to set limits to not-for-profit group politics.	The Irs are beginning to set limits on not-for-profit group politics as well.
38	rule aim nonprofit political role	L' Objective of the Non-profit Rule Non-profit Political Role.	The objective of the not-for-profit rule is non-profit political role.	L' objective of the rule non-profit political role non-profit.
38	rulemaking campaigning tax exempt group month	For more information, see our Web site at www.cra.gc.ca.	Campaigning regulations for group month exempt from tax.	Campaigning regulations for tax exempt group month.
38	irs rein tax exempt political organization	It is a tax-exempt political organization.	It is a political organization that is exempt from taxation.	It's a political organization exempt from taxation.
38	obama pitch rule political nonprofit	Obama pitch is a not-for-profit political regime, right?	Obama pitch non-profit political reign.	Obama pitch political nonprofit rule.
38	restriction proposed tax exempt group political activity	Proposed Restriction Exempt Group Political Activities; Tax.	Proposed Restriction Exempt group political activities; tax.	Proposed restriction Exempt group political activities; tax.
38	jay sekulow chief counsel aclj proposed irs regulation	L&apos, Jay Sekulow's senior counsel, has been proposing a regulation of income tax.	Lapos, Jay Sekulow's Senior Counsel, has proposed a regulation of income tax.	L'apos, senior counsel for Jay Sekulow, has proposed a regulation of the income tax.
38	expert dark money stay	Expert remains silent; black money.	The expert is still black money.	L' expert remains l' money black.
38	amendment american greater risk irs issue rule	Amend the U.S. Higher Risk Regulations.	Amend the U.S. higher risk regulations.	To amend the U.S. higher risk regulations.
38	irs target political nonprofit group conservative shriek	He's targeting the non-profit political group, the conservative group Shriek.	It targets the conservative non-profit political group Shriek.	He targets the conservative nonprofit political group Shriek.
38	president obama pitch rule political nonprofit	President Obama pitch is a not-for-profit political leader in the United States.	President Obama pitch, nonprofit political rule.	President Obama pitch political nonprofit rule.
39	aarushi case family justice law abiders	Aarushi Family Law Cases - Family Law Abiders of Family Law.	Aarushi family law case abiders of family law.	Aarushi family law case family law abiders.
39	defence lawyer confident rajesh nupur talwar acquitted	L' defense attorney is confident that Talwar Rajesh has been acquitted.	He is confident that Rajesh nupur Talwar has been acquitted.	L' defense lawyer is confident Rajesh nupur Talwar was acquitted.
39	indian parent life double murder	Life of an Indian parent, double murder.	The life of an Indian parent, double murder.	The life of an Indian parent, double murder.
39	aarushi talwar final verdict rajesh nupur talwar gui	Aarushi Talwar's final verdict will be Rajesh nupur Talwar gui.	Aarushi Talwar final verdict rajesh nupur Talwar gui.	Aarushi Talwar final verdict rajesh nupur talwar gui.
39	aarushi case cbi asks death pena parent nupur rajesh talwar	Aarushi case CBI is asking for the death of Pena parent Nupur Rajesh Talwar.	Aarushi case CBI asks for the death of Pena parent Nupur Rajesh Talwar.	Aarushi case CBI asks death Pena parent Nupur Rajesh Talwar.
39	happened courtroom blow blow account rajesh nupur	S' went to court breath breath Rajesh nupur account.	He s' went to court to blow off Rajesh nupur account.	He s' has gone to court blow blow Rajesh nupur account.
39	aarushi hemraj dual murder verdict held pm	Aarushi hemraj verdict of double murder.	Aarushi hemraj verdict of double murder held at pm.	Aarushi hemraj double murder verdict held at pm.
39	talwars gui aarushi killing court describes freak history	The Talwars Gui Aarushi Murder Court describes the story of monsters.	Talwars gui aarushi Murder Court describes the story of the monsters.	The Talwars gui aarushi murder court describes the story of monsters.
39	india dentist convicted killing daughter maid	Convicted of the murder of a girl servant.	Indian dentist convicted for the murder of d' a girl servant.	Indian dentist convicted of murdering a servant girl.
39	parent gui killing aarushi case captivated india	The Gui parent, who killed Aarushi, was the one who captivated the people of India.	The Gui parent who killed Aarushi... captivated India.	Gui parent who killed Aarushi captivated India.
39	aarushi hemraj murder rajesh nupur life term appeal hc	Aarushi hemraj Rajesh nupur murder call for life, hc.	Aarushi hemraj murder Rajesh nupur calling for life hc.	Aarushi hemraj murder Rajesh nupur call for life hc.
39	aarushi murder judgement rajesh nupur danger security beefed	Rajesh Nupur murder trial heightened security danger.	Aarushi murder trial Rajesh Nupur increased security risk.	Aarushi murder trial Rajesh Nupur heightened security danger heightened.
39	live rajesh nupur talwar life sentence aarushi hemraj double	Rajesh nupur Talwar living aarushi hemraj double life sentence.	Rajesh nupur Talwar living life sentence aarushi hemraj double sentence.	Rajesh nupur talwar living life sentence aarushi hemraj double penalty.
39	indian parent life killing teen butler	Life of an Indian parent kills a teenage butler.	The life of an Indian parent kills the teenage butler.	The life of an Indian parent kills a teenage butler.
39	rajesh nupur convicted killing aarushi hemraj	Rajesh Nupur was found guilty of murder d' Aarushi hemraj.	Rajesh Nupur was found guilty of the murder of D' Aarushi hemraj.	Rajesh Nupur has been found guilty of the murder of Aarushi hemraj.
39	rajesh talwar nupur life term killing aarushi hemraj	Rajesh Talwar, who was sentenced to life for the crime of murdering Aarushi hemraj.	Rajesh Talwar, life sentence for killing Aarushi hemraj.	Rajesh Talwar, life sentence for killing Aarushi hemraj.
39	live talwar couple life sentence aarushi hemraj double murder	A Talwar couple is sentenced to life imprisonment for two counts of murder.	A living Talwar couple is sentenced to life for the double murder of D' Aarushi hemraj.	A Talwar couple is sentenced to life for double murder d' Aarushi hemraj.
39	circumstantial evidence held key talwars murder conviction	Circumstantial conviction of Talwars for murder.	Indirect evidence of Talwars murder conviction.	This is circumstantial evidence of Talwars' murder conviction.
39	aarushi verdict shifting burden proof accused unheard	Aarushi reverse burden of proof.	Aarushi the reversal of the burden of proof.	AARUSHI Reversal of the burden of proof.
39	rajesh nupur talwar gui aarushi hemraj murder	I ain't got nothing against killing Hemraj.	I have nothing against the murder of Hemraj.	I have nothing against the murder of Hemraj.
39	aarushi verdict upsetting celebs	Celebrities are shocked by Aarushi's verdict.	Aarushi handed down a verdict that shocked many celebrities.	Aarushi handed down a verdict that shocked celebrities.
39	aarushi hemraj murder talwars hurt anguished conviction	Aarushi hemraj murderer talwars wounded anguished conviction.	Aarushi hemraj murder talwars wounded anguished conviction.	Aarushi hemraj murder talwars wounded anguished conviction.
39	extreme prejudice cry family rajesh nupur talwar	Rajesh family nupur talwar's extreme prejudice.	Extreme prejudice Cree Rajesh family nupur Talwar.	Extreme prejudice screams Rajesh family nupur talwar.
39	aarushi talwar case disappointed hurt parent rajesh nupur talwar	Rejected Aarushi Talwar wounded parent Rajesh nupur Talwar.	Aarushi Talwar disillusioned case wounded parent Rajesh nupur Talwar.	Aarushi Talwar disappointed case wounded parent Rajesh nupur Talwar.
39	life slitting daughter throat	Cutting the girl's throat.	Life cutting down the girl's throat.	The life slashing the girl's throat.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case verdict wrong talwar lawyer	Aarushi Hemraj apo verdict; Talwar murder case, bad lawyer.	Aarushi Hemraj verdict of the apos; murder case Talwar bad lawyer.	Aarushi Hemraj verdict of I' Talwar murder case bad lawyer.
39	people crowd court aarushi murder verdict	People are piling up on the D&apos verdict; Aarushi.	People are piled up on the verdict of D' Aarushi.	The people s' pile on the verdict d' Aarushi.
39	aarushi talwar case freak history mankind judge	Aarushi Talwar story of monster of the Apos history; humanity judge.	Aarushi Talwar monster story of the apos; history of the apos; humanity judge.	Aarushi Talwar story of the Apos Monster; history of the Apos Monster; judge humanity.
39	dentist couple convicted murder teenage daughter servant	Murder-suited dentist couple, maiden servant.	Dentist couple convicted of murder, young maiden.	This is a dentist couple convicted of murder, maiden maiden.
39	talwars gui daughter aarushi murder cbi court	Talwars gui daughter Aarushi murdered the CBI court.	Talwars gui daughter Aarushi murder the CBI court.	Talwars gui daughter Aarushi murder CBI court.
39	timeline aarushi hemraj murder case	Chronology of murders d' Aarushi hemraj.	The timeline of the murders d' Aarushi hemraj.	Aarushi hemraj murder chronology.
39	hurt anguished talwars	Anguished talwars.	Hurt talwars with anguish.	To hurt anguished talwars.
39	judge cite reason sentencing talwars aarushi hemraj murder case	The judge cited the reason for the conviction of Talwars aarushi hemraj, a murder case.	The judge cites the reason for the conviction of Talwars aarushi hemraj murder case.	Judge cited the reason talwars aarushi hemraj was convicted of murder.
39	aarushi case live rajesh nupur talwar reach court sentencing shortly	L' case aarushi Rajesh nupur Talwar will soon be tried by the court.	Rajesh's case aarushi nupur Talwar will soon be tried by the court.	L' Rajesh nupur Talwar aarushi case will soon be tried in court.
39	aarushi murder talwars victim botched investigation	Aarushi murder Talwars, victim of apos; a botched murder investigation.	Aarushi murder Talwars victim of apos; a botched investigation.	Aarehi murder Talwars, victim of a botched investigation.
39	hemraj family wanted death talwars	The Hemraj family was after death talwars.	The Hemraj family wanted death talwars, right?	Hemraj family wanted death talwars.
39	heavy security ahead aarushi hemraj murder verdict	We've got an extra security detail waiting for us, aarushi hemraj verdict of murder.	We have a heightened security detail waiting for us aarushi hemraj murder verdict.	Enhanced security awaits us aarushi hemraj murder verdict.
39	fighting read talwars statement aarushi verdict	The fights are reading the Talwars declaration aarushi verdict.	The fights read Talwars declaration aarushi verdict.	The fights read talwars declaration aarushi verdict.
39	strong proof talwars aarushi hemraj case lawyer	This is not the case, it is not the case.	Strong evidence aarushi hemraj lawyer from the case.	Evidence strong talwars aarushi hemraj lawyer de l'apos; case.
39	killed aarushi talwar hemraj verdict today	The verdict of Aarushi Talwar has been handed down today.	The verdict of Aarushi Talwar hemraj has been delivered today.	Aarushi Talwar hemraj verdict was handed down today.
39	talwars tehelka case medium excess	You know, Talwars tehelka, average excess case.	Talwars tehelka average case excess.	Talwars tehelka case average excess.
39	aarushi talwar murder case justice	Talwar Aarushi murder case.	Aarushi Talwar murder case.	Aarushi Talwar is a murder case.
39	life jail murdering daughter	Life for the murder of the girl.	Life in prison for the girl's murder.	You know, life for murdering the girl.
39	convicted killing daughter aarushi rajesh nupur talwar cried jail	Sentenced for the murder of his daughter, Aarushi Rajesh Nupur Talwar cried in prison.	Sentenced for killing her daughter, Aarushi Rajesh Nupur Talwar cried in prison.	Rajesh Nupur Talwar, who was convicted of killing his daughter, cried in prison.
39	aarushi murder case rajesh nupur gui sentencing tuesday	Aarushi murder case Rajesh Nupur was sentenced to death on Tuesday.	Aarushi murder case Rajesh Nupur sentencing on Tuesday.	Aarushi murder case Rajesh Nupur gui sentencing Tuesday.
39	aarushi hemraj murder convict nupur talwar unwell dasna jail	Nupur Talwar was sentenced to death in Dasna prison by Aarushi Hemraj.	Aarushi Hemraj convicted for murder Nupur Talwar was jailed in the Dasna prison.	Aarushi Hemraj convicted for murder Nupur Talwar was jailed in Dasna jail.
39	aarushi trial double murder forensics investigation	Trials Aarushi double murder medical investigation-legal.	Aarushi double murder trial medical investigation-legal.	Aarushi trial double murder investigation medical-legal.
39	aarushi talwar murder case timeline happened	Aarushi Talwar has arrived.	The timeline of the murders d'apos; Aarushi Talwar has arrived.	The Aarushi Talwar murder chronology has arrived.
39	aarushi talwar case rape justice	Aarushi Talwar, the Rape of Justice case.	Aarushi Talwar, court rape case.	Aarushi Talwar rape case of justice.
39	aarushi hemraj murder verdict quantum sentence parent today	Today Aarushi hemraj verdict of quantum murder parent.	Aarushi hemraj verdict of quantum murder parent today.	Aarushi hemraj quantum murder verdict parent today.
39	aarushi talwar murder case indian dentist rajesh nupur talwar convicted	Aarushi Talwar Murder Case Indian Dentist Rajesh Nupur Talwar convicted.	Aarushi Talwar murder case Indian dentist Rajesh Nupur Talwar convicted.	Aarushi Talwar murder case Indian dentist Rajesh Nupur Talwar convicted.
39	aarushi murder witch hunt sad day india talwars lawyer	Aarushi murder witch witch hunting sad day India talwars talwars lawyer.	Aarushi murder witch witch hunt sad day India talwars lawyer talwars.	Aarushi murder witch hunt sad day India talwars lawyer talwars.
39	indian court find parent gui honor slaying	The Indian court has found that the parent is the killer of the child.	The Indian court found that the parent killed the apos; honor.	Indian court finds parent to kill father.
39	parent gui killing aarushi rule court talwars appeal hc	Gui killed Aarushi, the court d'apos; Talwars appeal.	Father Gui killed Aarushi, the court of Apos Talwars appealed.	Father Gui killed Aarushi, the court d'apos; talwars appeal.
39	aarushi verdict live cbi seek death talwars sentencing	Aarushi verdict live, CBI calling for death penalty talwars.	Aarushi verdict live CBI call for death penalty talwars.	Aarushi verdict live CBI request talwars death penalty pain.
39	parent gui killing teen daughter	The father kills the teenage girl.	Father kills teenage daughter.	The father's killing the teenage daughter.
39	talwars killed aarushi hemraj court	Talwars murdered Aarushi hemraj court.	Talwars killed Aarushi, hemraj court.	Talwars killed Aarushi hemraj cour.
39	aarushi talwar murder case judge refers talwars modern outlook excerpt	Aarushi Talwar murder case the judge referred to modern-day perspectives extracted from Talwars.	Aarushi Talwar murder case the judge referred to modern talwars perspectives extracted.	Aarushi Talwar murder case judge returns to Talwars modern perspectives extracted.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case verdict pm talwars lawyer	Aarushi Hemraj death conviction, Talwars lawyer.	Aarushi Hemraj verdict of the apos; murder case of Talwars lawyer.	Aarushi Hemraj sentencing from the apos; murder case lawyer Talwars.
39	aarushi talwar murder nupur rajesh fallen ahead punishment	Aarushi Talwar murdering rajesh nupur fell before punishment.	Aarushi Talwar assassinating nupur rajesh fell before the punishment.	Aarushi Talwar murder nupur rajesh fell before punishment.
39	going nupur talwar sister	Nupur-Talwar sister.	Nupur talwar sister.	Hey, nupur talwar sister.
39	talwars life aarushi hemraj murder	Talwars lives aarushi murder hemraj.	Talwars lives aarushi hemraj murder.	Talwars life aarushi hemraj murder.
39	rajesh talwar filed wrong fir mislead investigator cbi	Rajesh Talwar s&apos is misled as a CBI investigator.	Rajesh Talwar s&apos is the CBI investigator.	Rajesh Talwar s' is wrong d' CBI investigator.
39	indian special court sentence doctor couple life killing daughter servant	A special sentence from the Indian court, doctor, couple, killing his daughter, a servant, for life.	Special sentence from the Indian court, doctor, couple, killing his servant daughter for life.	Special Indian court conviction, doctor, couple, killing his daughter servant for life.
39	aarushi hemraj murder emergence golf club theory	Aarushi hemraj murder, emerging from golf club theory.	Aarushi hemraj murder emerging from golf club theory.	Aarushi hemraj murder emerging golf club theory.
39	rajesh nupur talwar gui killing daughter aarushi domestic help hemraj	Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui kill Aarushi girl domestic helper Hemraj.	Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui kill daughter Aarushi domestic helper Hemraj.	Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui kill daughter Aarushi domestic help Hemraj.
39	serious miscarriage justice talwars lawyer	Serious miscarriage of justice, Talwars lawyer talwars.	It was a serious miscarriage of justice by Talwars lawyer talwars.	A serious miscarriage of justice Talwars talwars lawyer.
39	parent best protector freak	Best parent, protective monster.	Best parent, protective freak.	Best parent, freak protector.
39	indian couple gui murdering daughter servant	Indian Couple... gui murder girl servant.	Indian couple gui murder girl servant.	Indian couple gui murdering the maid.
39	rajesh nupur convicted murder aarushi talwar hemraj	Rajesh Nupur has been found guilty of the murder of Aarushi Talwar hemraj.	Rajesh Nupur was convicted for the murder of Apos; Aarushi Talwar hemraj.	Rajesh Nupur was convicted for murder of Aarushi Talwar hemraj.
39	aarushi hemraj case talwar couple convicted murder	Aarushi Hemraj Talwar couple sentenced for murder.	Aarushi Hemraj, Talwar couple convicted of murder.	Aarushi Hemraj case Talwar couple convicted of murder.
39	indian couple sentenced life murder daughter housekeeper	A couple of Indians condemned Apos' housekeeper to life, a murdered girl.	A couple of Indians sentenced the d'apos housekeeper to life; a murdered girl.	An Indian couple sentenced the housekeeper to life imprisonment; a murdered Indian girl.
39	aarushi trial court clear house help raising question probe	Aarushi clear court of first instance home help raise probing issues.	Aarushi clear first-instance court house help raise probing issues.	Aarushi court of first clear house help raise probes questions.
39	talwars life jail daughter murder	Talwars prison for life, girl murder.	Talwars life imprisonment girl murder.	Talwars life imprisonment daughter murder.
39	couple gui slitting daughter throat finding objectionable	A couple of mistletoes slit her daughter's throat, and they find it reprehensible.	A couple of mistletoes cut their daughter's throat and find it reprehensible.	Her daughter gets her throat cut by a couple of mistletoes, and it's reprehensible.
39	aarushi murder case talwars rule court	Aarushi murder talwars settle court.	Aarushi murder talwars case settles court.	Aarushi murder case talwars settle court.
39	talwar trial combination lazy investigation lynch mob medium senior	Talwar Combination Trial lazy investigation, lynching of the senior psychic mafia.	Talwar Trial Combination lazy mob lynch mob senior investigation.	Talwar Combination trial lazy investigation lynch mob senior psychic.
39	aarushi talwar murder couple sentenced life prison death teen	Aarushi Talwar is a couple of murderers who have been sentenced to life imprisonment as a teenager.	Aarushi Talwar couple of murderers sentenced to life sentence teen death penalty.	Aarushi Talwar murderers couple sentenced to life imprisonment as a teenager.
39	life term talwar couple killing aarushi hemraj	A Talwar couple kills Aarushi hemraj.	A Talwar couple for life kills Aarushi hemraj.	A couple talwar for life kills Aarushi hemraj.
39	aarushi talwar case judge refers year beaut damsel	Judge de l'apos, Aarushi Talwar case, refers to the year of the beautiful maiden.	Judge de l'apos; Talwar Aarushi case refers to the year of beauty.	The case of Aarushi Talwar refers to the year of beauty.
39	aarushi hemraj murder verdict live court accused flouted law land	Aarushi Hemraj has been convicted of murder live, charged with breaking the law.	Aarushi Hemraj verdict of murder live, accused of breaking the law.	Aarushi Hemraj live murder verdict accused of breaking the law.
39	twist turn aarushi murder case	It's a good idea to go in a circle; it's a case of the murder d'apos.	Running around in circles; case of the murder d'apos; Aarushi.	Running in circles; murder case d' Aarushi.
39	resident house aarushi killed ghost	Resident aarushi house killed a ghost.	Aarushi resident house killed ghost.	Resident house aarushi killed ghost.
39	cascade plea talwars aimed delaying law course cbi	Cascade pleading talwars to delay cbi course.	Cascade pleading talwars to delay the cbi course of law.	Cascade pleading talwars to delay law course cbi course.
39	aarushi character assassination daughter	Aarushi character... murder girl.	Aarushi character murder girl.	Aarushi character murder girl.
39	aarushi hemraj verdict live talwars reach court verdict expected	Aarushi Hemraj living Tawars verdict reach the expected verdict of the court.	Aarushi Hemraj verdict living talwars reach the expected verdict of the court.	Aarushi Hemraj live verdict talwars reach expected court verdict.
39	aarushi talwar ghost spook neighbour	Ghost Aarushi Talwar neighbor.	Aarushi Talwar is a ghost.	Aarushi Talwar ghost next door.
39	friend aarushi spoke	Friend Aarushi has spoken.	L' friend Aarushi has spoken.	L' friend Aarushi talked.
39	aarushi trial talwars freak killed progeny court	Aarushi Monster Talwars Murdered offspring court.	Aarushi Monster Talwars trial killed a breeding ground.	Aarushi Monster Talwars trial killed offspring court.
39	aarushi case pilloried noida cop feel vindicated	Aarushi case pilloried noida cop, they feel justified.	Aarushi case pilloried noida cop feel justified.	Aarushi case pilloried noida cop feel justified.
39	movie aarushi murder case	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	L' Aarushi murder case.	L' murder case d' Aarushi.
39	judgment miscarriage justice appeal aarushi talwar family	Justice appeals to the Aarushi Talwar family.	Misjudgment The Aarushi Talwar family is being called upon for justice.	The Aarushi Talwar family is the source of the justice system.
39	aarushi talwar case parent rajesh nupur sentenced life prison	Aarushi Talwar relative Rajesh Nupur sentenced to life imprisonment.	Aarushi Talwar parent Rajesh Nupur sentenced to life imprisonment.	Aarushi Talwar parent Rajesh Nupur sentenced to life imprisonment.
39	anguished continue fight justice talwars	Anguished continuation of battle against the talwars of justice.	Anguished continuation of the fight against the talwars of justice.	Anguished continuation of the justice talwars fight.
39	aarushi case unanswered query nailed talwar couple	Aarushi case without answer nailed question talwar couple.	Aarushi case without answer question nailed talwar couple.	Aarushi unanswered case nailed talwar couple question.
39	gui verdict aarushi talwar murder	Who is guilty of murder?	Who verdict aarushi talwar murderers.	Who verdict aarushi talwar murder.
39	aarushi talwar family appeal court verdict	A.T.A.T.W.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.S.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.T.	Aarushi Talwar court verdict; family appeal.	Aarushi Talwar court verdict d' family appeal.
39	talwar couple gui killing daughter aarushi servant hemraj	Talwar couple will kill daughter Aarushi servant Hemraj.	Talwar couple gui kill daughter Aarushi servant Hemraj.	Talwar couple gui kill daughter Aarushi servant Hemraj.
39	aarushi case nupur talwar father hea worse conviction	Aarushi case Talwar father Hea nupur worst conviction.	Aarushi case nupur Talwar father Hea worst conviction.	Aarushi case nupur talwar father hea worst conviction.
39	india shocking murder mystery	The mystery of India's shocking murder.	The mystery of the shocking murder of India.	The shocking murder mystery of India.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case talwars life imprisonment	Aarushi Hemraj Murder Talwars Prison for Life.	Aarushi Hemraj murder case Talwars prison for life.	Aarushi Hemraj Talwars murder case life imprisonment.
39	aarushi talwar verdict parent held gui	One parent, Aarushi Talwar, has been sentenced to death.	Aarushi Talwar, a relative sentenced to death.	Aarushi Talwar, a parent was sentenced to death.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case talwars convicted quantum punishment	Aarushi Hemraj murder case, Talwars doomed quantum punishment.	Aarushi Hemraj murder case Talwars convicted quantum punishment.	Aarushi Hemraj murder case Talwars convicted quantum punishment.
39	judgement day india awaits verdict aarushi hemraj twin murder case	On the day of the judgment, India awaits the verdict of the aarushi hemraj case of murder of twins.	On the day of judgment l' India awaits the verdict aarushi hemraj case of murder of twins.	On the day of judgment; India awaits verdict aarushi hemraj case of murder of twins.
39	happened talwars convicted pic	It is also produced from condemned peaks.	It is produced by the production of condemned talwars.	Peak condemned talwars are produced.
39	blog aarushi talwar	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry.	Blog aarushi talwar.	Blog aarushi talwar.
39	aarushi murder case cbi claim talwars defence	Aarushi, the CBI, is calling for the defense of Talwars.	L' case of the murder of D' Aarushi, the CBI, calls for the defense of Talwars.	The case of the murder of D' Aarushi, the CBI, claimed the defence of the Talwars.
39	parent handed life sentence killing aarushi	He was sentenced to life imprisonment by a relative for the murder of his father.	A parent condemned the murder of Apos; Aarushi to life.	A parent sentenced to life the murder of d' Aarushi.
39	parent gui killing daughter case captivated india	The case of the parent who kills his daughter has captured the imagination of the people of India.	The case of the parent who kills his daughter captivated l'apos; India.	The parent killing his daughter captivated India.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case happened	The case of the murder of Aarushi was brought to the public's attention.	L' case of murder d' Aarushi hemraj s' is produced.	L' murder case d' Aarushi hemraj s' is produced.
39	talwars gui cbi court rule dentist couple kill daughter	It's not like you're a dentist, but it's a dentist.	Talwars gui cbi court rules d' a pair dentist kill daughter.	Talwars gui cbi court rules d'apos; couple dentist kill girl.
39	judgement day sensational indian double murder trial	On the day of the sensational Indian Trials for Double Murder.	It's the day of the sensational Indian double murder trial.	The day of the sensational double murder trial in India.
39	talwars life prison murdering aarushi hemraj	Life sentence Talwars murder aarushi hemraj.	Talwars life imprisonment murder aarushi hemraj.	Talwars life imprisonment murder aarushi hemraj.
39	talwars gui killing daughter aarushi hemraj	Talwars will kill Aarushi Hajj.	Talwars gui kill daughter Aarushi hemraj.	Talwars gui kill daughter Aarushi hemraj.
39	wea hy indian couple sentenced life slitting daughter servant throat	Wea hyan couple serving life sentences slashing his daughter's throat.	Wea hyan couple serving life slashing his servant daughter's throat.	A Hyan couple sentenced to life slashing his servant daughter's throat.
39	talwars devoted parent aarushi murder convict	Talwars, kinsman of the apos; Aarushi, convicted for murder.	Talwars, devoted relative of Aarushi, convicted of murder.	Talwars, devoted parent of Apos; Aarushi, convicted for murder.
39	couple jailed life slitting throat teenage daughter servant	She's in jail for slitting the throat of a teenage girl who's a servant.	A couple in prison for slitting the throat of a teenage servant.	A couple in jail for slitting the throat of a teenage servant girl.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case cbi court hold rajesh nupur talwar gui	Aarushi Hemraj murder case in the court of the CBI held Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui.	Aarushi Hemraj murder case in CBI court held Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui.	Aarushi Hemraj murder case in CBI court hold Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui.
39	aarushi talwar murder life imprisonment rajesh nupur	Aarushi Talwar assassin Rajesh lupur prison for life.	Aarushi Talwar assassinate Rajesh lupur life imprisonment.	Aarushi Talwar murder Rajesh nupur life imprisonment.
39	indian couple sentenced life murder	There's a life sentence for murder by an Indian couple.	One Indian couple gave a life sentence for murder.	An Indian couple condemned a murder to life.
39	nupur talwar complains high bp anxiety jail	Nupur Talwar has been complaining about apoes; there is a lot of anguish in prison.	Nupur Talwar complains of serious prison anguish.	Talwar complains of high anxiety in prison.
39	aarushi talwar murder case rajesh nupur talwar convicted	Aarushi Talwar murder case Rajesh Nupur Talwar has been convicted.	Aarushi Talwar murder case Rajesh Nupur Talwar convicted.	Aarushi Talwar murder case convicted Rajesh Nupur Talwar.
39	judgment miscarriage justice appeal talwar family	Miscarriage of justice appeals to the Talwar family.	A miscarriage of justice has brought in the Talwar family.	A miscarriage of justice has appealed to the Talwar family for help.
39	indian couple sentenced daughter murder	His daughter was convicted of murder by an Indian couple.	An Indian couple condemned his daughter for murder.	An Indian couple sentenced her daughter to murder two years ago.
39	aarushi talwar india talked murder verdict	Aarushi Talwar India has just handed down a verdict of murder.	Aarushi Talwar India handed down a verdict of murder.	Aarushi Talwar India has pronounced a murder verdict today.
39	aarushi verdict court delay judgement	Aarushi delays the judgement.	The D&apos verdict; Aarushi delays the judgement.	The verdict of the court in the case of Aarushi delays the judgement.
39	emotion high aarushi judgement medium spectacle	L' feeling aarushi judging medium-show emotion.	L' emotion aarushi judging average spectacle.	L' emotion aarushi judging medium spectacle.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case rajesh nupur talwar life sentence	Aarushi Hemraj murder case, Rajesh Nupur Talwar life sentence.	Aarushi Hemraj murder case Rajesh Nupur Talwar, life sentence.	Aarushi Hemraj murder case Rajesh Nupur Talwar life sentence.
39	aarushi murder case verdict life term talwar couple killing aarushi hemraj	Aarushi murder case, verdict of life sentence talwar couple kill aarushi hemraj.	Aarushi murder case verdict of life sentence talwar couple murder aarushi hemraj.	Aarushi murder case verdict talwar couple kill aarushi hemraj life sentence.
39	aarushi talwar close friend extend support parent	Next of kin Aarushi Talwar.	Aarushi Talwar is a close friend and supportive relative.	Aarushi Talwar close friend support parent.
39	indian medium aarushi murder case	L' D&apos murder case; Aarushi in India.	L' case of the murder d' Aarushi in India.	L' Aarushi murder case in India.
39	evidence sc judgement relied convict talwars aarushi case	Proof that the trial was s' it is based on the case of the convicted Talwars aarushi.	Proof that the S&apos judgement is based upon the case of the condemned Talwars aarushi.	Proof that the S&apos judgement is based on the Talwars aarushi case.
39	cbi court find rajesh nupur talwar gui aarushi murder	Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui aarushi is declared a murderer by the CBI court.	The CBI court declares Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui aarushi a murderer.	CBI court declares Rajesh Nupur Talwar gui aarushi murderer.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case handled better	In addition, there is the case of the murder of Aarushi hemraj, which has been better handled.	L' case of the murder d' Aarushi hemraj murder was better handled.	L' Aarushi hemraj murder case was handled better.
39	talwars life term aarushi hemraj murder lawyer call witch hunt	Talwars term for life aarushi hemraj assassinate lawyer call witch-hunt.	Talwars term for life aarushi hemraj murder lawyer called witch-hunt.	Talwars term for life aarushi hemraj murder lawyer call witch hunt.
39	latest reaction	Last reaction.	One last reaction.	Okay, last reaction.
39	couple convicted murdering teen daughter domestic help	A young woman, a teenager, a domestic worker.	A couple convicted for the murder of a teenager, a domestic worker.	A couple convicted of murdering a teenage domestic worker.
39	aarushi talwar murder family reel impact gui verdict	Aarushi Talwar murderous family real impact gui verdict.	Aarushi Talwar murder family real impact gui verdict.	Aarushi Talwar murder family reel impact gui verdict.
39	aarushi talwar case reason murder	Aarushi Talwar... murder-related case.	Aarushi Talwar murder case.	Aarushi Talwar murder charge case.
39	judge relied sc judgement convict talwars aarushi case	The judge based his judgment on the Talwars Aarushi Case.	The judge based his judgment on the case of Talwars aarushi.	The judge based his judgement on the Talwars aarushi case.
39	aarushi hemraj double murder story	Aarushi hemraj, the story of double murder.	Aarushi hemraj story of double murder.	Aarushi hemraj double murder story.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case conviction happened	The case of Aarushi hemraj for a conviction for murder has taken place.	Aarushi hemraj murder conviction case has taken place.	Aarushi hemraj murder case has taken place.
39	aarushi talwar case rajesh nupur sentenced shortly	Aarushi Talwar, Rajesh Nupur case, was condemned shortly afterwards.	Aarushi Talwar Rajesh nupur case condemned a short time later.	Aarushi Talwar Rajesh nupur case condemned shortly afterwards.
39	talwars life killing teen daughter servant	Talwars lives by killing the servant teenage girl.	Talwars life by killing the teenage maiden servant girl.	Talwars life killing teenage maid maiden.
39	noida ghaziabad cop boost security aarushi judgment	Noida ghaziabad cop to boost security and aarushi judgment aarushi.	Noida ghaziabad cop boost security aarushi judgment aarushi.	Noida ghaziabad cop boost security aarushi judgment aarushi.
39	talwars held gui aarushi hemraj killing	The talwars assumed that mistletoe aarushi hemraj would kill.	The talwars assumed that aarushi hemraj would kill.	Talwars assumed that gui aarushi hemraj would kill.
39	live rajesh nupur talwar held gui killing daughter aarushi domestic help	Rajesh Nupur Talwar has killed his daughter, Aarushi, as a domestic helper.	Rajesh Nupur Talwar murdered his daughter Aarushi as a domestic helper.	Rajesh Nupur Talwar killed his daughter Aarushi as a domestic aide.
39	court accept theory cbi	Court accepts CBI theory.	Well, the court accepts the CBI theory.	The court accepts the theory of the CBI.
39	indian doctor couple gui killing teenage daughter helper	Indian doctor guile kill gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui gui.	Indian doctor couple gui kill helps teenage girl help.	Indian doctor couple gui killing teenage girl helps.
39	aarushi talwar verdict	Talwar Aarushi verdict.	Aarushi Talwar verdict.	Aarushi talwar verdict.
39	aarushi talwar case nupur rajesh talwar gui murdering teen	Aarushi Talwar case nupur rajesh Talwar murder teenager.	Aarushi Talwar case nupur rajesh Talwar gui murder teenager.	Aarushi Talwar case nupur rajesh talwar gui murder teenager.
39	aarushi murder case nupur parent appeal verdict	Aarushi murder case, Nupur parents verdict d' appeal.	Aarushi murder case Nupur parents verdict d' appeal.	Aarushi murder case Nupur parents verdict call.
39	dentist couple rajesh nupur talwar gui killing daughter servant	Dentist Rajesh Nupur Talwar kills his daughter, a servant.	Dentist Rajesh Nupur Talwar kills his servant daughter.	And dentist Rajesh Nupur Talwar kills his servant daughter.
39	aarushi murder case verdict nupur talwar broke judgment	Aarushi verdict of l' case of murdering Talwar nupur has been overturned.	Aarushi verdict of l' case of murder nupur Talwar has broken the judgment.	Aarushi verdict of l' Talwar murder case has overturned judgement.
39	aarushi case verdict shock disbelief social medium	Aarushi verdict d' shocking social media disbelief.	Aarushi verdict d' case of social media shock disbelief.	Aarushi verdict d' case shock disbelief media social disbelief.
39	aarushi hemraj murder case timeline	Chronology of murders d' Aarushi hemraj.	The timeline of the murders d' Aarushi hemraj.	Aarushi hemraj murder chronology.
39	aarushi talwar murder thing case	Murder d' Aarushi Talwar.	The murder of Aarushi Talwar.	The murder of Aarushi Talwar.
39	rajesh nupur talwar victim unfair trial	Rajesh Nupur Talwar has been the victim of unfair trial.	Rajesh Nupur Talwar victim unfair trial.	Rajesh Nupur Talwar victim unfair trial unfair.
39	aarushi case rajesh nupur talwar life term lawyer call witch hunt	Aarushi cas Rajesh Nupur Talwar's life-span is called a witch-hunt.	Aarushi cas Rajesh Nupur Talwar lifetime lawyer called witch-hunt.	Aarushi case Rajesh Nupur Talwar lifetime lawyer called witch hunt.
39	inconsolable talwars refuse dinner	Unconsolvable talwars don't want to go to dinner.	Oh, the inconsolable talwars refuse dinner.	The inconsolable talwars refuse dinner tonight.
39	aarushi talwar murder case death sentence sought nupur rajesh	Aarushi Talwar murder case the death penalty requested Nupur rajesh nupur nupur nupur nupur nupur nupur.	Aarushi Talwar's murder case the death penalty requested nupur rajesh Nupur.	Aarushi Talwar murder case the death sentence sought nupur rajesh Nupur nupur nupur.
39	trial talwars conviction divide opinion	Opinions are divided in the Talwars trial.	The Talwars trial, conviction divides opinions.	Talwars trial conviction divides opinions.
39	indian couple gui killing year daughter servant	The Gui Indian couple kills their daughter, the Gui Indian Servant of the Year.	The Gui Indian couple kills their daughter servant of the year.	Indian couple Gui kills his daughter servant of the year.
39	dear filmmaker film aarushi	Dear filmmaker, aarushi film aarushi.	Dear filmmaker aarushi film aarushi.	Dear aarushi filmmaker film aarushi.
39	dentist slit daughter servant throat	Dentist cut the maid's daughter's throat.	The maid's daughter's throat was slit by the dentist.	The dentist slit the servant's daughter's throat.
39	aarushi talwar murder case cbi flip flop intriguing	Aarushi Talwar murder case, CBI flip flop intriguing.	Aarushi Talwar murder case CBI flip flop intriguing.	Aarushi Talwar murder case CBI flip flop intriguing.
39	aarushi case post mortem report mystery	Aarushi post-mortem mystery report.	Aarushi case postmortem report.	Aarushi case postmortem mystery report.
39	indian couple life double murder	Life as an Indian couple, double murder.	The life of an Indian couple doubles murder.	Indian couple life double murder.
40	tacloban city three week haiyan	Three weeks from Tacloban City.	This is Tacloban City, 3 weeks old.	Tacloban City three weeks huryan.
40	philippine typhoon rebuilding cost longer aceh	It took longer to rebuild the typhoons in the Philippines.	Filipino typhoon reconstruction took a longer time to complete.	Philippine typhoon reconstruction cost longer aceh aceh.
40	fao visayas farmer risk double tragedy post yolanda	L&apos, farmer fao visayas, is in danger of a double tragedy after Yolanda.	Farmers fao visayas face a double tragedy after Yolanda.	L' farmer fao visayas risks double tragedy after Yolanda.
40	typhoon haiyan uk aid flight philippine	Haiyan Typhoon flying from Laos; Filipino aid.	Typhoon Haiyan uk vol d'apos; aide philippine.	Typhoon Haiyan uk flight d' aid Philippines.
40	philippine typhoon aid transition long term recovery	The Philippine typhoon is helping us make the transition to a long-term recovery.	The Philippine typhoon aids the transition to long-term recovery.	Filipino typhoon helps transition to long-term recovery.
40	alicia key visit typhoon haiyan refugee manila air base	Alicia Key visits Manila Air Base of the Haïyan Typhoon refugee.	Alicia Key visits the Manila Airbase of Typhoon Haïyan refugee.	Alicia Key visits the Manila Typhoon Haïyan refugee airbase.
40	philippine typhoon aid effort focusing recovery	In addition, a number of projects have been launched to support the recovery of the victims of typhoons.	Rapos; Filipino efforts to help typhoon victims focus on recovery.	L'apos; effort philippin d'apos; aid to victims of the typhoon puts the apos; emphasis on recovery.
40	monsanto aid farmer devastated typhoon haiyan	Monsanto farmer from l'apos; help wreaked havoc on Typhoon Haiyan.	Monsanto farmer of the Apos; aid typhoon Haiyan devastated.	Monsanto farmer from Haiti; help devastated typhoon Haiyan.
40	typhoon haiyan rebuilding cost going huge	It was very expensive to rebuild after the typhoon.	Typhoon reconstruction cost a lot of money.	Rebuilding after the typhoon cost a lot.
40	alicia key visit typhoon refugee philippine	Alicia Key is visiting the typhoon of the Philippine refugees.	Alicia Key visiting typhoon Filipino refugees.	Alicia key is visiting the philippine refugee typhoon.
40	food priority typhoon hit philippine boost relief effort	The food-priority typhoon has hit the Philippines, restarting the emergency response to the crisis.	The food-priority typhoon hit the Philippines, scrambling relief efforts.	Food-priority typhoon hit the Philippines, restarting relief efforts.
40	alicia key visit typhoon survivor philippine air force base	Alicia Key visits the Apos base, the army of the Philippines that survived the typhoon.	Alicia Key visits the base of the Apos; army of l'apos; Philippine air that survived the typhoon.	Alicia Key visits the Apos base; Apos army; Filipino typhoon survivor air.
40	digital album song donated typhoon haiyan relief	The song of l&apos, a digital album, was donated by a Haitian typhoon rescue group.	The song of l' digital album donated d' a haiyan typhoon rescue.	L&apos song; digital album donated d' typhoon relief haiyan.
40	unicef rihanna launch philippine campaign help	Unicef Rihanna launches the Filipino D&apos Campaign; Filipino Help.	Unicef Rihanna launches the Philippine campaign d' aide philippine.	Unicef Rihanna launch Filipino campaign d' help Philippines.
40	rihanna unicef team help typhoon haiyan victim	Team Rihanna Unicef helps victims of Typhoon Haïyan.	L' team Rihanna Unicef helps victims of Typhoon Haïyan.	L' team Rihanna Unicef helps Haitian typhoon victims.
40	cabinet approves troop dispatch philippine	Filipino troops were approved by Cabinet.	Cabinet approved the sending of Filipino troops.	Cabinet approves the release of Filipino troops.
40	tourism industry functioning philippine	L' Tourism Industry Works Filipino.	The Philippine tourism industry is working.	L' tourism industry works philippine.
40	quarterbacking philippine relief effort	Supporting the Apos; relief efforts in the Philippines.	Support the Philippines; relief effort.	Supporting the relief effort in the Philippines.
40	overseas philippine worker typhoon lifeline	In the case of a Filipino worker at the airport, a foreigner was affected by the typhoon.	A foreign worker in the Philippines was affected by the typhoon.	Filipino worker at the airport; stranger hit by typhoon.
40	fao typhoon hit farmer risk double tragedy	Typhoon Fo has hit the farm, and it's a double-diamond hazard.	Typhoon fao hit the farmer double tragedy risk.	Typhoon fao hit farmer risk double tragedy.
40	manila typhoon philippine military accord	Typhoon Manila Philippines Military Agreement.	Filipino Manila Typhoon military agreement.	Manila typhoon Filipino military agreement.
40	campus responds disaster philippine midwest	It's a response to the Philippine Midwest disaster.	The campus is responding to the Filipino Midwest disaster.	The campus responds to the Filipino Midwest disaster.
40	body hunter collecting dead tacloban	Body Hunter picking up dead tacobans.	Body hunter picking up dead tacobans?	Uh, body hunter picking up dead tacobans.
40	jk group client donate typhoon haiyan relief effort	One of our group's clients is making a donation of money to help save Typhoon Haïyan.	A client of the jk group is donating money to rescue Typhoon Haïyan.	A client of the jk group donates money, a relief effort for Typhoon Haïyan.
40	typhoon haiyan help	Typhoon Haiyan has helped.	Typhoon Haiyan helped.	Haiyan typhoon helped.
40	typhoon aid greater military presence dfa chief	Typhoons help strengthen the military presence, chief.	A typhoon helps to strengthen the military presence, chief.	A typhoon helps to strengthen the military presence in the region.
40	typhoon haiyan victim	Victim of Typhoon Haïyan.	Typhoon-Hayyan victim.	Hurian typhoon victim.
40	japanese troop return philippine provide aid typhoon haiyan victim	Japanese troops returning from the Philippines have been providing assistance to the victims of Typhoon Haïyan.	Japanese troops returning from the Philippines provide support to victims of Typhoon Haïyan.	Filipino returning Japanese troops provide support to typhoon victims in Haiti.
40	typhoon hero casua	Typhoon Casua's hero.	I'm the hero of the typhoon.	The hero of typhoon casua.
40	local ministry sending package typhoon wrecked philippine	And the local government department sending a typhoon package destroyed the Philippines.	The local ministry sending a typhoon package destroyed the Philippines.	The local ministry sending typhoon package destroyed Filipino.
40	programme aim resuscitate economy typhoon hit philippine	The goal of the program is to revive the typhoon-affected Philippine economy.	The program aims to help revive the typhoon-affected Philippine economy.	The program aims to revive the economy of the Philippines affected by the typhoon.
40	typhoon survivor tacloban vaccinated measles polio	Typhoon survivor, Tacloban, vaccinated against the measles, polio.	One typhoon survivor, Tacloban, has vaccinated against measles, polio.	One typhoon survivor, Tacloban, vaccinated against polio.
40	help philippine storm relief	Assist the Philippines mitigate the effects of storms.	Help the Philippines to mitigate the effects of storms.	Helping the Philippines with storm mitigation.
40	juneau filipino community hold benefit dinner	The youth community-filipino is hosting a youth charity dinner.	The youth community-filipino organizes a charity dinner.	The community juneau-filipino is hosting a charity dinner.
40	philippine uk helicopter deploys aid primary school	It's a good thing you're not going to be able to do that.	The Filipino helicopter deploys an elementary school.	The Philippines helicopter deploys a primary school from Apos; help.
40	donate relief effort typhoon haiyan	Hurricane Haiyan emergency.	Donate relief supplies; emergency response to Typhoon Haiyan.	Donate disaster relief; Haiyan typhoon emergency.
40	philippine banana chip market state turmoil typhoon	The market for banana shavings in the Philippines has been hit by the storm.	The Philippine banana shavings market has been hit by turmoil.	The typhoon of turmoil hit the Philippine banana chip market.
40	philippine typhoon relief continues	The Philippines has continued to rescue victims of the Philippine typhoon.	The Philippines continues to rescue victims of the Philippine typhoon.	The Philippines continues to rescue the Philippine typhoon victims.
40	interactive video typhoon haiyan aftermath	Interactive video about the consequences of Typhoon Haiyan.	Interactive video about the aftermath of Typhoon Haiyan.	An interactive video on the aftermath of Typhoon Haiyan.
40	military relief philippine winding	This was the first time that the Philippines had a military aid program in place.	The Philippines military aid writhed from envy.	Filipino military aid writhing.
40	school district collect money typhoon relief	The school district's collecting money for typhoon relief.	The school district collects money for the relief of typhoon victims.	The school district collects money for typhoon relief.
40	typhoon hit philippine farmer risk double tragedy fao	The typhoon that struck a Filipino farmer is likely to result in a double tragedy.	The risk of a typhoon hitting a Filipino farmer is twofold.	The typhoon that hit a Filipino farmer could lead to a double tragedy in the Philippines.
40	uk aid ship arrives philippine	This is the first time I've had the pleasure to help you.	Ship d' help uk arrives Filipino.	The ship d' help uk arrives Filipino.
40	typhoon cleanup offer economic lifeline	The cleanup of typhoons is an economical way to save lives.	Typhoon clean-up provides an economic lifeline.	Typhoon cleanup offers an economic lifeline.
40	typhoon ruined traditional high tech livelihood	Traditional high-tech livelihoods have been ruined by the typhoon.	The typhoon has ruined the traditional high-tech livelihood.	The typhoon ruined traditional high-tech livelihoods.
40	filipino paid clean typhoon haiyan debris	Filipino has paid for the clean debris from the Hajyan typhoon.	Filipino paid for clean debris from the Hajyan typhoon.	Filipino paid clean debris from Typhoon Hajyan.
40	monsanto pledge mu stage support aid philippine local farmer	Monsanto promised no scene of apos; help to the apos; help of Filipino farmer.	Monsanto promised no scene; help to the apos; local Filipino farm help.	Monsanto promised no scene of apos; aid to apos; local Filipino farm help.
40	china relief effort late start philippine	L' the relief effort in China, started late in the Philippines.	L' the relief effort in China started late Filipino.	L' relief effort in China started late philippine.
40	alicia key visit typhoon haiyan refugee	She is visiting Typhoon Haiyan refugee.	Alicia Key visits Typhoon Haiyan refugee.	Alicia Key visits refugee Haiyan Typhoon.
40	philippine typhoon haiyan vaccine help risk child	The Philippine vaccine against Typhoon Haiyan helps to prevent the risk to the child.	The Philippine vaccine against Typhoon Haiyan will help prevent the risk to children.	Philippine typhoon Haiyan vaccine helps prevent risk to children.
40	cash help philippine typhoon survivor	Cash helps the Philippines survive typhoons.	L' liquid money helps the Philippines survive the typhoon.	L' cash helps the Philippines survive typhoons.
40	irs warns duped typhoon donation	The apos; I.R. warns that he has deceived the gift of the typhoon.	I.R. warns that he has deceived the gift of the typhoon.	I.R. warns that he deceived the typhoon's gift.
40	typhoon response improves military tie manila	Reaction to typhoons enhances military ties.	The response to typhoons improves military ties.	The typhoon response improves manila military ties.
40	mass immunisation programme philippine	Filipino mass-immunization program.	Filipino mass vaccination program.	Philippine mass immunization program.
40	kaiser permanente pledge typhoon haiyan relief recovery	The Kaiser announces the resumption of aid for Typhoon Haïyan.	The Permanent Kaiser has announced the resumption of relief efforts for Typhoon Haïyan.	Kaiser Permanently announces the resumption of relief efforts for Typhoon Haïyan.
40	wfp feed typhoon aid kenya camp cut	Wfp feeding typhoon helps kenya encampment cut kenya.	Wfp feed typhoon helps kenya kenya camp cut kenya cut.	Wfp feed typhoon helps kenya camp cut kenya cut.
40	candlelight vigil held typhoon victim	Make sure the candles are holding the typhoon.	Watch out for the candles while the typhoon hits.	Look out for the typhoon candle.
40	philippine senate approves billion reconstruction budget	The Philippine Senate approves a budget to rebuild dapos; a billion dollars.	The Philippine Senate approves a budget for the reconstruction of one billion dollars.	The Philippine Senate approves a US$1 billion reconstruction budget.
40	fun day raise money typhoon victim	Apostle Day, wake-up fun, typhoon money.	D'apos day; fun to raise from the apos; money victim of the typhoon.	Day; fun to raise money; typhoon victim money.
40	launch polio measles vaccine campaign philippine	Launch a Filipino National Polio Immunization Campaign.	Filipino poliomyelitis vaccination campaign to begin.	Initiate polio vaccination campaign in Philippines.
40	ludacris drink neuro support relief effort victim typhoon haiyan	Ludacris has a glass of neuro-support for Typhoon Haiyan victims.	Ludacris drinks a glass of neuro-support for the victims of Typhoon Haiyan.	Ludacris drinks a glass of neuro-support for typhoon Haiyan victims.
40	tacloban child vaccination	Children vaccinated by tacloban.	Immunization of children by tacloban.	Immunization by tacloban for children.
40	philippine turned graf	Filipino started grafting.	Philippine's started to graft.	So, Philippine started doing grafts.
40	monsanto aid philippine farmer devastated typhoon	Monsanto is helping Filipino farmer, devastated by typhoon.	Monsanto helps the devastated Filipino farmer typhoon.	Monsanto helps devastated Filipino farmer typhoon.
40	role typhoon relief boost military deal manila	It's the only way we're going to be able to do that.	Typhoon relief role boosts momentum; military agreement manila.	Relief role typhoon boost the apos; military agreement manila.
40	haute update alicia key visit philippine	High Update Alicia visit key Filipino Philippines visit.	High update alicia visit key Filipino Philippines visit.	High update alicia key Filipino visit Philippines.
40	alicia key head philippine visit typhoon victim	Alicia Key Head Philippine visits the victim of the typhoon.	Alicia Key Head Philippine visits the typhoon victim.	Alicia key head philippine visits the typhoon victim.
40	ater typhoon haiyan philippine senate panel monitor disbursement relief	A committee of the Philippine Senate monitors disbursements and monitors disbursements to help victims of Typhoon Haïyan.	A committee of the Philippine Senate to monitor disbursements of aid to victims of Typhoon Haïyan is monitoring disbursements.	A Philippine senate committee to monitor Haitians' disbursement of aid to victims of Typhoon Haïyan monitors disbursements.
40	philippine child vaccinated disease	Child immunized in the Philippines.	Apos disease; vaccinated child in Philippines.	D'apos disease; child vaccinated in Philippines.
40	rihanna donates philippine relief effort	Rihanna will donate the apos; Filipino help.	Rihanna donates the apos; help Philippines.	Rihanna donates Portuguese; Filipino help.
40	ut student organization raise fund typhoon haiyan survivor	Student organizations are also raising funds for the survivors of Typhoon Haïyan.	The student organizations are raising funds for the survivors of the typhoon.	Student organizations raise funds for survivors of Typhoon Haïyan.
40	unicef rihanna launch philippine campaign help	Unicef Rihanna launches the Filipino D&apos Campaign; Filipino Help.	Unicef Rihanna launches the Philippine campaign d' aide philippine.	Unicef Rihanna launch Filipino campaign d' help Philippines.
40	local woman family displaced typhoon haiyan	Typhoon Haiyan was moved by a local woman.	One woman from the local family moved Typhoon Haiyan.	A local woman moved Haiyan typhoon.
40	boost relief effort typhoon hit philippine	It's been a long time since we've been able to get there.	Raising the Epos; Relief Effort The typhoon hit Filipino.	Raising the numbers; relief effort The typhoon hit Filipino.
40	relief philippine	Filipino, new Filipino.	Filipino, she's a rising Filipino.	Filipino, a relief Filipino.
40	typhoon death toll philippine soar	Typhoon victims have exploded in the Philippines.	The number of typhoon victims has soared in the Philippines.	The death toll from the typhoon exploded in the Philippines.
40	aid needed farmer philippine fao	Filipino farmers are in dire need of help.	Filipino peasants need help.	Help is needed for Filipino farmers.
40	military relief effort philippine typhoon winding	Filipino typhoon-related military aid.	Filipino military rescue against the Philippine typhoon.	Filipino military relief against the Philippine typhoon.
40	ludacris donates typhoon relief	Ludacris donates aid to the victims of the typhoon.	Ludacris donates aid to typhoon victims in the village.	Ludacris donates relief to typhoon victims.
40	relief supply philippine typhoon victim	Philippine Emergency Supplies Typhoon Victim.	Typhoon victim Philippine relief supplies.	Philippine relief supplies, typhoon victim.
40	typhoon stricken central philippine early recovery phase	The typhoon has hit the Philippines' rapid recovery phase.	Typhoon hit the rapid recovery phase of central Philippines.	The typhoon hit the rapid recovery phase of central Philippines.
40	typhoon haiyan death toll expected rise	We're just waiting for an increase in the number of deaths caused by Typhoon Haiyan.	We're looking for an increase in Hurricane Haiyan deaths.	We're on our way; expecting an increase in the death toll from Typhoon Haiyan.
40	alicia key visit typhoon haiyan evacuee	Alicia Key visits evacuated Typhoon Haiyan.	Alicia Key visits Typhoon Haiyan evacuated.	Alicia Key visits the town of Typhoon Haiyan.
40	kaiser pledge typhoon haiyan relief effort	Kaiser promised to make a rescue effort for Typhoon Haïyan.	Kaiser pledges relief efforts for Typhoon Haïyan.	Kaiser promises a relief effort for Haitian typhoon.
40	aid boost military deal manila	L' aide à stimuler l' entente militaire manila.	L' aid and assistance; military agreement manila.	Help boost morale; military agreement manila.
40	typhoon hit philippine farmer risk double tragedy	The typhoon that struck a Filipino farmer is likely to result in a double tragedy.	The risk of a typhoon hitting a Filipino farmer is twofold.	The typhoon that hit a Filipino farmer could lead to a double tragedy in the Philippines.
40	quarterbacking philippine relief operation	Rapos support quadrant; Filipino rescue operation.	Fourth quarter support to the Philippines relief operation.	Fourth quarter Philippine relief operation.
40	singer key visit typhoon refugee	Singer Key visits Typhoon refugees in the city.	Singer Key visits the typhoon refugees.	The singer Key visits typhoon refugees.
40	beatles eminem donate song philippine relief album	Beatles eminem donation of the Filipino Relief Song Filipino Album.	Beatles eminem donate the Philippines album relief song Philippines album.	Beatles eminem donate the song of the Philippines relief album Philippine album.
40	philippine death toll continues rise	The number of deaths in the Philippines has also continued to rise.	The number of deaths in the Philippines continues to rise.	Philippine death toll continues to rise.
40	rihanna donates philippine typhoon aid	Rihanna donates the money to help the victims of the typhoon.	Rihanna donates the money; Filipino aid to typhoon victims.	Rihanna donates Filipino aid to typhoon victims.
40	chicken farmer recover philippine typhoon	Chicken farmers are now recovering from the Philippine typhoon.	The chicken farmers are recovering from the Philippine typhoon.	The Filipino typhoon is getting back to the chicken farmers.
40	philippine gdp growth forecast cut typhoon haiyan rebuilding	Filipino gdp's growth forecasts have reduced Haitians' reconstruction by the typhoon.	Filipino gdp's growth forecasts have reduced the rebuilding of the Haitians by the typhoon.	Philippine gdp growth forecasts reduced the rebuilding of Haitians by the typhoon.
40	mass vaccination child typhoon hit philippine	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal.	Mass Vaccination Typhoon de l'apos; child has hit the Philippines.	Mass vaccination Typhoon de l'apos; child hit the Philippines.
40	typhoon haiyan ruined traditional high tech livelihood philippine	Typhoon Haiyan ruined the traditional livelihoods of the high-tech Philippines.	Typhoon Haiyan has ruined the traditional livelihoods of the high tech community in the Philippines.	Typhoon Haiyan has ruined traditional high-tech Filipino livelihoods.
40	philippine typhoon relief effort face persistent challenge	There is a constant challenge for the relief of the victims of the typhoon.	There is a constant challenge for the Philippine typhoon relief effort.	The Philippine typhoon relief effort faces an ongoing challenge.
40	filipino priest suffers flock amid typhoon ruin	The Filipino priest is suffering from the herd in the midst of the ruins caused by the typhoon.	The Filipino priest suffers from the herd, amidst the ruins caused by the typhoon.	The Filipino priest suffers from the herd amid the typhoon ruins.
40	philippine post typhoon rehab year	Philippines after the Year of Rehabilitation after the Typhoon.	Philippines after the year of rehabilitation after the typhoon.	Philippines after the typhoon; year of rehabilitation.
40	meh student council raise fund typhoon haiyan relief	Meh Student Haiyan Haiyan Relief Haiyan Typhoon fundraising tips.	Meh advice studying to raise typhoon funds Haiyan relief haiyan typhoon.	Meh student council raising Typhoon Haiyan relief haiyan typhoon fundraiser.
40	philippine typhoon hm illustrious increase aid ten fold	It's been a long time since the tsunami hit the Philippines.	L'apos; illustrious Filipino typhoon has now multiplied the apos; aid by ten.	L' illustrious philippine typhoon multiplied the apos; help by ten.
40	call urgent help philippine farmer typhoon	Calling for emergency shelter helps Filipino peasant typhoon.	Calling for help; emergency assistance; help the Filipino peasant typhoon.	Urgent assistance to typhoon farmer in Philippines.
40	team score big benefit game help philippine rebound typhoon	L' team marks big game profits to help Filipino women and children typhoon.	L&apos team makes big game profits helping Filipino typhoon rebound.	L' team marks big game profits help Philippines typhoon bounce.
40	moncton raise typhoon haiyan relief	Moncton relieves victims of Typhoon Haïyan.	Moncton relieves the victims of Typhoon Haïyan.	Moncton relieves Haitian typhoon victims.
40	westwood resident join relief effort victim typhoon haiyan	He is also a member of the Canadian Red Cross and the Canadian Red Cross.	A Westwood resident joins the relief effort following Typhoon Haiyan.	Westwood resident joins in relief effort after typhoon Haiyan.
40	beatles muse linkin park featured philippine benefit album	The Beatles' Muse Linkin Park showcased the Filipino album.	The album was presented by the Beatles' linkin park muse.	"The Beatles' muse linkin park presented the album, ""L'apos""; a Filipino album."
40	madeleine para typhoon climate change defining moral issue	Madeleine by Climate Change Typhoon defining the moral issue.	Madeleine by climate change typhoon defining the moral question.	Madeleine by typhoon climate change defining the moral issue.
40	rotary raise philippine relief	Filipino terrain to be rotated.	Rotate the Filipino relief.	Rotate relief of Filipino terrain.
40	philippine typhoon death toll soar	The number of typhoon victims in the Philippines has skyrocketed.	The number of Filipino typhoon victims has skyrocketed.	Filipino typhoon casualties have skyrocketed.
40	mass immunization program campaign philippine	Filipino mass-immunization campaign.	Filipino mass immunization campaign.	Filipino women's mass immunization campaign.
40	ludacris donates typhoon relief	Ludacris donates aid to the victims of the typhoon.	Ludacris donates aid to typhoon victims in the village.	Ludacris donates relief to typhoon victims.
40	local resident help victim devastating typhoon philippine	A local is helping victims of the devastating Philippine typhoon.	A local resident is helping the victims of the devastating typhoon.	A local resident helps victims of devastating Filipino typhoon.
40	british carrier arrives typhoon aid	There's a gateway-British aircraft coming in to help the victims of the typhoon.	There's a British gate coming to help the typhoon victims.	A gate-British aircraft arrives to help typhoon victims.
40	alicia key visit philippine	Alicia Key visiting Filipino.	Alicia Key's visiting the Philippines.	Well, Alicia Key is visiting the Philippines.
40	hm illustrious crew christmas deliver aid	It's the first time I've had the pleasure of helping you.	L' illustrious Christmas crew brings apos; humanitarian aid.	L' illustrious crew Christmas brings apos; humanitarian aid.
40	air land sea food assistance reach outlying area hit typhoon	It is located in the middle of the Mediterranean Sea, near the Mediterranean Sea and the Mediterranean Sea.	Land-based food aid from the sea reaches the peripheral area affected by the typhoon.	Land-based food aid from the sea reaches the peripheral area hit by typhoon.
40	cathedral mass priest urge prayer support philippine wake	The priest of the Cathedral Mass presses the church prayers to support the Filipino wake.	The priest of the Cathedral Mass is urging prayer to support the Filipino wake.	The cathedral priest presses prayer to support the Filipino wake.
40	super typhoon haiyan help	Super typhoon, Haiyan, is helping.	Super typhoon Haiyan helps out.	Haiyan super typhoon helps.
41	sifting carlos rumor	I'm gonna go through Carlos' rumor.	Dig into Carlos' rumor.	Checking out Carlos' rumor mill.
41	report york yankee favorite land free agent outfielder carlos	Report the Yankees' favourite outdoor field player, Carlos.	Just point out the Yankees' favorite outdoor field player, Carlos.	Well, report the Yankees' favorite outdoor field player, Carlos.
41	yankee wait forever cano	Yankee's waiting for canoe forever.	Yankee wait for canoe forever.	Yankee will wait forever for a canoe.
41	report yankee room negotiate robinson cano	Report, Yankee Room, negotiate canoe robinson.	Report Yankee Room negotiate robinson canoe cano.	Report Yankee room negotiate robinson cano cano.
41	mlb rumor yankee emerging favorite sign carlos	There's a rumor floating around that Carlos, the Yankees' favorite sign, is about to pop up.	There's a rumor that Carlos, the Yankees' favorite symbol, is coming out.	There's a rumor that Carlos, the favorite sign of the Yankees, is emerging.
41	yankee cano rep apart meeting	Yankee cano-rep in a meeting.	Yankee canoe rep to reunion.	Hey, yankee cano rep in a meeting.
41	mlb free agency rumor yankee eyeing carlos stephen drew	The Yankees were watching Carlos Stephen.	They said the Yankees watch Carlos Stephen.	The agency said the Yankees were watching Carlos Stephen.
41	pera deal cardinal battling yankee red sox	Cardinal Pera deal fighting Yankee Red Sox.	Pera deal cardinal fighting Yankee Red Sox.	Pera deal cardinal fighting Yankee Red Sox.
41	year carlos deal breaker york yankee	The year Carlos broke the Yankee York contract.	The year Carlos broke the york Yankee contract.	The year Carlos broke the york Yankee contract.
41	yankee emerging favorite carlos	The yank emerges carlos favorite carlos.	The Yankee is emerging carlos favorite carlos.	The yank emerges carlos favorite carlos carlos.
41	robinson cano yankee talk met chris young center field	Robinson Cano Yankee Talk meets Chris Young Central Field.	Robinson Cano Yankee Talk has met Chris Young Central Field.	Robinson Cano Yankee Talk met Chris Young Central Field.
41	mlb rumor robinson cano met york yankee	Rumor has it that Robinson Cano ran into York Yankee.	Rumor has it that Robinson Cano met York Yankee.	Rumor has it Robinson Cano met York Yankee.
41	source cano agent yankee meet apart term	L' Agent Cano Source Yankee is referred to separately.	L' agent Yankee Cano Source meets the term separately.	L' agent Cano Source Yankee meets term separately.
41	carlos free agency year deal breaker yankee	Carlos l' Free Agency of the Apos; Year of Breaking; Yankee Agreement.	Free agency Carlos l' year of breakup; Yankee deal.	Carlos l' free agency of the year of the Yankee deal.
41	mlb hot stove brian cashman black friday shopping list yankee	Friday, Brian Cashman, hot stove, Friday shopping list, Yankee.	On Friday, Brian Cashman, hot stove, Friday shopping list, Yankee.	On Friday, Brian Cashman, hot stove, shopping list Friday, Yankee.
41	carlos report carlos yankee top target	Carlos says that Carlos Yankee is the primary target.	Carlos reports Carlos Yankee is the primary target.	Carlos reports that the primary target is Carlos Yankee.
41	rounding third buying yank tough stance cano	Third round in Apos; purchase of canoes; Yankee attack.	Rounding of the third to the apo; purchase of boats; a hard canoe; Yankee attack.	Rounding of the third to the east; buying a canoe; yankee attack.
41	yankee robinson cano apart contract negotiation	Yankee Robinson canoeing aside from negotiating the contract.	Yankee Robinson canoe, except for contract negotiation.	Yankee Robinson cano apart from negotiating contract.
41	robinson cano yankee apart meeting tuesday	Yankee Robinson Cano except for a meeting on Tuesday.	Robinson Cano Yankee, apart from meetings, on Tuesday.	Well, Robinson Cano Yankee apart from a meeting on Tuesday.
41	ny yankee rumor robinson cano negotiation stall carlos	There is a Yankee rumor that Robinson canoe will delay negotiations with Carlos.	There's a Yankee rumor that Robinson cano is delaying negotiations with Carlos, and that's what they're gonna do.	There's a yankee rumor that Robinson canoe is delaying negotiations with Carlos.
41	york yankee second baseman robinson cano working	Second base Robinson Cano, canoeing.	Robinson Cano, 2nd York base, works in canoe.	Robinson Cano, second york base, canoeing, canoeing, canoeing.
41	yankee meet robinson cano agent big gap contract talk	Yankee, this is Robinson Cano Agent Big Gap Contract Talk.	Yankee, this is Robinson Cano Agent Big gap contract talk.	Yankee, this is Robinson Cano agent big gap contract talk.
41	free agent robinson cano meet yankee tuesday	Free agent Robinson Cano meets with Yankee on Tuesday.	Free agent Robinson Cano to meet Yankee on Tuesday.	You know, free agent Robinson Cano meets Yankee on Tuesday.
41	daily jo	Everyday Jo.	Jo daily.	Uh, daily Jo.
41	yankee wait forever cano eye	Yankee wait forever, canoe-eye.	And Yankee wait forever for canoe eye.	Yankee wait forever canoe eye.
41	yankee sign robinson cano follow boston blueprint	The Cano Cano Yankee panel follows Boston's blueprint.	The Robinson Canoe Yankee sign follows Boston's blueprint.	The canoe yankee Robinson sign follows Boston's blueprint.
41	report yankee limited time offer robinson cano team	Yankee Report Limited Time Offer Robinson Canoe Team.	Yankee report time limited offers team robinson team cano.	Yankee report limited time offers robinson team cano robinson.
41	ap source robinson cano agent yankee meet	Source Robinson Cano, Agent Yankee, meet.	Source Robinson Cano Agent Yankee meet.	Source Robinson Cano Agent Yankee to meet with.
41	mlb notebook yankee robinson cano close	My Robinson Cano Yankee Notebook closed.	My Yankee robinson notebook cano closed.	My notebook yankee robinson cano closed.
41	mlb rumor carlos yankee target	Carlos Yankee is said to be the target.	I heard Carlos Yankee is a target.	I hear carlos yankee is the target.
41	yankee robinson cano large gap remains source	Yankee Robinson canoe is still the source.	And Yankee Robinson cano wide hole remains the source.	Yankee Robinson cano wide hole remains spring.
41	ny yankee rumor carlos top target brian mccann signing	Nyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyy,	Ny yankee rumor carlos main target Brian McCann signing up.	Ny yankee rumor carlos main target Brian McCann signing.
41	report fresh mccann yankee priority	McCann Yankee's new priority.	A new priority for McCann Yankee.	New priority for McCann Yankee.
41	three year deal breaker	Three-year contract terminated.	Termination of the three-year contract.	This was the first time that a contract had been signed.
41	rumor roundup bronx	It's rumored to pick up the Bronx.	Word on the street's picking up the Bronx.	Well, word on the street is the Bronx.
41	yankee meet cano agent	Yankee meets canoe agent.	The Yankee meets the canoe agent.	The yankee meets the canoe agent.
41	robinson cano rumor pretty big gap negotiation yankee	Robinson Cano the rather large rumored Yankee gap negotiations.	Robinson Cano, the pretty big rumor gap negotiation Yankee.	Robinson Cano rumor pretty big gap negotiation Yankee.
41	robinson cano meet york yankee tuesday gap contract	Robinson cano meets York Yankee on Tuesday.	Robinson cano meet York Yankee on Tuesday contract gap.	Robinson cano meet York Yankee Tuesday gap contract.
41	source yank cano apart	Removed canoe spring from source.	Source canoe pulled from source.	This is the source of the canoe.
41	yankee pushing meeting cano	Yankee, cano, cano.	Yankee pushing canoe meeting canoe.	Yank pushing cano meeting cano.
41	yankee handle offseason move rod scenario	Scenario for off-season fishing rod.	Fishing rod scenario, off-season.	Fishing rod scenario out of season.
41	carlos york yankee number free agent	Carlos York Yankee number available.	Uh, Carlos York Yankee free agent number.	Carlos York Yankee number free agent.
41	report carlos yankee target wake brian mccann signing	Carlos Yankee, Brian McCann's follow-up target, has signed.	Carlos Yankee, a target in Brian McCann's wake, signed.	Carlos Yankee, target in the wake of Brian McCann, signed on.
41	red express interest carlos	Carlos Interests Red Express.	Red Express, Carlos Interests.	Red express interest carlos.
41	bernie williams endorses carlos york yankee	It's Bernie Williams supporting Carlos York Yankee.	Bernie Williams backs Carlos York Yankee.	Bernie williams endorses carlos york yankee.
41	ap cano agent yankee meet	Cano Yankee Agent meets Cano Agent.	L' agent Cano Yankee meets the apos; agent Cano.	Cano Yankee agent meets Cano agent.
41	yankee set sight carlos	Yankee, take aim at Carlos.	Yankee aim carlos.	Yankee carlos aim.
41	yankee meet cano agent gap substantial	The Yankees face a significant breach of the canoe agent.	Yankees face a major breach of the canoe agent.	The Yankees face a major gap in canoe agent.
41	talk movement yankee cano	I want to talk cano yankee cano movement.	To talk cano yankee cano movement.	Cano yankee cano talk.
41	red	Red light.	Red.	A red one.
41	yankee rumor carlos third year team mm	Yankee rumor, carlos, third-year team.	The yankee rumor is that carlos is a third-year team.	The yankee rumor carlos third-year team.
41	mlb predicts choo shin soo sign yankee	There would be Yankees in the tibia.	J&apos, had predicted that there would be Yankees in the tibia.	It's not like I didn't predict that there'd be Yankees in my tibia.
41	cano rep talking yank	That's it.	C&apos, that's it.	C&apos, c&apos.
41	york yankee list	York Yankees list.	List of the York Yankees.	York Yankees list of the Yankees.
41	carlos report red contacted	Carlos reports contact with red.	Carlos has reported contact with the red one.	Carlos reports red contact.
41	york yankee news note hall fame free agency	L' York News Agency-Yankee Hall Fame.	L' news agency york-yankee Hall Fame.	L' york news agency-yankee hall fame.
41	limited time offer robinson cano	Offer time-limited canoe robinson.	Canoe robinson time limit.	Time limited canoe robinson offer.
41	carlos rumor red interested yankee focusing veteran	Interesting red rumor by Carlos Yankee targeting veteran.	Carlos red rumor interested Yankee targeting veteran.	Carlos red rumor interested Yankee targeting veteran vet.
41	free agent forecast carlos	He's a free agent, he's a free agent.	L' Carlos is free agent.	The free agent foresees Carlos.
41	york yankee robinson cano tricky offseason	York Yankee Robinson cunning canoe out of season.	York Yankee Robinson canoeing out of season.	York Yankee Robinson cano tricky out of season.
41	robinson cano contract update video jay latest meeting	Robinson cano video update contract Jay last meeting.	Robinson Cano contract update video Jay last meeting.	Robinson cano contract update video Jay last meeting.
41	nate mclouth free agency yankee interested	Nate mclouth free-yankee interested.	Nate mclouth free agency Yankee interested?	Nate mclouth free agency Yankee interested.
41	robinson cano yankee apart deal latest round contract	Well, Robinson Cano Yankee aside is negotiating the final round deal.	Robinson Cano Yankee aside is negotiating the last round deal.	Robinson Cano Yankee apart negotiates the last round contract.
41	cano yankee contract talk	Talk Yankee cano deal.	Talking about cano yankee contracts.	Talk cano yankee contract.
41	cano likeliest yankee suitor	I think Cano looks more like the Yankee suitor.	Cano looks like the Yankee suitor.	Cano most resembles the suitor yankee.
41	empire york yankee news	L' Yankee Empire Yankee news.	The yankee empire news.	L' empire york yankee news.
41	mlb free agency top remaining free agent position	In addition, there are a number of other positions in the Department of Peacekeeping Operations.	The remaining free agent position is that of a free agent of the department.	The remaining free agent position is that of free agent.
41	mlb deal struck winter meeting	It's been a long time since we've been able to get there.	L' agreement IMB struck the meeting d' winter.	The winter meeting was marked by the IMB agreement.
41	report robinson cano yankee apart negotiation	Report by Robinson Cano Yankee, except for the negotiation.	Well, Robinson Cano Yankee report aside from the negotiation.	Robinson Cano Yankee report except negotiation.
41	carlos free agency red inquired	Carlos, l' Free Red Agency, s' is informed.	Carlos, l' free red agency, s' is informed.	Carlos, l' free agency red, s' is informed.
41	york yankee emerging front runner land st louis cardinal	York Yankee is the new runner-up of Land St. Louis Cardinal.	New York Yankee premier track runner St. Louis Cardinal.	York Yankee new premier runner Land St. Louis Cardinal.
41	source yankee robinson cano agent meet	Source Yankee Robinson canoe agent, meet canoe.	Source Yankee Robinson agent cano meet cano.	Source Yankee Robinson agent meet canoe.
41	report yankee lead horse race	Yankees lead the race.	The Yankees lead the way in the horse race.	Yankees lead the horse race.
41	source cano rep yank meet big gap	It's a good place to relax and relax.	The spring cano rep yan meet great gap.	The source cano rep yan meet big gap.
41	remains yank outfield target	All we have to do is fire out of range.	All we have to do is shoot the target out of range.	Shoot the target out of range.
41	red sox title brought aggressive yankee offseason plan	The Red Sox brings a plan out-aggressive season for the Yankees.	The Red Sox title brings the Yankees an out-of-@ aggressive season plan.	The Red Sox title brings an off-@ aggressive season plan for the Yankees.
41	report yankee favorite sign carlos side negotiating	Point out that the Yankees' favorite sign, Carlos, is in negotiations with them.	Point out that Yankees' favorite sign, Carlos, is negotiating with them.	Point out that the Yankees' favorite sign Carlos is negotiating with them.
41	robinson cano plan delay signing big contract backfire	Robinson's canoe plan delayed the signing of the big-ticket deal, which Robinson turned against him.	Robinson's canoe plan delayed the signing of the big contract, which was then turned against Robinson.	Robinson's canoe plan delayed signing the big contract that turned against him.
41	carlos return nl play east coast	Carlos returns and plays on the East Coast.	Carlos comes back and plays East Coast.	Carlos goes back and plays on the east coast.
41	yankee rumor carlos top target	According to the Yankee rumor, Carlos is the number one target.	Yankee rumor has it that Carlos is the number one target here.	Well, yankee rumor has it that Carlos is the number one target.
41	yankee agent cano meet side remain apart	L' agent Yankee cano meet side-side stays separate and apart.	L' agent Yankee cano meet side remains separate.	L' agent Yankee cano meet side remain separate and apart.
41	report red interested carlos	Interested Carlos red.	Reports red carlos interested.	Uh, red report carlos interested.
41	mlb transaction round	Roundtable MIB Transaction.	Transaction of the MIB on the tour de table.	MIB's transaction on the round table.
41	source limited time offer cano	Time-limited offer canoe source.	Time limited spring offer canoe cano.	Source limited in time offer cano cano.
42	raider time wallow latest loss	Raider Time s&apos errs in the last losses.	Raider Time s' loses in last losses.	Raider Time s' gets lost in the latest loss.
42	fact raider cowboy	Cow facts-boy Raider cowboy.	Cow Facts-cowboy boy Raider.	Facts cow-boy cowboy Raider.
42	dallas cowboy face dangerous game oakland quarterback matt	Dallas cowboy facing a dangerous oakland matt quarterback game.	Dallas cowboy versus a very dangerous game oakland quarterback matt.	Dallas cowboy versus a dangerous game oakland quarterback matt matt.
42	mary blige sing anthem dallas cowboy match	Mary Blige sings the song Dallas Cow-boy match.	Mary Blige sang the apos; hymn Dallas Cow-boy match.	"Mary Blige sings the song, ""Dallas Cow""-boy match."
42	oakland raider dallas cowboy spread analysis pick prediction	Oakland Raider Dallas cow-boy analyzes propagation choose prediction.	Oakland Raider Dallas cow-boy analyzes the propagation choose prediction.	Oakland Raider Dallas cow-boy analyzes the spread choose prediction.
42	mike jenkins mike jenkins expected active dal	Mike Jenkins Mike Jenkins was just waiting for the active dal to be active.	Mike Jenkins Mike Jenkins s' expected that the active dal would be active.	Mike Jenkins Mike Jenkins s' expected active dal to be active.
42	raider cb mike jenkins hold personal vendetta cowboy	Raider Cb Mike Jenkins has a personal cow vs. boy vendetta.	Raider Cb Mike Jenkins holds a personal cow vendetta-boy.	Raider Cb Mike Jenkins holds a personal vendetta cow-boy.
42	nfl pick prediction week raider cowboy	The Week of Prediction for Cow Thieves-Boys.	The Screamers-Boys selection prediction week.	The selection selection week cow looters-boys.
42	power ranking oakland raider	The government has classed Oakland Raider.	Power class Oakland Raider.	Oakland Raider's power class.
42	jones expect thanksgiving day letdown raider	Jones is waiting for Thanksgiving to drop Raider.	Jones s' let's wait for Thanksgiving to drop Raider.	And Jones s' wait for Thanksgiving to drop Raider.
42	oakland raider offense face lowly dallas cowboy defense	Oakland Raider faced Dallas Cowboy's modest defense.	Oakland Raider faced the small defence of the city of Dallas Cowboy.	Oakland Raider faces the modest defense of Dallas Cowboy.
42	raider sold rookie quarterback putting week loss	Raider just sold out the starting quarterback by losing the week.	Raider sold the starting quarterback by losing the week.	Raider sold out the rookie quarterback by losing the week.
42	trend trench breaking oakland raider	Trend Breaking Oak Trench-Fisherman.	Trench breaking trend oak-fisherman.	Trend breaking the trench oak-fisherman.
42	tony romo cramming work fewer day	Tony Romo crammes less work.	Tony Romo cramps less work.	Tony Romo is cramming less work.
42	coach allen talk short week cowboy	Coach Allen talks about short weeks of cow-boys.	L' coach Allen talks about the short weeks of cow-boys.	L' coach Allen talks about short weeks cow-boys.
42	beatable cowboy raider thanksgiving day	Cow Thanksgiving-boy raider beatable.	Cow Thanksgiving Day-boy raider battable.	On the day of Thanksgiving of the cow-boy raider beatable.
42	dallas cowboy wear blue jersey thanksgiving	Dallas cowboy, wearing the blue Thanksgiving jersey.	Dallas cowboy wears the Thanksgiving blue jersey.	Dallas cowboy wears the blue jersey thanksgiving.
42	cowboy raider going	Raider cow-boy will go.	Raider cow-boy will go.	Now Raider Cow-boy will go.
42	raider cowboy tv info spread injury update game time	Raider cow-boy info tv widespread injury gameplay update time.	Raider cow-boy info tv widespread injury game time update.	Raider cow-boy info tv widespread game time injury update game time.
42	dan bailey week fantasy outlook	Fantasy Outlook Dan Bailey Week.	Dan Bailey Week Fantasy Outlook.	Dan Bailey Week fantasy outlook.
42	dallas cowboy fan meet oakland raider quarterback matt mcgloin	Dallas Cowboy meets quarterback Oakland Raider Matt Mcgloin.	Dallas Cowboy fan meets quarterback Oakland Raider Matt Mcgloin.	Dallas Cowboy fan meets quarterback Oakland Raider Matt Mcgloin.
42	dallas cowboy thanksgiving schedule tv coverage nfl week game	Dallas Cow-boy Thanksgiving has a live coverage of the NFL Weekly Game.	Dallas Cow-boy Thanksgiving features coverage of the NFL Weekly Game.	Dallas Cow-boy Thanksgiving features coverage of the NFL game of the week.
42	cowboy owner high chance lee claiborne play raider	Lee Claiborne is playing Raider.	The cow-boy Lee Claiborne plays Raider.	Raider plays for Lee Claiborne.
42	dennis allen nfl underrated head coach	Dennis Allen is a senior trainer at @-@estimated.	Dennis Allen is a senior coach under-estimated.	Dennis Allen is a head coach with-estimated.
42	oakland raider teamreport	Oakland Raider team report.	Report of the Raider Oakland team.	Raider Oakland, R.A., R.A., R.A.R.
42	cowboy face dangerous game raider quarterback matt mcgloin	Cow-boys are facing a dangerous Raider quarterback Matt Mcgloin game.	The cowboys face a dangerous game Raider quarterback Matt Mcgloin.	The cow-boys face a dangerous game Raider quarterback matt Mcgloin.
42	dallas cowboy add cb sterling moore roster morris claiborne hurt	Dallas Cow-boy add Morris Claiborne injured cb Sterling Moore roster.	Dallas Cow-boy add cb Sterling Moore roster Morris Claiborne injured.	Dallas Cow-boy add cb Sterling Moore roster Morris Claiborne injured.
42	nfc east injury report week morris claiborne injures hamstring	Nfc East injury report morris week claiborne wound tendon.	Nfc East injury report week morris claiborne injured tendon tendon.	Nfc East injury report week morris claiborne wound tendon.
42	nfl thanksgiving viewing guide	Thanksgiving observance.	Thanksgiving guide; Thanksgiving observation.	A guide to Thanksgiving.
42	oakland raider monday injury report mychal rivera darren mcfadden	Oakland Raider on Monday, mychal rivera mychal rider mcfadden.	Oakland Raider Monday report of injuries mychal rivera darren mcfadden.	Oakland Raider injury report mychal rivera darren mcfadden on Monday.
42	nfl pick week showcasing exploitable spread	The live broadcast is highlighted by the NFL's Week of Gathering.	The NFL's Gathering Week highlights the program's exploitable broadcast.	The NFL's pick-up week highlights the live broadcast.
42	cowboy wear blue jersey thursday	Cowboys-boys are all wearing blue jerseys on Thursday.	They're wearing a blue jersey on Thursday.	Cow-boys wearing blue jersey Thursday.
42	mike jenkins personal vendetta ended cowboy stay	Mike Jenkins's personal vendetta has put an end to the cowboys'-boys.	Mike Jenkins' personal vendetta ended the cowboys' stay in the city.	Jenkins' personal vendetta ended Cow's stay-boys.
42	change cowboy injury report	Change the ratio of cow injuries-Boys.	Change the injury ratio of the cow-boys.	Change the Cow-Boys injury report.
42	raider cowboy prediction betting odds preview thursday	It's time for a big game, but it's a big game, so it's a big game.	The prognoses of the cowboys-boys raider who are betting give a glimpse of the odds on Thursday.	A preview of the probabilities is given by the betting cow-boys raider on Thursday.
42	dallas cowboy oakland raider nfl blame matchup	Dallas Cow-boy Oakland Raider nf. blames the gameup.	Dallas Cow-boy Oakland Raider nfl blames the matchup.	Dallas Cow-boy Oakland Raider nfl blames matchup.
42	scout eye raider game bad matchup cowboy	Scout eye raider game bad matchup cow-boy.	Scout eye raider game bad matchup cow-boy.	Scout eye raider game bad matchup cow-boy.
42	mcgloin raider hole	Raider Mcgloin's hole.	The Mcgloin Raider hole.	Mcgloin's hole raider.
42	jerry jones sean lee playing thanksgiving optimistic	Sean Lee plays Thanksgiving with optimism.	Jerry Jones Sean Lee plays Thanksgiving with optimism.	Jerry Jones Sean Lee plays optimistic Thanksgiving.
42	cowboy wear blue jersey throwback helmet thanksgiving day	Cowboys-boys wear blue-suit helmets on Thanksgiving Day.	The cowboys,-boys, wear a helmet in a blue jersey on Thanksgiving Day.	Cowboys wear blue jersey helmets on Thanksgiving Day.
42	raider report concussed jenkins close	The Raider Report indicates that Jenkins s' is close.	The Raider report indicates that Jenkins's s&apos are close.	Raider report indicates Jenkins s' is close.
42	official breakdown scott green	Scott Green, you're in the middle of an official search.	Scott Green, official patch.	Scott Green, official bailout.
42	dallas cowboy defense continue operate sean lee	Dallas Cow-boy continues to work on Sean Lee's album.	Dallas Cow-boy continues to operate Sean Lee.	Dallas Cow-boy continues to do so; continue to operate on Sean Lee.
42	raider cowboy capsule	Raider-boy.	Capsule of cow-boy Raider.	I'm a big fan of the game.
42	turkey york newspaper react giant loss cowboy	The York Times turkey reacts to the giant cowboy loss.	York Turkey newspaper reacts to giant cowboy loss.	York's turkey paper reacts to giant loss cowboy.
42	raider expect cb mike jenkins active cowboy	Raider s' waits for Mike Jenkins to be an active {@-@ boy} cow.	Raider s' waits for Mike Jenkins to be an active cow-boy.	Raider s' waits for Jenkins to be an active cowboy-boy.
42	dallas cowboy wear blue jersey regular helmet thanksgiving	Dallas Cow-boy is wearing the blue jersey, which is his usual Thanksgiving helmet.	Dallas Cow-boy wears the blue jersey, the usual Thanksgiving helmet.	Dallas Cow-boy wears the blue jersey, the usual helmet for Thanksgiving.
42	rivera cleared expects play veldheer mcfadden	Rivera allowed s' waiting to play mcfadden veldheer.	Rivera's allowed s' waiting to play veldheer mcfadden.	Rivera allowed s' wait to play veldheer mcfadden game.
42	forest hill northern jared veldheer nears return oakland raider	Forest North hill jared veldheer soon to return.	North hill forest jared veldheer returning Oak hunter soon.	North hill forest jared veldheer soon return Oak hunter.
42	raider cowboy point spread pick profitable team clash	Raider cow-boy picks profit margin clashes of teams profitable.	Raider cow-boy picks profit gap clashes with profitable team.	Raider cow-boy picks a profitable difference in odds; team wins.
42	raiderdamus thanksgiving foretelling raider cowboy	Raiderdamus announcing the cow-boy raider.	Raiderdamus Thanksgiving announcing the cow-boy raider.	Raiderdamus Thanksgiving announcing the boy raider cow.
42	nfl thanksgiving day preview packer lion raider cowboy steelers	On Thanksgiving Day, before-first of the cow-boys cow-boys cow-boys Packer Raider.	Thanksgiving Day, before-cow premiere-boys cow-boys cow-boys packer Raider.	On Thanksgiving Day, before-cow premiere-boys cow-boys cow-boys packer Raider.
42	mike jenkins reference personal vendetta	Well, Mike Jenkins is referring to his personal vendetta.	Mike Jenkins refers to a personal vendetta.	Mike Jenkins is referring to his personal vendetta here.
42	matt mcgloin updated fantasy outlook	Matt Mcgloin has uncovered his fantasies.	Matt Mcgloin just updated his fantasy.	Matt mcgloin has updated his fantasy.
42	jerry jones optimistic sean lee hamstring return week	Jerry Jones is optimistic about the upcoming week of Sean Lee's return.	Jerry Jones is optimistic about Sean Lee's return week.	Jerry Jones is optimistic about Lee's return week.
42	sean lee dallas expected sean lee thursday	Sean Lee Dallas was expecting his sean Lee on Thursday.	Sean Lee Dallas was waiting Thursday for sean Lee.	Sean Lee Dallas expected sean Lee Thursday.
42	mike jenkins dallas cowboy vendetta	Dallas, cow-boy vendetta.	Mike Jenkins Dallas, cow-boy vendetta.	Mike jenkins Dallas, cow@-@ boy vendetta.
42	dallas cowboy playerwatch	Cowboy Dallas playerwatch.	Dallas cowboy playerwatch?	Dallas cowboy playerwatch.
42	sean lee expected play week	Sean Lee was waiting for a week's game.	Sean Lee s' looked forward to a week of playing.	Sean Lee s' expected a week of game.
42	demarco murray week fantasy outlook	Demarco Murray Fancy Week Fancy Outlook week.	Demarco Murray week of fancy perspectives fantasy week.	Demarco Murray week of fancy week fantasy perspectives.
42	dallas cowboy rookie lb devonte holloman play thursday	Dallas cowboy rookie Lb Devonte holloman playing Thursday night.	Dallas cowboy rookie Lb Devonte holloman play Thursday.	Dallas cowboy rookie lb Devonte holloman play Thursday.
42	raider cowboy watch	Raider cow-boy look.	Raider cow-boy look.	Raider cow-boy watch it.
42	jared veldheer return cowboy khalif barnes move guard	Jared Veldheer return cow-boy Khalif Barnes will move guard.	Jared Veldheer return cow-boy Khalif Barnes move guard.	Jared Veldheer return cow-boy Khalif Barnes move guard.
42	oakland raider plan return jared veldheer	Oakland Raider turn back Jared Veldheer.	Plan Oakland Raider to return Jared Veldheer.	Oakland Raider plan to return Jared Veldheer.
42	raider cowboy injury report morris claiborne sean lee practicing	Raider Cow reports that Morris Claiborne Sean Lee s&apos is training at the Apos; training.	Raider cow-boys wounded reports that Morris Claiborne Sean Lee s' training at the Apos; training.	Raider cow-boys wounded reports that Morris Claiborne Sean Lee s' is training at the club.
42	armchair oakland raider week	This is Oakland Wheelchair Raider Week.	Oakland wheelchair raider week.	This is the week of the raider oakland wheelchair.
42	oakland raider dallas cowboy preview	Oakland Raider Dallas front-first preview.	Oakland Raider Dallas forward-first cowboy previews.	Oakland Raider Dallas forward-first cowboy preview.
42	plan veldheer debut dallas	Plan Veldheer Dallas' debut, please.	I want you to plan Veldheer Dallas' debut.	Plan the debut of Veldheer Dallas.
42	refreshed veldheer huge raider	Veldheer's got a big, fat, refreshed Veldheer.	Veldheer refreshed big Raider.	Veldheer refreshed huge Raider.
42	despite vendetta cowboy jenkins moving	Despite the blood feud, the boys are moving.	Despite the blood feud, the cowboys-boys Jenkins are moving.	And despite the blood feud, the cowboys-boys Jenkins are moving.
42	jared veldheer jared veldheer rotate thanksgiving	Jared Veldheer alternates Thanksgiving.	Jared Veldheer Jared Veldheer alternates Thanksgiving.	Jared Veldheer jared veldheer alternates thanksgiving.
42	sterling moore rejoining cowboy time turkey	Sterling Moore returns to the era of cow-boys.	Sterling Moore is back in the game of cow-boys.	Sterling Moore returns to the time of the cow-boys.
42	oakland raider dallas cowboy spread prediction preview key matchup	Oakland Raider Dallas cowboy, prediction preview key matchup.	Oakland Raider Dallas cowboy prediction preview key matchup.	Oakland Raider Dallas cowboy prediction preview key matchup game.
42	nfl thanksgiving day schedule tv channel start time holiday	On Thanksgiving, the TV starts the holidays.	And on Thanksgiving Day, the TV station starts the holidays.	On Thanksgiving Day, the TV channel starts the holidays.
42	jakes oakland raider dallas cowboy	Raider Dallas cow-boy.	Jakes Oakland Raider Dallas cow-boy.	Jakes Oakland Raider-boy.
42	jerry lee claiborne doubtful thanksgiving day	Jerry Lee, whose pardon action is in doubt on Thanksgiving Day.	Jerry Lee, whose pardon action is in doubt, on the day of his death; Thanksgiving.	Jerry Lee, whose action of mercy is doubtful, on the day of mercy.
42	cowboy wear blue jersey thursday	Cowboys-boys are all wearing blue jerseys on Thursday.	They're wearing a blue jersey on Thursday.	Cow-boys wearing blue jersey Thursday.
42	raider week	Raider week.	Raider week.	Raider week is over.
42	nfl team win week	L&apos, the NFL football team, wins the week.	L' team of the NFL wins the week.	L' NFL team wins week.
42	quick turnaround lead thanksgiving game	Quick turnaround on Thanksgiving.	It's a quick spin on Thanksgiving.	A quick turnaround on Thanksgiving.
42	dallas cowboy face favorable matchup raider thanksgiving day	Dallas Cow-boy faces a very positive match on Thanksgiving Day.	Dallas Cow faces a favorable match on Thanksgiving Day.	Dallas Cow-boy faces favorable match on Thanksgiving Day.
42	cowboy working continued hamstring woe	Work by a cow@ boy Work by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others.	Work by others; a cow@ boy Work by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others; a worker by others.	The following are some examples of this type of work: a cow, a boy, a d'apos worker; a d'apos worker; a d'apos worker; a d'apos worker; a d'apos worker; a d'apos worker.
42	countdown paydirt oakland raider dallas cowboy	Raider Dallas cow-boy.	Oakland countdown Raider Dallas cow-boy.	Oakland countdown Raider Dallas cow-boy.
42	mcfadden hope play dallas	J' Hoping to Play Dallas.	J' hopes to play Dallas.	Hoping to play Dallas.
42	dissecting crucial matchup dallas cowboy week contest	Dissecting the Cowboys Week Critical Dallas Match.	Dissecting the crucial Dallas Cowboys Week game.	Dissecting the crucial Dallas game from the cowboy week pageant.
42	wonder wild card possibility	I would like to thank you for your support.	I wonder if you can have a card.	I wonder s' it's possible to have a wild card.
42	dallas cowboy lb sean lee wr dwayne harris player	Dallas Cowboy Ib Sean Lee Dwayne Harris player.	Dallas Cowboy Ib Sean Lee's Dwayne Harris player.	The Dallas Cowboy Ib Sean Lee Dwayne Harris is a professional baseball player.
42	raider defense carry	Defensive raider.	Raider's defense.	Okay, Raider's defense.
42	jenkins personal vendetta clouded final year cowboy	The last year's Cow-boy was overshadowed by Jenkins' personal vendetta.	Jenkins' personal vendetta overshadowed last year's-boy cow.	Jenkins' personal vendetta clouded last year's cow-boy.
42	veldheer return bodes raider	As Veldheer returns, the Raider returns.	Veldheer's return heralds the return of the Raider.	Veldheer's return heralded Raider's return.
42	injured mlb sean lee leadership braved chilly weather coach	McB's injured leader, Sean Lee, defied the cold-weather head of the team.	McB's injured leader Sean Lee braved the apos; a coach in cold weather.	McB's injured leader Sean Lee braved the cold weather coach.
42	raider qb matt mcgloin call play thanksgiving stage	Raider qb Matt Mcgloin calls Thanksgiving stadium.	Raider qb Matt Mcgloin calls playing Thanksgiving Stadium.	Matt Mcgloin calls Raider qb to play Thanksgiving Stadium.
42	nfl week pick team cover spread	The coverage of the Weekly Selection Team is extended.	The coverage of l' selection team of the week nf s' is extended.	The cover of the week's selection team is extended.
42	oakland raider dallas cowboy thing watch	Oakland Raider Dallas cow thing-boy look.	Oakland Raider Dallas cow stuff-boy look.	Oakland Raider Dallas thing cow-boy look.
42	practice report claiborne practice	A Practical Report on Claiborne Practices.	Claiborne practice report.	Practice report on claiborne practices.
42	oakland raider cb mike jenkins sleep tony romo long	Oakland Raider Cb Mike Jenkins sleeps on Tony Romo long.	Oakland Raider Cb Mike Jenkins sleep Tony Romo long.	Oakland Raider Cb Mike Jenkins long sleep Tony Romo.
42	titan beat raider	Titan has defeated Raider.	Titan beat up Raider.	Titan beat Raider!
42	nfl preview oakland dallas	Enter-premiere Oakland Dallas.	Let's go-premiere, Oakland Dallas.	Okay, let's go-first, Oakland Dallas.
42	mo claiborne suffers hamstring injury	My claiborne's suffering from a tendon injury.	My claiborne also suffers from a tendon injury.	My claiborne suffers from apos; tendon injury.
42	dallas cowboy lb sean lee cb morris claiborne wr dwayne harris	Dallas Cow-boy Ib Sean Lee Cb Morris takes away Dwayne Harris.	Dallas Cow-boy Ib Sean Lee Cb Morris takes away Dwayne Harris.	Dallas Cow-boy Ib Sean Lee Cb Morris has just taken away Dwayne Harris.
42	missing cowboy practice	Lack of training cow-boys.	Miss L' cow training-boys.	I'm still missing it; cow training-boys.
42	raider turn focus thanksgiving day game dallas cowboy	Raider's focused Thanksgiving Day game Dallas cowboy.	Raider is focusing on Dallas cowboy Daygame Thanksgiving.	Raider's focusing Thanksgiving day game Dallas cowboy.
42	dallas cowboy prepared raider rushing attack	Dallas cow-boy has been planning a Raider Rush attack.	Dallas cow-boy has planned an attack on Raider Rush.	Dallas cow-boy has prepared an attack Raider Rush.
42	cowboy sign cb sterling moore	Signature cow-boy cb, Sterling Moore.	Signature cow-boy cb Sterling Moore.	Signs cow-boy cb Sterling Moore.
42	american underdog america team	L&apos, the oppressed American team, is running late.	L' oppressed American team is late.	The U.S. team is running late.
42	dez bryant week fantasy outlook	"""Fantasy Outlook"" -- what?"	What about Dez Bryant Week Fantasy Outlook?	It's been a long time since I've had a chance to work with you.
42	jerry jones dallas cowboy letdown game oakland	Jerry Jones, cow-boy rabat-joy, played Oakland.	Jerry Jones Dallas, cow-boy rabat-joy, played Oakland.	Jerry Jones Dallas, cow-boy rabat-joy, played the game Oakland.
42	raider drive alive cowboy	Raider drives live, cow-boy.	Raider drives live cow-boy.	Raider drive live cow-boy.
42	oakland raider facing identity crisis	Helping Oakland out in the face of a corporate identity crisis.	Helping Oakland deal with a crisis of identity.	Help Oakland face an identity crisis.
42	claiborne ailing cb moore sign te waived	C&apos is a d&apos sign; a diseased heart that has been abandoned.	C&apos, is the sign of d&apos, a sick heart that has been abandoned.	C' is the sign of d' an abandoned diseased heart.
42	raider hopeful injured player	Hurt gambler's hope.	I'm sorry, I can't help it.	Raider injured player hope.
42	thanksgiving day game bill	Thanksgiving Match Bill.	Thanksgiving game bill.	The Thanksgiving game bill.
42	tony romo week fantasy outlook	Tony Romo's Fantastic Week Prospects.	The Fantastic Perspectives of Tony Romo Week.	This week's Fantastic Perspectives from Tony Romo.
42	mcgloin play thanksgiving stage	Mcgloin plays the Thanksgiving scene.	Mcgloin plays the Thanksgiving scene.	Mcgloin's on the Thanksgiving stage now.
42	mary blige set perform national anthem prior cowboy	Mary Blige set to interpret the' previous national anthem, cow@-@ boys.	Mary Blige set interpret l' previous national anthem cow@-@ boys.	Mary Blige set to perform the' previous national anthem cow-boys.
42	cowboy bring moore release smith	Cow-boys, let go of Moore Smith.	Cow-boys, release Moore Smith!	Cow-boys, release Moore Smith now.
42	jason witten week fantasy outlook	Jason was expecting fantasies of the week.	Jason's been waiting for some of the week's fantasies.	And Jason was waiting for some of this week's fantasies.
42	dallas cowboy rookie lb devonte holloman play thursday	Dallas cowboy rookie Lb Devonte holloman playing Thursday night.	Dallas cowboy rookie Lb Devonte holloman play Thursday.	Dallas cowboy rookie lb Devonte holloman play Thursday.
42	smith win dallas cowboy oakland raider	Smith wins Dallas Oakland Raider cowboy.	Smith wins Dallas cowboy Oakland Raider.	Smith wins Dallas cowboy Oakland Raider.
42	raider veldheer poised return thanksgiving day	Raider Veldheer comes back on Thanksgiving.	Raider Veldheer came back on Thanksgiving.	Raider Veldheer came back on the day of Thanksgiving.
42	oakland raider playerwatch	Raider Oakland playerwatch.	Oakland Raider playerwatch.	Oakland raider playerwatch.
42	dallas cowboy oakland raider pick odds prediction	Dallas, cow-boy Oakland Raider predicts the odds.	Dallas, cow-boy Oakland Raider, predicts the odds.	"""Dallas, cow-boy Oakland Raider,"" predicts the odds."
42	cowboy notebook jenkins dallas exit	Dallas-boy Jenkins release.	Release of cow book-boy Jenkins Dallas.	Cow notebook release-boy Jenkins Dallas.
42	review cowboy week	Cow Week-boy.	Weekly cow magazine-boy.	Weekly review cow-boy.
42	practice report lee durant running claiborne harris sit	The-report of training downwind while Harris was on the run.	The account-of the apos; training downwind while Harris was on the run.	The report-of the scene; training downwind while Harris was on the run.
42	raider time regret thanksgiving game loom	Raider time are regretting the Thanksgiving looms game.	Time Raider regret the Thanksgiving game looms.	Raider time regrets Thanksgiving game looms.
42	oakland raider cb mike jenkins dallas cowboy personal	Oakland Raider Cb Mike Jenkins Dallas Cowboy personnel.	Oakland Raider Cb Mike Jenkins Dallas Cowboy personnel.	Oakland raider cb Mike Jenkins Dallas cowboy personnel.
42	khalif barnes primed move inside	Khalif Barnes started moving indoors.	And Khalif Barnes started moving indoors.	Khalif Barnes started to move indoors.
43	burger king expanding france	Burger King enlarging the france.	Burger King expanding france.	Burger king expanding france.
43	burger king mcdonald pact france	King MacDonald Burger, France pact.	Burger King MacDonald, France pact.	Burger King MacDonald, pact France.
43	news hp earnings burger king france	New hp winnings hp hamburger king france.	New hp winnings hamburger king france.	New king france hp hamburger winnings.
43	burger king bite french market	Burger King bites the French market.	Burger King bites the French market.	Burger King will bite the French market.
43	burger king form jv france	JV France Burger King.	Burger King from JV France.	Burger king from JV France.
43	mcdonald competition france burger king ink deal expand	The McDonald Marketplace; McDonald's King Burger ink; s Competition France s' expanded.	McDonald's King Burger ink market; s Competition France s' expands.	The McDonald's King Burger ink market is expanding.
43	burger king expand france	Burger King expands France.	Burger King extends France.	Burger king expands France.
43	company update mcdonalds corporation nyse mcd burger king	Update of the mcdonalds corporation, nyse mcd burger king.	Update of the mcdonalds corporation nyse mcd burger king.	Update of mcdonalds corporation nyse mcd burger king.
43	burger king open location france ready mcdonald	Burger King overdrawn in France on loan Mcdonald.	Burger King in France, in the open, ready for Mcdonald.	Burger King overdrawn in France ready Mcdonald.
43	france step burger king global expansion	France Step Burger King World Expansion.	France Step Burger King Expansion worldwide.	France Step Burger King expansion worldwide.
43	burger king expanding location france	Burger King enlarging site France.	Burger King extending the site France.	Burger King expanding France website.
43	burger king form joint venture mcdonald france	Burger King formed Macdonald France.	Burger King formed the Macdonald France joint venture.	Burger King formed the Macdonald-France joint venture.
43	burger king worldwide enters joint venture groupe	Burger King is a member of the Burger King Group.	Burger King from around the world joins the joint venture group.	Burger King worldwide joins the joint venture group.
43	burger king expand france	Burger King expands France.	Burger King extends France.	Burger king expands France.
43	goldman sachs group initiate coverage burger king worldwide bkw	Goldman Sachs Group launches the King World Bkw Burger Coverage.	Goldman Sachs Group launches the king world bkw hamburger blanket.	Goldman Sachs Group launches king world bkw hamburger blanket.
43	mcdonald burger king burger war heat	McDonald Burger King War Heat Burger.	McDonald Burger King War Heat Burger.	McDonald burger king war heat burger.
43	burger king worldwide bkw groupe olivier bertrand enter joint venture	The international Bertrand bkw bburger olivier group is entering into a joint venture.	The international bkw bburger olivier bertrand group has entered into a joint venture.	The international bkw bburger olivier bertrand group enters into a joint venture.
43	roundup burger king expand france fisker bankruptcy case fast track	King hamburger rally extend France Fisker in cases of expedited bankruptcy.	King Burger Gathering extend France Fisker fast-track bankruptcy case.	King Hamburger Gathering will extend France Fisker fast-track bankruptcy case.
44	invite buy google glass	Buy google drink.	Invite to buy a google drink.	Invite to buy google drink.
44	google launch dev kit augmented reality glass	Google Launch Kit Dev Dev Dev Augmented Augmented reality glass.	Google launch Dev augmented increased reality glass kit.	Google launch Dev kit augmented reality glass augmented.
44	google invite developer purchase google glass explorer edition	Google Invites Developers to Purchase the Google Google Glass Explorer Edition.	Google invites developers to buy the' google glass edition to explore.	Google invites developers to purchase the google glass explorer edition.
44	google invite round explorer buy glass	Google Invites L' Round Explorer Buy Glass.	Google invites l' explorer round buy drink.	Google invites the reader; round explorer buy drink.
44	google release glass development kit limitation	Limit of Google Release Glass Development Kits.	Google release glass development kits are limited.	Limit google release glass development kits.
44	latest news google glass development kit gdk	Latest update on the new gdk kit google glass.	Latest new glass google development kit gdk kit.	Latest gdk kit google glass development kit.
44	entrepreneur opportunity google glass	Business Opportunity; Google Glass Google Glass Builder.	Opportunity of sites; Google google glass google glass contractor.	Opportunity of google glass google contractor.
44	google glass half empty half full	Google Glass, half-empty, half-full.	I mean, Google glass half-empty half-full.	Google half empty half full glass.
44	google inviting developer buy glass	Google Invites Promoters to Buy Glass.	And Google invites developers to buy glass.	Google invites developers to buy glass.
44	glass interesting	Interesting glass.	This is an interesting glass.	Interesting glass there.
44	google inviting google glass explorer	Google Invites Google's Google Glass Explorer.	Google invites Google Glass Explorer.	Google invites the glass explorer Google.
44	google glass mirror api leaf preview phase developer	Google Phase preview mirror glass phase developer.	Google Mirror glass poster api phase preview phase developer.	Google Glass mirror api phase preview developer phase.
44	google glass invitation heading developer	D&apos Developer; Google Glass Invitationals.	D&apos developer; invitations in google glass.	D&apos developer; google glass invitations.
44	google glass signup pay invite	Google Glass Registration invites customers to subscribe.	The service d' registration Google Glass invites customers to subscribe.	The Google Glass registration service invites customers to subscribe to the online registration service.
44	google expands glass explorer program developer interested making	Google is expanding the program of l' explorer of glass programmer interested in making manufacturing.	Google extends the program of l' glass explorer programmer interested in making manufacturing.	Google extends the program of program developer glass explorer program interested in making manufacturing.
44	google glass developer	Google Glass Developer.	Glass developer Google.	I'm a glass developer from Google.
44	google expands glass explorer program bit time developer	Google is expanding the program d' binary glass explorer and binary program time developer.	Google extends the program d' binary glass explorer binary program time developer.	Google extends the binary program time developer binary glass explorer program.
44	google open mirror api developer glassware incoming	Google Open Mirror Api Incoming Glassware Developer.	Google Open mirror api developer inlet glassware.	Google open mirror api developer incoming glassware.
44	google open mirror api access developer happy hacking	Google Open Hacking Hacking Hacking mirror api access happy developer.	Google open mirror api access happy developer hacking hacking.	Google open mirror api access developer happy hacking hacking.
44	google open glass mirror api	Google opens the window of a glass mirror.	Google to open glass mirror api.	Google open glass mirror api.
44	google woo developer glass	Woo Google Developer glass.	Google Woo Developer glass.	Google woo developer glass.
44	google invite round glass vip	Google Invites the Round Glass Vip.	And Google invites the round glass vip.	Google invites round glass vip.
44	google inviting developer buy google glass	Google also invites developers to purchase Google Glass.	Google invites developers to purchase Google Glass.	Google invites developers to buy Google Glass.
44	austin startup future google glass apps	Future Google applications are started by Austin.	Austin boots future Google applications.	Austin starts the future Google applications.
44	haxlr hardware startup laser tag baby incubator making	Haxlr hardware startup baby baby tag incubator making.	Haxlr hardware startup laser tag baby incubator making.	Haxlr hardware startup laser tag baby incubator making.
44	primetime glass developer claim gdk google leaving	Gdk google's prime-time window developer claims to be leaving the site.	The prime-time window developer claims google gdk leaving the site.	The prime-time window developer claims that gdk google is leaving the site.
44	google inviting developer join glass explorer program	Google Invites Developers to Join the Glass Explorers program.	Google is inviting developers to join the program of D' Glass Explorers.	Google invites developers to join the d' glass explorer program.
44	google open mirror api develop gizmohead spec	Google Open Mirror, Api develop gizmohead spec.	Google open mirror api develop gizmohead spec.	Google open mirror api develop gizmohead spec.
44	remotte remote control google glass seeking kickstarter funding	Google glass remote remote remotely operated search for' start-up funding.	Remote remote control google glass in search of mobile phones; start-up financing.	Remote remote control google glass looking for' seed funding.
44	google push round glass invite	And Google throws out an invitation for the round glass.	Google throws out an invitation for the round glass.	Google throws round drink invitation.
44	sd time blog google release glass mirror api developer	Sd Time blog google release mirror api developer.	Sd Time blog google release mirror api developer.	Sd Time blog google release api developer mirror release.
44	google launch glass mirror api developer	Google launches its api-developer mirror.	Google launches the mirror api developer.	Google launches mirror api developer mirror.
44	google glass invitation developer public launch draw closer	This is the first game to be released in the world.	The public launch of l' google glass invitation is now approaching.	The public launch of l' google glass invitation is approaching.
44	google developer glass	Google Device Developer Glass.	This is a Google Developer's Glass.	Google developer glass.
44	google glass order opening people	This is a Google glass order to open people up.	Google glass order to open people's doors.	A Google glass order for opening people.
44	google glass mirror api open developer	Google Open Api Device Mirror Glass.	Google Mirror glass api developer open.	Google mirror glass api developer open.
44	google polish glass development kit	Polish Google Glass Development Package.	Google Polish glass development toolkit.	Google Polish glass development kit.
44	google glass preview gdk official missing	Google glass gdk preview official missing.	Google glass preview gdk official missing.	Google glass preview gdk official missing.
44	google work prescription google glass	I'm sorry, but I don't know what to do.	Google work prescription google glass google.	Google work prescription google glass google.
44	google invite developer purchase google glass	Google invites developers to buy Google Glass Google.	Google invites developers to buy Google Google Glass.	Google invites developers to purchase Google Glass.
44	google glass purchase code going developer	Code d' google purchase glass will developer.	D&apos code; purchase google glass goes to developer.	D&apos code; google glass purchase will developer.
44	google glass mirror api developer	Google Mirror Glass Developer api.	Google Virtual mirror developer api.	Google Device mirror glass api developer.
44	google glass explorer family grows bit bigger	Google glass s&apos explorer family, a little bigger.	The family of explorers of google glass s' enlarges a bit.	The google glass s&apos family of explorers is expanding.
44	column apps increase appetite google glass	The application of the column increases the speed; the appetites google glass.	The column applications increase l' google glass appetite.	Column applications increase appetite google glass.
44	apps glass google open mirror api developer	Apps Google glass open api api developer api developer mirror.	Apps glass Google open mirror api api developer api developer.	Apps glass Google open mirror api developer api developer.
44	google glass developer flying half blind	Google glass developer, half-blind.	Half-blind google glass developer.	Google half blind glass developer.
44	google expands glass explorer programme	Google also extends the Glass Explorers program.	Google is expanding the program of glass explorers.	Google extends the glass explorer program.
44	week android nov	Android Week Nov.	Nov. android Week.	Nov android week.
44	remotte remote controller google glass kickstarter	Remote Google Glass Kickstarter remote control.	Remote remote google glass kickstarter.	Google google glass kickstarter remote remotely button.
44	google glass explorer edition sale	Selling d' publishing d' explorers of google glass.	Sale d' edition d' Google glass explorers.	Sale d' google glass explorer edition.
44	google glass gdk explorer	Google gdk is a new browser.	Google glass gdk Google Explorer.	Google glass gdk Google explorer.
44	google reportedly invite developer buy glass eyewear	They say Google invites developers to buy glass-glass glasses.	They say Google is inviting developers to buy glass glasses.	They say Google invites developers to buy glass goggles.
44	google open glass mirror api developer glass	Google Open Mirror Glass Api Glass Glass Developer glass.	Google Open glass mirror api glass developer glass.	Google open glass mirror api glass developer glass.
44	today apis google glass api apis	I'm sorry, but I don't know what to do.	Today, google apis api apis apis.	Today; hui apis google api apis apis.
44	google sending second wave glass explorer invite	Google is sending out a second wave of invitations to the world of glass explorers.	Google sends a second wave of apos; invitations from glass explorers.	Google's sending a second wave of invitations from glass explorers.
45	lego menorah bui dec	Lego, menorah, bui dec.	Lego menorah bui dec.	Lego, lego, lego menorah bui dec.
45	thanksgivukkah local celebrant revel lifetime convergence	Thanksgivukkah celebrating local celebrate the lifelong convergence.	Thanksgivukkah celebrating local celebrate the convergence of a whole life.	Thanksgivukkah celebrating local celebrate convergence of a lifetime.
45	thanksgivukkah rare convergence hanukkah thanksgiving	Thank you, thank you, thank you, thank you.	Thanksgivukkah rare convergence hanukkah Thanksgiving.	Thanksgiving thanksgivukkah rare convergence hanukkah Thanksgiving.
45	thanksgiving hanukkah festive	Happy Thanksgiving Hanukkah.	Hanukkah holiday thanksgiving.	Uh, happy Thanksgiving Hanukkah.
45	politically liberal jew consider skipping hanukkah	The Jewish liberals are thinking about jumping Hanukkah.	You know, the liberal Jews are thinking about banging Hanukkah.	The liberal Jews are considering Hanukkah.
45	hanukkah ancient story applies today	Ancient history d' Hanukkah s&apos.	Ancient history, Hanukkah s&apos, also applies today.	The ancient history of Hanukkah s&apos applies today.
45	chabad host hanukkah celebration	Hanukkah hosts Chabad.	Hanukkah is the host of Chabad.	Hanukkah is host to Chabad.
45	thanksgivukkah remember	Remember thanksgivukkah-you.	Thanksgivukkah remember-you.	Thankgivukkah remember @-@you.
45	thanksgivukkah byo menorah navigating joint	I'd like to thank you for your time.	Thanksgivukkah byo menorah navigation joined.	Thankgivukkah byo menorah navigation join.
45	thanksgiving immigrant family incorporate traditional	The Thanksgiving Immigrant Family incorporates tradition.	Well, the immigrant family of Thanksgiving incorporates tradition.	Thanksgiving's immigrant family embodies tradition.
45	turn happy thanksgivukkah	Merry thanksgivukkah.	I want you to make happy thanksgivukkah.	Make thanksgivukkah merry.
45	menurkey thanksgivukkah tchotchke	Menurkey thanksgivukkah-chotchke.	Menurkey thanksgivukkah tchotchke?	Menurkey thanksgivukkah tchotchke.
45	hanukkah thanksgiving rare overlap holiday fall thursday	Hanukkah Rare Thanksgiving Fall Overlap Feast Thursday.	Hanukkah Rare Thanksgiving overlap party fall thursday.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving rare fall overlap party thursday.
45	celebrating hanukkah	Hanukkah celebration.	To celebrate Hanukkah.	I want to celebrate Hanukkah.
45	hanukkah thanksgiving meet dinner table	Hanukkah Thanksgiving meeting the dinner table.	Hanukkah thanksgiving meeting dinner table.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving meet dinner table.
45	thanksgiving hanukkah overlap unprecedented calendar oddity	Thanksgiving's hanukkah intersects with an unparalleled peculiar calendar.	The Thanksgiving hanukkah intersects with an unprecedented calendar quirk.	Thanksgiving hanukkah overlaps with unprecedented calendar quirk.
45	day hanukkah thanksgiving day year	Hanukkah Thanksgiving day; year.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving day; year.	Hanukkah day Thanksgiving day; year.
45	reason grateful	Gratitude.	Reason for gratitude.	A reason for gratitude.
45	true message hanukkah	Hanukkah the real message.	Hanukkah, the real message.	Hanukkah, true message.
45	lake county start hanukkah early	Early in the morning, Lake County begins hanukkah.	Well, Lake County starts hanukkah early in the morning.	Lake county starts hanukkah early in the morning.
45	winona jew celebrate thanksgivukkah	Winona Juw festival thanksgivukkah.	Winona Juw party thanksgivukkah.	Winona Juw thanksgivukkah party.
45	thanksgivukkah modern holiday foretold scripture	Thanksgivukkah modern vacation predicts Scripture.	Thanksgivukkah modern holiday foretells the Scriptures.	Thanksgivukkah modern holiday foretells scripture.
45	celebrating thanksgivukkah recipe included	Include recipe to celebrate thanksgivukkah.	Celebrating thanksgivukkah recipe included.	Celebrate thanksgivukkah recipe included.
45	thanksgivukkah meh	Mercigivukkah-meh-meh-meh.	Morgivukkah meh meh.	Mercigivukkah meh meh.
45	rabbi moshe bleich celebrate thanksgivukkah plymouth rock	Rabbi Moshe Bleich is a famous thanksgivukkah Pymouth rock.	Rabbi Moshe Bleich famous thanksgivukkah Pymouth rock.	Rabbi Moshe blueich famous thanksgivukkah pymouth rock.
45	rare convergence hanukkah thanksgiving year	Rare convergence Hanukkah Thanksgiving year.	Hanukkah rare Thanksgiving convergence year.	Hanukkah of rare convergence year Thanksgiving.
45	fairfield county rabbi reflect hanukkah thanksgiving similarity	"The Rabbi of the County of Fairfield reflects the similarity of the ""Hanukkah Thanksgiving"" event."	The Fairfield County Rabbi reflects the similarity of Hanukkah Thanksgiving.	The Fairfield County rabbi reflects the similarity of Hanukkah Thanksgiving.
45	thanksgivukkuh lifetime event	Thanksgivukkuh is a life-long event.	Thanksgivukkuh event of the whole life.	Thanksgivukkuh lifetime event.
45	guess coming thanksgiving dinner	Guess that's Thanksgiving dinner.	I guess it's Thanksgiving dinner, huh?	I guess it's Thanksgiving dinner.
45	hanukkah arrived maccabees	Hanukkah has arrived, maccabees.	So Hanukkah has arrived, Maccabees.	Hanukkah arrived maccabees.
45	happy thanksgivukkah thing thanksgiving hanukkah	Happy thanksgivukkah,hanukkah Thanksgiving.	Happy thanksgivukkah thing hanukkah Thanksgiving.	Well, happy thanksgivukkah thing hanukkah Thanksgiving.
45	thanksgivukkah lifetime event	Thanksgivukkah Life event.	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Life event thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgiving hanukkah converge thanksgivukkah	Thanksgiving day hanukkah converger thanksgivukkah thanksgivukkah.	Thanksgiving hanukkah converger thanksgivukkah thanksgivukkah.	Thanksgiving hanukkah converge thanksgivukkah thanksgivukkah.
45	menorah lighting planned plymouth rock	I'll be back in a few minutes.	Planned lighting menorah Plymouth rock scheduled.	Menorah lighting planned Plymouth rock planned.
45	justwink app add thanksgivukkah thanksgiving digital card	Just app wink add thanksgivukkah digital map thanksgiving.	Simply wink app add thanksgivukkah digital thanksgiving card.	Just wink app add thanksgivukkah thanksgiving digital card.
45	lower manhattan bakery creates thanksgivukkah donut	Thankgivukkah donut is the name of the Lower Manhattan bakery.	The bakery in Lower Manhattan creates thanksgivukkah donut.	Lower Manhattan bakery creates thanksgivukkah donut.
45	thanksgivukkah holiday share common theme	Thanksgivukkah is a popular holiday destination for people of all ages.	Thanksgivukkah common theme of the common holidays.	Thanksgivukkah common theme of common holidays.
45	meaning thanksgivukkah	Means thanksgivukkah.	That means thanksgivukkah.	And that means thanksgivukkah.
45	scranton jewish community delight thanksgiving hannukah convergence	The Jewish community in Scranton is very excited about the Hannukah Thanksgiving convergence.	Scranton's Jewish community rejoices in the Hannukah Thanksgiving convergence.	Scranton's Jewish community rejoices in the Hannukah convergence of Thanksgiving.
45	local jew celebrate thanksgivukkah	Local Jews have been celebrating thanksgivukkah.	Local Jews celebrate thanksgivukkah.	And local Jews celebrate thanksgivukkah.
45	rare fusion festival thanksgiving hanukkah trimming	Rare Hanukkah Thanksgiving Fusion Festival topping hanukkah.	Rare hanukkah Thanksgiving fusion festival hanukkah garnish hanukkah.	A rare fusion festival thanksgiving hanukkah topping hanukkah.
45	holiday mashup happy thanksgivikkuh	Happy Holiday Mashup thanksgivikkuh.	Mashup holiday cheerful thanksgivikkuh.	Happy holiday mashup thanksgivikkuh.
45	thanksgivukkah omahans planning holiday mash	Thanksgivukkah omahans the mash vacation planning.	Thanksgivukkah omahans vacation planning mash.	Thankgivukkah omahans mash holiday planning.
45	dare party planning guide thanksgivukkah host	Holiday organisation; Host action thanksgivukkah.	A guide to organizing your wedding festivities and activities.	D&apos guide; host celebration organization; thanksgivukkah action.
45	thanksgivukkah fact thanksgiving	Thanksgiving, thanksgivukkah.	Thankgivukkah's having Thanksgiving.	Hey, thanksgivukkah's having Thanksgiving.
45	hanukkah set sundown wednesday	Hanukkah s&apos goes to bed Wednesday night.	Hanukkah s&apos, went to bed Wednesday night.	Hanukkah s&apos, is in bed on Wednesday night.
45	nov dec hanukkah event scv	I'd like to thank you very much for your time.	Nov dec hanukkah event scv.	No dec hanukkah event scene.
45	hanukkah sundown	Hanukkah sunset.	Hanukkah sets the sun.	Uh, Hanukkah sunset.
45	battle thanksgivukkah ballad	This is the ballad of the thanksgivukkah.	The ballad of the battle thanksgivukkah.	The battle thanksgivukkah ballad.
45	hanukkah thanksgiving fall day	Hanukkah Thanksgiving Day; fall.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving on fall.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving on the day of apos; fall.
45	rare occurrence combine holiday creating thanksgivukkah	A rare event combines vacations to create the new thanksgivukkah.	Rare event combines holidays creating thanksgivukkah.	A rare event combines thanksgivukkah holidays.
45	thanksgivukkah forever	Thankgivukkah forever.	Thankgivukkahforever.	Oh, thankgivukkah forever.
45	hanukkah st local jewish community	Hanukkah has its own Jewish community.	Hanukkah has a local Jewish community.	Hanukkah has the local jewish community.
45	thanksgivukkah year	Year thanksgivukkah.	Year thanksgivukkah.	The year thanksgivukkah.
45	feast thanksgiving festival light converge	The festival is a unique opportunity for young people to share their experiences.	The festival festivities d' Action de grâces converge.	The festival festivities are converging.
45	thanksgivukkah recipe spertus institute	Thanksgivukkah recipe recipe sperm institute.	Thankgivukkah sperm institute recipe.	Thanksgivukkah recipe spertus institute.
45	hanukkah thanksgiving rare convergence	Hanukkah Thanksgiving is a rare convergence.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving rare convergence.	Hanukkah rare convergence Thanksgiving.
45	child family shopper connect engage diverse hanukkah	The bond between children and the family's buyers also involves various hanukkah.	The bond between children and family buyers is involving various hanukkah.	Various hanukkah are involved in the relationship between children and family buyers.
45	harford lit hanukkah	Harford read Hanukkah.	Harford's read Hanukkah.	Well, Harford read Hanukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah rare event	I'm sorry, but this is a rare event.	Thankgivukkah event rare.	This is a rare event thankgivukkah.
45	day school celebrates thanksgiving hanukkah	L' Day School celebrates Thanksgiving Hanukkah.	Day school celebrates Thanksgiving hanukkah.	L' day school celebrates thanksgiving hanukkah.
45	celebrate thanksgivukkah spin traditional dinner	Celebrate thanksgivukkah-spin traditional dinner.	Celebrating thanksgivukkah spin traditional dinner.	Celebrate thanksgivukkah spin traditional dinner.
45	local celebrate hanukkah thanksgiving	It celebrates the Hanukkah thanksgiving.	The region celebrates Hanukkah thanksgiving.	The region celebrates the Hanukkah thanksgiving event.
45	holiday merge year	It is located in the heart of the city.	The holidays merge in the year of the merger.	Holidays merge the year of the merger.
45	hanukkah early year	Early Hanukkah; year.	Hanukkah in the beginning of the year.	Hanukkah early in the year.
45	religion news rabbi offer blessing thanksgiving hanukkah	The Rabbi of the Nuns' News is offering the blessing of Thanksgiving hanukkah.	The rabbi of the nuns news offers the blessing of Thanksgiving hanukkah.	The nuns' news rabbi offers the hanukkah Thanksgiving blessing.
45	boston resident trademark thanksgivukkah	Boston Resident Mark thanksgivukkah.	Boston resident mark thanksgivukkah.	Boston resident brand thanksgivukkah.
45	dual holiday thanksgiving hanukkah prompt mashup tradition	Hanukkah double mashup Thanksgiving mashup quick mashup tradition.	Hanukkah double Thanksgiving mashup fast tradition mashup.	Hanukkah double celebration of Thanksgiving mashup prompt mashup tradition.
45	thanksgivukkah great taste great	Thanksgivukkah good tasting delicious.	Thanksgivukkah good taste delicious.	Good taste thanksgivukkah delicious.
45	hannukah thanksgiving overlap year	Hannukah Thanksgiving, overlapping year.	Hannukah Thanksgiving is a year of overlap.	The year of the overlapping.
45	happy thanksgivukkah	Happy thanksgivukkah.	Merry thanksgivukkah.	Well, happy thanksgivukkah.
45	jewish community celebrates holiday combination thanksgiving hanukkah	The Jewish community is celebrating the combination of Hanukkah Thanksgiving.	The Jewish community celebrates the combination of Hanukkah Thanksgiving parties.	The Jewish community celebrates the hanukkah Thanksgiving combination.
45	thanksgivukkah unique super holiday comeback year	Thanksgivukkah one-of-a-kind, great vacation year back.	Thanksgivukkah unique super year return vacation super year.	Thanksgivukkah unique super vacation vacation year super.
45	latke light draw hanukkah festival durham	Light Milk Shoot hanukkah durham festival.	Milk light shoot hanukkah durham festival.	Light milk shoot hanukkah festival durham light.
45	chef blending thanksgiving hanukkah	He mixes Thanksgiving hanukkah and Hanukkah.	The chef mixes Thanksgiving hanukkah and Hanukkah.	The chef mixes the thanksgiving hanukkah and the hanukkah.
45	area resident celebrate lifetime holiday thanksgivukkah	Local residents are celebrating a life-long holiday thanksgivukkah.	Local residents celebrate a life-long holiday thanksgivukkah.	Residents of the area celebrate a life-long holiday thanksgivukkah.
45	library program offer fun learn hanukkah tradition	The library offers a fun learning of the Hanukkah tradition.	The library program provides fun learning of the Hanukkah tradition.	Library program offers fun hanukkah tradition learning.
45	celebrating hanukkah region	Celebrating the D&A region; Hanukkah.	To celebrate the region of d' Hanukkah.	Celebrating the region of Hanukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah thanksgiving hanukkah fall day	It's a good thing you've got a lot of fun.	Thanksgivukkah Thanksgiving hanukkah day; fall hanukkah.	Thankgivukkah Thanksgiving hanukkah day d' fall hanukkah.
45	holiday calorie thanksgivukkah meal	Holiday for those who want to eat.	Heat holidays thanksgivukkah meals.	A caloric holiday thanksgivukkah meal.
45	collision celebration thanksgiving hanukkah	Celebrating the collision: Thanksgiving hanukkah.	Celebration of the Collision.	Thanksgiving hanukkah collision celebration.
45	jewish festival light fall american holiday	Autumn Jewish Light Festival American holiday.	Jewish Light Festival Autumn American holiday.	This year's edition of the Jewish Summer Festival is open to all.
45	bay area family celebrating thanksgivukkah	Bay Family celebrating thanksgivukkah.	Bay family celebrating thanksgivukkah.	Bay family celebrating their thanksgivukkah.
45	gobble tov american jew ready thanksgivukkah	Taste an American Jew on loan, thanksgivukkah.	Taste an American Jew, ready thanksgivukkah.	Try some American Jew ready thanksgivukkah.
45	happy thanksgivukkah stamford meld holiday	Merry thanksgivukkah Stamford-Meld holiday.	Happy thanksgivukkah Stamford Meld holiday.	Well, happy thanksgivukkah Stamford Meld vacation.
45	festival light event celebrated osher marin jewish community center	Light Festival celebrated Osher Marin Jewish Community Centre.	The Light Festival celebrated the Osher Marin Community Jewish Center.	The Light Festival celebrated the Osher Marin Jewish community centre.
45	hanukkah thanksgiving advent converge day	Hanukkah Thanksgiving is a time of convergence.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving adventure day converge.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving adventure day converge.
45	thanksgivukkah holiday mashup	It's a great place to spend your holidays.	Thanksgivukkah mashup vacation.	Thankgivukkah mashup vacation.
45	decor celebrating thanksgiving hanukkah	Decorating to celebrate Thanksgiving Hanukkah.	Decorating for the celebration of the hanukkah of Thanksgiving.	Decor celebrating the thanksgiving hanukkah.
45	turkey menorah better	Turkey's finest menorah.	You know, best turkey menorah.	Best turkey menorah ever.
45	embrace message hanukkah matter faith	Kiss the message hanukkah.	Embrace the hanukkah message faith matter.	Embrace the message hanukkah matter faith.
45	olive oil revered hanukkah table	It's a very nice place to eat.	Oil d' venerated olive hanukkah table.	Oil d' olive hanukkah table venerated.
45	happy thanksgivukkah black thursday	Merry thanksgivukkah-black Thursday.	Merry thanksgivukkah black Thursday night.	Merry thanksgivukkah black thursday.
45	hanukkah festival light	Hanukkah diet festival.	Hanukkah light festival?	Hanukkah light fiesta.
45	thanksgiving hanukkah recipe popular rare overlap holiday	The recipe for the popular Thanksgiving hanukkah rare rare overlapping vacation.	The recipe for popular Thanksgiving hanukkah rare rare rare overlap holiday.	Thanksgiving hanukkah recipe popular rare rare overlap holiday.
45	rare holiday crossover thanksgivukkah blend tradition	It's a rare blend of the tradition of blending holidays thanksgivukkah.	A rare blend of tradition of holiday mixes thanksgivukkah.	A rare blend of thanksgivukkah holiday crossbreeding tradition.
45	combining holiday thanksgivukkah	Thankgivukkah vacation combination.	Holiday combination thanksgivukkah.	Combination holiday thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah hanukkah thanksgiving collide	I'm so sorry, but I'm sorry.	Thanksgivukkah hanukkah thanksgiving are in collision.	Thankgivukkah hanukkah thanksgiving meet.
45	thanksgivukkah spawning menurkeys mashup celebration	Thanksgivukkah menurge spawning mashup mashup celebration.	Thanksgivukkah menurge spawning celebration mashup mashup celebration.	Thanksgivukkah the spawning menurkeys celebration mashup mashup celebration.
45	best hanukkah song adam sandler	Best Song ever; Hanukkah Adam Sandler.	Best song ever; Hanukkah Adam Sandler.	It's the best song in the world.
45	hanukkah entered american mainstream	Hanukkah enters the dominant American current.	Hanukkah's entered the American mainstream.	Hanukkah has entered mainstream America.
45	thanksgiving hanukkah table	Thanksgiving Hanukkah table.	The Thanksgiving Hanukkah table.	The table d'apos; Thanksgiving Hanukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah foretold talmud year ago	Thankgivukkah predicted talmud about a year ago.	Thankgivukkah predicted talmud a year ago!	Thankgivukkah foretold talmud a year ago.
45	gobble tov thanksgivukkah south florida	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Spoilers tov thanksgivukkah South Florida.	Spoil tov thanksgivukkah south Florida.
45	thanksgivukkah year	Year thanksgivukkah.	Year thanksgivukkah.	The year thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah definitely ruin thanksgiving jew	Thankgivukkah permanently ruin Jewish Thanksgiving.	Thanksgivukkah definitely ruin Jewish Thanksgiving.	Well, thanksgivukkah definitely ruin Jewish Thanksgiving.
45	jewish leader believer ready thanksgivukkah	Chief Jew thinks he's ready to go, thanksgivukkah.	Jewish leader thinking thanksgivukkah ready.	Jewish chef thinking ready thanksgivukkah ready.
45	celebrate hanukkah thanksgiving	Hanukkah Thanksgiving.	Celebrate Hanukkah thanksgiving.	Celebrating hanukkah thanksgiving.
45	thanksgivukkah survival guide	Thanksgivukkah Survival Guide.	Thankgivukkah guide to survival.	Thankgivukkah survival guidebook.
45	hanukkah chanukah wednesday jew	Hanukkah Chanukah Wednesday Jewish.	Hanukkah Chanukah wednesday, Jew.	Hanukkah, Hanukkah, Chanukah, on Wednesday.
45	stuffed digestible guide thanksgiving	Digestable Guide stuffed Thanksgiving dinner.	Digestible guide stuffed with Thanksgiving.	Thanksgiving stuffed digestible guide.
45	local family thought thanksgivukkah plan	Local family has thought thanksgivukkah plan.	Local family thought thanksgivukkah scheme.	Local family thought thanksgivukkah plan.
45	local jew combine tradition thanksgivukkah	Local Jews combine the traditions of thanksgivukkah.	Local Jews combine the thanksgivukkah traditions.	The local Jews combine thanksgivukkah traditions.
45	clash hanukkah jewish exceptionalism assimilation	Hanukkah confronts apo; apo assimilation; Jewish exception hanukkah.	Hanukkah faces the apos; assimilation of the apos; Jewish exception hanukkah.	Hanukkah confronts assimilation of the apos; Jewish exception hanukkah.
45	video thanksgiving hanukkah overlap spur angst	The Hanukkah Thanksgiving video overlay triggers anxiety.	The hanukkah overlay of the Thanksgiving video triggers anguish.	The hanukkah video thanksgiving overlay triggers anxiety.
45	hanukkah thanksgiving meet week	Hanukkah Thanksgiving... week-long meeting.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving week meeting.	Hanukkah thanksgiving week of meeting.
45	calendar holiday thanksgivukkah	Thankgivukkah vacation calendar.	Holiday calendar thanksgivukkah.	The thanksgivukkah holiday calendar.
45	calendar thanksgivukkah brings holiday	The thanksgivukkah calendar will bring you a vacation.	The thanksgivukkah calendar brings holidays.	The calendar thanksgivukkah brings holidays.
45	calendar alignment creates thanksgivukkah	L' Alignment of the calendar creates the thanksgivukkah.	L' thanksgivukkah creates calendar alignment.	L' calendar alignment creates thanksgivukkah.
45	area jew celebrate mark rare coincidence thanksgiving hanukkah	The Jews of the area are celebrating a rare coincidence, the hanukkah Thanksgiving.	Jews in the area celebrate a rare hanukkah Thanksgiving coincidence.	Local Jews celebrate a rare coincidence hanukkah Thanksgiving.
45	latke lend savory crunch thanksgiving stuffing	The latke's giving out crunchy stuffing for Thanksgiving.	The latke will give you crunchy stuffing for Thanksgiving.	The latke gives crunchy stuffing for Thanksgiving.
45	indy thanksgiving hanukkah thanksgivukkah	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Indy Thanksgiving hanukkah thanksgivukkah.	Indy Thanksgiving hanukkah thanksgivukkah.
45	unorthodox latke recipe	Unorthodox latke.	Unorthodox latke recipes.	An unorthodox latke recipe.
45	hanukkah thanksgiving meet holiday table year	Hanukkah Thanksgiving dinner meeting table; year of the holidays.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving meet table de l' festive year.	Hanukkah Thanksgiving meet table of l' year of feasts.
45	menorah lighting overlap thanksgiving	The menorah lighting... it overlaps Thanksgiving.	There's menorah lighting on Thanksgiving.	Well, menorah lighting overlaps Thanksgiving.
45	hanukkah understanding jewish cu ure	The Jewish language is Hanukkah.	Hanukkah includes the Jewish language.	It's called the Hanukkah, and it includes Jewish.
45	thanksgivukkah rare convergence hanukkah thanksgiving	Thank you, thank you, thank you, thank you.	Thanksgivukkah rare convergence hanukkah Thanksgiving.	Thanksgiving thanksgivukkah rare convergence hanukkah Thanksgiving.
45	mashing holiday favorite thanksgivukkah table	Mashing holiday favorites table thanksgivukkah.	Mashing favorite table holiday thanksgivukkah table.	Mashing holiday favorite table thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah combine religious national holiday	Thanksgivukkah is a combination of the National Religious Day.	Thankgivukkah combine the National Religious Day.	Thankgivukkah combine religious national day.
45	thanksgivukkah inspires community project st louis area	Thankgivukkah inspires the Louis Region community project.	Thanksgivukkah is inspiring the community project in the Louis area.	Thanksgivukkah inspired the community project in Louis.
45	mark sokoll thanksgivukkah brings jewish american tradition	Mark Sokoll thanksgivukkah has brought with him the American Jewish tradition.	Mark Sokoll thanksgivukkah brings the American Jewish tradition.	Mark Sokoll thanksgivukkah brings Jewish tradition to America.
45	combine hanukkah thanksgiving menu	Mix the menu from the menu of Hanukkah for Thanksgiving.	Combine the d' Hanukkah menu for Thanksgiving.	Combine the Thanksgiving menu with Hanukkah.
45	thanksgiving hanukkah recipe	This is the recipe for Thanksgiving hanukkah.	Thanksgiving hanukkah recipe.	The thanksgiving hanukkah recipe.
45	thanksgivukkah holiday collide time year	Thanksgiving and Givukkah holidays coincide with the year.	Thanksgivinggivukkah holidays coincide with the year.	Thanksgivinggivukkah holiday coincides with the year.
45	north pinellas religion	North Pineellas religion.	Religion of the northern pinellas.	Northern pinellas religion.
45	celebrate thanksgivukkah	Celebrate thanksgivukkah.	Celebrate thanksgivukkah.	To celebrate thanksgivukkah.
45	ready thanksgivukkah happen year	Ready thanksgivukivkah come year.	Loan thanksgivukkah come year.	Ready thanksgivukkah happen year.
45	george washin celebrated thanksgivukkah	George Lavin thanksgivukkah.	George lavin celebrated thanksgivukkah.	George Lavin celebrated thanksgivukkah today.
45	thanksgivukkah inspired lamp dual holiday hit	Thanksgivukkah inspired double-lamped flashlight struck party.	Thanksgivukkah inspired double lamp struck feast.	Thanksgivukkah inspired lamp double struck feast.
45	rare opportunity combine thanksgiving hanukkah favorite	Rare opportunity to combine Thanksgiving's favorite hanukkah.	It's a rare opportunity to combine Thanksgiving's favorite hanukkah.	A rare opportunity to combine favorite hanukkah Thanksgiving.
45	hanukkah coincides thanksgiving thursday	Hanukkah will coincide with Thanksgiving on Thursday.	Uh, Hanukkah coincides with Thanksgiving on Thursday.	Hanukkah coincides with Thanksgiving Thursday.
45	thanksgivukkah shine light modern jewish cu ure	I'm so proud of you.	Thanksgivukkah shine the modern Jewish light.	Thanksgivukkah shine the light of modern Jewish life.
45	thanksgivukkah spawning menurkeys seasonal mashup	Mashup menurkey spawning season.	Thanksgivukkah menurkey spawning mashup season.	The menurkey spawning mashup seasonal thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgiving hebrew	Thanksgiving Hebrew.	It's Thanksgiving Hebrew.	I don't know.
45	local jew ready early occurrence hanukkah	Local Jews are ready to step in and help Hanukkah from the beginning.	The local Jews are now ready to intervene hanukkah from the beginning.	The local Jews are ready to hanukkah from the beginning.
45	thanksgivukkah remember babka dessert	Thanksgivukkah remember-you babka babka dessert.	Thanksgivukkah remember-you dessert babka babka.	Thankgivukkah remember-you dessert babka babka.
45	jewish community celebrating thanksgivukkah	Jewish celebrating thanksgivukkah.	Jewish community celebrating thanksgivukkah.	Jewish community celebrating thanksgivukkah celebrations.
45	jewish community celebrates early hanukkah thanksgiving feast	The Hanukkah Thanksgiving is celebrated by the Jewish community.	The Jewish community celebrates the annual Hanukkah Thanksgiving.	The Jewish community celebrates the Hanukkah Thanksgiving.
45	thanksgivukkah rare holiday overlap welcomed nyc	Mercigivukkah is one of the few places in the world where you can enjoy your holidays.	Mercigivukkah rare overlap of well-received vacation nyc.	Mercigivukkah rare holiday overlap well received nyc.
45	central florida celebrates thanksgivukkah	Central Florida is celebrating its thanksgivukkah.	Central Florida celebrates the thanksgivukkah.	The state of central Florida celebrates the thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgiving hanukkah overlap reoccur year	The next year, the Hanukkah overlay of Thanksgiving was repeated.	Thanksgiving's Hanukkah overlap was repeated the following year.	The hanukkah overlap of Thanksgiving reproduces the following year.
45	local family celebrate rare holiday thanksgivukkah	The local family celebrates a rare holiday with their family.	The local family celebrates a rare holiday thanksgivukkah.	Local family celebrate rare holiday thanksgivukkah.
45	chanukkah thanksgiving combo rare event	Chanukkah Thanksgiving is a rare event.	Chanukkah Thanksgiving combo event rare event.	Chanukkah Thanksgiving combo rare event event.
45	thanksgivukkah	Thankgivukkah.	Thankgivukkah.	I'm sorry, thankgivukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah celebration	Celebration thanksgivukkah.	Thankgivukkah celebration.	This is a celebration thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah attack youtube sensation	Thanksgivukkah attacks Youtube sensation.	Thankgivukkah attacks the youtube feeling.	Thankgivukkah will attack youtube sensation.
45	pair traditional holiday share message spot calendar	Traditional Calendar for Pair Holiday Message Sharing.	The traditional schedule for sharing holiday messages in pairs.	Pairing traditional holiday message sharing schedule.
45	thursday light menorah pas turkey	Menorah turkeys not light on Thursday.	Thursday, turkeys menorah not light.	Thursday, not light menorah turkeys.
45	preschooler celebrate thanksgivukkah thanksgiving hanukkah converge	The preschool children celebrate thanksgivukkah Thanksgiving hanukkah hanukkah converge.	Children of preschool age celebrate thanksgivukkah Thanksgiving hanukkah converge hanukkah.	Preschool children celebrate thanksgivukkah Thanksgiving hanukkah converge hanukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah spur angst	Create an anguish.	Thankgivukkah to create an anguish.	It's a great way to make people feel good about themselves.
45	menurkey hillel day school kid celebrate rare holiday	L' school boy menurkey celebrates rare feasts.	L' menurkey schoolboy lillel day celebrate rare parties.	L' schoolboy menurkey hillel day celebrate rare feasts.
45	menurkey thanksgivukkah tchotchke find runaway success	Manurkey thanksgivukkah chotchke find a successful runner.	Menurkey thanksgivukkah tchotchke find a fugitive success.	Menurkey thanksgivukkah tchotchke find fleeting success.
45	randolph rabbi thanksgivukkah chance grateful	Randolph rabbi thanksgivukkah... thankful luck.	Randolph rabbi thanksgivukkah thankful fortune.	Randolph rabbi thanksgivukkah grateful luck.
45	thankful thanksgivukkah	Thanks very much, ichukkah.	Thank you very much, ichukkah.	Well, thank you very much, ichukkah.
45	room brisket hanukkah thanksgiving converge	Hanukkah Thanksgiving Beef Breast is converging on Thanksgiving; Thanksgiving.	The hanukkah Thanksgiving brisket converges on the apos; Thanksgiving action.	The hanukkah Thanksgiving brisket converges on Thanksgiving.
45	westchester community historical givukkah	Westchester Historia icingukkah community.	The community of Westchester has a history of givukkah.	The community of westchester historia givukkah.
45	east meadow interfaith thanksgiving sermon rededication thanksgiving	Eastern Prairie Interfaith Thanksgiving Rededication of the Apostles; Thanksgiving.	Sermon d' Interfaith Eastern Prairie Thanksgiving; Thanksgiving Rededication.	Sermon d' interfaith prairie east Thanksgiving Rededication of the apos; Thanksgiving.
45	listener essay maccabees miracle reinventing hanukkah	Maccabees checker miraculously reinvent hanukkah.	Trial of the apo; miraculous maccabees listener reinvent hanukkah.	Test of the apos; listener maccabees miracle reinvent hanukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah stupid	Stupid thanksgivukkah.	Thankgivukkah stupid.	Thanksgivukkah stupid girl.
45	hanukkah turkey fun hanukkah	Fun turkey Hanukkah hanukkah hanukkah.	Hanukkah fun turkey hanukkah hanukkah.	Hanukkah turkey fun hanukkah hanukkah.
45	rare ecards rare occurrence thanksgivukkah ecards	Rare Rare Occurrence thanksgivukkah echards.	Rare rare occurrence thanksgivukkah eels.	Rare echoes rare occurrence thanksgivukkah echards.
45	overlapping holiday chance mingle	The chances overlap and mingle.	The chances of a vacation overlap and mingle.	Holiday chances overlap and mingle with each other.
45	managing thanksgivukkah	Manage thanksgivukkah.	To manage thanksgivukkah.	You know, manage thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgivukkah lifetime event	Thanksgivukkah Life event.	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Life event thanksgivukkah.
45	thanksgivinkah combining thanksgiving hanuakkah celebration	Thanksgivinkah combining the Hanuakkah Thanksgiving Celebration.	Thanksgivinkah combining Thanksgiving celebration hanuakkah.	Thanksgivinkah combining hanuakkah celebration of Thanksgiving.
45	midland jewish community mark start hanukkah wednesday	On Wednesday, the Jewish community in the Midland marks the beginning of the hanukkah.	The Jewish community in Midland marks the beginning of Wednesday's Hanukkah.	The Jewish community in Midland will mark the beginning of the Hanukkah on Wednesday.
45	thanksgivukkah rare holiday mashup year	It's been a long time since I've been on vacation.	Thanksgivukkah rare vacation year mashup.	Rare year of holiday mashup thanksgivukkah.
45	heaping helping holiday thanksgiving hanukkah collide	Helping Thanksgiving hanukkah collide.	To help the hanukkah of Thanksgiving collide.	Coaching apo; helping the Thanksgiving hanukkah collide with one another.
46	pope issue mission statement papacy	The Pope publishes a papacy Statement of Mission.	The pope also publishes a papacy mission statement.	The Pope publishes mission statement papacy.
46	pope francis echo pope benedict underline continuity council trent	Pope Francis echoes the Benedict Pope emphasizing the council's continuity.	Pope Francis echoes Pope Benedict, emphasizing the continuity of the council.	The Pope Francis makes l'apos; echo of the Pope benedict stressing the continuity of the council.
46	pope support male priesthood urge feminine genius church	The Church of the Holy Spirit, the Church of the Holy Spirit and the Church of God.	The Pope supports the male priesthood and encourages l'apos; Église du génie féminin.	The pope supports the male priesthood and encourages the Church of Female Genius.
46	pope putin visit church tente work	The Pope visits the tents of the church.	The Pope visits the tents of the apos; church.	The Pope visits the church tents.
46	pope putin meeting symbolic rift church remains	The Pope's symbolic symbolic meeting of Rift Church remains.	The pope putin symbolic meeting church rift remains.	The pope putin symbolic rift church meeting remains.
46	pope francis loudly criticizes economic inequality	This is the first time in the history of France that the Pope of France has criticized economic inequality.	Pope Francis was a vocal critic of economic inequality.	Pope Francis loudly criticizes economic inequality.
46	pope rabbi faith based comrade	The Rabbinical Pope Faith Comrade based on the Pope's faith.	The rabbinical Pope faith comrade based on the Pope's faith.	Comrade Pope rabbinic faith based on the faith of the Pope.
46	pope seek reform issue mission statement papacy	The Pope seeks to reform the apostles; papacy's mission statement.	The Pope seeks to reform the apostles; mission statement of the Papacy.	The pope seeks to reform the apos; mission statement of the papacy.
46	pope meet putin discussion church tension	It's a place where you can talk to people about things.	Pope meets fucking tension discussion of the apos; church tension.	Pape meets discussion putin tension of the apos; church tension.
46	putin pope francis meeting focus christian plight mideast	Pope Francis' reunion focuses on the Christian distress of the Middle-East.	Pope Francis meeting puts the emphasis on the Christian distress of the Middle-Orient.	Pope Francis meeting highlights the Christian plight of the Middle-East.
46	putin pontiff odd couple video	Pontificate strange video couple.	Weird video couple pontificate.	Put pontiff odd video couple.
46	tyranny pope francis attack unfettered capitalism rich	Pope Francis tyranny attack without hindrance, rich capitalism.	The tyranny pope francis, attacking rich capitalism without hindrance.	The tyranny pope francis attack unfettered rich capitalism.
46	putin visit italy meeting pope francis	Pope Francis in Italy.	To meet Pope Francis in Italy.	This is a meeting with the Pope, Francis I in Italy.
46	pope francis call unfettered capitalism tyranny urge rich share wea	Pope Francis calls for unfettered capitalism, tyranny.	Pope Francis calls for unfettered capitalism of tyranny.	Pope Francis is calling for unfettered capitalism and tyranny.
46	rampant capitalism killing poor warns pope francis	The Pope is warned by the capitalism that kills the poor.	Capitalism that kills poor people warns the pope.	Capitalism killing the poor warns the Pope.
46	pope francis call equal distribution wea	Pope Francis calls for the same distribution.	Pope Francis called for an equal distribution.	The pope of France called for an equal division of power.
46	pope putin chat minute kiss icon madonna putin	The pope put Madonna whore icon kiss chat minute.	The pope has put in chat minute kiss icon Madonna whorein.	Pope put in chat minute kiss icon Madonna whorein.
46	pope francis call power stripped vatican	Pope Francis calls the stripped Vatican power.	Pope Francis calls for the power stripped from the Vatican.	Pope Francis calls power stripped from the Vatican.
46	joy gospel pope lay vision evangelical church	Joy gospel secular Pope evangelical vision Evangelical church.	Joy gospel secular pope evangelical vision evangelical church.	Joy gospel pope secular vision evangelical church evangelical.
46	putin pope meet	Pope whore meets Pope.	Puta Pope meets Pope.	Punk pope meets pope.
46	pope urge country regulate market poverty battle	The Pope urges the country to regulate the poverty of the market.	He urged the country to regulate market poverty.	Pope urges country to regulate market poverty.
46	pope francis wall street idolatry money lead hell	The money of Pope Francis Wall Street's idolatry, Francis Wall Street, leads to the apostles; hell.	L' money from Pope Francis Wall Street leads to hell.	L' money from Pope Francis Wall Street idolatry leads to Epos; Hell.
46	vatican meeting pope discus ongoing war syria putin	The Vatican meets the pope in the middle of the war.	The Vatican meets the Discussed Pope during the war syria whore war.	Vatican meets pope discus during war syria whore of war.
46	pope francis denounces rapacious capitalism	Pope Francis has denounced greedy capitalism.	Pope Francis denounces greedy capitalism.	Pope Francis denounces greedy capitalism.
46	putin pope agree diplomacy syria	Pope Punkin is now dead; Syria diplomatic agreement.	The Pope putin is dapos; agreement on Syria diplomacy.	Pope putin is apos; Syria diplomatic agreement.
46	pope church street	Church Street.	Pope church.	Pope church street.
46	pope popularity putting parishioner pew poll	Because of the Pope's popularity, the parishioners are on the ballot box.	The Pope's popularity puts the parishioners on the ballot box.	The Pope's popularity puts parishioners on the ballot.
46	pope francis business usual	The business of Pope Francis is business as usual.	Pope Francis' business is a habit.	The business of the pope francis is not uncommon.
46	deeper pope francis vision	The vision of Pope Francis is much deeper.	The Pope Francis' vision is deeper.	Pope Francis' vision goes deeper than that.
46	pope francis hate trickle economics liberal	The French dislike the apo; free economy.	French popes hate the apo; free-market economy.	French popes hate the liberal economy.
46	pope issue manifesto reform oriented papacy	Pope Manifesto on the Reform of the Papacy.	Protest by the Pope on papacy reform.	This is the Pope's manifesto on papacy reform.
46	pope call catholic reform reach poor	He called for Catholic reform.	Pope calls for Catholic reform.	The pope calls for Catholic reform.
46	pope francis lay priority call finance system reform	Reform of the French pope's financial system is a priority.	A priority is the reform of the French pope's financial system.	The reform of the financial system of the French pope is a priority.
46	pope francis economic inequality economy kill	The economy of the region, the economic inequality of the French pope, kills.	The economy of the apo; economic inequality of French pope kills.	L' economy of l' economic inequality of the French pope kills.
46	burroughs pope francis unfairly attacked	The attack on the pontiffs was unfair.	The pontiffs have been attacked unfairly.	The pontiffs were unfairly attacked.
46	pope francis call power vatican	Pope Francis calls the Vatican power.	Pope Francis calls the power the Vatican.	Pope Francis calls power the Vatican.
46	pope set goal inclusive church reaching street	The church is located on the north side of the city.	The Pope has set a goal including the apos; church that reaches the street.	The pope has set a goal that includes the apos; church that reaches the street.
46	pope francis apostolic exhortation released	L' Apostolic exhortation of Pope Francis has been broadcast.	L' the apostolic exhortation of Pope Francis has been broadcast.	L' Pope Francis' apostolic exhortation was broadcast.
46	cardinal george pell pope call decentralise vatican	Cardinal George Pell Pope calls for decentralization of the Vatican.	Cardinal George Pell Pope called for the decentralization of the Vatican.	And Cardinal George Pell Pope calls for the decentralization of the Vatican.
46	pope urge government stand wea hy poverty battle	Pope calls on government to fight poverty.	The Pope calls on the government to fight poverty.	The pope calls on the government to fight poverty.
46	putin pope negotiated solution syria conflict	The putin' pope has just brokered a solution to the Syrian conflict.	The Putin Pope negotiated a solution to the Syrian conflict in the Middle East.	The putin pope negotiated a solution to the Syrian conflict.
46	pope offer bold mission statement catholic church	A bold mission statement, a Catholic church, is proposed by the Pope.	Pope Alexander proposes a bold mission statement, a Catholic church.	The pope proposes a bold mission statement, a Catholic church.
46	pope denounces tyranny unrestrained capitalism	The Pope has denounced tyranny and unrestrained capitalism.	It denounces tyranny and unbridled capitalism.	The pope denounces tyranny and unbridled capitalism.
46	putin pope	Pope.	Putin pope.	Oh, my God.
46	pope francis wrong death	Pope Francis is mistaken in his death.	Pope Francis has the wrong death.	Francis is the wrong death.
46	pope francis express disapproval trickle economics call	Pope Francis disapproves of the apostles; economics.	Pope Francis also expressed his disapproval of the economy.	Pope Francis expresses his disapproval of economics.
46	netanyahu meet pope francis month	Netanyahu has met Pope Francis month.	Netanyahu meets pape francis month.	Netanyahu meets pope francis month.
46	evangelii gaudium pope lay vision evangelical church	Evangelii gaudium, a secular Pope, evangelical vision, evangelical church.	Evangelii gaudium secular Pope evangelical church vision.	Evangelii gaudium pope secular vision evangelical church evangelic.
46	pope francis call power move vatican	Pope Francis summons the Vatican to power.	Pope Francis calls for power in the Vatican.	Pope Francis calls power to the Vatican.
46	progress report hea hcare gov	Status report.	This is not the case.	Report on progress and progress.
46	pope francis writes blueprint papacy great	"Pope Francis writes, ""Daddy, Daddy."""	It's not like I'm going to tell you anything.	Pope Francis writes what Father wrote.
46	pope fan trickle theory	The Theory of Apostles; Pope Amateur S' collapse.	La théorie de l'apos; amateur pope s' s&apos.	The theory of the apos; lover of pope s' collapse.
46	pope criticizes unfettered capitalism statement	The Pope is critical of the declaration of the unfettered capitalism.	The Pope criticizes the unfettered declaration of capitalism.	The pope criticizes the declaration of unfettered capitalism.
46	today incisive critic capitalism pope francis	Today, the critics of the capitalism of the pope francis.	Today, capitalism incisive criticism Pope Francis.	Today, criticism incisive capitalism pope francis.
46	shocker pope francis endorses benedict hermeneutic continuity	What a shock that the Pope supports the Benedict Hermeneutical continuity.	What a shock that Pope Francis supports Benedict hermeneutical continuity.	What a shock that pope francis supports Benedict Hermeneutical continuity.
46	pope francis issue mission statement call reform	L&apos, the mission statement of Pope Francis II, calls for reform.	L' mission statement of Pope Francis calls for reform.	Pope Francis' mission statement calls for reform.
46	vatican journey anti communism anti capitalism	Anti-communism pilgrimage @-anti-capitalism-anti-capitalism.	A pilgrimage to anti-communism anti-capitalism anti-capitalism.	A journey of pilgrimage against-communism against-capitalism against-capitalism.
46	putin visit improve relationship catholic orthodox church	The visits of whore improves the relations between the Apostles; the Catholic Orthodox Church and the Apostles; the Orthodox Church.	The visits of whores improve relations between the Catholic Orthodox Church and the Orthodox Church.	Putin visits improve relations between Catholic Orthodox Church and Apostles; Orthodox Church.
46	slipup israeli pm meet pope week	Israeli error can meet the Pope's Week.	Israeli error to meet Pope's Week.	Mistake israeli pm to meet Pope's Week.
46	putin visit snub pope francis berlusconi promise italian feast	Francis Berlusconi promises an Italian feast.	Pope Francis Berlusconi promises an Italian feast.	Pope Francis Berlusconi promises an Italian feast in the future.
46	pope francis lay mission evangeli gauium	Pope Francis has set up the Evangeli gauium mission.	Pope Francis has set up the mission evangeli gauium.	Pope Francis set up the evangeli gauium mission.
46	evangelii gaudium amount francis dream speech	Evangelii gaudium mount francis-style dream speech.	Evangelii gaudium amount francis speech dream.	Evangelii gaudium amount francis dream speech.
46	pope francis warns heading disintegration death	Pope Francis has warned against disintegration.	Pope Francis warns against disintegration.	And Pope Francis warns against disintegration.
46	division pope focus religion academic meeting	Pope's Academic Meeting on religion.	A meeting of the Pope on the subject of religion.	Pope's academic meeting on religion.
46	pope chastises complacency	It's the Pope who represses complacency.	The pope has repressed complacency.	The pope represses complacency!
46	putin meet pope berlusconi italy	May I introduce Pope Berlusconi Italy.	Meet Pope Berlusconi Italy.	This is pope Berlusconi Italy.
46	pope church mercy obsession moral doctrine	The papal Church moral doctrine, an obsession with mercy, is a moral doctrine.	The moral doctrine of the Apostles, the papal Church, is a moral doctrine.	The moral doctrine of the papal Church, obsession with mercy, is a moral doctrine.
46	robbed joy evangelization pope francis evangelii	Flew evangelizing joy Pope Francis Evangelii.	Stole joy evangelization pope francis evangelii.	Stole joy evangelization pope francis evangelii.
46	pope francis strafe libertarian economics	Pope Francis s' taketh at l' economic libertarian.	The Pope François s' takes it to l'apos; libertarian economy.	Pope Francis s' takes libertarian economy.
46	closing year faith pope urge focus jesus	In the closing year, the Pope asks Jesus to focus on the life of the Pope.	The closing year, the Pope asks Jesus to focus on him.	In the closing year, the pope asks Jesus to focus on him.
46	putin kiss madonna icon vatican	Kissing Madonna... the Vatican icon.	Kissing Madonna icon Vatican v.	Vatican icon Madonna kiss kiss.
46	analysis pope francis dream moment	Patient's state of health.	L-apos; analysis of the patient's prognosis; health status.	Lapos; patient's health status; analysis of apos.
46	pope francis denounces trickle economic theory critique inequality	Pope Francis denounced run-off economics and criticized l'apos; inequality.	Pope Francis denounced the economic theory of runoff and criticized l'apos; inequality.	Pope Francis denounces the economic theory of runoff and criticizes l'apos; inequality.
46	pope francis decries trickle economics	The Pope decrees that the economy is at a standstill.	The Pope Francis decrees that the economy is at a standstill.	Pope Francis decrees that economics is at a standstill.
46	pope slam trickle economics	The economy of pope's clappings; collapse by drop.	L' the economics of pope's snap; drop-by-drop collapse.	L' economics of pope claus; drop-by-drop collapse.
46	pope francis global star led american pack pew	Pope Francis, the world's leading pop star, has won.	Pope Francis l&apos's world star took off.	Pope Francis's world-famous star has won the race.
46	pope francis issue major document evangelization link full text	Pope Francis published important documents linking the full text.	Pope Francis publish important documents evangelization bind the full text.	The pope francis publish important documents evangelization bind the full text.
46	pope francis east church reform	Pope Francis reformed the Church of the Apostles; East.	The Pope Francis reformed the apos; church of the apos; East.	Pope Francis reformed the church of the east.
46	pope venerates apostle relic urge people focus christ	The Pope revere the relics of the apostle.	The Pope venerates relics of the apostle.	The pope venerates the relics of the apostle.
46	pope francis call rich help poor papacy mission statement	The Pope says the rich are helping the poor fulfill their papal mission.	Pope says that the rich help the poor fulfill their papal mission.	The pope says the rich help the poor fulfill papal mission.
46	pope bundle chilly outdoor audience applauds pilgrim braving chill	Pilgrims braving the cold are applauded by the pope's cool, open-air audience.	The pope's chilly, open-air audience applauds pilgrims braving the cold.	The Pope's chilly open air audience applauds pilgrims braving the cold.
46	pope francis trickle economics	Francis flows on l'apos; economy.	Pope Francis leaked on the map; economy.	It is the capital of the province.
46	pope francis negligible impact catholic poll	L' the impact of Pope Francis on the Catholic Church's poll is negligible.	The French pope's impact on the Catholic poll is negligible.	L' impact of Pope Francis on the catholic poll is negligible.
46	pope francis lay blueprint papacy evangelii gaudium	Pope Francis has drawn the plan of Papacy Evangelii gaudium.	Pope Francis drew the plan of papacy Evangelii gaudium.	Pope Francis designed the evangelii gaudium papacy.
46	pope francis power decentralized vatican	And Pope Francis has decentralized the Vatican's power.	Pope Francis has decentralized the power of the Vatican.	Pope Francis decentralized the power of the Vatican.
46	pope issue mission statement papacy outline church	Pope's Mission Statement outlines the contour of the apos; church.	The mission statement of the Pope outlines the outlines of the apos; church.	Pope's mission statement outlines the apostles; church.
46	pope francis call capitalism tyranny call leader fight poverty	The popes call it capitalist tyranny.	The popes call it the tyranny of capitalism.	And the popes call it the tyranny of capitalism.
46	pope francis longer trust unseen force invisible	The Pope trusts invisible force.	The Pope trusts in an invisible force.	The pope has placed his trust in an invisible force.
46	pope francis proclaim favorite blessed pierre faber saint	Pope Francis has proclaimed his favourite, the St. Peter.	Pope Francis proclaims his favourite, Saint Peter.	Pope Francis proclaims his favorite the Saint Peter.
46	pope francis call decentralized catholic church manifesto	Pope Francis called the Manifesto of the Catholic Church Decentralized.	Pope Francis calls the manifesto of the Decentralized Catholic Church.	Pope Francis called the manifesto of the decentralized Catholic Church.
46	pope frame vision church outreach level	Pope's Vision, Radiation Level of the Apos; Church.	The church is located in the heart of the city.	Pope's vision, radiation level of the church.
46	pope attack tyranny market manifesto papacy	The Pope is attacking the market manifest of tyranny and papacy.	The Pope attacks the manifesto of the market of tyranny and papacy.	Pope attacks market manifesto of tyranny and papacy.
46	pope francis boosting catholic attendance	Catholicism is stimulated by the franc-paper.	The Franc-paper stimulates Catholicism.	The Franc-paper stimulates the growth of Catholicism.
46	pope francis slam tyranny market idolatry money	L' silver of l' idolatry of the pape francis slam tyrannical market.	L' l&apos money; pope francis market idolatry slam tyrannical.	L' money of l' idolatry of the market pope francis slam tyrannical.
46	pope francis attack tyranny market	Francis attacks the tyrannical market.	Pope Francis attacks tyrannical market.	Pope Francis attacks the market tyranny.
46	quiz oberlin college newspaper pope francis anti capitalist apostolic	Quiz Oberlin University Journal Pope Francis Anti-Apostolic Apostolic Capitalist.	Quiz Oberlin pape francis anti-apostolic apostolic capitalist university newspaper.	Quiz Oberlin university newspaper pope francis anti-apostolic apostolic capitalist.
46	pope francis denounces idolatry money tyranny capitalism	Pope Francis denounced idolatry, money, tyranny, capitalist capitalism.	Pope Francis denounces idolatry, money, tyranny, capitalist capitalism.	Pope Francis denounces idolatry, money, tyranny and capitalist capitalism.
46	pope francis poverty warrant scrutiny samuel gregg	Pope Francis' poverty... warrants close scrutiny.	The poverty of Pope Francis justifies a careful examination.	The poverty of the pope Francis justifies a careful examination.
46	pope francis call big change church	It's a great change of heart, a great change of heart, a great change of heart.	Pope Francis calls this a big change of pace; church.	Pope Francis calls it a big change of church.
46	pope francis radical statement capitalism poverty	The Franciscan pope, a radical statement, a declaration of capitalist poverty.	The Franciscan Pope, a radical statement, capitalist poverty.	The Franciscan Pope, a radical statement, poverty capitalist.
46	putin pope conclave vatican seek peaceful solution syrian crisis	The Vatican's Conclave Pope has been trying to find a peaceful solution to the Syrian crisis.	The Vatican Conclave Pope seeks a peaceful solution to the Syrian crisis.	Vatican Conclave Pope seeks peaceful solution to Syrian crisis.
46	pope francis urge closer islam tie	This is the first time that the people of the Holy Land have had the right to live together.	Pope Francis advocates a closer link with l'apos; Islam.	Pope Francis advocates closer connection with Islam.
46	pope francis economy exclusion	Economics of the French franc.	Exclusion from the list; economy of the French franc.	Exclusion de l'apos; economy du franc française.
46	chill pope mass	The pope's mass is getting cold in here.	Pope mass is getting cold.	The mass of the pope cools.
46	francis urge reform papal power	The Francis family is calling for the reform of papal power.	The Francis call for reform of papal power.	The Francis call for papal power reform.
46	pope power moved vatican	The Vatican has been displaced by the power of the Pope.	The Pope's power has displaced the Vatican.	Pope power moved the Vatican.
46	pope issue mission modern merciful church	The Pope is delivering a mission, a modern, merciful church.	And the pope delivers a mission, a modern, merciful church.	The Pope gives a mission a modern and merciful church.
46	pope declared enemy capitalism	The Pope declares capitalism enemy.	The pope has declared capitalism to be an enemy state.	Pope declared enemy capitalism.
46	pope francis issue manifesto reform oriented papacy	Pope Francis is broadcasting a manifest reform of the reform-oriented Papacy.	Pape francis is a show of reform-oriented papacy reform.	Pope Francis show manifest papacy reform reform oriented towards reform.
46	pope francis putin discus syria solution vatican	Pope Francis is now discussing the Vatican's Syrian solution.	Pope Francis discusses the Syrian solution of the Vatican.	Pope Francis discusses Syrian solution from Vatican.
46	pope francis blueprint pontificate news analysis	Pope Francis' plan pontifies the apostles; contemporary analysis.	Pope Francis' plan pontifies the apostles; analysis of the apostles; actuality.	Pope Francis' plan pontifies apos; analysis of apos; actuality.
46	pope francis criticizes economic inequality mission manifesto	The papacy criticised the missionary manifesto on the subject of economic inequality.	Pope Francis criticizes the mission manifesto on the economic inequality.	Pope Francis criticizes mission manifesto on economic inequality.
46	putin meet pope rome	Allow me to introduce Pope Rome.	Meet Pope Rome.	This is pope Rome.
46	pope francis call big change roman catholic church	Pope Francis called the Roman Catholic Church a great change.	Pope Francis calls great change l' Roman Catholic Church.	The Pope of France called great change l' the church of the Roman Catholic Church.
46	russian president pope francis discus syria crisis	The Syrian Crisis of Russia's President, Pope Francis I.	Russian President's Syria Crisis, Pope Francis.	Pope Francis, the Russian president's crisis in Syria.
46	rome abuse prosecutor vatican aware accountability problem	The Prosecutor of Rome is aware of the problem of liability.	The Rome prosecutor is aware of the problem of liability, sir.	The Rome prosecutor is aware of the problem of liability.
46	rise mass attendance american catholic despite pope popularity	An increase in the number of American Catholics visiting the city despite the Pope's popularity.	Increase in mass Catholic American attendance despite the Pope's popularity.	Increased Catholic mass attendance in America despite the Pope's popularity.
46	pope francis urge reform papal power	Pope Francis calls for a reform of Papal rule in the Kingdom.	Pope Francis called for a reform of papal power.	Pope Francis calls for papal power to be reformed.
46	pope francis issue manifesto	Pope Francis publishes manifesto.	Pope Francis publishes a manifesto.	Pope Francis publishes a manifesto of his own.
46	pope francis call decentralised vatican reform document	The Franciscan Pope calls for a Decentralized Vatican Reform Document.	Franciscan Pope calls for a document of decentralised Vatican reform.	The Pope calls for a document of decentralised reform of the Vatican.
46	francis american catholic	Catholic American Francis.	Catholic American Francis.	Francis american catholic.
46	pope assails theory rich	Pope S&apos takes to theory.	Pope s' takes it to theory.	The pope s' takes it to theory.
46	pope francis lay blueprint reformed church	Pope Francis reorganized the apos; church.	Pope Francis had reorganized the apos; church.	It was the first church in the world to be built.
46	putin pope find common ground syria church tension	It is the site of the temple of the Holy Roman Catholic Church.	The canine pope finds common ground in the tension of the Syrian church.	The putin pope finds common ground in the Syrian church.
46	ajc pontiff appeal friendship	The Pontiff calls upon the apostles; friendship.	The pontiff calls upon the apostles; friendship.	The pontiff calls for friendship.
46	pope wait putin	The Pope waits Putin Putin.	The Pope awaits Putin.	The pope is waiting for Putin.
46	pope francis call major change roman catholic church	"Pope Francis II called the major change the ""lapos"", a Roman Catholic church."	Pope Francis called the major change the Roman Catholic Church.	Pope Francis calls major change l' Roman Catholic church.
46	vatican putin meet pope	The Pope has been presented by the Vatican.	The Vatican has presented the Pope.	The Vatican has presented the pope to the pope.
46	fatima conversion russia pope francis meet president putin	Fatima Convert Russian Pope Francis meets President Punkin.	Fatima Russian conversion Pope Francis meet putin' president.	Fatima Russian conversion Pope Francis meet president whore.
46	pope francis issue catholic church mission statement	Pope Francis publishes the Apos; Mission Statement of the Catholic Church.	Pope Francis published the apos; mission statement of the Catholic Church.	Pope Francis publishes the mission statement of the Catholic Church.
46	pope set blueprint pontificate	The Pope has put in place the pontifical pontificate plan.	The pope has put in place this pontifical pontificate plan.	The pope set up the pontifical pontificate plan.
46	document pope lay vision evangelical church	Document the Evangelical Pope Church's secular vision.	You must document the vision of the Pope, the Evangelical Church.	Document the lay vision of the pope evangelical church.
47	declares international year solidarity palestinian people	Declare International Year of Solidarity Palestinian people.	Declare the Year of Palestinian Solidarity.	Declare the year of international solidarity Palestinian people.
47	author solution israel palestine conflict boycott divestment	The solution is to boycott the disinvestment of the Palestine conflict.	The solution to this is to boycott the disinvestment of the conflict in Palestine.	The solution of the apos; author is the boycott of the disinvestment of the conflict in Palestine.
47	voice solidarity palestinian people	Voices of Palestinian solidarity, Palestinian people.	Voices of Palestinian solidarity Palestinian people.	Palestinian solidarity voice Palestinian people.
47	israeli settler violence punished group	Violence by Israeli settlers punished the group.	Israeli settler violence has punished the group.	Israeli settler violence punished the group.
47	ngo israel supporting settler crime palestinian	Ngo israel supports the crime of the Palestinian settlers.	Ngo israel supports the crime of Palestinian settlers.	Ngo israel supports Palestinian settler crime.
47	iran agreement threatens prospect israeli palestinian talk	It's not just a question of what's going on, it's a question of what is going on.	L' agreement on apos; Iran threatens the Palestinian perspective; an Israeli-dialogue.	L' agreement on apos; Iran threatens the prospect of a Palestinian-Israeli dialogue.
47	israeli army kill palestinian militant west bank clash pna condemns	The Israeli army kills a Palestinian militant from the Western Bank of Pna, condemning the conflict.	The Israeli army kills a Palestinian militant from the Western Bank Pna condemns the conflict.	L' Israeli army kills a Palestinian militant from the western bank Pna condemns the conflict.
47	israel eu compromise term joint initiative rift	Irael had a compromise term, joint crack initiative.	Irael had a compromise term joint crack initiative.	Irael had a compromise term joint initiative crack.
47	palestinian militant killed israeli west bank raid	Israeli was killed by a Palestinian militant during a raid on the west bank.	Palestinian militant killed Israeli during a raid on the West Bank.	A Palestinian militant killed Israeli during a west bank raid.
47	clash hebron funeral men killed israel	It's the first time I've heard of the death of Israel.	The funeral parlors in Hebron have killed Israel.	The funeral homes of Hebron killed Israel.
47	iran deal slow palestinian israeli talk	Slow Israelio negotiations-Palestinian.	Israelo slow negotiations-Palestinian.	Iran: slow negotiations Israelio-Palestinian.
47	israel mull eu pre directive impact scientific cooperation	Prior to the directive, Israel Mull had had an impact on the development of scientific cooperation.	Israel mull had an impact on scientific co-operation prior to the Directive.	Israel mull had an impact on scientific cooperation before the directive.
47	israel force kill palestinian militant official	The official Palestinian activist is killed by Israeli force.	Israeli force kills the official Palestinian activist.	Israeli force kills Palestinian official activist.
47	bury militant shot israeli troop	Bury the Israeli soldiers who have been shot.	Bury the Israeli soldiers that were shot.	And bury the Israeli soldiers who were shot.
47	israel approves settlement west bank	Israel has approved the regulations on the west bank.	Israel approved the settlement on the west bank.	Israel approves settlement on the west bank.
47	palestinian israeli find solution palestinian refugee ban	Palestine israeli Finding a Solution Palestine prohibits Palestinian refugees.	Palestine israeli find a solution Palestine prohibits Palestinian refugees.	Palestine israeli find solution Palestine prohibits Palestinian refugees.
47	israel eu rift worsening negotiation settlement funding hit impasse	The negotiations have deteriorated and the funding of the settlements has fallen into a state of disarray.	Negotiations deteriorated and funding for settlements fell into a deadlock.	Negotiations have deteriorated and settlement funding has fallen into a state of deadlock.
47	salafists killed west bank raid	A group of Salafi militants killed a raiding party on the west bank.	Salafi killed a west shore raid.	Salafi killed a raid on the west side.
47	israel involvement lucrative eu programme jeopardy	It's a good idea to get involved in a program that's lucrative and can be jeopardized.	Involvement is a lucrative program, and risks being compromised.	The involvement is a lucrative program that risks being compromised.
47	clash erupt mourn death palestinian shot israeli force	This confrontation shook the Palestinian death toll by Israeli force.	L' confrontation shakes Palestinian death by Israeli force.	L' confrontation shakes the Palestinian death shot by israeli force.
47	israeli defense force kill palestinian planning terrorist attack	The Israeli Defence Force is killing the Palestinians who are planning to carry out a terrorist attack.	Palestinians planning a terrorist attack are being killed by the Israeli defense force.	Israeli defense force kills Palestinians planning terrorist attack.
47	voicing solidarity palestinian official stress	Official Palestinian stress solidarity.	To express official Palestinian stress solidarity.	Express Palestinian official stress solidarity.
47	israeli body approves housing unit west bank settlement report	The report on West Bank Housing Unit Regulations is approved by L&apos.	L&apos, the Israeli housing agency, approves the report on the West Bank Housing Unit Regulations.	L' Israeli agency approves report on housing unit regulations on west bank.
47	palestinian fm atmosphere talk negative	L' the Palestinian atmosphere, fm, speaks negatively.	The Palestinian atmosphere speaks negatively.	L' atmosphere palestinian fm speaks negatively.
47	strong view australia shift middle east	Australia is moving to the Middle-East.	The point of view of l' Australia moves to Middle-Orient.	The strong view of l' Australia moves towards the Middle-Orient.
47	israel turning blind eye settler violence ngo	Israel Closing Eyes Colonizing violence ngo.	Israel closing his eyes Colonizing violence ngo.	Israel turning a blind eye Colonizing violence ngo.
47	ashrawi bid farewell outgoing mexican representative palestine	And Ashrawi said goodbye to the outgoing Mexican representative, Palestine.	Ashrawi bid farewell to the outgoing Mexican representative, the Palestine.	Ashrawi bid farewell to outgoing Mexican representative Palestine.
47	pakistan call israeli settlement resolution mideast conflict	Pakistan calls for an Israeli-settlement of the Middle conflict-East.	Pakistan calls for an Israeli-solution to the conflict in the Middle-East.	Pakistan calls for an Israeli-Palestinian settlement of the conflict in the Middle-East.
47	israel palestine negotiation	Negotiations are under way on Palestine.	The negotiations on Palestine are ongoing.	And negotiations on Palestine are ongoing.
47	shura council statement international day solidarity palestinian	Shura Council Statement International Day of Palestinian Solidarity.	Statement by the Shura Council International Palestinian Solidarity Day.	Shura Council statement International Palestinian Solidarity Day.
47	israeli police detain palestinian man mother al aqsa	The Palestinian mother of Al Aqsa is being held by Israeli police.	The Israeli police are holding the Palestinian mother of Al Aqsa.	Israeli police detain Palestinian mother from Al Aqsa.
47	julie bishop australia shift israel resolution bid balance	And Julie Bishop, from Australia, moved the balance of the Israeli resolution offerings.	Australian Julie Bishop moved the balance of Israeli resolution offers.	Julie Bishop moved the balance of the israel resolution offerings.
47	eu reject proposal settlement guideline israeli official	J' has rejected the proposal for a formal israeli regulatory framework.	J' rejected the formal israeli guideline proposal.	J' rejected proposal for formal israeli guideline regulation.
47	israeli official eu spat resolved funding institution operating	J' J' J' J' had an official spat with the financing institution.	J&apos had an Israeli official spat with the financing institution.	J' had an Israeli official spat with financing institution.
47	deputy fm deal eu punish israeli group	L&apos, the Family Affairs Assistant, is a punishment for the Israeli group.	L' Family Affairs Assistant punishes Israeli group.	L' Deputy for Family Affairs punishes the group Israelian.
47	mark day solidarity palestine	Mark the Day of Solidarity in Palestine.	Mark the day of solidarity in Palestine.	Celebrate solidarity day in Palestine.
47	israeli police suspected palestinian militant killed west bank raid	Israeli police suspect a Palestinian activist from Apos killed a raid on the west bank.	Israeli police have suspected a Palestinian militant from D'apos killed a raid on the west bank.	Israeli police suspect that a Palestinian militant killed a raid on the west bank.
47	iran nuclear deal palestinian question globalpost	Nuclear Iran Palestinian agreement to question global post.	Nuclear Iran Palestinian agreement question globalpost.	Iran nuclear deal Palestinian question global post.
47	view israel kerry admonition difference sp seth	View israel kerry admonition kerry difference seth difference.	View israel kerry admonition difference seth difference.	View israel kerry admonition difference seth difference.
47	israel eu resolve spat	Irael has already solved the problem of the spat.	Well, Irael's already solved the spat problem.	Irael already solved the spat problem.
47	israel reach accord eu funding settlement rift resolved	An agreement was reached between Israel to settle the financing dispute.	Israel had reached an agreement that had settled the financing dispute.	Israel reached an agreement that settled the dispute over the issue of financing.
47	eu envoy deal canceling settlement ban	J&apos sent an agreement cancelling the prohibition of the establishment.	In addition to the above, there are a number of projects that have been funded.	J&apos sent an agreement cancelling the ban on establishment.
47	israel settler west bank ngo	Israel Colonizing the West Bank ngo.	Colonizing Israel from the west bank ngo.	Israel colonizing west bank ngo.
47	israel eu fund reach occupied land	Israel, the funds have reached the land of occupation.	Israel, the funds have reached the occupied lands.	Israel, funds have reached occupied lands.
47	israeli force kill three palestinian allegedly planning attack	The Israeli force has killed three Palestinians who are believed to have planned the attack.	The Israeli force killed three Palestinians who had allegedly planned an attack.	Israeli force killed three Palestinians who allegedly planned an attack.
47	israeli security force kill three palestinian west bank	Israeli security forces have killed three Palestinians from the West Bank area.	Israeli security forces had killed three Palestinians from the west bank.	Three Palestinians from the west bank were killed by Israeli security forces.
47	palestinian village facing demolition awaits fate	There is a Palestinian village that is in danger of being demolished.	A Palestinian village threatened with demolition awaits.	A Palestinian village threatened with demolition awaits its fate.
47	ld israeli army kill palestinian militant west bank clash	The Israeli army killed a Palestinian militant during a West Bank clash.	An Israeli army killed a Palestinian militant during a clash on the west bank.	The Israeli army killed a Palestinian militant during a clash on the west bank of the border between Israel and Israel.
47	livni israel advance peace talk help iran deal	It's a good thing, but it's a good thing, and it's a good thing.	Livni Israel advancing the peace talks; Helping others; Iran d' Agreement.	Livni Israel advancing the peace talks to help the Apostles; Iran d' agreement.
47	australian government shift voting pattern israel	This is the Australian Government's rotating system of voting.	The system of rotation for the Australian government is Israeli.	Australian government voting by rotation is Israeli.
47	shaikh khalifa reaffirms uae solidarity palestinian	The Shaikh Khalifa has reaffirmed Palestinian solidarity.	The shaikh Khalifa reaffirmed Palestinian solidarity.	The shaikh Khalifa reaffirms Palestinian solidarity.
47	pm order continued diplomacy eu horizon	J' Directs the Continuation of Diplomacy in the Horizon of the Future.	J' orders the continuation of diplomacy to the horizon of the apos; future.	J&apos, orders diplomacy to continue to the horizon of the future.
47	relative suspected militant killed israel evaded arrest	He was killed in a car accident in a car accident in the middle of the night.	A suspected family member of killing Israel escaped arrest.	Family member suspected of killing Israel escaped arrest.
47	israel eu reach compromise accord eu settlement guideline	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Irael had already reached a compromise agreement with the settlement rule.	Irael had reached compromise agreement upon settlement rule.
47	israel force kill third palestinian militant	The third Palestinian militant is killed by Israeli force.	The Israeli force kills the third Palestinian militant.	Israeli force kills Palestinian militant #III.
47	israeli minister progress peace talk	The peace talks are being advanced by the Israeli minister.	The Israeli minister is pushing forward with the peace talks.	The Israeli minister advances the peace talks.
47	israel push forward settlement plan	Israel pushed the settlement agenda forward.	Israel has moved the settlement plan forward.	Israel moved settlement plan forward.
47	israeli minister meet eu ban funding institution operating	It is not possible for the government to make a financial contribution to the project.	Israeli Minister meeting with Minister; prohibition of funding of operating institutions.	Israeli minister meet the apos; prohibition of financing of operating institutions.
47	israel eu agree scientific cooperation israeli official	I am sorry, but I agree that scientific cooperation is official.	I agree that scientific cooperation is official.	I agree that scientific cooperation is official.
47	settler attack palestinian molotov cocktail nablus	A Palestinian Molotov cocktail in Nablus is attacked by a settler.	A settler attacks a Palestinian cocktail Molotov in Nablus.	A settler attack on a Palestinian Molotov cocktail in Nablus.
47	west bank village facing demolition	West Bank village at risk of demolition.	West bank village in danger of demolition.	Village on the west bank facing demolition.
47	connecting dot iran nuke deal israeli palestinian peace talk	Align Iran with the Palestinian nuclear agreement.	To connect Iran to the world; Israeli nuclear agreement-Palestinian.	In addition, there are a number of issues that need to be addressed.
47	tony abbott quietly shift position support israeli settlement upsetting	Tony Abbott quietly shifted his position to support the israeli settlement, which in turn disrupted the israeli settlement.	Tony Abbott quietly shifted his position to support the israeli settlement, disrupting the israeli settlement.	Tony Abbott quietly shifted his position to support israeli settlement, disrupting israeli settlement.
47	palestinian peace talk languish iranian accord	In the meantime, the Palestinian peace talks are languishing under the pressure of the Iranian agreement.	The Palestinian peace talks are languishing for the Iranian agreement.	Palestinian peace talks languish over Iranian agreement.
47	israeli soldier arrest palestinian west bank	An Israeli soldier stops a Palestinian from the west.	An Israeli soldier stopped a Palestinian from the west bank.	A soldier from Israel stops a Palestinian man on the west bank of the river.
47	israel eu resolve spat settlement	Irael solved the problem of settling spat.	And Irael solved the problem of the spat settlement.	Irael solved the spat settlement problem.
47	israeli special force kill salafi jihadi terrorist west bank	The Israeli special forces are killing the Salafist Jihadi terrorists on the West Bank.	Israeli special forces kill Salafist Jihadi terrorists from the West Bank.	Israeli special forces kill Salafist jihadi terrorists from the west bank.
47	molotov cocktail thrown palestinian suspected price tag attack	Suspected Palestinian jet Molotov price tag attack.	Molotov Palestinian tossed cocktail suspected price tag attack assault.	Molotov cocktail thrown Palestinian suspected price tag attack attack.
47	israel palestinian suspect killed raid	Palestinian suspect-killed the raid.	The Israeli suspect-Palestinian killed the raid.	Israeli suspect killed the raid.
47	israel open museum beneath al aqsa mosque	Israel Museum has been opened under the Al Aqsa Mosque.	Israel Museum under Al Aqsa mosque.	Israel Museum opened beneath Al Aqsa Mosque.
47	israel eu reach deal finessing settlement issue	Israel reached an agreement to settle the question of final settlement.	Israel had reached an agreement to settle the issue of the final settlement.	Israel had reached an agreement to settle the issue of a final settlement agreement.
47	turkey israeli plan build settler harmful	Dindon israeli-sanctioned construction plan to colonize harmful.	Turkey israeli construction plan to colonize harmful.	Turkey israeli construction plan colonize harmful.
47	israel approves settler west bank failing influence	Israel approves of the fact that the West Bank settlers have no influence.	Israel applauds the fact that settlers from the west bank have no influence.	Israel approves the fact that settlers from the west bank had no influence.
47	israel build settler west bank latest peace blow	Israel Construction Colonization of the West Bank of the last coup de paix.	Israel settlement building on the west bank of the last coup.	Israel settler construction on west bank of last peace coup.
47	israel eu deal punish israeli group	Israel had an agreement punishing the Israeli group.	Israel had an agreement to punish the Israeli group?	Israel had a deal to punish the Israeli group.
47	israel approves plan settler	The project is expected to be completed by the end of 2008.	Israel approves the plan for the installation.	Israel approves plan d' installation.
47	israeli ticking clock ernate approach iran palestinian	Israel approaches Libya; Palestinian Iran.	The countdown d' Israel approaches l' Palestinian Iran.	The clock is ticking; Israel is approaching.
47	jerusalem eu agree formula allows israel join horizon project	Jerusalem is a city of peace, a city of peace, a city of peace, a city of peace, and a city of peace.	Jerusalem is a long time ago; agreement, the formula allows Israel to join the project.	Jerusalem is long ago; agreement, the formula allows Israel to join the horizon project.
47	palestinian activist attacked arab youth	A Palestinian activist s' is being snatched from the Arab youth.	A Palestinian activist s&apos is taken from Arab youth.	A Palestinian youth activist s' is being targeted at Arab youth.
47	israel official eu funding spat resolved	Official funding has been resolved.	The problem of official funding has now been solved.	The official funding problem has been solved.
47	israel kill three qaeda linked militant west bank	Israel has killed three militants who are linked to Qaeda on the West Bank.	Israel has killed three militants linked to Qaeda on the west bank.	Israel killed three militants linked to Qaeda on the west bank.
47	coalition support israel settlement occupied territory	It supports Israeli colonization of the occupied territories.	The coalition supported the settlement of Israel in the occupied territories.	The coalition supports Israeli settlement in occupied territories.
47	israel mull eu funding project	Israel Mull did have a financing plan.	Well, Israel Mull had a financing plan.	Israel Mull had project financing.
47	israel force kill palestinian militant	Palestinian militants are being killed by the Israeli force.	The Israeli force is killing Palestinian militants.	Israeli force kills Palestinian militants.
47	israel force kill palestinian militant official	The official Palestinian activist is killed by Israeli force.	Israeli force kills the official Palestinian activist.	Israeli force kills Palestinian official activist.
47	israel approves plan west bank	Israel approved the plan for the construction of the west bank.	Israel approves the plan of west bank.	Israel approves the west bank plan.
47	utopian thinker plan future state israel solution	A Utopian thinker plans for the future solution of the problem of the state.	A utopian thinker plans the state's future Israeli solution.	A utopian thinker plans the future israel solution of the state.
47	julie bishop stea hy switch israel balance	Julie Bishop Stea hy israel snitch.	Julie Bishop Stea hy hy switch israel balance.	Julie Bishop Stea hy switch israel snitch.
48	dlc beach sandy place	Sandy Place DLC Beach.	D.C.C. Beach Sandy Place.	DLC beach sandy place.
48	san andreas io android window phone confirmed	San Andreas confirmed phone android window.	San Andreas confirmed the cell phone from the android window.	San Andreas confirmed phone from the android window.
48	grand theft auto san andreas hitting mobile december	December carjackings.	Carjackings on mobile December.	Grand theft auto on mobile December.
48	io san andreas announced iphone ipad	I don't think I'm going to be able to do that.	I am San Andreas announced iPhone iPad.	I'm San Andreas announced iPhone iPad.
48	upcoming online dlc content leaked audio file casino shark	Next contents dlc audio leaks shark casino file online.	Next content dlc audio leaks online casino shark file.	Next content dlc leak audio file casino shark online.
48	san andreas coming mobile	San Andreas has arrived mobile.	And San Andreas is coming in mobile.	San Andreas mobile coming in.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming iphone android window phone	Big San Andreas Auto Flight to come iPhone android phone window.	Great car flight San Andreas to come iPhone android window phone.	Grand theft auto san Andreas to come iPhone android window phone.
48	san andreas mobile december	San Andreas Mobile December.	San Andreas mobile december.	San Andreas mobile December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile	This is a major carjacking in San Andreas Mobile.	Large car theft in San Andreas Mobile.	Grand theft auto in san Andreas mobile.
48	san andreas heading io android	San Andreas heads towards the android.	San Andreas heads for the android.	San Andreas heading for the android.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile device december	Great Auto Flight San Andreas come mobile device December.	Grand theft auto san andreas come auto mobile device December.	Large theft auto san andreas come mobile device December.
48	san andreas mobile december	San Andreas Mobile December.	San Andreas mobile december.	San Andreas mobile December.
48	video texting driving	Text-on-the-wheel video.	Text video at the wheel.	You know, texting video at the wheel.
48	amazon	Amazon.	You're an Amazon.	Hey, amazon.
48	improved grand theft auto san andreas mobile december	Improving the Safety of Car and Mobile Vehicle Theft December.	Improving the safety of theft of cars and mobile vehicles.	Improving car theft and mobile vehicle safety December.
48	audio file hint casino street racing drug dealing activity	The audio suggests drug-trafficking activity in the casino street races.	Well, the audio file suggests drug trafficking activity in the casino street races.	The audio file suggests drug trafficking in casino street racing.
48	san andreas smack disobedient hooker phone	San Andreas Heroin Phone disobedient whore.	San Andreas heroin hero phone disobedient whore.	San Andreas hero phone disobedient hooker.
48	grand theft auto san andreas going mobile december	December is the date of the carjacking.	The carjacking is coming in December.	Auto theft will take place sometime in December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas announced mobile	San Andreas was the scene of a carjacking.	The theft of cars was reported in San Andreas.	The carjacking was announced in San Andreas.
48	online bug changing character race gender japan	Online character-changing bug, race, gender, gender, japan.	I mean, an online bug changing the character, race, gender, gender, japan.	An online bug changing character, race, gender, genre, japan.
48	rockstar release grand theft auto san andreas mobile platform	Rockstar release large San Andreas flat auto flight-mobile form.	Rockstar release grand theft auto san andreas flat-form mobile.	Rockstar release grand theft auto san andreas flat-mobile form.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile device	The airport is located in the heart of the city, in the heart of the city.	Grand auto theft at Apos airport, Andréas, mobile aircraft to come.	Grand theft auto à l'apos; airport d'apos; Andréas, mobile aircraft to come.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile device december	Great Auto Flight San Andreas come mobile device December.	Grand theft auto san andreas come auto mobile device December.	Large theft auto san andreas come mobile device December.
48	patch avoided	Looks like the patch's been missed.	The patch has been avoided.	The patch was avoided.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile month	Big carjacking in San Andreas for the coming, moving month.	Big carjacking in San Andreas for the moving month ahead.	Big theft auto in San Andreas for the next moving month.
48	grand theft auto controversy game protested elementary school	The game of the theft of cars has been controversial and has protested against the school.	The carjacking controversy has protested against the elementary school.	The controversial auto theft game protested against the elementary school.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming io android december	San Andreas carjackings in December.	In December, a car was stolen in the city of San Andreas.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas in December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas hit mobile december	The carjacking in San Andreas took place in December.	The carjacking in San Andreas happened on a mobile in December.	The San Andreas auto theft took place on a mobile in December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile month	Big carjacking in San Andreas for the coming, moving month.	Big carjacking in San Andreas for the moving month ahead.	Big theft auto in San Andreas for the next moving month.
48	top cheat advantage heist	Holding @-@up de l' first cheater advantage.	The hold-up de l' advantage of the first cheater.	The advantage of the first cheat is the hold @-@up de l&apos.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming android december	It's the first time I've been in a carjacking.	Car theft at android in December.	Grand theft auto at the android in December.
48	online unlimited reputation update	Unlimited updating of the online reputation.	Unlimited update of online reputation.	Unlimited reputation update online.
48	san andreas coming phone	San Andreas arrives by phone.	Well, San Andreas is on the phone.	San Andreas is coming by phone.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile month	This is a big carjacking at the San Andreas moving month.	Big car theft at the moving month of San Andreas.	San Andreas mobile month auto theft.
48	audio file point casino indoor dirt track racing camera feature	Casino audio point inland track track camera function.	Casino Audio Point feature Inland Racetrack camera of dirt track.	Audio point casino camera function inland track racing ground track camera.
48	grand theft auto san andreas hit google play month	This carjacking happened in the Google Game Month.	Car theft took place in Google Game Month.	The auto theft took place in the Google month game.
48	san andreas mobile version coming december	San Andreas mobile in December.	San Andreas mobile version available in December.	San Andreas mobile version in December.
48	grand theft auto online gameplay video rumored content watch	Great theft of l' auto gameplay online video rumor of the monitoring of the content.	Big theft of l' online video gameplay video monitoring rumor.	L&apos grand theft; online auto gameplay video rumor monitoring content.
48	san andreas coming mobile device	San Andreas is on the move.	San Andreas is coming, mobile device.	San Andreas coming mobile device.
48	online cop killing gang going	Gang-killer cop go online, go.	Cop killer gang go online go.	Cop-killer gang go online go.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile release arrives month	The big carjacking and San Andreas mobile releases are coming in next month.	The grand theft auto and the San Andreas mobile releases are coming in next month.	San Andreas' grand theft auto and mobile releases arrive next month.
48	online future content leaked audio file casino pink slip	Future online content leak Audio Casino Pink slip file.	Content future online leak file Pink slip audio casino.	Future content online escape file Pink slip casino audio file.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming io month	There's gonna be a carjacking in a month.	The carjacking's gonna happen in a month.	Carjacking's gonna be in a month or so.
48	grand theft auto san andreas hitting smartphones tablet	Large San andreas auto theft hit smartphones tablet.	Large theft auto san andreas hit smartphones tablet.	Large theft auto san andreas hit smartphones tablet.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming io android window phone	Big auto flight San Andreas to come IO android phone window.	Grand theft auto san andreas to come IO android phone window.	Grand theft auto san andreas coming phone android window IO android.
48	beach bum pack reveals casino custom car racing future	It's about the future of the personalized racing of the casino.	The beach backpack reveals the apos; future of personalized casino car racing.	The beach backpack reveals the future of casino custom car racing.
48	san andreas coming iphone ipad window phone kindle fire	San Andreas will be coming soon iPhone iPad phone window turn on fire.	San Andreas coming to iPhone iPad phone fire window.	San Andreas coming phone iPhone iPad window phone turn on fire.
48	rockstar preparing port grand theft auto san andreas mobile	Rockstar stealing cars in Port Grand San Andreas Mobile.	Rockstar preparing to steal cars in Port Grand San Andreas Mobile.	Rockstar's prepping for auto theft in Port Grand San Andreas Mobile.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile phone	You know, big carjacking in San Andreas come cell phone.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas come cell phone.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas come mobile phone.
48	grand theft auto sans andreas io android window mobile amazon	Large car without Andreas window android mobile amazon.	Great auto flight without Andreas window android mobile amazon.	Grand theft auto without Andreas window android amazon mobile phone.
48	fill pocket heist	Armed robbery.	Filling armed robbery.	To fill armed robbery.
48	san andreas coming io android window phone	I.O. Android is on the way to San Andreas.	San Andreas is coming in I.O. Android window phone.	San Andreas I.O. Android window phone arrives.
48	san andreas coming mobile device december	San Andreas is the newest mobile phone in the world.	San Andreas comes from mobile device December.	San Andreas is coming mobile device December.
48	school advises buying child year	It's a great place to learn about the history of the city.	School advises us to buy the year of birth; child.	The school advises you to buy the year of birth; child.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile device month	We are looking forward to your visit in the near future.	Large car flight San andreas next month of apos; mobile devices.	Grand theft auto san andreas next month of mobile devices.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile device december	Great Auto Flight San Andreas come mobile device December.	Grand theft auto san andreas come auto mobile device December.	Large theft auto san andreas come mobile device December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas going mobile month	Big carjacking in San Andreas during the moving month.	Big auto theft in San Andreas during the mobile month.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas during the mobile month.
48	grand theft auto san andreas revived mobile	Carjacking revived cell phone service.	The carjacking operation has revived the mobile network.	Auto theft has revived our mobile network.
48	grand theft auto san andreas going mobile december	December is the date of the carjacking.	The carjacking is coming in December.	Auto theft will take place sometime in December.
48	san andreas hitting android december	San Andreas hits android, December.	San Andreas hits android in December.	San Andreas is hitting android in December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming android io window phone	I'm looking forward to your visit and I'm looking forward to your visit.	Grand theft auto san andreas to come android android Iio window phone.	Grand theft auto san andreas to come android Iio window phone.
48	san andreas mobile app release shock happiness	San Andreas mobile apps to release the shock.	San Andreas mobile app release the shock happy shock.	San Andreas mobile app release shock happy shock.
48	san andreas hit mobile	San Andreas just hit mobile.	San Andreas hit the mobile phone.	San Andreas hit mobile phone.
48	san andreas arriving io android window phone device month	San Andreas arrives at the Android window of Apos, a telephone company last month.	San Andreas arrives at the window of android d'apos; a phone last month.	San Andreas arrives at the android window d'apos; a phone device last month.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile device updated format	Big Auto San Andreas Flight to come mobile device update format.	Big theft auto san andreas to come mobile device update format.	Large theft auto san andreas to come mobile device updated format.
48	grand theft auto cheat code xbox weapon hea	Carjacking, scam, Xbox code, weapon, hea.	Carjacking, scam, Xbox code, weapon hea.	Grand theft auto, scam, Xbox code, weapon hea.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming io month	There's gonna be a carjacking in a month.	The carjacking's gonna happen in a month.	Carjacking's gonna be in a month or so.
48	grand theft auto san andreas hit mobile device december	In December, the carjacking hit the mobile aircraft.	The theft of cars hit the apos; mobile aircraft in December.	Auto theft hit mobile aircraft in December.
48	san andreas io android launch month	Launch month for San Andreas Iio android.	San Andreas Iio android launch month.	San Andreas Iio android launch month.
48	grand theft auto san andreas heading mobile device december	Large San Andreas auto flight heading towards a mobile device December.	Grand theft auto san andreas en route to a mobile device in December.	Grand theft auto san andreas heading to December mobile device.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming phone remastered graphic	This is the first time you'll be able to use a new phone.	Grand theft auto san andreas to come to you next graphics phone remastered.	Large theft auto san andreas to come graphic phone remastered.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming android december	It's the first time I've been in a carjacking.	Car theft at android in December.	Grand theft auto at the android in December.
48	san andreas landing december enhanced graphic support	L' San Andreas flight landing in December improved the graphical support.	L' December San Andreas landing improved graphical support.	L' December landing of San Andreas improved the graphic support.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile coming december video game	Big San Andreas Mobile Auto Flight coming up next December, San Andreas Video Game.	San Andreas Mobile Grand Auto Flight coming December video game.	Big San Andreas mobile car flight coming December video game.
48	san andreas coming io android kindle window mobile	San Andreas arrives in the middle of the city.	San Andreas arrives android kindle window mobile.	San Andreas arrives io android kindle window mobile.
48	grand theft auto san andreas announced smartphone tablet	Grand Auto San Andreas announced the Smartphone Tablet today.	Grand theft auto san Andreas has just announced the smartphone tablet.	Grand theft auto san Andreas announced smartphone tablet.
48	audio file point upcoming feature	Audiobook coming through.	Audio file coming up.	We'll have audio file coming up.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile	Big carjacking in San Andreas comes mobile.	Big car theft in San Andreas is coming mobile.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas arrives mobile phone.
48	san andreas coming iphone android window phone december	San Andreas arrives December android phone window iphone.	San Andreas arrives iphone android phone window December.	San Andreas arrives iphone android window phone December.
48	grand theft auto leaked audio file tease upcoming feature	The theft of the car has leaked file audio tease functionality to come.	The car theft leaked audio tease functionality file coming up.	Car theft has leaked audio file tease feature coming up.
48	grand theft auto dlc content leaked includes casino dirt racing	The reported grand theft of cars included a race of filth casino.	The grand theft of cars that's been leaked includes a crappy casino run.	The grand theft auto whose contents were leaked includes a casino run of filth.
48	score music grand theft auto	Music theft, carjacking, carjacking.	Music, carjacking, auto theft.	Music, grand theft auto, grand theft auto.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming wp io android december	December is the date of the carjacking.	The carjacking's gonna happen in December.	Auto theft will take place sometime in December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming iphone android window phone	Big San Andreas Auto Flight to come iPhone android phone window.	Great car flight San Andreas to come iPhone android window phone.	Grand theft auto san Andreas to come iPhone android window phone.
48	grand theft auto san andreas headed android scheduled drop	We have a big San Andreas head-android auto flight scheduled for release.	Grand theft auto San Andreas head android planned to be released.	Grand theft auto san Andreas head android planned release.
48	grand theft auto san andreas revived io android window phone	Auto theft revived apo system; I.O. Android window phone.	I.O. Android window phone has been updated with new features.	Car theft revived the d' I.O. Android window phone system.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile device month	We are looking forward to your visit in the near future.	Large car flight San andreas next month of apos; mobile devices.	Grand theft auto san andreas next month of mobile devices.
48	san andreas coming io physical controller support	San Andreas will arrive with the support of the physical controller.	San Andreas arrived with the physical controller support.	San Andreas comes with physical controller support.
48	title going mobile	Mobile heading mobile.	You know, mobile headline.	Mobile mobile heading.
48	grand theft auto san andreas hitting mobile month	Big-time carjacking in San Andreas in the moving month.	Big auto theft in San Andreas in the mobile month.	Uh, grand theft auto in San Andreas in the moving month.
48	grand theft auto san andreas hit io android window phone month	Large San Andreas Auto Flight to L' I.O. Android Telephone window month.	Large car flight San Andreas to l' I.O. Android window phone month.	Grand theft auto san Andreas to l' I.O. Android window phone month.
48	grand theft auto san andreas android io window phone coming	San Andreas Android's next stop is San Andreas Android's next stop.	Large car theft San Andreas Android Iio window phone to come.	Big car theft San Andreas Android window phone coming up.
48	grand theft auto dlc leaked	It's a carjacking.	The carjacking's leaked.	Well, the carjacking was a leak.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming android month	Well, the carjacking's gonna take place sometime in the android month.	The carjackings are gonna happen within the android month.	Auto theft will take place sometime in the android month.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile coming december	Carjackings in San Andreas Mobile, California, in December.	Auto theft in the city of San Andreas Mobile in December.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas Mobile in December.
48	san andreas rockstar announces mobile release	San Andreas Rockstar has announced the release of its mobile phone.	San Andreas Rockstar announces the release of their mobile phone.	San Andreas Rockstar announces mobile release.
48	grand theft auto san andreas window phone arriving month	Big car theft San Andreas window telephone coming month.	Grand theft auto San Andreas window San Andreas phone coming month.	Grand theft auto San Andreas window phone coming month.
48	san andreas set jump smartphone tablet bandwagon	San Andreas set jumps the train from the tablets to the smartphone.	San Andreas set just skips the smartphone tablet train.	San Andreas set skips the smartphone tablet train.
48	upcoming online content info leaked	We are pleased to announce the release of the following information on online content.	Details of the next online content have been released.	Upcoming online content information has been released.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming android december	It's the first time I've been in a carjacking.	Car theft at android in December.	Grand theft auto at the android in December.
48	san andreas coming iphone ipad game controller support	San Andreas comes with iPhone ipad, game controller.	San Andreas comes game controller iPhone ipad.	San Andreas is coming iPhone ipad game controller.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming io controller support infinity	I would like to thank you for your time and effort.	Great car ride san andreas come io controller infinity support.	Large theft auto san andreas come io controller infinity support.
48	san andreas mobile device december	San Andreas Mobile Device December.	San Andreas Mobile Device December.	San Andreas mobile device December.
48	san andreas move android io window phone	San Andreas is moving Android Iio phone window.	San Andreas moves Android Iio phone window.	San Andreas is moving Android phone window Iio.
48	san andreas coming io android window phone december	San Andreas arrives Iio Android window December phone.	San Andreas arrives Iio Android window phone December.	San Andreas arrives Iio Android window phone December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming io	Foreign carjackings.	Carjackings abroad.	Grand theft auto at the airport; stranger.
48	san andreas launching mobile	San Andreas launches motive.	San Andreas launches the motive.	San Andreas is launching the mobile now.
48	rockstar announces san andreas mobile	San Andreas Mobile is announced by the rock star.	Rockstar announces the San Andreas Mobile.	Rockstar announces San Andreas Mobile.
48	guide maximum xp update	Guide the upgrade of the xp version.	Guide the full update of the xp update.	Guide the xp update to maximum.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile device month	Mobile aircraft from San Andreas.	Great theft of cars in the month of September; mobile device of San Andreas.	Grand theft auto in the month of September; mobile device of San Andreas.
48	upgraded san andreas coming mobile	San Andreas has been modernized and arrives mobile.	San Andreas has been modernized and is mobile.	San Andreas has been modernized and is now in the process of being upgraded to a mobile phone.
48	san andreas coming android io december	San Andreas arrives in December.	San Andreas arrived in December.	San Andreas is a city in the north of France.
48	grand theft auto san andreas headed mobile platform month	The San Andreas International Airport is located in the heart of the San Andreas region.	San Andreas Grand Auto at the head of d' a month of mobile platform.	Grand theft auto San Andreas at the head of d' a month of mobile platform.
48	grand theft auto san andreas arriving mobile device december	Grand Thievery of Cars and Vehicles Arriving Mobile Aircraft December.	Grand theft of cars and of vehicles arriving mobile device December.	Large theft of cars and vehicles arriving mobile device December.
48	dlc feature casino	DLC offers a casino.	DLC offers a casino.	DLC offers casino services.
48	grand theft auto san andreas going mobile	This is a major carjacking in San Andreas.	Big car theft in San Andreas on mobile phone.	Uh, grand theft auto in San Andreas on a mobile phone.
48	san andreas coming mobile	San Andreas has arrived mobile.	And San Andreas is coming in mobile.	San Andreas mobile coming in.
48	rockstar san andreas coming mobile device	The Rockstar San Andreas will be arriving with a mobile device.	The Rockstar San Andreas comes with mobile device.	Rockstar San Andreas arrives with a mobile device on board.
48	audio file hint casino indoor racing	Audio file suggests a drive-by at a casino.	Well, the audio file suggests an indoor race to a casino.	The audio file suggests a casino run-in.
48	io apps dated san andreas doctor legacy assassin creed	Applications dating back to San Andreas Doctor Legacy Murderer creded.	I have applications dating back to San Andreas Doctor killer legacy creded.	Applications dating back to San Andreas killer legacy doctor creded.
48	san andreas coming select mobile device december	San Andreas is located in the heart of the city of San Andreas.	San Andreas arrives with a mobile device in December.	San Andreas arrives with mobile device in December.
48	san andreas mobile december	San Andreas Mobile December.	San Andreas mobile december.	San Andreas mobile December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas roll io android device	This is the first time I've had a chance to see you on the airplane.	Grand vol Auto-San Andreas, aircraft android d' electroencephalogram.	Grand vol Auto-San Andreas, android device d' electroencephalogram.
48	san andreas hitting mobile platform december	San Andreas reached the mobile-form-platform in December.	San Andreas reaches the platform-mobile form in December.	San Andreas reaches the mobile platform-form in December.
48	future online content spoiled leaked audio file	Future online content has ruined the leaked audio files.	Future online content ruined audio file leaks.	The future online content ruined the audio file leaks.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile coming december	Carjackings in San Andreas Mobile, California, in December.	Auto theft in the city of San Andreas Mobile in December.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas Mobile in December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas app game coming mobile device	This is the first time you'll be able to enjoy a great deal of fun.	Big theft auto san andreas game d' application arrives mobile device.	Grand theft auto san andreas game d' mobile device application arrives.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile december	Big carjacking in San Andreas Mobile, December.	Car theft in San Andreas Mobile December.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas Mobile December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming mobile device	The airport is located in the heart of the city, in the heart of the city.	Grand auto theft at Apos airport, Andréas, mobile aircraft to come.	Grand theft auto à l'apos; airport d'apos; Andréas, mobile aircraft to come.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile device	San Andreas, San Andreas, San Andreas, San Andreas, San Andreas.	Grand theft auto, mobile device from San Andreas.	San Andreas mobile phone, grand theft auto.
48	leaked grand theft auto audio file hint casino racing	A stolen car audio leak suggests a casino run.	A leak of the stolen car audio file suggests a casino run.	An auto theft audio file leak suggests a casino run.
48	rockstar game announces grand theft auto san andreas mobile	San Andreas Mobile, San Andreas Mobile, San Andreas Mobile and San Andreas Mobile.	The rock star game announces the theft of cars in San Andreas Mobile.	Rock star game announces San Andreas Mobile auto theft.
48	grand theft auto san andreas coming io month includes controller	The airport is located in the heart of the city, in the heart of the city.	The theft of cars at the airport d'apos; here a month includes the controller.	Auto theft at Apos airport; here a month includes controller.
48	grand theft auto san andreas break mobile device december	La grande volta auto san etreas contra la calidad y el servicio mobile de December.	Grand theft auto san andreas, break the apos; mobile device December.	Grand theft auto san andreas break the mobile device December.
48	game parent	C&apos is a d&apos game; child.	C&apos is a game of d' child.	C&apos is a game for children.
48	san andreas coming mobile apps december	San Andreas arrives with mobile applications in December of that year.	San Andreas arrives with mobile applications in December.	San Andreas arrives with mobile apps in December.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile releasing month	San Andreas Grand Auto Mobile release month.	Great San Andreas mobile auto theft release month.	Grand theft auto San Andreas mobile release month.
48	grand theft auto san andreas mobile version coming december	San Andreas mobile car theft in December.	Big theft of cars San Andreas version mobile in December.	Big theft auto San Andreas mobile version in December.
48	rockstar announces san andreas arriving android	The rock star will announce the arrival of the android San Andreas.	The rock star announces the arrival of the android San Andreas.	Rockstar announces the arrival of android San Andreas.
48	grand theft auto san andreas head mobile phone month	Big car theft in San Andreas head of mobile phone month-long mobile phone.	Grand theft auto in San Andreas head of mobile phone month mobile phone.	Big car theft in San Andreas head mobile phone month mobile phone.
48	hidden audio file grand theft auto casino street racing	Hidden audio theft car casino street racing.	Hidden audio file car theft casino street racing.	Hidden audio file theft of car casino street racing.
48	grand theft auto san andreas heading io android december	It is located in the centre of the city of Androde.	Grand theft de car en direction d' Android December.	Grand theft auto en direction d'apos; Android Decembre.
48	remastered san andreas coming mobile	Remastered San Andreas come to come.	Remastered San Andreas come mobile to come.	Remastered San Andreas come mobile come.
49	latest bcs ranking fresno state	The last two rank the apos; state of fresno.	The last bcs rank the apos; state of fresno.	The last bcs rank the fresno state.
49	western michigan unable northern illinois heisman hopeful	It's just a matter of time before we get there.	Western Michigan is unable to hope in the future; northern Illinois.	Western Michigan is unable to hope for northern Illinois.
49	lynch highlight senior night win wmu	Lynch highlight the victory of the night wmu wmu wmu wmu.	Lynch highlight the victory of the senior night wmu wmu wmu wmu.	Lynch highlight senior night win wmu wmu wmu wmu.
49	jordan lynch break ncaa record lead northern illinois western michigan	Jordan break ncaa lynch record at the top of the list; northern Illinois of western Michigan.	Jordan lynch break ncaa record number one on the map; northern Illinois, western Michigan.	Jordan lynch break ncaa record number one in west Michigan's northern Illinois.
49	northern illinois husky qb jordan lynch left heisman race	L' L' L' North Illinois husky qb jordan lynch has left breed Heisman.	North Illinois husky qb jordan lynch has left Heisman race.	North Illinois husky qb jordan lynch left Heisman race.
49	mac player raise draft stock bowl season	The pimp restarts draft-ball season.	The pimp player then restarts the draft ball season.	The mac player restarts the draft ball season.
49	niu perfect regular season win	Nu perfect season to win.	Niu perfect regular season to win.	Niu perfect regular season win it.
49	lynch roll northern illinois win western michigan	Illinois from the north to Michigan from the west.	Lynchage L' Illinois from the north to Michigan from the west.	L&apos lynching; L&apos lynching; Illinois from the north to Michigan from the west.
49	lynch husky bowl bronco	Lynch husky, bowl bronco.	Lynch husky bowl bronco.	Lynch husky bowl bronco.
49	wmu niu game note	Wmu, wmu, wmu, wmu, wmu, wmu.	Wmu niu note of the game.	Wmu niu game note.
49	jordan lynch lead niu bcs heisman invite	Jordan Lynch invites Niu Bcs Heisman.	Jordan Lynch invited Niu Bcs Heisman.	Jordan lynch invited niu bcs heisman.
49	husky host bronco senior day tuesday	Husky bronco hostel, senior day, Tuesday.	Husky bronco host, senior day Tuesday.	Host husky bronco senior day Tuesday.
49	lynch delivers heisman worthy performance	Heisman performed well during the lynching.	The lynching resulted in a performance worthy of the name of Heisman.	Lynching resulted in a performance worthy of the Heisman name.
49	northern illinois western michigan preview	It is located in the heart of the city, in the heart of the city.	D&apos View; Ensemble de l' Western Michigan in northern Illinois.	D&apos view; apos ensemble; western Michigan in northern Illinois.
49	northern illinois western michigan	Illinois, West Michigan.	North of the Apos; Illinois, west of Michigan.	It is located in the northwestern part of the state.
49	mac football week coverage final countdown	Last countdown to Mac soccer week.	This is the final countdown to the final countdown to the Mac football week.	Last countdown to mac football week.
49	jordan lynch break record heisman case	Jordan Lynch just broke the Heisman record.	Jordan Lynch broke the record on the Heisman case.	Jordan Lynch broke the record for Heisman.
49	stewart mandel bowl projection ready lot postseason maction	Stewart Maction Maction Maction Bowl Projection ready post-maction maction season.	Stewart projected bowl Mandel ready lot post-maction maction season maction.	Stewart Mandel bowl projection ready lot post-season maction maction.
49	northern illinois inch bcs ap	Illinois in the north of the island.	The northern part of the island.	North of Apos; Illinois inch bcs ap.
49	northern illinois jordan lynch remains heisman chase	Heisman Chase was the first to be killed by a lynch mob in North Illinois.	The lynching of North Illinois remains Chase Heisman.	The North Illinois lynch mob remains Heisman Chase.
49	lynch break qb rushing game record	The lynching broke qb's speed record.	The lynching broke the game speed record of qb.	The game speed record of qb is set by lynching.
49	northern illinois favored beat wmu football touchdown tuesday	L' Northern Illinois preferred the beat wmu touchdown on Tuesday.	L' Northern Illinois preferred beat wmu football touchdown on Tuesday.	North Illinois beat wmu football touchdown on Tuesday.
49	northern illinois stay undefeated	Northern Illinois undefeated.	L'apos; Illinois du Nord remains undefeated.	It's the first time I've ever been in North Illinois.
49	husky minute drill	I'm drilling by the Husky minute.	Drilling to the minute husky.	Minute husky drill.
49	updated mid american conference bowl projection niu	Update from the U.S. Niu Bowl Projection Conference.	Update of the American conference on the projection of the niu bowl.	Update from the niu bowl projection conference.
49	final northern illinois beat western michigan	L' Northern Final Illinois defeated Western Michigan.	L&apos, the final northern Illinois, has beaten western Michigan.	L' final northern Illinois beat western Michigan.
49	northern illinois qb heisman contender brilliant	The candidate of North Illinois, Qb heisman, is brilliant.	The candidate from Qb heisman, North Illinois, is brilliant.	North Illinois candidate Qb heisman is brilliant.
49	niu rout bronco completes perfect regular season	Niu rout bronco is a perfect complement to regular season.	Niu routine bronco complete perfect regular season perfect.	Niu routine bronco perfect regular season perfect.
49	jordan lynch career day northern illinois defeat western michigan	Jordan lynch career day, Northern illinois, beats western michigan.	Jordan lynch career day Northern illinois beats western michigan.	Jordan lynch career day Northern illinois beat western michigan.
49	northern illinois lynch wild	Wilderness in the north of l'apos; Illinois.	Wild lynching in the northern part of the island of Illinois.	Wild lynching in northern Illinois.
49	jacobson fleck western michigan niu	Jacobson Fleck Western Michigan Niu.	Jacobson Fleck western Michigan Niu.	Jacobson Fleck western michigan niu.
49	western michigan northern illinois preview husky win	The victory of the North Illinois Husky in Michigan's West End.	The victory of the North Illinois husky in the west of Michigan.	The victory of the husky of northern illinois in west Michigan.
49	western michigan northern illinois point spread pick husky eye bcs	The point of the summit is the northern Illinois of western Michigan, extending towards the husky eye.	The tip of the northern Illinois border in western Michigan extends towards the husky eye bcs.	The northern Illinois tip of western Michigan stretches towards the husky eye bcs.
49	lynch carry northern illinois undefeated regular season	The lynching brought the north of the city undefeated.	The lynching brought north illinois unbeaten regular season.	Lynching brings illinois north undefeated regular season.
49	husky race st joseph ind	St. Joseph's breed of husky.	This is the St. Joseph husky breed.	The St. Joseph husky breed.
49	northern illinois fresno state best bcs race	In the north of the island, the state of Illinois is the best racing race.	The north of l' Illinois fresno is the best race bcs race race.	North of the Apos; Illinois fresno state best race bcs race.
49	niu lynch pick mac offensive player week honor	Niu Lynch chooses Mac Offensive Player; player's Weekly Honour; honor.	Niu Lynch choose Mac offensive player d'apos; honor week d' honor.	Niu Lynch choose Mac offensive player d' honor week d&apos.
49	lynch set record niu roll	The lynching set the record, niu roll.	The lynching set the record niu roll.	The lynch set the record niu roll.
49	lynch break rushing record	The lynching is breaking the race record.	The lynching breaks the race record.	The race record was set by the lynch mob.
49	mountain west week review examining northern illinois jump bcs	Apos Week Review; Western Mountains looking at the hop bricks of northern illinois.	Weekly review of the west of the mountains looking at North illinois hopping bricks.	Review of the week of l' west of the mountains examining the bocks to jump of l' illinois northern.
49	cravatta score niu win	Cravatta, score, win, win.	Cravatta score nada win.	Cravatta score niu win.
49	illinois beat michigan	L' Illinois has beaten Michigan.	Lapos, Illinois beat Michigan!	Illinois beat Michigan.
49	fleck return bronco	Fleck goes back bronco.	Fleck turns brown.	Fleck back to bronco again.
49	wmu football northern illinois prediction beat writer david drew	Wmu football North illinois predicts David Drew.	Wmu football North Illinois prediction beat David Drew.	Wmu football north illinois prediction beat screenwriter David Drew.
49	tuesday college football roundup northern illinois western	On Tuesday, West Illinois University Football Club brings together the north of West Illinois.	On Tuesday college football brings together the north of West Illinois.	On Tuesday, college football is played in northern Washington, West Illinois.
49	preview western michigan northern illinois	Overview of l' Northern Illustration of Western Michigan.	A glimpse of the northern Illinois coastline of western Michigan.	Overview of l' northern illinois of western Michigan.
49	northern illinois qb jordan lynch putting western michigan	North of Michigan, Illinois, near lynch, Illinois, west of Michigan.	The northern part of the island; Illinois, jordan lynch places l' western Michigan.	Illinois qb jordan lynch places l' west Michigan.
49	western michigan head coach pj fleck	L' Head Coach of Western Michigan, PJ Fleck.	Western Michigan head coach, PJ Fleck.	L' head coach of western Michigan, PJ Fleck.
49	western michigan northern illinois preview capsule	Prediscovery Capsule of the North Illinois of West Michigan.	Capsule for preview of the northern illinois of western Michigan.	North illinois preview of western Michigan.
49	ball state teamreport	Report of the apo team; status of the ball.	Report of the apos; team of apos; condition of the balloon.	Moose report; Moose team; ball state.
49	jordan lynch break single game fbs qb rushing record	Jordan Lynch breaks the speed record for the first time in a single game.	Jordan Lynch breaks the speed record for fbs qb in just one game.	Jordan Lynch breaks the fbs qb speed record in one game.
49	previewing tuesday night tv game western michigan niu	The game will be available on Monday, August 27th, and on Saturday.	Forecast Tuesday night game Western Television Michigan Niu.	It's previewed Tuesday night game western television game Michigan Niu.
49	fleck return dekalb bronco	Fleck has come back from kalb bronco.	Fleck is back in the game.	Fleck back to dekalb bronco again.
49	jordan lynch set ncaa single game rushing record qbs	Jordan Lynch has set up a one-of-a-kind video game by breaking the qbs qbs record.	Jordan Lynch set the qbs qbs record for a unique game.	Jordan Lynch set up ncaa single game by beating the qbs qbs record.
49	niu move ap poll	Nuu movar a proba.	We're moving ap polling.	Nu move ap sondage.
49	buckeye bcs illinois	Illinois bockeye boc.	Buckeye bcs illinois?	Buckeye bcs illinois.
49	northern illinois teamreport	Northern Illinois team report.	Report from l'apos; team of l'apos; Northern Illinois.	Canadian Council on Social Development.
49	lynch record setting performance	Record-setting lynching of performances.	The lynching of performances d' setting of record.	The lynching of d&apos' performance figures; record setting.
49	northern illinois husky western michigan bronco pick odds prediction	L' illinois from the north, husky from the west of Michigan, bronco, predicts probabilities.	L&apos, northern Illinois, husky of west Michigan, bronco, predicts probabilities.	L&apos, northern illinois husky from west Michigan, bronco, predicts the odds.
49	jordan lynch hope crash heisman party husky bust bcs	Jordan Lynch Hope crash crash heisman husky party bus bcs.	Jordan Lynch Hope crash heisman party husky bus bcs crash.	Jordan Lynch Hope crash crash heisman party husky bcs.
49	niu husky wmu brutally honest preview	Niu husky wmu is brutally honest before-first.	Niu husky wmu brutally honest before-first.	Niu husky wmu brutally honest before-first.
49	ranked husky host bronco regular season finale	Classified as the final hostess husky bronco of the regular season.	Classified hostess husky bronco final of the regular season.	Classified husky bronco final regular season hostess.
49	men basketball face nebraska	Men are facing Nebraska.	The men are facing Nebraska.	The men face Nebraska.
49	jordan lynch break ncaa record niu rout	Jordan lynch break ncaa record, niu rout.	I don't know, Jordan lynch break ncaa record niu rout.	Jordan lynch break ncaa record niu rout.
49	fresno state football team bcs hope	L' Apos soccer team; state of Fresno Bcs hope.	L' football team; state of Fresno Bcs.	L' football team of l' state of Fresno Bcs hope.
49	lynch break rushing record niu win	Lynch break record, no record, no record, no record.	Lynch break record win niu record.	Lynch break record break record niu win.
49	niu focus finale bcs	Nu final focus, bcs.	Nu final focus bcs.	Our final focus bcs.
49	illinois rout ii st joseph ind	Routines from Illinois, Illinois, and Illinois.	It is also important to keep in mind that this is not an easy task.	Routines from Illinois ii joseph ind.
49	join niu husky detroit mac title game	Join the game husky niu detroit mac title.	Join the game niu husky detroit mac title.	Join the niu husky detroit mac title game.
49	college football niu western michigan	It's called college football, and it's called Western Michigan Football.	University Football niu western Michigan.	University football niu western Michigan.
49	northern illinois husky live stream watch online espn college football	North of the apos; Illinois husky live stream watching online university football espn online.	North of l' Illinois husky live stream watching online college football espn online.	North of the apos; Illinois husky live stream watching online espn college football online.
49	jordan lynch set fbs rushing record qb northern illinois win	"Jordan Lynch broke the record for fastest speed by breaking the record for the record for ""Northern Illinois."""	"Jordan Lynch broke the speed record by breaking the record for ""l'apos""; Northern Illinois."	Jordan Lynch broke the speed record by breaking the Northern Illinois record.
49	bronco battle niu fall	Bronco fight no downfall.	You know, Bronco fight no downfall.	Bronco battle niu down.
49	western michigan northern illinois key victory bronco	Michigan West North Illinois victory key Bronco victory.	Western Michigan North illinois key victory bronco victory.	Western Michigan North illinois key victory bronco victory.
49	western michigan northern illinois live score highlight	The highest point of the series is the living music of the northern Illinois of western Michigan.	Living music from l'apos; northern Illinois of western Michigan is the climax.	L'apos' live music, northern Illinois of western Michigan, is the climax.
49	niu bust lynch stock rise	Stop the apos; increase in actions lynch.	I'm sorry, but I don't think I'll be able to help.	Niu stop the' increase in lynch actions.
49	college football niu senior finish career unbeaten tuesday	It's the first time I've had a chance to play football in my life.	It's not like college football or senior football to end their undefeated career on Tuesday.	Neither college football nor senior finish their undefeated careers on Tuesday.
49	watch western michigan northern illinois preview tv schedule	Watch the TV program of the North Illnesses of West Michigan ahead-first.	Watching the television program of the l' North Illinois of the West Michigan in front-premiere.	Watch TV program from l' northern illinois of western Michigan ahead-premiere.
49	niu jordan lynch set record rushing yard game quarterback	Niu Jordan Lynch broke the watch record-back of lawn game.	Niu Jordan Lynch broke the watchkeeping record for-backyard lawn game.	Niu Jordan Lynch broke the-lawn game quarterback record.
49	niu western michigan husky bronco improve	Niu western michigan michigan husky bronco will improve.	Niu western michigan husky bronco improve.	Niu western michigan husky bronco improve upon.
49	jordan lynch legit heisman candidate	Jordan Lynch runs for Heisman.	Jordan Lynch rightfully ran for heisman.	Jordan Lynch legitimates heisman candidate.
49	point husky victory	Husky medium win.	Husky-point victory.	A point husky win.
49	beat writer banter qa northern illinois beat writer steve nitz dekalb	L' Beat Writer, North of the Apostles; Illinois Beat Writer, Steve Nitz Dekalb.	Lapos; writer of beat banter from the north of the apos; Illinois beats the apos; writer Steve Nitz Dekalb.	Lapos; beat writer from north of the Apos; Illinois beat apos; writer Steve Nitz Dekalb.
49	men basketball dominates	It is the most popular game in the world, and the most popular game in the world.	Basketball-ball d' men dominate basketballs-ball d' other men.	Basketball-ball d' other men dominate basketball.
49	northern illinois western michigan game preview tv schedule	North illinois game michigan western michigan preview TV schedule.	North illinois western michigan game preview TV schedule.	North illinois western michigan game preview TV schedule.
49	fresno state northern illinois	State of Illinois; Northern Illinois; State of Fresno.	State of l' Illinois in the north of l' State of Fresno.	Illinois, northern state of Illinois; Fresno state.
49	jordan lynch rush heisman race	Jordan Lynch rush-hisman breed.	Jordan Lynch rush heisman race?	Jordan lynch rush heisman breed.
49	lynch style	Lynching style.	It's lynching style.	You know, lynching style.
49	western michigan downed northern illinois	It's the only place in the world that's ever been killed.	Western Michigan brought down the apos; northern Illinois.	Western Michigan downed Apos; northern Illinois.
49	western michigan loses finale illinois	West Michigan is now losing the final Illinois.	West Michigan loses apo; Illinois loses final.	Western Michigan loses the final Illinois.
49	western michigan niu preview	L&apos before-premiere of West Michigan Niu.	L' before-premiere of West Michigan Niu.	L' before-premiere of the Michigan Niu West.
49	computer problem	Computer-Based Problems Computer-Based Problems.	Computer problem Computer problem.	Computer problem Computer problem.
49	lynch rush yard northern illinois rout michigan	Lynch north illinois rim michigan.	Lynch rush yard in the north of the illinois rund michigan.	Illinois north lynch rush yard rout michigan.
49	watch wmu gametime tv radio streaming preview	Watch wmu gametime tv radio streaming video preview.	Watch wmu gametime tv radio streaming preview.	Watch wmu gametime tv radio streaming preview gameplay.
49	husky finish regular season undefeated	The season ended with the husky returning to the U.S.	The husky finishes the undefeated regular season.	Husky finishes regular season undefeated.
49	northern illinois husky win bcs	The Husky of the North Island of Illinois won the Bcs.	The husky of the apos; northern Illinois won the Bcs.	The northern Illinois husky won the Bcs.
49	illinois shrug bcs question	The shoulders of the illinois.	Question about the apo's shoulders; illinois.	A question about illinois shoulders.
49	western michigan northern illinois live strea	Western Michigan North Illinois strea strea living strea.	Western Michigan North Illinois strea living strea.	Western Michigan North Illinois, live strea strea.
49	heisman watch jordan lynch break rushing record win	Heisman watches Jordan Lynch beat her speed record.	Heisman watching Jordan Lynch break his speed record.	Heisman watches Jordan Lynch break his speed record for the first time.
49	niu pass fresno st bcs standing ohio st	Our freshness stands at the same time.	Nuu passons fresno st bcs se tenait ohio st.	We pass fresno st bcs standing oh sto sto st.
49	bowl projection northern illinois wisconsin join bcs mix	This is the first time you'll be able to see the gameplay of the game.	Bow projection Wisconsin north of l' Illinois join bcs mix.	Wisconsin bowl projection from north of l' Illinois join bcs mix.
49	lynch break fbs record niu win wmu	This is the first time I've tried to do this.	Lynch break fbs record niu win wmu wmu.	Lynch break fbs record niu win wmu wmu.
49	niu finish perfect	It doesn't end perfect.	Niu finish perfect.	Niu finish perfect.
49	college football week western michigan bronco northern illinois	Westminster University Football Week Bronco Bronco North Illinois Football Week.	A week of college football in the north of the city.	University football week western michigan Bronco North illinois football week.
49	wmu close season loss niu	Wmu, Wmu, Wmu, Wmu, Wmu, Wmu, Wmu.	Wmu end of season niu loss niu.	Wmu end of season niu loss niu niu.
49	warszawski conspiracy explain northern illinois bcs leap	The warzawski conspiracy is the reason why the U.S. government has taken such a bold step.	This warzawski conspiracy explains the surge in northern Illinois.	The warzawski conspiracy explains the leap forward of northern Illinois.
49	photo niu wmu break ernate uniform maction	Photo by Nuu wmu breaking ernate uniform maction.	Picture niu wmu break ernate uniform maction.	Photo niu wmu break ernate uniform maction.
50	thai protest paralyse ministry	The protests are now paralysing the ministry.	Protests paralyze ministry.	Protests paralyse the ministry.
50	thai protester continue effort topple government	The Thai protest continues its efforts to overthrow the government.	The Thai protester continued his efforts to overthrow the government.	Thai protester continues efforts to overthrow government.
50	thailand protest escalate	The protests in Thailand are intensifying.	The Thai protests have escalated.	The protests in Thailand are intensifying.
50	anti govt protest spread area thailand capital	Anti-government protests-spread to Thailand's capital city.	Anti-government protests have spread to the capital city of Thailand.	Anti-government protests have spread in Thailand's capital city.
50	hrw thai opposition protest attack journalist	Hrwai, the journalist's opposition.	Hrwai, the protesting journalist of l' opposition.	Hrwai, the protest journalist from l'apos; opposition.
50	thailand slip worst political crisis bloody protest	Thailand is slipping even more into a bloody political crisis.	Thailand slides worse bloody political crisis protest.	Thailand slides worse political crisis bloody protest.
50	thai political protest spread bangkok	Thailand's political protests are widespread in Bangkok.	The Thai political protest movement s&apos is widespread in Bangkok.	Thai political protest s&apos are widespread in Bangkok.
50	thai protester urge civil servant join anti government push	Officials are urged by a Thai protester to join the fight against the government.	Thai protester urges government officials to join the fight against the Thai government.	A Thai protester urged government officials to join the anti-government fight.
50	bangkok protester demand people revolution	Protesters in Bangkok call for the popular revolution.	The protestor from Bangkok is calling for a revolution of the people.	Bangkok protester calls for people's revolution.
50	mass protest thailand government	Thai Government Mass Demonstration.	Mass protest by Thai government.	Thai government mass protest.
50	thai protest hit ministry	The Thai protest was a blow to the ministry.	And the Thai protest hit the ministry.	Thai protest hit ministry.
50	thai market edge government surviving confidence vote	The government of the country, the advantage of the Thai market, survives the vote of confidence.	Thai government's market advantage survives the vote of confidence.	The government of l'apos; Thai market advantage survives vote of confidence.
50	pressure build crisis hit thai government	The pressure crunch has hit the Thai government.	The pressure crunch hit Thailand's government.	The rising pressure crisis hit Thailand's government.
50	civil unrest grip thailand etf	It is a time of civil unrest, which has taken over Thailand and Thailand.	L' civil unrest has taken over Thailand and Thailand.	Thai and Thai civil unrest ensues.
50	thing opening bell	Something that opens the bell.	The thing that unlocks the bell.	The opening bell thing.
50	warrant issued suthep arrest	A warrant has been issued for Suthep's arrest.	A warrant was issued for the arrest of Suthep.	An arrest warrant was issued against Suthep.
50	thai demonstrator seek thaksin political dominance	The Thai protester has been trying to dominate the political scene.	The Thai protester sought to dominate the political scene.	The Thai protester seeks political dominance.
50	thailand protester street	Thai protesters' street.	Street of Thai protesters.	This is the street of Thai protesters.
50	report taiwanese thailand protest	Feature of the Thai Protest in Thailand.	Feature of Thai protest in Thailand.	Thailand protest report from Thailand.
50	thai government facing serious threat street political scientist	The Thai government is facing a serious threat: the Street Politologist.	The Thai government faces a serious threat: the street political scientist.	There is a serious threat to the Thai government: the street political scientist.
50	thai government building evacuated protester surround dept chief	Building of the Thai government evacuated protesting surrounded department head.	Thai government building evacuated protesting and surrounded department head.	Thai government building evacuated protester surrounded department head.
50	thailand parliement hold censure debate	The Thai parliament is discussing censorship.	Thailand's parliament is also holding a debate on censorship.	Thailand's parliament is holding a debate on censorship.
50	thai court approves arrest warrant top protest leader	The Thai court approved the terms of reference of the court; the decision of the head of the protest.	The Thai court approves the warrant of the ruling of the head of protest.	Thai court approves warrant from apos; protest leader's ruling.
50	rule mob law	Mobism-anti-law.	The @-@mobility anti-law.	The law against-mobism.
50	thai issue arrest warrant anti government protest leader	They issued a warrant against the leader of the protest against the government.	They're issuing a warrant for the arrest of the leader of the protest against the government.	They issue a warrant for the arrest against the leader of the protest against the government.
50	thai pm defends leadership statement parliament	Thai pm stands for the Thai Parliament leadership statement.	Thai pm defends the declaration of leadership parliament.	Thai pm defends Parliament's leadership statement.
50	thailand cut rate amid flagging growth	In fact, Thailand has reduced its growth rate in the middle of a slowdown.	Thailand reduced its growth rate in the middle of a slowdown.	Thailand reduced growth rate in the middle of a slowdown.
50	singapore issue travel advisory amid rally bangkok	A Travel Report is issued to Singapore during the Bangkok Rally.	A travel advisory was issued to Singapore during the Bangkok rally.	Singapore has a travel advisory during the Bangkok rally.
50	anti government protest escalate thailand	The protests against the government are intensifying in the country.	Protests against the government have intensified in Thailand.	Protests against government are intensifying in Thailand.
50	thai protester move ministry central bank cut rate	A Thai protester proposes a reduction in the interest rate on the central bank of the ministry.	A Thai protester proposed a reduction in the ministry's central bank rate.	A Thai protester proposes a central bank rate cut for the ministry.
50	thai judge release arrest warrant protest leader	The Protestant leader is released from the judge's mandate.	The judge releases the protesting leader from the term of office.	The judge releases the protest leader from Apos; judgment.
50	thailand opposition group attacking journalist	A group of protesters from Thailand attacked a journalist.	A group of Thai opposition attacked a journalist.	Thai opposition group attacked journalist.
50	censure debate yingluck jarupong ruangsuwan kick	Yingluck jarupong censorship debate ruangsuwan kick.	The debate censorship yingluck jarupong ruangsuwan kick.	The censorship debate yingluck jarupong ruangsuwan kick kick.
50	thai protester besiege ministry confidence debate	The protestor Thai besieged the debate on the ministry's confidence.	The Thai protester besieged the debate over the confidence of the Thai ministry.	The Thai protesters besiege the debate on confidence of ministry.
50	baht extends loss confidence debate amid protest	Baht is extending the debate about trust in loss to the midst of protests.	Well, Baht extends the debate about trust in loss to the midst of protest.	Baht extends the loss confidence debate to the midst of protest.
50	india advises national thailand alert	L' India has advised a Thai national alert.	L&apos, India advises a Thai national alert.	L' India advises a national alert from Thailand.
50	warrant issued arrest thai protest leader	A warrant was issued for the arrest and detention of Thailand's protesting leader.	A warrant was issued against the Thai protest leader.	A warrant was issued for the arrest of the protest leader of Thailand.
50	thai protester besiege ministry	A Thai protester has laid siege to the ministry.	A Thai protester besieged the ministry.	Thai protester besieges ministry.
50	thai leader invokes security law amid protest	Thailand's leader has been invoking the security law in the midst of protests.	The Thai leader invokes the security law in the midst of protests.	Thailand's leader invokes security law amidst protests.
50	update thai protester step campaign oust government	Update the protesters' anti-government protest campaign.	Update the current protest campaign of the protesters against the government.	To update protesters' campaign against the government.
50	thailand rocked anti govt protest	Thailand has been rocking anti-government protests.	Thailand rattled anti protests-governments.	Thailand shook the anti protests-governments.
50	thai government building evacuated protester ministry	L&apos, a Thai government building, has evacuated protestors' ministry.	The Thai government building has evacuated the ministry of protesters.	Thai government building evacuated the ministry of protesters.
50	thailand expects export grow cent year	Thailand is expecting its exports to increase by one cent a year.	Thailand's exports are expected to grow at a rate of -1 per cent per year.	Thailand expects its exports to increase by one cent a year.
50	anti govt protest swell thailand	Thailand is swelling with protests against the government.	Protests against the government are swelling Thailand.	Protests against government swell Thailand.
50	protest continue bangkok despite imposition security	The protests continue in Bangkok, despite the security measures that have been imposed.	Demonstrations continue in Bangkok, despite the security measures imposed.	Demonstrations continue in Bangkok despite security measures.
50	besieged running thailand finance ministry	Thailand's Ministry of Finance is under siege.	Beleaguered heading Thailand's Ministry of Finance.	Beleaguered running Thailand's Ministry of Finance.
50	interview military coup feared cap thailand massive anti gov protest	Interview coup; dreaded military state Thailand massive protest against-governments.	Interview coup d' feared military state of Thailand massive anti-government protests-governments.	Interview coup d' military state feared Thailand massive anti-government protest-governments.
50	thai political protest paralyse ministry	Political protests are paralysing the ministry.	The political protests are now paralysing the ministry.	The ministry is paralysed by political protests.
50	thailand protest spread tourist area bangkok	Thai protests have expanded the tourist zone of Bangkok.	The Thai protest has expanded Bangkok's tourist zone.	Thailand's protest expanded Bangkok's tourist zone.
50	thai pm offer dialogue political unrest	Thai pm offers the possibility of dialogue; political agitation.	Thai pm offers the dialogue l' political unrest.	Thai pm offers dialogue l' political unrest.
50	protest thai government continues	Protests that the Thai government will continue to protest.	Protest that Thai government continues.	Thai government protests continue.
50	roundup thai government premise siege anti gov protester	Assemble government headquarters against government protesters.	Assemble the government headquarters against the protestors.	Assemble the government headquarters against the government protesters.
50	thai protester occupy state building	A protestor from Thailand occupies a building in the state of Apos.	A Thai protester occupies a building in the Apos; State.	A Thai protester occupies a state building in Apos.
50	ousted thai leader thaksin shinawatra call shining age king	The ejected Thai chief, Thaksin shinawatra, called the King of the Apos; brilliant age.	The ousted Thai chief, Thaksin Shinawatra, summons the King of the Apos; Brilliant Age.	The ousted Thai leader, Thaksin shinawatra, calls the king of the shining age.
50	thai protest leader call people revolution demonstration enter	The leader of the Thai protest is calling for people to demonstrate in the revolution.	The leader of the Thai protest calls on people to demonstrate the revolution.	Thai protest leader calls people to protest the revolution.
50	thai protest widen bangkok central bank cut rate	Thai protest to widen the central bank of Bangkok to reduce the interest rate.	Thai protest widen Bangkok central bank to reduce the interest rate.	Thai protest widen Bangkok central bank reduce the interest rate.
50	thai protester street	Thai protesters street.	The Thai protest street.	Protest street in Thailand.
50	thai anti gov protester block state agency bangkok	Anti-government protesters-governorate in Thailand are blocking the government of Bangkok.	Anti-demonstrators-governorate thai blocked the office of the Bangkok state.	Protesters anti-governorate thai block the apos agency; state Bangkok.
50	thai protester besiege govt building call pm quit	Thai protesters besieged by the government are calling for a halt.	A Thai protester being besieged by the government calls for abandonment.	A government-stressed Thai protester calls for immediate withdrawal.
50	lawyer appeal court warrant arrest protest leader suthep	Advocate of the Court of Appeal; Appeal of the Court of Appeal; judgment of the leader of the protest Suthep protest.	Counsel Court d' appeal warrant d' ruling leader of protest Suthep protest.	Advocate Court d'apos; Appeal warrant d'apos; Suthep protest leader judgment.
50	thai opposition kick trust debate street protest continue	Protests against the confidence debate continue.	Protests on the streets of L'apos; opposition to the confidence-building debate continue.	The protests street de l'apos; opposition against the debate on trust continue.
50	british government update advises citizen avoid bangkok phuket protest	The UK government is advising citizens to avoid protests in Bangkok Phuket.	The British government advises its citizens to avoid demonstrations in Bangkok Phuket.	UK government advises citizens to avoid Bangkok Phuket protests.
50	pm call meeting ministry siege	Call the seat of the ministry.	Call the seat of the ministry at the meeting.	Please call the ministry headquarters at the meeting.
50	thailand unexpectedly cut rate protest crimp outlook	Thailand unexpectedly lowered protest rates.	Thailand unexpectedly lowered its protest rates.	Thailand had unexpectedly lowered its protest rates.
50	thai politician lead protester defy government	The Thai politician who leads the protest movement defies the government.	The Thai politician leading the protests defies the government.	Thailand's protesting politician challenges the government.
50	protest thailand escalate crisis developed	Protest Thai escalating crisis developed.	Thai protest escalating crisis escalation.	Protests in Thailand escalate crisis developed.
50	thailand capital tense political rival rally	There is a rally of political rivals in the Thai capital.	The Thai capital is holding a rally of political rivals.	Thailand's capital is holding a political rival rally.
50	uncertainty defines thailand political future	L' Uncertainty defines Thailand's political future.	L' uncertainty defines Thailand's political future.	L' uncertainty defines the political future of Thailand.
50	thailand suthep dissent crusher turn protest leader	Thailand suthep dissident crush to turn leader of protest leader.	Thailand suthep dissident crush to turn protest leader leader.	Thailand suthep dissident crush turn protest leader leader.
50	anti government protester occupy government ministry	An anti-government protester, @-@government, occupies the ministry.	An anti-demonstrator @-@government occupies the seat of the ministry.	An anti @-@government protester occupies the ministry.
50	thai ministry besieged oust leader	The Thai government has been besieging the ousted leader.	The Thai Ministry besieged the ousted leader.	The thai ministry has laid siege to the ousted leader.
50	protester drive oust government bangkok	Protesters are now ousting Bangkok's government.	The protesters ousted the government of the city of Bangkok.	Protesters oust the government of Bangkok.
50	court asked review suthep warrant	Court's filed a writ of review against Suthep.	The court's asked for a writ of review against Suthep.	The court asked for a review order against Suthep.
50	thailand travel warning issued protester gather	Protest rally for Thai travellers.	Warning to travelers from Thailand: protest rally.	Warning to travelers from Thailand: rally of protesters.
50	china urge stability thailand	In Thailand, China is pushing for stability.	China's pushing for stability in Thailand.	China brings stability to Thailand.
50	thai protester threaten seize ministry	The protestor is threatening to sue the government for damages.	The Thai protester is threatening the ministry.	Thai protester threatens to seize the ministry.
50	thai protester force ministry evacuation oust gov	A Thai protester forced apo to evacuate the government by the Ministry of Foreign Affairs.	A Thai protester forced the government to evacuate the city.	A Thai protester forced the ministry to evacuate the government.
50	spreading thai anti government protest raise fear violence	Disseminating Thailand's anti-government protest-government raises fear and violence.	Disseminating Thai anti @-@government protest stirs up fear and violence.	Thai broadcasting anti @-@government protest stirs fear violence.
50	thailand protester besiege ministerial building seeking govt ouster	A Thai protester has laid siege to the government building in search of a new government eviction.	A Thai protester besieged the ministerial building in search of a government eviction.	Thai protester besieges ministerial building in search of government eviction.
50	thai government building evacuated protester surround ministry	Government buildings evacuated from protest are surrounding the ministry.	Evacuated protestors government buildings surround the ministry.	The government buildings evacuated protesters surround the ministry.
50	thai protester call nationwide occupation government building	A Thai protester calls for a visit to the National Occupation of the government building.	A Thai protester calls for national occupation of the government building.	A Thai protester is calling for the government building to be annexed to the government building.
50	thai protester besiege government	Thai protesters have been besieging the government.	The protesters in Thailand are laying siege to the government.	Thai protesters besiege government.
50	thai opposition protester continue occupying state building	The protestor of the Thai opposition continues to take control of the building of the state.	The protester of the apos; Thai opposition continues to d*apos; occupy the building of Apos; State.	Thai opposition protester continues to d&apos occupy the building of l' state.
50	finance ministry named protest site	The Ministry of Finance named the site of the protest.	The treasury department named the protest site.	The Ministry of Finance named the protest site after him.
50	thai protester move ministry effort oust pm	A Thai protester lobbies the Ministry of Interior and Kingdom Relations to eliminate the MP.	A Thai protester presses the ministry to eliminate the PM.	Thai protester puts pressure on ministry to remove PM.
50	thai protester enter finance ministry bid oust yingluck	A protestor from Thailand entered the Ministry of Finance and demanded that he be expelled from Yingluck.	A Thai protester went to the Ministry of Finance and demanded that Yingluck be expelled.	A Thai protester enters the Ministry of Finance and demands Yingluck's expulsion.
50	question answer thailand political protest	Answer to Questions Thai Political Manifestation.	Answer to questions: Political demonstrations in Thailand.	Thai political protests answered questions.
50	thailand cut interest rate political strife compound weakening outlook	In addition, the U.S. economy is expected to grow at a faster rate than the U.S. economy.	Thailand has lowered interest rates, which has worsened the outlook for further weakening.	Thailand has lowered interest rates, worsening the outlook for weakness.
50	thailand anti government protester mass interior ministry	Minister of Interior, protesting against the Thai government.	Protesters against the Thai government, Interior Minister.	Protesting against the government of Thailand, Minister of Interior.
50	anti government protester thailand target ministry	Target the ministry, protesting against the Thai government.	Protest against the Thai government, target the ministry.	Protesting against the government of Thailand, target the ministry.
50	thai protester move ministry office anti government push	A protestor from Thailand is moving the Minister's office against the government.	A Thai protester is moving the minister's office against the government.	A Thai protester moves the minister's office against the government.
50	thai protester intensify campaign bring government	Protesters in Thailand are stepping up their campaign to bring in the government.	Thai protesters are stepping up their campaign to bring in the government.	Thai protesters intensify campaign to bring government.
50	protester force evacuation thai fbi aim invade ministry	A protestant forces the government to evacuate the area and invade the area.	One protester forces them to evacuate thai fbi to invade the ministry.	A protester is forcing a thai fbi evacuation to invade the ministry.
50	thai protester march main govt complex	Thai protesters, walk on top of the main government compound.	Thai Protesters, walk on the main government compound.	Thai protesters, walk on main government compound.
50	thai protester surround interior ministry	The Interior Ministry is surrounded by a Thai protester.	A Thai protester surrounds the Ministry of the Interior.	Thai protester surrounds Ministry of Interior.
50	thailand revers course post trade deficit october	Thailand turned the tide after the country's October trade deficit.	Thailand turned the tide after October's trade deficit.	Thailand turned the tide after the trade deficit in October.
50	concerned rising tension thailand	Concerned about rising tensions in Thailand.	I was worried about the rising tension in the country.	Concerned about the rising tension in Thailand.
50	thai protester anti government push	He is being pressured by a protester from Thailand against the government.	A Thai protester against the Thai government is putting pressure on him.	There's a Thai protester against the government pressuring him.
50	suthep ready police ambush	Suthep is about to be ambushed by police.	Suthep setting up police ambush.	Suthep ready police ambush.
50	suthep scorn arrest warrant	Judgment against Suthep disdainful.	Prison term; judgment against Suthep disdainful.	A warrant was issued for the arrest of Suthep.
50	court upholds warrant suthep	The court's confirmed the Suthep warrant.	The court has confirmed the Suthep warrant.	The court upholds the Suthep warrant.
50	thai protester force evacuation top crime agency	A Thai protester is forcing the government to evacuate the country's highest-ranking law enforcement agency.	Thai protester forces apos to evacuate the highest criminal agency.	A Thai protester forces apos; evacuation of the highest criminal agency.
50	mind coup protest flood tourist coming thailand	It's a great place to stay, and it's a great place to stay.	A coup d'apos; state of mind, a flood, a tourist from thailand.	A coup d'apos; state of mind, flood, a tourist coming from Thailand.
50	protest shake thailand stability	Protests are also shaking Thailand's stability.	The protests undermine Thailand's stability.	Protests shake Thailand's stability.
50	thai protester vow seize state office nationwide topple government	The Thai protester swears de s' capturing the seat of the State of Apostle; national scale to overthrow the government.	The Thai protester swears de s' take the seat of the apo; state to apo; national scale to overthrow the government.	The Thai protester swears de s' to seize the seat of the state; to overthrow the government on a national scale.
50	thai protest widen bangkok	Bangkok was enlarged by the Thai protest.	The protest in Thailand widens Bangkok.	Thai protest widens Bangkok.
50	thai anti government protester target ministry	Anti-demonstrator-Thai government targets ministry.	Anti-demonstrator-Thai government targets the ministry.	The anti-demonstrator-Thai government targets the ministry.
50	demonstration bangkok raise concern stability thailand	The protest in Bangkok also raises concerns about Thailand's stability.	The protest in Bangkok raised concerns about the stability of the country.	Bangkok protests raise concerns about Thailand's stability.
50	thai protester vow seize state office nationwide escalating political crisis	The Thai protester has vowed to take over the city's seat of statehood, statehood, and statehood, deepening the political crisis.	The Thai protester vowed to take over the seat of the state of Apos, on a national scale, which aggravated the political crisis.	Thailand's protester vowed to seize the Apostolic State's seat at the national level, which aggravated the political crisis.
50	question protest thailand	Questioning the Thai protest.	To question the validity of the Thai protest.	Question the protest Thai.
50	thai protester occupy ministry pm face confidence vote	The Thai protester occupies the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the Ministry of Foreign Affairs.	The Thai protester is occupying the ministry pm in face of vote of confidence.	Thai protester occupies ministry pm face to vote of confidence.
50	update thai protester rally main government complex	Updating Thai protestors at the main gathering government complex.	Update Thai protesting main government complex main gathering.	Update Thai protesting main government complex gathering.
50	thailand cut interest rate escalating protest add pressure economy	Thailand has reduced interest rates by escalating protests, which has increased the pressure on the country's economy.	Thailand has reduced interest rates by escalating protests, increasing the pressure on the economy.	Thailand has cut interest rates by escalating protests, which is putting more pressure on the economy.
50	protest thailand	Thai protests.	It's a Thai protest.	You know, Thai protest.
50	thai protest widen	The protest by the Thai government was amplified.	The Thai protest s' amplifies.	Thai protest amplifies.
50	russian advised avoid visiting bangkok	They advise you not to visit Bangkok.	Russians advise not to visit Bangkok.	Russians advise d' avoid visiting Bangkok.
50	yingluck pressured thailand ministry seized southeast asia	Yingluck put pressure on the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and seized the website of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs.	Yingluck lobbied the Thai Ministry and seized South Asia-East.	Yingluck lobbied Thailand's ministry and seized Laos; South Asia-East.
50	update thai protester occupy main government complex	Thai Update Protesting Occupying the Main Government Complex.	Thai update protesting occupying main government complex.	Thai Update protesters occupy main government compound.
50	thai protester call nationwide uprising	There is a Thai protest calling for a national uprising.	A Thai protester calls for national uprising.	A Thai protester is calling for a nationwide uprising.
50	thailand protest ministry surrounded bangkok	Bangkok has been surrounded by Thailand's protest ministry.	Thailand's protest ministry has now surrounded Bangkok.	The Thai protest ministry surrounded Bangkok.
50	thai protester plan demonstration	A Thai protester.	Demonstration by a Thai protester.	A protest by a protester from Thailand.
50	indonesia rupiah drop thai baht fall debt sale fail	Indonesia rupiah drop thai baht drop thai baht debt sale fail.	Indonesia rupiah drop thai baht debt sale fall fail.	Indonesia rupiah drop thai baht fall debt sale fail.
50	thai protester seize ministry	A Thai protester, S&apos, has seized the ministry.	A Thai protester s' takes over ministry.	A Thai protester grabbed the ministry.
50	escalating thailand protest seek unseat yingluck shinawatra	L' escalating Thai protests to seek out yingluck seats shinawatra siege.	L' escalation of Thai protests seek seats yingluck shinawatra siege.	L' escalating Thai protests seek siege yingluck shinawatra seats.
50	thailand country torn yellow red	Torn red-yellow Thailand.	Torn red-yellow country of Thailand.	Thailand country torn red yellow.
50	thai opposition hold fourth day demonstration	L' Thai opposition organizes a protest on Day 4.	L' Thai opposition organizes a protest on the fourth day.	L' Thai opposition organizes a fourth day protest.
50	thai protester step campaign oust government	The protesters in Thailand are campaigning to oust the government.	The Thai protesters are campaigning to oust the government.	Thai protesters campaign to oust the government.
50	thing today	Today is for today.	Today's thing is for today.	The d&apos thing today is for today.
50	wrapup thai protester move ministry central bank cut rate	The end of the Thai rally proposes a reduction in the interest rate on the central bank of the ministry.	The end of the Thai protest proposes a rate reduction of the central bank of the ministry.	The end of the Thai protest proposes a central bank rate cut.
51	birth death star captured large telescope	The Death Star has captured a large telescope.	Death star has captured a large telescope.	The death star captured a large telescope.
51	stunning image large magellanic cloud reveals fiery star birth	The sky is full of stars and stars, and the sky is full of stars and stars.	A striking image of the apoes; a large magellanic cloud reveals the birth of flaming stars.	A large magellanic cloud reveals the birth of flaming stars.
51	eso release surreal image star birth death large magellanic cloud	Eso release l'apos; image surreal of the death of d'apos; star of birth large cloud of magic.	Eso release the apos; surreal image of death d' great magellanic birth star.	Eso release the surreal image of death d' great magellanic birth star.
51	fiery drama star birth death	Dramatic, inflamed, birth-star-de-dead drama.	Burning drama born-of-death celebrity.	The inflamed drama of a dead birth star.
51	birth death star spectacular photo	Spectacular photo of l' Natural Death Star.	Spectacular photo of l' natural death star.	A spectacular photo of l' star of natural death.
51	fiery drama star birth stellar death	A spirited drama... a stellar birth... a stellar death.	It was a fiery drama... a stellar birth... a stellar death.	A fiery drama a stellar birth a stellar death.
51	star stuff star birth death captured dramatic intergalactic tableau	The death by birth of the stars has captured a dramatic, intergalactic picture of the universe.	The death by birth of the stars captured a dramatic intergalactic picture.	Death by birth of stars captured dramatic intergalactic picture.
51	dragon head nebula beauty beast amazing telescope view	Dragon face nebulous beast nebulous beast incredible telescopic view.	Dragon head nebulous beauty beast incredible telescopic view.	Dragon head nebulous beauty beast amazing telescopic view amazing.
52	nj officer rescue unconscious driver burning truck amid flame blinding	An NJ officer rescues an unconscious driver as he burns a truck in the middle of a blinding flame.	New York City police rescue an unconscious driver burning a truck in the middle of a blinding flame.	NJ policeman saves an unconscious driver burning a truck in the middle of a blinding flame.
52	police officer pull man burning truck	A policeman shoots a man from a truck that's on fire.	Policeman shoots a man from a burning truck.	A police officer pulls a man from a burning truck.
52	cape officer brave rescue landing man burning truck caught	He was a cloak-and-dagger officer, a relief man, a sober man, a large fire, a truck.	Cape officer, a man from a great relief, a man from a great fire, a truck.	L'apos; cape officer, a man from France, a great help, a big fire, a truck.
52	video police officer rescue man burning vehicle	A police video officer saves a man who's burning a vehicle.	And a video police officer rescues a man who's burning a vehicle.	A video police officer saves a man burning a vehicle.
52	nj officer rescue man burning truck	The NJ cop rescues a man who burns a truck.	The NJ cop saves a man from burning a truck.	NJ policeman saves a man who's burning a truck.
52	caught camera fiery rescue	Fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire	Fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire	S' agir d' a rescue operation d' emergency and d' a fire feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu feu fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire fire.
52	jersey police officer rescue driver burning truck	He is also the driver of a truck that is on fire.	L' police officer from Jersey is the driver of a burning truck.	L' Jersey police officer is a burning truck driver.
52	caught cam officer save man burning truck	It is a case of force majeure.	It's a case of force majeure.	It is important to note, however, that this is not a case of force majeure.
52	nj cop rescue unconscious man burning car	Well, an NJ cop saves an unconscious man from burning a car.	NJ rescues an unconscious man who's burning a car.	NYPD cop rescues an unconscious man burning a car!
52	caught cam fiery rescue	It is taken from a campfire.	It's a campfire.	It's caught in a campfire.
52	video nj cop pull man burning truck	Video footage from the NJ Cop shoot fireman truck.	Video NJ Cop pulling man truck on fire.	Video NJ Fcop pull man fire truck.
52	cape cop save man burning car	The man who burns his car is the same as the man who burned his car.	The cape cop saves the apos; the man who burns his car.	The cape cop saves the apos; man burning his car.
52	true hero dramatic moment cop pull unconscious driver burning car	Real hero drama time cop shot driver unconscious on fire car.	Real dramatic hero cop moment shot driver unconscious on fire car.	Real dramatic hero cop moment fire unconscious driver on fire car.
52	video cape cop pull man burning truck	Cap Cape Cop shoots man on fire truck.	Cape Cop shoots man truck fire truck fire.	Cape Cop shoots man truck fire truck fire.
53	ape escape bonobo german zoo flat screen tv	A monkey escapes from German bonobo flat-screen TV flat-screen zoo.	A monkey escapes German flat-screen TV zoo bonobo flat-screen.	A monkey escapes from a German bonobo TV flat screen zoo flat screen TV.
53	human expansion squeezing bonobo population congo	Human expansion compressing the population of bonobo congo.	L' human expansion compressing the population of congo bonobo.	L' human expansion compressing bonobo congo population.
53	bonobo serious danger losing habitat range human	It is important to note that there is a high risk of loss of habitat; human range.	Bonobo serious risk of habitat loss; habitat; human range.	Bonobo serious danger of loss of habitat; human range.
53	bonobo ape threatened poaching forest disintegration study	The Monkey Bonobo threatened to poach the Apos; the study of the disintegration of the forests.	The monkey bonobo threatened to poach the apos; study on forest disintegration.	The bonobo monkey threatened to poach the forest disintegration study.
53	bonobo habitat threatened human activity forest loss	It was not easy to get rid of the forest, but it was easy to get rid of it.	The bonobo's habitat threatened the trees, and human activity threatened to make the forest disappear.	The bonobo's habitat threatened human activity to make the forest disappear.
53	study find forgotten ape threatened human activity forest loss	It was discovered that the forgotten monkey was a threat to human activity.	The study found that there was a threat to human activity due to the presence of the forgotten monkey.	The study revealed that the forgotten ape threatened the apos; human activity.
53	endangered bonobo threatened forest loss poaching study	In addition, Bonobo, a threatened species of d'apos; extinction, threatened to carry out a study on forest poaching.	Bonobo, threatened with extinction, threatened to carry out a study on forest poaching.	Bonobo, a threatened forest species, threatened with extinction, threatened to carry out a forest poaching study.
53	forest fragmentation human activity threatening bonobo population	Fragmentation of the L&apos forest; human activity is a threat to the Bonobo people.	Fragmentation of the forest L' human activity threatens the bonobo population.	Forest fragmentation L' human activity threatens bonobo population.
53	study reveals forgotten ape vulnerable poaching forest loss	Forgotten monkeys are vulnerable to poaching, according to one study.	One study shows that forgotten monkeys are vulnerable to poaching.	One study shows forgotten monkeys are vulnerable to poaching.
53	bonobo hurtling extinction	Bumping Bonobo towards the apos; extinction.	Bonobo headed for the apos; extinction.	It's like a bonobo racing towards the end of the world.
53	rare fellatio ape face extinction interaction human	It's not easy to see how humans and apes interact with each other in the face of death.	Apos; man-monkey interaction facing apos; extinction is rare.	L' interaction between the human and the ape in the face of apes; extinction is rare.
53	bonobo losing habitat fast pace study	In addition to the above, there are a number of options.	Bonobo habitat loss fast pace study.	Bonobo habitat loss fast pace study.
53	forgotten ape risk habitat loss poaching percent animal range	It is important to note, however, that there is a high risk of extirpation and extinction.	Risk of loss of habitat; monkey habitat Poaching of animals; range of animals.	Risk of ape loss; monkey habitat Ape poaching; animal range.
53	forgotten african ape risk habitat loss poaching	It's a great place to live, and it's a great place to live.	Forgotten Africa could lose its habitat by poaching.	An ape d'apos; Forgotten Africa risks losing its habitat by poaching.
53	hippie chimp losing ground people study	Hippie chimpanzee loses ground, people start studying.	This hippie chimpanzee is losing ground, people are studying.	The hippie chimp loses ground, people study.
53	bonobo ape tech german zoo banana food tv porn	Monkey Bonobo German technology banana zoo food tv porn.	Bonobo monkey German technology zoo banana food porn tv.	Bonobo monkey German technology zoo banana food tv porn.
53	forgotten ape threatened poaching forest loss study reveals	A forgotten monkey is threatening to poach the L&apos forests; a study of the L&apos forest reveals a loss of forest.	Forgotten ape threatens to poach L&apos forests; study reveals a loss of forest.	A forgotten ape threatens to poach the forests of L' study reveals a loss of forest.
53	bonobo lost percent habitat	Bonobo loses a percentage of its habitat.	Well, Bonobo's lost a percentage of his habitat.	Bonobo's lost a percentage of its habitat here.
53	bonobo endangered great ape face threat growing human population	Bonobo threatened big ape to face the growing threat of ape population.	Bonobo threatened great ape to face the growing threat of the human population.	Bonobo threatened great ape facing growing human population threat.
54	blu life pro unveiled inch display quad core processor mm	Blu Life Pro released a quadruple mm processor.	Blu Life Pro has released a new quadruple processor inch.	Blu Life Pro unveiled inch a quadruple processor mm.
54	blu life pro android super thin smartphone measure mm thick	Blu-Life Pro android measures super-thin, thick-machine smartphone.	Blu-life pro android measuring super thin smartphone thick mm.	Blu life pro android measuring super thin smartphone thick mm.
54	blu unveils life pro currently thinnest hd smartphone	Blu unveils the latest in professional life, the thinnest of all smartphone hds.	Blu unveils the world's thinnest professional smartphone hd.	Blu unveils the life pro currently the thinest smartphone hd.
54	blu life pro aimed selfie set megapixel front cam	Blu-Life Pro selfie aims to put megapixel before camcorder.	Blu life pro selfie aims to put megapixel before cam cam.	Blu life pro selfie aims at megapixel before cam cam.
54	blu life pro lay claim thinnest android phone inch display	Blu-Life pro lay claims the thinnest phone android screen thumb phone display inch phone.	Blu-Life Pro Lay claims the thinnest android phone screen thumbs inch phone display.	Blu life pro lay claims the thinnest android phone screen thumb phone display inch phone display.
54	blu life pro thinnest inch hd smartphone	Blue Life Pro Thinnest Inner is the smallest smartphone.	Blue Life Pro Thinnest Inner is the smallest smartphone.	Blue Life Pro Thinnest Inner is the smallest smartphone in the world.
54	blu announces thinnest inch smartphone blu life pro	Blu announces the thinnest professional life blu smartphone.	Blu announces thinest smartphone blu life pro.	Blu announces the thinest smartphone blu life pro.
54	blu life pro	Blue-living professional.	The blue-living professional.	Uh, blue-lifestyle professional.
54	blu product life pro unveiled thinnest inch hd smartphone	The blu-product-lifestyle professional has just unveiled the finest smartphone in the series.	The most refined smartphone of the series was unveiled by the blu product professional.	The blu product life professional unveiled the finest smartphone in the series.
54	blu product announces addition flagship life series smartphone	The product blu announces the addition of d' a smartphone bearing the-standard of the Life series.	The blu product also announces the addition of d' a smartphone bearing the Life series.	The blu product announces the addition of d' a-Life series smartphone.
54	blu life pro sport inch screen quad core processor price tag	L' price tag of the quadruple processor core of l' life-pro-sport inch blue screen.	L' quadruple core processor price tag; sport pro-sport blue screen.	L' quadruple core processor price tag of l' life pro sport blue screen inch.
54	blu life pro mp front camera greatly improve selfies	Selfies are greatly enhanced by the front-end, life-pro-mp.	The blue life-pro-mp front-end camera greatly improves the selfies.	The blue life pro mp front-end camera greatly enhances selfies.
54	blu life pro smartphone rock mediatek ghz quad core processor	Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray Blu-ray.	Blu-life pro smartphone rock mediatek ghz quad core processor.	Blu-fi life pro smartphone rock mediatek ghz quad core processor.
54	blu life pro spec release reasonable price	Blu-Life Pro Spec is a reasonably priced release.	Blu life pro spec release is reasonable price.	Blu life pro spec release reasonable price.
55	doggie scofflaw bagged dna testing	Doggie Scofflaw just bagged the DNA tests.	Doggie Scofflaw bagged them DNA tests.	Doggie Scofflaw bagged the dna tests.
55	mass condo turn dna force pet pooper scooper compliance	Spin the mass condo; D.N.A. shovel force animal shovel compliance shovel.	Mass condo turn the apos; animal shovel force DNA shovel compliance shoveler.	Mace condo turn l'apos; DNA shovel force animal shovelers compliance shoveler.
55	dna test help bag dog doo scofflaw mass town	The DNA test is helping pack the Doo Scofflaw Mass Town dog.	The DNA test helps pack Doo Scofflaw Mass Town.	Well, the DNA test helps pack the doo scofflaw mass town dog.
56	lara logan producer ordered leave aftermath minute	Lara Logan's producer's ordered time off to the minute.	Lara Logan's producer ordered time off to the minute.	Lara Logan's producer ordered a one-minute vacation.
56	cbs lara logan minute leave	Lara Logan Cbs is on leave.	Cbs Lara Logan's day off.	Cbs Lara Logan minute off.
56	lara logan leave absence minute	Lara Logan absent for one minute.	Lara Logan's missing for a minute.	Lara Logan is out of town for a minute now.
56	lara logan suspended minute benghazi report error	Lara Logan put a one-minute suspension on the Benghazi report, which was a mistake.	Lara Logan's suspended a minute, mistake in the Benghazi report.	Lara Logan suspended a minute, Benghazi report error.
56	lara logan leave cbs inferior benghazi story	Lara Logan leaves Cbs history Benghazi inferior.	Lara Logan left Cbs's Benghazi history inferior.	Well, Lara Logan leaves Cbs Benghazi history inferior.
56	leave absence lara logan flawed benghazi report	Lara Logan has vitiated the Benghazi report.	Leave Lara Logan vitiated the Benghazi report.	And leave Lara Logan vitiated the Benghazi report.
56	cricket daily time minute bungle	Cricket time every day, minute bungle bungle.	Cricket bungle bungle daily time minute.	Cricket daily time minute bungle bungle.
56	lara logan ordered leave absence minute	Lara Logan ordered a minute's worth of absenteeism.	Lara Logan ordered one minute of absenteeism.	Lara logan ordered a minute of absence.
56	lara logan leave absence botched benghazi report	Lara Logan lack of a botched leave-of-absence Benghazi report.	Lara Logan no botched leave Benghazi report.	Lara Logan absence of botched benghazi report.
56	lara logan leave minute report benghazi	Lara Logan, this is the Benghazi time-out report.	Lara Logan, Benghazi minute off report.	Lara Logan, Benghazi leave minute report.
56	cbs order leave benghazi story	Cbs orders Benghazi Benghazi history to stand down.	Cbs orders Benghazi to leave Benghazi history alone.	Cbs orders to leave Benghazi history benghazi.
56	lara logan producer suspended false minute report	Lara Logan's producer suspended-fake minutes reporting.	Lara Logan's producer has suspended the-report of false minutes.	Lara Logan's producer suspended the-report of false minutes.
56	cbs lara logan leave botched story obama visit hollywood	Cbs Lara Logan leaves the studio and Obama visits Hollywood.	Cbs Lara Logan leaves the apos; botched Obama story tours Hollywood.	Cbs Lara Logan leaves the studio; botched story Obama visits Hollywood.
56	cbs asks lara logan leave flawed benghazi report	Cbs has asked Lara Logan to drop the defective Benghazi report.	Cbs asks Logan to drop the defective Benghazi report.	Cbs asks Lara Logan to drop the Benghazi report as defective.
56	minute reporter logan leave amid benghazi report fallout	He left in the middle of Benghazi's fallout.	The reporter left right in the middle of Benghazi's fallout.	The reporter left in the middle of Benghazi's fallout?
56	cbs minute reporter leave benghazi story	Cbs-minute reporter leaving Benghazi history.	Cbs minute reporter leaving Benghazi history.	Cbs minute reporter leave the history of Benghazi.
56	cbs lara logan producer ordered leave	Permission was granted by Cbs producer Lara Logan.	Cbs producer Lara Logan has ordered permission.	Cbs producer Lara Logan ordered permission.
56	lara logan leave minute benghazi report	Lara Logan just stepped out of the Benghazi report.	And Lara Logan is leaving the Benghazi report.	Lara Logan is leaving the minute report benghazi.
56	lara logan leave minute review slam benghazi story	Lara Logan leaves the Benghazi slam minute-by-minute story.	Lara Logan leaves the minute-minute slam benghazi story.	Lara Logan leaves the minute slam benghazi story minute review slam.
56	lara logan leave absence minute	Lara Logan absent for one minute.	Lara Logan's missing for a minute.	Lara Logan is out of town for a minute now.
56	lara logan longer hosting cpj dinner	For a long time now Lara Logan has been hosting a cpj dinner.	Lara Logan has been hosting a cpj dinner for a long time.	Lara Logan has been hosting a cpj dinner for years.
56	logan leave absence minute report	Logan debriefed on leave.	Report from Logan; absence on leave.	Logan report card; absence on leave.
56	mike huckabee label lara logan hero journalist discredited benghazi	Mike Huckabee label Lara Logan hero discredited Benghazi journalist.	Mike Huckabee label Lara Logan hero journalist discredited Benghazi.	Mike Huckabee label Lara Logan hero journalist discredited Benghazi.
56	cbs lara logan leave absence benghazi report	Cbs lara logan absentee benghazi report.	Cbs lara logan no benghazi vacation report.	Cbs lara logan no benghazi leave report.
56	minute lara logan ordered leave	Lara Logan ordered the day off the minute she did.	Lara Logan ordered a leave the minute she did.	Lara Logan ordered leave the minute she did it.
56	jeff fager minute cbs chief draw scrutiny wake benghazi	Chief of the minute, Jeff Fager, scrutinize Benghazi Wake.	Jeff Fager, minute leader Cbs, scrutinize Benghazi Wake.	Jeff Fager, minute leader Cbs, magnifying glass, Benghazi Wake.
56	cbs punishes logan producer	Cbs is punishing the producer of logan.	Cbs punishes the producer of logan.	Cbs punishes logan producer.
56	internal review benghazi report cbs logan leave	Benghazi Internal Review logan leave report cbs logan.	Benghazi in-house journal report cbs logan congé.	Benghazi internal review report cbs logan leave.
56	minute lara logan ordered leave absence cbs	The minute Lara Logan called it off.	The minute that Lara Logan ordered the absences.	The minute Lara Logan ordered the absences.
56	lara logan leave flawed minute report	Lara Logan reports a defective-minute report.	Lara Logan left a flawed-minute report.	Lara Logan left a report-of a minute malfunction.
56	jeff fager minute cbs chief draw scrutiny wake benghazi	Chief of the minute, Jeff Fager, scrutinize Benghazi Wake.	Jeff Fager, minute leader Cbs, scrutinize Benghazi Wake.	Jeff Fager, minute leader Cbs, magnifying glass, Benghazi Wake.
56	minute reporter lara logan leave benghazi report	Lara Logan is leaving Benghazi reporting.	The journalist Lara Logan is leaving Benghazi reporting.	The journalist Lara Logan is leaving the report from Benghazi.
56	update cbs news minute reporter lara logan leave	Update Cbs new minute reporter Lara Logan exit.	Update Cbs news minute reporter Lara Logan exit.	Updating Cbs news minute reporter Lara Logan quit.
56	cbs suspends lara logan producer benghazi report	The Cbs is suspending producer Lara Logan Benghazi's report.	The Cbs suspended the report from producer Lara Logan Benghazi.	Cbs suspends report from producer Lara Logan Benghazi.
56	lara logan minute producer leave discredited benghazi	Lara Logan, a producer, has left Benghazi.	Lara Logan minute producer leaves Benghazi discredited.	Lara Logan minute producer discredits discredited Benghazi.
56	reporter cbs bungled benghazi report leave	Reporter Cbs missed the report on Benghazi and just took off.	Reporter Cbs missed the Benghazi report and left town.	Well, reporter Cbs missed the Benghazi report and took off.
56	lara logan producer leave cbs find minute benghazi story	Lara Logan producer, leaving Cbs to find out minute Benghazi story.	Lara Logan producer leaving Cbs find minute Benghazi story.	Lara Logan producer leaving Cbs find minute benghazi story.
56	lara logan told leave absence minute benghazi story	Lara Logan shared the moment's story of Benghazi's absence.	The story of the minute of Benghazi's absence.	Lara Logan told the story of the minute of the absence of Benghazi.
56	minute journo leave wake bogus benghazi report	Reporter minutes to leave s' stir up false Benghazi report.	Journalist minute leave s' arouse false Bangazi report.	Journalist minute leave s' arouse false report benghazi.
56	cbs correspondent ordered leave	The Cbs correspondent called it in.	The Cbs correspondent has ordered a leave of absence.	Cbs correspondent ordered a leave of absence.
56	cbs news correspondent producer forced leave benghazi report	CBI news correspondent left Benghazi reporting.	CBI news correspondent has left Benghazi reporting.	CBI news correspondent has left the reporting Benghazi.
56	lara logan ordered leave absence cbs	Logan ordered a sabbatical.	Lara Logan ordered a sabbatical.	Well, Lara Logan ordered a sabbatical.
56	lara logan leave botched benghazi minute report	Lara Logan has left, leaving behind a botched account of Benghazi's minute.	So Lara Logan left, leaving a botched account of Benghazi's minute.	Lara Logan left with a botched report of Benghazi's minute in the air.
56	lara logan involuntary time minute benghazi	Lara Logan unwitting Benghazi minute.	Lara Logan has involuntary Benghazi minute.	Lara Logan involuntary benghazi minute.
56	punishment time cbs sideline lara logan msnbc dump alec baldwin	Lara logan msnbc cbs sideline penalty time drop alec baldwin.	Time of punishment cbs sideline lara logan msnbc drop alec baldwin.	Punishment time cbs sideline lara logan msnbc drop baldwin alec.
56	lara logan producer suspended flawed minute benghazi report	Lara Logan, Lara's producer, has suspended the Bangla Minute report, which was defective.	Lara Logan, Lara's producer, suspended the defective Benghazi minute report.	Lara Lara's producer Lara Logan suspended the Bangazi minute report that was flawed.
56	minute lara logan producer leave fau benghazi report	The minute Lara Logan Producer leaves the Benghazi Fawns report.	The minute that Lara Logan producer leaves fau benghazi report.	The minute Lara Logan producer leaves fau benghazi report.
56	cbs lara logan producer leave discredited benghazi report	Cbs Lara Logan, producer, exits the Benghazi report.	Cbs Lara Logan producer exits discredited Benghazi report.	Cbs Lara Logan producer leave discredited Benghazi report.
56	cbs news internal review find benghazi story deficient respect	The internal C.B.C. News magazine finds that Benghazi history is disrespectful.	The C.B.C.'s in-house news review found that Benghazi's story was disrespectful.	The internal review of the C.B.C. News finds Benghazi's history disrespectful.
56	lara logan leave absence minute benghazi report	Lara Logan, she's been AWOL at the Benghazi minute.	Lara Logan, cleared to the Benghazi minute.	Lara Logan, allowed to miss the minute Benghazi.
56	lara logan minute benghazi report leave absence	Lara Logan, Benghazi Minute, Report of Absence.	Lara Logan benghazi minute report from apos; absence.	Lara Logan minute benghazi report d'apos; absence.
56	minute correspondent lara logan producer leaf absence	Lara Logan Head Correspondent no production leaves.	Head Correspondent Lara logan absence of producing leaves.	Correspondent-in-chief lara logan absence of producing leaves.
56	lara logan leave minute report	Lara Logan, you have a minute's notice.	Lara Logan, minute off report.	Lara Logan, leave minute report.
56	minute correspondent leave botched benghazi report	Correspondent moment, please exit botched Benghazi report.	Correspondent minute to leave the botched Benghazi report.	Correspondent minute leave botched Benghazi report.
56	cbs punishes logan producer	Cbs is punishing the producer of logan.	Cbs punishes the producer of logan.	Cbs punishes logan producer.
57	microsoft anti google ad trash chromebook real laptop	Microsoft Anti-Google Advertising Chromebook.	Microsoft chromebook anti google advertising real laptop.	Microsoft anti google advertising chromebook real laptop chromebook.
57	microsoft aim google chromebook	Google Chromebook for microsoft.	Go to the ChromeBook site for more information.	Go microsoft on Google Chromebook.
57	microsoft scroogled campaign hit low pawn star guy	The scroogled microsoft campaign just hit the weakest star guy.	The microsoft scroogled campaign has hit the weak star guy pawn.	The microsoft scroogled campaign hit the weak star guy pawn.
57	microsoft scroogled video	Microsoft scrooglée video.	Video scrooglée microsoft.	Video microsoft scrooglée.
57	pawn star chromebook microsoft behalf	Pion star microsoft chromebook chromebook for the account of microsoft.	Pion star microsoft chromebook chromebook for microsoft.	Pion star chromebook microsoft for the account of microsoft.
57	scroogled campaign chromebooks pawn star	Scroogled chromebooks campaign pawn star.	Scroogled campaign chromebooks pawn star.	Scroogled campaign chromebooks pawn star.
57	chromebook coming age	Ageing chromebook.	Chromebook aging.	Uh, aging chromebook.
57	microsoft scroogled campaign google chromebook	Microsoft Scroogled and Google Chromebook Campaign.	Microsoft scroogled Google Chromebook campaign.	Microsoft scroogled campaign Google Chromebook.
57	microsoft enlists pawn star commercial targeting google chromebook	It recruits pawnbrokers who target Google Chromebook.	Microsoft recruits pawnbrokers who target Google Chromebook.	Microsoft recruits pawnbrokers targeting Google Chromebook.
57	ancoris hit microsoft anti google campaign	L' ancoris has now reached Google anti-campaign microsoft.	L' ancoris has reached microsoft anti-Google campaign.	L' ancoris has reached microsoft anti Google campaign.
57	microsoft scroogled campaign target chromebooks	Microsoft Scrooglé is a targeted chromebook campaign.	Microsoft scrooglé target campaign chromebooks.	Microsoft scrooglé target campaign chromebooks.
57	google chromebook latest scroogled ad pawn star	Google Chromebook latest pawn star scroogled.	Google chromebook last scroogled ad pawn star.	Google chromebook latest scroogled ad pawn star.
57	microsoft attack chromebook latest scroogled embarrassment	Microsoft attacks last scrooglé chromebook embarrassed embarrassment.	Microsoft attacks chromebook last scrooglé embarrassed.	Microsoft attacks chromebook latest embarrassment scrooglé.
57	microsoft scared chromebooks launch smear campaign	Microsoft Chromebooks launches a defamation campaign.	Microsoft Chromebooks launches a defamation campaign.	Microsoft Chromebooks launches a campaign of defamation.
57	microsoft latest scroogled ad chromebook brick	This is the latest edition of the Microsoft scrooglé ad chromebook brick.	Microsoft latest scrooglé ad chromebook brick.	Microsoft latest ad chromebook brick scrooglé.
57	microsoft bash chromebook latest video pretty brick	Microsoft bash chromebook is the last video of the game.	Microsoft bash chromebook last video pretty brick.	Microsoft bash chromebook latest pretty video brick.
57	pawn star bach chromebooks terrible scroogled ad microsoft	Star Bach Chrome Pion Terrible scrooglée ad microsoft.	Pion Star Bach Chromebooks terrible scrooglé ad microsoft.	Star Bach Chrome Chrome Books ad microsoft scrooglé terrible.
57	microsoft hire pawn star bash google chromebooks	Microsoft rental star pion bash-google chromebooks.	Microsoft rent star pion bash google chromebooks.	Microsoft rent bash google chromebooks star pion.
57	microsoft latest scroogled ad set sight chromebook	Microsoft latest chromebook vision set scrooglé.	Microsoft latest scrooglé ad set vision chromebook.	Microsoft latest scrooglé ad set vision chromebook.
57	microsoft enlists pawn star latest scroogled ad	Microsoft is currently recruiting pawnshops for the latest scrooglée ad.	Microsoft's recruiting pawnshops for the latest scrooglée ad.	Microsoft is recruiting new pawnshops for the latest ad scrooglée.
57	microsoft enlists pawn star slam chromebook latest scroogled hit	Microsoft adds slam star chromebook pion last scroogled hit.	Microsoft enroll pion star slam chromebook last scroogled hit.	Microsoft enlists pion star slam chromebook latest scroogled hit.
57	microsoft hire pawn star attack google	Google attacks Microsoft location pawn star.	Microsoft location pawn star attacks google.	Microsoft location pawn star attacks Google.
57	microsoft mock chromebook latest anti google scroogled ad	Motif chromebook microsoft latest in anti-google scroogled advertising.	Microsoft ChromeBook Motif latest anti google scroogled advertising.	Motif chromebook microsoft latest anti google scroogled advertising.
57	microsoft star pawn star going buying	L&apos, microsoft's pawn star, is about to buy some money.	Microsoft pawn star L&apos is going to buy silver.	L' microsoft pawn star will buy silver.
57	pawn star troll google chromebook latest microsoft scroogled ad	Star troll google pawn chromebook latest scrooglée advertising microsoft.	Pion star troll google chromebook last ad scrooglée microsoft.	Pion star troll google chromebook latest microsoft scroogle advertising.
57	microsoft scroogled campaign chromebooks video	Microsoft Scroogled Campaign: Video ChromeBooks.	Microsoft scroogled video chromebooks campaign.	Microsoft scroogled campaign chromebooks video chromebooks.
57	google chromebooks winning business	Business-winner Google Chromebooks.	Google Chromebooks wins business.	Google Chromebooks winning business.
57	microsoft trash google chromebooks ad video	Microsoft google trash chromebooks video chromebooks.	Microsoft trash google chromebooks video chromebooks.	Microsoft trash google chromebooks video video.
57	microsoft scroogled gear sell fast	Microsoft's scrooglated machine is sold quickly.	L' microsoft scrooglé machine is sold quickly.	L' microsoft scrooglé machine is a fast sell.
57	microsoft rope pawn star potshot google chromebooks	E-mail address, e-mail address, e-mail address, e-mail address.	Microsoft cord star potshot google chromebooks.	Microsoft cord star potshot google google chromebooks.
57	microsoft claim google chromebook real laptop ad	Sale of chromebook microsoft google real laptop chromebook announces.	Sale of the microsoft google chromebook real laptop announced.	Sale of microsoft google chromebook real laptop announced.
57	microsoft chromebooks con compliment chromebooks	Microsoft Chromebooks with additional features such as chromebooks and chromebooks.	Microsoft chromebooks with complementary chromebooks and chromebooks.	Microsoft chromebooks with chromebooks add-on.
57	chromebooks debate post mortem bad deal	Chromebooks debate bad business postmortem.	Chromebooks debate post mortem bad business deal.	I mean, chromebooks debate post mortem bad business.
57	microsoft strange ad trash google chromebooks	Microsoft's weird ad trashogle google chromebooks.	Microsoft weird ad trash google chromebooks ad.	Microsoft strange ad trash google chromebooks.
57	microsoft corporation nasdaq msft mock google goog	Google Google simulation by Microsoft Corporation nasdaq msft.	Microsoft Corporation msft nasdaq simulate Google Google.	Microsoft Corporation nasdaq msft simulate Google Google.
57	xbox bookless library microsoft attack chromebooks tech news	Xbox Library without Microsoft Book attacks chromebooks tech news.	Xbox library without microsoft book attacks chromebooks tech news.	Xbox library without microsoft attack chromebooks tech news.
57	microsoft attack google chromebooks scroogled video advertisement	Google Chromebooks Microsoft Attack Scrooglé video advertising.	Google Chromebooks scrooglé video advertising microsoft attack.	Google Chromebooks microsoft attack scrooglé video advertising.
57	microsoft tap pawn star guy fun chromebook	Microsoft star pawn fun fun chrome chrome chrome chrome chrome guy.	Microsoft star player fun chromebook fun chrome guy.	Microsoft pion star guy fun chromebook funchrome.
57	microsoft tap pawn star guy bash chromebooks scroogled ad	Microsoft Pwn star guy bash scroogled advertising chromebooks.	Microsoft Pwn star guy bash chromebooks scrooglé advertising.	Microsoft Pwn star guy bash chromebooks scrooglé ads.
57	microsoft latest scroogle campaign slam google laptop	Microsoft latest slam Google Google Google Google mobile phone campaign Google laptop.	Microsoft latest slam google campaign scroogle mobile phone google laptop.	Microsoft latest scroogle campaign slam google portable google laptop.
57	microsoft latest scroogled ad pawn star rip google	This is Microsoft's latest update on the game.	Microsoft latest scroogled ad pawn star response google.	Microsoft latest scroogled ad pawn star rip google.
57	microsoft enlists pawn star mock google chromebooks	Google Chrome's fake pawnbooks are being recruited by Microsoft.	Microsoft's recruiting fake Google Chrome pawnbooks.	Google Chrome is one of the most popular games in the world.
57	microsoft pawn star attack google chromebook	A Microsoft Pion Star attacker attacks Google Chromebook.	A microsoft pawn star is attacking Google Chromebook.	A microsoft pawn star attacks Google Chromebook.
57	microsoft enters spirit xmas rip google head	Microsoft Enters Inside; Mind Xmas Tear Google Head.	Microsoft goes into mind Xmas tear google head.	Microsoft enters into the apos; spirit Xmas tear google head.
57	microsoft enlist reality tv star unreal claim chromebooks	Microsoft enroll reality TV unreal star claim chromebooks unreal.	Microsoft enroll reality TV star unreal claim claim chromebooks unreal.	Microsoft enroll reality TV star unreal claim chromebooks unreal.
57	pawn star guy dis chromebooks microsoft ad	Chromebook star pawn microsoft ads.	Pion star guy chromebooks microsoft ads.	Pion star guy chromebooks microsoft ads.
58	gchq called crack password watkins child abuse case	"It's called the ""Crack Watkins Password"" and it's called child abuse."	Gchq called crack watkins password case of child abuse.	Gchq called crack watkins child abuse case password.
58	lostprophets rocker pleads gui long list depraved sex crime	Perdusprophets rocker argues for a long list of depraved sexual crimes.	Perdusprophets rocker pleads to a long list of depraved sex crimes.	Perdusprophets rocker pleads long list of depraved sex crimes.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui child sex offence including attempted	The Prophets of the Lost Warriors plead for a sexual offence against children, including an attempt to commit a sexual offence.	The lost prophets plead to a sexual offence against children, including an attempt to commit an offence.	The lost prophets plead a sexual offence against children, including an attempted sexual offence.
58	lostprophets frontman ian watkins pleads gui series child sex offence	Perdus Prophets Frontman Ian Watkins has been advocating a series of sexual crimes against children.	Perdus Prophets Frontman Ian Watkins pleads for a series of sexual crimes against children.	Perdus Prophets Frontman Ian Watkins pleads for a series of child sex offenses.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui attempted rape fan baby	Lost Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads that the baby rapist has been trying to get raped.	The singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleads that the baby rape fan has been trying to get raped.	Lost Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads that baby rape fan has attempted to be raped.
58	lostprophets frontman change plea infant rape case gui	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Perdusprophets frontman change advocate rape d' child's case.	Perdusprophets frontman change plea of rape d' child cases.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui charge including count	The lost prophets,ian watkins, plead the charge, including the count.	And the lost prophets ian watkins plead to the charge, including the count.	The lost prophets ian watkins plead mistress, including the count.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex abuse	The singer, Ian Watkins, is a vocalist and advocate for the cause of child abuse.	Ian Watkins, singer of Les Perdus, pleads for child sexual abuse.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins pleads for child sexual abuse.
58	ian watkins disgraced lostprophets singer facing year jail sickening	Ian Watkins disgraced the singer of the Prophet Lost and faced a revolting prison year.	Ian Watkins disgraced the singer of the Prophet Lost and faced a gruesome year in prison.	Ian Watkins disgraced the singer of the Prophet Lost and faced a year of sickening prison.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex offence	The singer of Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleaded guilty to the crime of sexual intercourse as a child.	The singer of Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleads the sex crime of children.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads to the child sex offense.
58	bandmates glad closure	They are happy to have moved on.	The members of the group are happy to have moved on.	The group was pleased to learn that they had moved on to the next phase of their lives.
58	ian watkins police warn twitter facebook user identify victim	Ian Watkins, a Facebook user, alerts us to the victim's name and address.	Photo police Ian Watkins warns the apo user Twitter facebook; victim identification.	The police warn Ian Watkins, user Facebook user, victim identification.
58	lostprophets singer pleads gui attempting rape baby	The singer of the Lost Prophets argues in favor of the baby's attempted rape.	The singer of the Lost Prophets pleads in favor of the attempted rape of the baby.	Lost Prophets singer pleads in favor of the baby's attempted rape.
58	rock singer ian watkins admits sex offence including attempted rape baby	The singer-songwriter Ian Watkins admits to having committed a sexual offence, including an attempt to rape a baby.	Rock singer Ian Watkins admits committing a sexual offence, including attempted rape of a baby girl.	Rock singer Ian Watkins admits he committed a sexual offence including attempted rape of a baby.
58	depraved singer admits plot rape fan baby	The depraved singer-songwriter admits he has a fan of rape.	The depraved singer admits to having a rapist fan?	The depraved singer admits to a rape fan.
58	ian watkins trial lostprophets singer pleads gui sex charge	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Anian Watkins trial losesprophets singer pleads sex charge.	Anian Watkins lossprophets trial lead singer pleads sex charge.
58	welsh band frontman watkins branded pedophile admits offense	Watkins, leader of a group of evil people, marks the paedophile of the brand admit to having committed a crime.	Watkins, leader of D' a group of evil people, marks the brand pedophile as having committed a crime.	Watkins, leader of d' a group of evil people, marks the brand's pedophile as committing a felony.
58	doncaster mother admits child abuse	The child's mother, for example, admits that she abused her child.	So, the mother admits to having abused a child.	The mother admits having abused a child.
58	ian watkins baptist minister stepson warped online porn	The beautiful-son of Ian Watkins Baptist Minister distorted online porn.	Baptist Minister Ian Watkins' beautiful-son distorted the online porn.	Baptist minister Ian Watkins' beautiful son distorted online porn.
58	lostprophets ian watkins	Lost Prophets Ian Watkins.	Prophets lost - Ian Watkins.	Well, lost prophets - Ian Watkins.
58	lostprophets singer pleads gui sexual assau child	The singer of the Lost Prophets pleads in favor of a child victim of the Lost Prophets, a sexual assault.	The singer of the Lost Prophets pleads for apos; a child victim of apos; sexual assault.	Lost Prophets singer pleads for apos; child victim of apos; sexual assault.
58	ian watkins pleads gui child sex offence	Ian Watkins pleads to child sex.	Well, Ian Watkins pleads to a child sex offense.	Ian Watkins pleads to a child sex offense.
58	lostprophets ian watkins admits sex offence including attempted rape baby	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins admits that he committed a sexual offence, including an attempt to commit a rape of a baby.	Lost Prophets Ian Watkins acknowledges having committed a sexual offence, including attempted rape of a baby.	Lost prophets Ian Watkins admits committing a sexual offence, including attempted rape of a baby.
58	lostprophets ian watkins gui child sex charge	Ian Watkins was charged with the rape of a child.	Lost, ian watkins has been charged with the crime of raping a child.	Lost, ian watkins was charged with raping a child.
58	lostprophets ian watkins admits gui child sex crime	The lost prophets, Ian Watkins, admit that they committed a sexual crime against a child.	The lost prophets Ian Watkins admit to committing a sexual crime against a child.	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins admit to a sexual crime against a child.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui attempted rape baby	The singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleaded guilty to the crime of trying to rape a baby.	Lead singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleads for trying to rape a baby.	Lost Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads to have attempted to rape a baby.
58	watkins bandmate tweet relief closure	Watkins, a member of the group, tweeted about the group's closure.	Watkins, a member of the group, tweeted about the closure of the emergency department.	Watkins, a member of the group, tweeted the closure of emergency d&apos.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui attempted rape baby	The singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleaded guilty to the crime of trying to rape a baby.	Lead singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleads for trying to rape a baby.	Lost Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads to have attempted to rape a baby.
58	rock singer admits baby rape attempt	The singer of rock admits that' there was rape.	Rock singer admits that' there was rape.	The rock singer admits that rape occurred.
58	lostprophets rocker admits attempted baby rape	The Lost Prophets, rocker, admit to raping a baby.	The Lost Prophets, rocker, admit to trying to rape a baby.	The rocker, the lost prophets, admits they tried to rape a baby.
58	rock star invited meet child hospital	It's the first time you've seen a movie about a child.	The guest rock star meets the children's hospital.	Guest rock star meets children's hospital.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui child sex offense	The Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleaded child sex.	Ian Watkins, the lost prophets, pleaded for a child sex offense.	Lost prophets, Ian Watkins, plead to a child sex offense.
58	reported baby rape case singer year ago girlfriend	She reported a baby-rape a year ago.	She reported a case of baby-rape one year ago.	She reported a case of baby rape a year ago.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui child sex charge	Lian Watkins has pleaded in favor of the indictment of paedophilia.	Lian Watkins pleads in favor of the charge of the offence of paedophilia.	Lian Watkins pleads for apo; charge of paedophilia.
58	rock singer admits child abuse offfences	She is also a member of the band, and is a member of the band.	The singer admits to having abused children.	The rock singer admits to abusing children.
58	ian watkins case apple selling lostprophets music lead singer	Anian Watkins Case Apple Selling Lostrophets Lead Singer Music.	Anian Watkins Case Apple selling lead singer perduprophets.	Anian Watkins Case Apple selling music lead singer perduprophets.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui mu iple child sex crime	The singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, argues in favor of protecting children from the commission of sexual crimes.	Ian Watkins, singer of the Lost Prophets, argues in favor of protecting children from sexual crimes.	Lost Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads for the protection of children from sexual crimes.
58	live update lostprophets singer ian watkins trial sex offence charge	Live update lostprophets singer, songwriter, songwriter, songwriter, songwriter, songwriter, songwriter and songwriter.	Live update lostprophets singer ian watkins trial; charge d'apos; sexual offence.	Live update lostprophets singer ian watkins trial d' charge of sex offence.
58	rock singer admits charge attempting rape baby	The singer-songwriter admits that he was accused of raping a baby.	The rock singer admits to having been accused of raping a baby.	The rock singer admits to being accused of raping a baby.
58	singer gui attempted rape	Gui, the singer, tried to be raped.	Singer Gui has been raped.	And singer Gui tried to get raped.
58	ian watkins girlfriend warned police paedophile year ago	It's been a year since Ian Watkins told the police about the problem of paedophilia.	Apos' girlfriend Ian Watkins alerted the police about the paedophilia a year ago.	Apos' girlfriend Ian Watkins warned the police about paedophilia a year ago.
58	lostprophets ian watkins carried shocking child abuse	It's been a long time since we've had a chance to talk to you.	Lost prophets Ian Watkins have been victims of abuse of children.	Lost prophets, Ian Watkins, have been the victims of apo abuse and child abuse.
58	step ian watkins quits twitter mistaken lostprophets abuse welsh star	Watkins is wrong about lost prophets abusing Welsh Star and left Twitter.	Watkins left Twitter wrong about lost prophets abusing Welsh Star.	Watkins has left Twitter, though, mistaking the lost prophets who abuse Welsh Star.
58	ian watkins pleads gui rape charge	That's Ian Watkins pleading rape.	Ian Watkins pleads to rape.	Ian Watkins pleads to rape him.
58	lostprophets star ian watkins admits rape baby	Losing the Prophets, the star, Ian Watkins, admits to having raped a child.	Losing the Prophets, star Ian Watkins admits to raping a baby.	Star star Ian Watkins admits to raping a baby.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins stand trial accused raping baby	Lostus singer Ian Watkins is on trial for the rape of a baby.	Lostus singer and songwriter Ian Watkins is on trial for raping a baby.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins is on trial for raping a baby girl.
58	rocker ian watkins admits attempted rape baby child abuse	Rocker Ian Watkins admits to raping a child.	Rock'n' roller Ian Watkins admits he tried to rape a child.	And rocker Ian Watkins admits that he tried to rape a child.
58	ian watkins girlfriend lostprophets singer revealed paedophile	I mean, I've got a girlfriend who's got a blackmailer who's a pedophile.	Anian watkins girlfriend loses singer-songwriter revealed as a pedophile.	Iian watkins girlfriend loses songwriter revealed pedophile.
58	lostprophets star admits abuse plot	It's not a coincidence, but it's a great thing.	L'apos; star of the lost prophets admits a conspiracy of abuse.	L'apos; star of lost prophets admits a conspiracy of abuse.
58	ian watkins profile lostprophets fame sickening plot rape baby	The profile of Ian Watkins has lost Groovy Baby Rape Prophets.	The profile of Ian Watkins has lost celebrity Prophets sickening conspiracy baby rape.	The profile of Ian Watkins lost celebrity Prophets disgusting baby rape plot.
58	ian watkins devastated parent fear son remembered jimmy	Devastated watkins scared parent son remembers Jimmy Jimmy Jimmy.	Ian watkins devastated scared parent son remembers Jimmy Jimmy.	Ian watkins devastated parent fear son remembers Jimmy Jimmy Jimmy.
58	rock singer trial child sex abuse	The singer-songwriter is a judge of child sexual abuse.	The rock singer judges the sexual abuse of children.	You know, the rock singer judges child molestation.
58	paedophile singer victim number warns	Pedophile singer's victim's phone number alerts.	The paedophile singer's victim's number alerts.	The paedophile singer's victim number is warning.
58	step star ian watkins trolled fan mistake lostprophets paedophile	Ian Watkins has lost paedophile prophets.	L' error of the fan troll d' Ian watkins has lost prophets pedophiles.	L' fan troll's mistake; Ian watkins lost paedophile prophets.
58	lostprophets singer facing baby rape trial today	The singer of the Lost Prophets is going to stand trial for raping his baby today.	The singer of the Prophet Lost will be tried for baby rape today.	Lost Prophets singer is on trial for baby rape today.
58	ian watkins trial lostprophets singer accused raping baby set	Ian Watkins Trial Lost Prophets Singer accused of Baby Set rape.	Ian Watkins Lost Prophets Trial Singer accused of raping Baby Set.	Ian Watkins Lost Prophets Singer accused of raping Baby Set.
58	girlfriend lostprophets rocker warned police year ago	Girlfriend lost some rocker prophets tipped off the police about a year ago.	The girlfriend lost rocker prophets, tipped off the police a year ago.	The girlfriend lost rocker prophets a year ago tipped off the police.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui horrific child sex offence	Perdus Prophets singer, Ian Watkins, pleads guilty to a child molestation and sexual abuse.	The singer of Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleads apo; horrible child sex offense.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads apo; horrific child sex offense.
58	ian watkins pleads gui charge child sexual offence	He is also a member of the Canadian Council on the Rights of the Child.	Ian Watkins pleads guilty to a sexual offence committed against a child.	Watkins pleads guilty to a sexual offence against a child.
58	ian watkins pleads gui sex offence	Ian Watkins has pleaded guilty to a sexual offence.	Ian Watkins pleads guilty to a sexual offence.	Ian Watkins pleads guilty to sex crimes.
58	ian watkins trial lostprophets frontman trial tomorrow accused	Ian Watkins trial has lost frontman trials tomorrow charged.	The ian watkins trial lost the frontman trials tomorrow charged.	The ian watkins trial lost frontman trials tomorrow morning.
58	profile lostprophets singer ian watkins	Lost Prophets Profile Singer Ian Watkins.	Profile of the Lost Prophets Singer Ian Watkins.	A Profile of the Lost Prophets.
58	ian watkins singer lostprophets bandmates relieved justice	I mean, I mean, I mean, I'm a singer-songwriter, lost-prophets bandmates relieves justice.	Iian watkins singer-songwriter lostprophets bandmates relieves justice.	Ian watkins singer lostprophets bandmates brings relief to the justice.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins child sex offence trial	The singer of Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, is on trial for a sexual offence against a child.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins is on trial for child sex.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins is on trial for a child sex offense.
58	lostprophets singer admits attempted baby rape	Well, the singer of the lost prophets admits that he tried to rape a baby.	The singer of the Lost Prophets admits to attempting to rape a baby.	Lost prophets singer admits he tried to rape a baby.
58	ian watkins trial lostprophets singer pleads gui attempting rape baby	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Watkins trial loseprophets singers pleads mistletoe baby rape attempt.	Anian Watkins trial lostprophets singer pleads baby rape attempt gui.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui child sexual abuse charge	Lian Watkins pleads in favor of a charge of sexual abuse of a child.	Lian Watkins pleads for an accusation of child sexual abuse.	Lian Watkins pleads for a charge of child sexual abuse.
58	lostprophets ian watkins admits child sex offence	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins admit to committing a sexual assault on a child.	The lost prophets Ian Watkins admit to committing a sex crime against a child.	Lost Prophets Ian Watkins admits to having committed a sexual offence against a child.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins gui attempting rape baby	Lostus singer, Ian Watkins, tries to rape his baby.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins is trying to rape a baby.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins is trying to rape a baby girl.
58	ian watkins committed paedophile dreamed crossing	Ian Watkins has committed an act of child molestation as a dream crossing.	Ian Watkins committed a childish act of dream crossing.	Ian Watkins committed a paedophile dream crossing act on his own.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins committed pedophile rape baby	Lostus singer, Ian Watkins, committed a child molester on his baby.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins has committed a child molester on a baby.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins has a baby child molester.
58	lostlost prophet guitarist relieved watkins trial	The Lost Prophet Guitarist has raised the issue of the trial of Watkins.	The lost prophet guitarist has noted Watkins' trial.	Lost prophet guitarist noted Watkins' trial.
58	lostprophets lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex offence	Perdusprophets Perdusprophets The singer, ian watkins, pleads for a sexual offence on a child.	Perdusprophets Perdusprophets Perdusprophets Perdusprophets singer ian watkins pleads for a child sex offense.	Perdusprophets Perdusprophets The singer ian watkins pleads to child sex.
58	ian watkins trial lostprophets singer court face baby rape charge	Ian Watkins, of the Perdantprophets trial, is facing charges of infant rape.	Ian Watkins, of the Perdantprophets trial, faces charges of the rape of a baby.	Ian Watkins, of the Perdantprophets trial, faces baby rape charges.
58	lostprophets ian watkins descent good guy depravity	The lost prophets are descended from the depravation of good guys.	Well, the lost prophets ian watkins are descended from the depravation of good guys.	Lost prophets ian watkins descended from the depravation of good guys.
58	singer admits assau ing baby	It's a good idea to have a baby.	The singer admits the existence of a baby.	The singer admits the existence of a baby.
58	lostprophets ian watkins rock hero paedophile monster	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins, the rock'n' roll hero, the pedophile monster.	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins, the rock star, the pedophile monster.	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins, the hero of rock and roll, the monster of child molestation.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins stand trial today accused raping baby	It's gonna be the day that the singer of the Lost Boys, Ian Watkins, is on trial for raping a baby.	Ian Watkins, singer of the Losers, will stand trial today for raping a baby.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins will stand trial today for raping a baby.
58	singer admits baby rape attempt	Singer admits that there was rape.	The singer admits that there was rape.	The singer admits that rape occurred.
58	ian watkins british rocker pleads gui attempted baby rape	Ian Watkins, an English rock musician, argues that this is an attempt on the life of a baby.	English rocker Ian Watkins argues that this is an attempt on baby rape.	English rocker Ian Watkins argues that it's an attempted baby rape.
58	rock singer pleads gui child sex charge	The rock singer's pleading for a paedophilia charge.	And the rock singer pleads to a charge of paedophilia.	The rock singer pleads to a paedophilia charge.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex offence charge	Perdus Prophets singer, Ian Watkins, pleaded guilty to an alleged sexual offence against children.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads for a charge of sexual abuse of children.	Prophets Perdus singer Ian Watkins pleads for a charge of sex offenses against children.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins admits plot rape baby sex	The Perdus Prophets' lead singer, Ian Watkins, has admitted that he conspired to sexually rape a baby.	The singer of the Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, admits he conspired to sexually rape a baby.	Prophet Perdus singer Ian Watkins admits he conspired to sexually rape a baby.
58	complaint claim police knew ian watkins abuse december	Police officers knew that he had been ill-treated in December.	The police knew that he had been ill-treated in December.	The police knew he was ill-treated in December.
58	breaking news lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui attempted	Latest News Perdusprophets chanteuse ian watkins is a singer pleading attempted mistletoe.	Latest News Perdusprophets singer ian watkins pleads to be tempted.	Latest news Perdusprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui tent.
58	lostprophets ian watkins admits rape attempt	The lost prophets Ian Watkins admits to an attempted rape.	Lost prophets Ian Watkins admits attempted rape.	The lost prophets Ian Watkins admits an attempt at rape.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui sexual assau involving child	The lost prophets,ian watkins, are pleading for a sexual assault involving a child.	The lost prophets ian watkins plead to a sexual assault involving one child.	The lost prophets ian watkins plead to child sexual assault.
58	ian watkins father talk fear son remembered jimmy savile	Well, Ian Watkins Sr. talks about fear, son remembered Jimmy Savile Jr.	Ian Watkins Sr. speaks of fear son remembered Jimmy Savile Jr.	Ian Watkins Sr. speaks fear son remembered Jimmy Savile son.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins gui sex offence including attempted	Loss of Prophets singer ian watkins includes attempted sexual offence.	Loss of the Prophets singer ian watkins gui sex offense including attempted sex.	Loss of Prophets singer ian watkins gui sex offence including attempt to attempt.
58	rock singer pleads gui child sex crime	She is also a founding member of the Canadian Children's Association, a non-profit organization.	The singer pleads for apos, a sexual crime against children.	The rock singer pleads for a sex crime against children.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex	Lead singer of the Lost Prophets Ian Watkins speaks out in favor of the sex of children.	Lead singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, speaks up for child sex.	The singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleads for the sex of children.
58	doncaster mother admits allowing lost prophet singer abuse baby	Thus, the mother admits having allowed a singer-prophet lost from apos; abuse of apos; a baby.	So the mother admits that she has allowed a lost prophet singer to abuse a baby.	So the mother admits to allowing a lost prophet singer to abuse a baby.
58	ian watkins face abuse twitter facebook lostprophets	Anian Watkins is the victim of Twitter's Facebook abuse.	Ian Watkins is a victim of Facebook abuse on Twitter.	Twitter's abuse of Watkins' facebook continues.
58	lostprophets lead singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex abuse charge	The court has ruled that the child is a child molester and that the child is a child molester and a child molester.	Perdusprophets lead singer ian watkins has pleaded guilty to child sexual abuse.	Perdusprophets lead singer ian watkins pleads for child sexual abuse.
58	lostprophets ian watkins abuse online chat risk warning	Perdusprophets ian watkins online chat abuse chat alert.	Perdusprophets ian watkins online chat abuse chat risk warning.	Perdusprophets ian watkins abuse chat online chat risk warning.
58	ian watkins pleads gui sex offence	Ian Watkins has pleaded guilty to a sexual offence.	Ian Watkins pleads guilty to a sexual offence.	Ian Watkins pleads guilty to sex crimes.
58	singer pleads gui rape baby	The singer's advocating baby-rape mistletoe.	And the singer pleads to rape the baby mistletoe.	The singer pleads rape baby mistletoe.
58	ian watkins girlfriend warned cop year ago	He's got a girlfriend, Ian Watkins, who tipped off the cop about a year ago.	Apos' girlfriend Ian Watkins tipped off a year ago.	Apos girlfriend Ian Watkins tipped the cop a year ago.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex offence watkins	The singer of Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleads in favor of apos; a sexual offence to the children.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads for apo; a sexual offence against children.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads in favor of a Perdus Prophets sex offence against children.
58	rocker admits baby rape attempt	Rocker admits that there was rape.	The rocker admits that' there was rape.	The rocker admits that rape occurred.
58	lostprophets ian watkins abuse victim urged forward	The lost prophets are victims of apoes; rushed to the apostles; before.	The lost prophets victim of apoes; rushed to the apostles; before.	Prophets lost ian watkins victim of apos; rushed to the apos; before.
58	lostprophets ian watkins appeal victim	The lost prophets, Ian Watkins, are appealing to the victim.	Well, the lost prophets Ian Watkins are appealing to the victim.	Lost prophets Ian Watkins appeal to the victim.
58	report lostprophets singer admits child sex offense including	According to the report, the singer of L' album lostprophets has admitted committing a sexual offence against children.	According to the report, the singer of the album lostprophets admits having committed a sexual offence against children.	According to the report the singer of lostprophets album l&apos admits having committed a sexual offence against children.
58	ian watkins cardiff hotel paedophile met woman plotted	American watkins cardiff paedophile hotel met conspirator female.	Watkins cardiff hotel paedophile met woman plotted woman.	Latin watkins cardiff hotel paedophile met woman plotted woman.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins face baby rape trial	Lostus vocalist Ian Watkins... is facing a lawsuit for baby-rape.	And Lostus singer Ian Watkins is facing a lawsuit for baby-rape.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins is facing a lawsuit for the rape of a baby.
58	lostprophets guitarist lee gaze reacts ian watkins pleads gui child	Lost Prophets guitarist Lee Looke responds to Watkins' call.	Lee Looke, guitarist for The Lost Prophets, responds to Watkins' call.	Lee Looke, guitarist for the Lost Prophets, responds to Watkins' call.
58	watkins warned police	Watkins alerted the police.	Watkins called the police.	Watkins called the police department.
58	lostprophets singer admits determined committed pedophile	The singer of the lostprophets admits that he is determined to s' to engage as a paedophile.	The singer of lostprophets admits that he is determined to be a paedophile.	The lostprophets singer admits that he is determined to s' hire as a paedophile.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui sex charge including plot	Prophet Lost Lead singer, Ian Watkins, pleads for mercy, including sexual charges; intrigue.	The singer of the Prophet Lost, Ian Watkins, pleads apo; sexual charges, including the apo; intrigue.	The singer of the Prophets Lost, Ian Watkins, pleads for sex charges, including intrigue.
58	lostprophets star baby abuse	Lost prophets are stars of child abuse.	Lost prophets are the stars of the baby abuse.	Lost prophets are baby abuse stars.
58	frontman gui sex charge	Frontman guui charging for sex.	Frontman gui sex charge?	Frontman gui sex charges.
58	trial lostprophets ian watkins charge raping baby today	The Lost Prophets trial, Ian Watkins, accused the baby of rape.	The trial of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, is today accusing the baby of rape.	The trial of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, today accused the baby of rape.
58	lostprophets singer watkins admits attempted rape baby	The singer of the Perdus Prophets, Watkins, has admitted that he tried to rape a baby.	The singer of the Perdus Prophets, Watkins, admits that he tried to rape the baby.	Lost Prophets singer Watkins admits he attempted to rape a baby.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex offense	The singer of Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleaded guilty to the crime of sexual intercourse as a child.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads Child Sexual Crime.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads to the child sex offense.
58	police chief ian watkins case shocking harrowing child	Ian Watkins, Chief of Police, shocked a distressing child.	The Chief of Police, Ian Watkins, has shocked and shocked a very distressing child.	Police chief Ian Watkins shocked a distressing kid.
58	lostprophets guitarist speaks relief quick ian watkins trial lee gaze	The guitarist of Perdusprophets speaks of rapid relief watkins trial look down the wind.	The guitarist of Perdusprophets speaks of rapid relief ian watkins trial look down the wind.	Perdusprophets guitarist speaks of rapid relief ian watkins trial look downwind.
58	lostprophets singer gui attempted baby rape	The lead singer of the Lost Prophets Gui has been trying to rape a baby.	The singer of the Prophet Lost Boys Gui tried to rape a baby girl.	Lost Prophets singer Gui tried to rape a baby girl.
58	ian watkins lostprophets singer case shocking harrowing child	Ian Watkins lost the lead singer of the Prophets shockingly horrifying child.	Ian Watkins has lost the lead vocalist of the Prophets to a shocking case of child abuse.	Ian Watkins lost the singer of the Prophets shocking case horrifying child.
58	lostprophets frontman pleads gui child sex crime	The leader of the Lost Prophets is pleading for a sexual crime involving children.	The leader of the lost prophets pleads to a sexual crime involving children.	Lost prophet leader pleads for child sex crime.
58	british rocker admits attempted baby rape	Well, the English rocker admits that he tried to rape a baby.	The English rocker admits he tried to rape a baby.	English rocker admits he tried to rape a baby girl.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins baby rape trial start	Trial begins on Ian Watkins, singer of the Lost Prophets, for the rape of a baby.	This is the start of the baby rape trial of Prophet's Loss singer, Ian Watkins.	Prophet's Loss singer Ian Watkins' baby rape trial begins.
58	ian watkins lostprophets pleads gui attempted rape baby	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Ian watkins lostprophets argues that it's an attempt on the baby's life.	ian watkins lostprophets argues that it's an attempt to rape the baby.
58	lostprophets lead singer ian watkins admits attempted baby rape	Perdusprophets Lead singer Ian Watkins has admitted that he tried to rape a baby.	Perdusprophets Lead singer Ian Watkins admits he tried to rape a baby.	Perdusprophets Lead singer Ian Watkins admits he attempted to rape a baby.
58	joanne majic year relationship ian watkins	Ian Watkins Relationship Year.	Joanne Majic Year, Ian Watkins Relationship.	Joanne Majic year Ian Watkins relationship.
58	lostprophets frontman ian watkins pleads gui charge sex crime	Lost Prophets Frontman Ian Watkins is pleading for a sex crime.	Perdus Prophets Frontman Ian Watkins pleads to a sexual crime charge.	Perdus Prophets Frontman Ian Watkins pleads a sex crime.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui sex offence	Perdus Prophets lead singer, Ian Watkins, has pleaded for a sex offense.	The singer of Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, pleads to a sex offense.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins pleads a sex offense.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins admits mu iple child sex offense	Perdusprophets singer Ian Watkins has admitted that he committed sexual offenses against children.	Perdusprophets singer Ian Watkins admits to having committed sexual offences against children.	Perdusprophets singer Ian Watkins admits to child sex crimes.
58	lostprophets singer pleaded gui attempted child rape	The singer of the Perdus Prophets has pleaded guilty to the attempted rape of his child.	The singer of the Perdus Prophets pleaded the attempted rape of children.	The singer of the Perdus Prophets pleaded the child rape attempt.
58	ian watkins girlfriend warned police lostprophets singer dangerous	The singer of the Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, warned the police that the singer of the Lost Prophets was dangerous.	Apos' girlfriend Ian Watkins warned the police that the singer of the Lost Prophets was dangerous.	Apos' girlfriend Ian Watkins warned police that the Lost Prophets singer was dangerous.
58	british rocker admits baby rape attempt	The English rocker admitted to attempted rape.	The English rocker admits an attempted rape.	The English rocker admits attempted rape.
58	lostprophets ian watkins finally pleads gui powerful men abuse	"In the end, the lost prophets, Ian Watkins, argued in favor of the ""abuse"" of powerful men."	The lost prophets, Ian Watkins, finally plead for the apo; abuse of powerful men.	Lost prophets Ian Watkins finally advocate apo abuse of powerful men.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui child sex offence	The Lost Prophets, Ian Watkins, have pleaded in favor of a sex crime against a child.	The lost prophets, Ian Watkins, plead for apos; a sexual offence against a child.	The lost prophets, Ian Watkins, plead for a sexual offence against a child.
58	step star targeted online troll mistook disgraced	Targeted Steam star online trolls disgraced.	Steam star targeted online trolls dishonored.	Steam star targeted online troll dishonored trolls.
58	lostprophets star gui baby abuse	Lostus Prophets star-spotted baby abuse.	Lost the Prophets star gui baby abuse.	Lost Prophets star gui baby molestation.
58	ian watkins worse gary glitter	Ian Watkins has more glitter than Gary's glitter.	Ian Watkins has glitter worse than Gary's.	Ian Watkins has glitter worse than Gary's.
58	lostprophets ian watkins groomed baby abuse	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins, he cured child abuse.	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins cured abuse of babies.	Lost prophets Ian Watkins cured baby abuse.
58	ian watkins south wale police face question singer girlfriend	Ian Watkins South Wale Police Department to face the issue of the girlfriend singer.	Ian Watkins South Wale Police face off to question singer girlfriend.	Ian Watkins South Wale Police face question girlfriend singer.
58	lost prophet singer stand trial today accused raping baby	He is accused of raping a baby and is sentenced to death by the court.	The singer of the lost prophet is tried today for raping a baby.	The singer of the lost prophet is on trial today for raping a baby.
58	lostprophets rocker ian watkins pleads gui charge attempting	Loss of the Prophets The rocker, Ian Watkins, pleads for an attempt to commit suicide.	Loss of Prophets Rocker Ian Watkins pleads for an attempt at indictment.	Loss of Prophets Rocker Ian Watkins pleads for indictment.
58	police knew lostprophets singer ian watkins paedophile	Police were aware that the Lost Boys singer, Ian Watkins, was a pedophile.	Police knew Lostus singer Ian Watkins was a pedophile.	The police knew the Lost Boys singer, Ian Watkins, was a pedophile.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins gui sexually abusing child	The singer of the Lost Boys, Ian Watkins, sexually abused one of his children.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins has sexually abused a child.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins has been sexually abusing a child.
58	lostprophets star admits baby rape attempt	L&apos, star of the lost prophets admits to raping a baby.	L'apos, star of the lost prophets, admits that he tried to rape the baby.	L&apos, Lost Prophets star admits to trying to rape a baby.
58	detail emerge lostprophets singer ian watkins sexual abuse	Details emerge from the sex abuse of Prophet Loss singer Ian Watkins.	The details are emerging from the sexual abuse of Prophet Loss singer Ian Watkins.	Details emerge from the sexual abuse of Prophet Loss singer Ian Watkins.
58	british singer admits attempted rape baby	The British singer-songwriter admits that he tried to rape a baby.	The British singer admits he tried to rape a baby.	British singer admits to trying to rape a baby.
58	twitter mob attack wrong celebrity ian watkins child abuse case	The crowd on Twitter attacked a celebrity like Ian Watkins, a case of child abuse.	A celebrity like Ian Watkins, a child abuse case, is being attacked by crowds on Twitter.	Crowds on Twitter attack a celebrity like Ian Watkins, a child abuse case.
58	lostprophets ian watkins gui child sex offence	The Lost Prophetsian Watkins have committed a sexual offence against a child.	Lost prophetsian watkins committed a sexual offence against a child.	The lost ian watkins prophets committed a child sex offense.
58	lost prophet singer ian watkins bedfordshire woman plead gui string	The Lost Prophet's singer, Ian Watkins Bedfordshire, has been advocating mistletoe.	Ian Watkins Bedfordshire, singer of the lost prophet, pleads for mistletoe rope.	Lost prophet singer Ian Watkins Bedfordshire pleads mistletoe.
58	plea social medium restraint ian watkins case	Average Social Advocacy Case Held ian Watkins Watkins.	Average social case retained byian Watkins Watkins case.	Average social advocacy retained ian Watkins case Watkins.
58	lostprophet singer bandmates glad closure	The group's losing singing companions are happy to have turned the page.	The fellow singers losing the band are happy to have moved on.	The band's songwriters are happy to have moved on to the next phase of their lives.
58	ian watkins disgraced lostprophets singer ambassador young people	Ian Watkins has disgraced the honor of the Ambassador of the Young Singers of the Lost Prophets.	Ian Watkins disgraced the Lost Prophets' Young Singer Ambassador.	Ian Watkins disgraced the apo, ambassador of the lost Prophets' young singers.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins gui attempted baby rape	The Lost Boys singer, Ian Watkins, has been trying to rape a baby.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins tried to rape a baby.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins attempted to rape a baby.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui child abuse belong	Lost, the Watkins argue that the family owns child abuse.	Lost, the Watkins argued that child abuse should belong to the family.	Lost, the Watkins are advocating that child abuse belong to the family.
58	rape fan baby admits rocker	The rapist fan, he admits the rocker.	The rape fan admits the rocker.	The rape fan admits rocker music.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui sex offense including attempted	The Lost Prophets Ian Watkins pleaded guilty to a sexual offence, including the offence of attempting to commit a sexual offence.	Lost Prophets Ian Watkins pleads sexual offence, including attempted sexual offence.	Lost prophets Ian Watkins pleads sexual offence, including attempted offence.
58	singer ian watkins pleads gui numerous sex offence	The singer, ian watkins, pleaded guilty to a number of serious sexual offences.	Male vocalist ian watkins pleads sexual offences.	Male singer ian watkins pleads numerous sexual offences.
58	lostprophets frontman ian watkins admits sick baby rape charge	Losing the Prophets The leader, Ian Watkins, admits that he was accused of raping a baby.	Losing Prophets Leader Ian Watkins admits to having been charged with baby rape.	Losing Prophets Leader Ian Watkins admits he was accused of baby rape.
58	lostprophets ian watkins pleads gui child sex offence charge court	Lost, Ian Watkins pleaded guilty to the charge of a sexual offence against children in court.	Lost, Ian Watkins pleads in favour of a charge of sex offenses against children in court.	Lost, Ian Watkins pleads in court for a charge of sex offenses against children.
58	ian watkins parent reveal overwhelming heartache singer son depravity	The parent d' Ian Watkins reveals a crushing depravation of grief-singing sons of love.	The parent d' Ian Watkins reveals a crushing depravation of singer sons d' love.	The parent d' Ian Watkins reveals a crushing depravation of son singer d' love.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins pleads gui child sex crime	Lostus singer, Ian Watkins, pleads to a sexual crime involving children.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins is pleading for a child sex crime.	Lostus singer Ian Watkins pleads to child sex crimes.
58	lostprophets singer pleads gui child sex abuse charge	The singer of The Loss of Prophets has pleaded guilty to child sexual abuse.	The singer of Lost Prophets pleads for a charge of child sexual abuse.	The Lost Prophets singer pleads for a child molestation charge.
58	rock singer trial	It's a rock-and-roll try.	Rock singer try it out.	Rock singer try.
58	lostprophets singer ian watkins gui child sex offence rock	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins has paedophilia rock.	The singer of Perdus Prophets, Ian Watkins, has a rock for paedophilia.	Perdus Prophets singer Ian Watkins has rock for paedophilia.
58	ian watkins ambassador young people met young child	Anian Watkins, ambassador, ran into young children.	Ambassadorian Watkins met young children.	And I'm an ambassador, and I've met young children.
58	police urge singer abuse victim forward	It's the first time that the police have pressed the victim of a car accident.	Police squeezes the victim from singing abuse before.	The police pressed the victim before.
59	assistant dalonte hill resigns position maryland	Dalonte Hill resigned from his post in Maryland.	L' assistant Dalonte Hill resigned his post in Maryland.	L' assistant Dalonte Hill resigns his post in Maryland.
59	juan dixon	It's Juan Dixon.	Juan dixon.	Uh, Juan Dixon.
59	maryland assistant coach dalonte hill resigns month third duo	Dalonte Hill's assistant coach, L&apos, resigned in the third month of the duo.	In the third month of the duet, L&apos, assistant coach of the Maryland Dalonte Hill, resigned.	L&apos, assistant coach of Maryland Dalonte Hill, resigns in the third month of the duo.
59	md assisstant dalonte hill resigns terps hire juan dixon	Dalonte Hill resigned and hired Juan Dixon.	L' Dalonte Hill assistant resigned and hired Juan Dixon.	L' assistant Dalonte Hill resigns and hires Juan Dixon.
59	maryland announces addition coaching staff	It's the first time I've heard of it, but it's not the first time.	Maryland announces the addition of Dapos; a coach.	Maryland announces the addition of a coach.
59	report dalonte hill resign assistant coach maryland	Dalonte Hill has resigned from his position as assistant coach, Maryland, at the end of the season.	Dalonte Hill has resigned as assistant coach, Maryland.	Dalonte Hill resigned as assistant coach, Maryland.
59	dalonte hill resigns terps promote dustin clark assistant hire juan dixon	Dalonte Hill resigned and announced that Juan Dixon would be hired by his assistant.	Hill resigned and announced that his assistant would hire Juan Dixon.	Dalonte Hill resigns and announces that his assistant will hire Juan Dixon.
59	dalonte hill resigns terps juan dixon join coaching staff	Dalonte Hill has resigned from his position as coach.	Dalonte Hill resigns as coach.	Dalonte Hill resigns from his position as coach of the team.
60	italy letta senate vote reinforces government reform action	The vote of the Italian Senate of the Senate of Letta strengthens the position of the government.	The vote of the Italian Letta Senate reinforces the government's action to reform the government.	The Italian Letta Senate's vote reinforces the government's action of reform.
60	vote loom expel italy berlusconi parliament	The vote is threatening to push the Italian Parliament out of Berlusconi.	The vote threatens to push the Italian parliament out of the country.	The vote threatens d'apos; expelling the Italian parliament of Berlusconi.
60	berlusconi fight desperate battle retain senate seat	Berlusconi desperately struggles to keep his Senate seat.	Berlusconi struggles desperately to keep his seat in the U.S. Senate.	Berlusconi fought desperately to keep his seat in the Senate.
60	berlusconi asks rival expel parliament	Berlusconi has asked his rival D'apos to remove the parliament.	Berlusconi asked rival Dapos to expel parliament.	Berlusconi asks his rival d'apos; expel the parliament.
60	update italy pm letta win confidence vote berlusconi move opposition	ITALY update pm Latvian win the vote of confidence Berlusconi propose the apos; opposition.	Updating ITALIE pm letta win the vote of confidence Berlusconi propose l' opposition.	Update ITALIE pm letta win the confidence vote Berlusconi propose opposition.
60	court italian pm corrupted witness	Well, the Italian court bribed the witness.	Italian court has corrupted the witness.	Italian court corrupted the witness.
60	italy president rule pardon berlusconi	Berlusconi is pardoned by the Italian President.	The Italian President grants pardon to Berlusconi.	The Italian president pardoned Berlusconi.
60	berlusconi clout mp expert	Berlusconi influences MP expert expert expert mp.	Berlusconi influences mp expert MP Expert.	Berlusconi influences mp expert MP.
60	silvio berlusconi timeline political career	Silvio Berlusconi Chronology of Political Career.	Silvio Berlusconi chronology of political career.	Silvio Berlusconi political career chronology.
60	letta seek post berlusconi italian majority confidence vote	Let's try to get a vote of confidence from the Italian majority, post-Berlusconi.	Let's try to get a vote of confidence from the Italian majority post-Berlusconi.	Let us seek a vote of confidence from the Italian majority post-Berlusconi.
60	update italian budget vote test government post berlusconi stren	Updating the vote on the Italian budget tests the government post-Berlusconi strong reinforcement Berlusconi government.	Update of the vote on the Italian budget test post Berlusconi government strong Berlusconi government reinforcement.	Italian budget vote update test post Berlusconi government strength Berlusconi government.
60	berlusconi request review fraud trial evidence	Mr. Berlusconi is asking for a review of the evidence from the fraud trial.	Berlusconi requests a review of the evidence from the fraud trial.	Berlusconi requests a review of the fraud trial evidence.
60	italy berlusconi ditch senate stand	The Italian Senate has abandoned Berlusconi's position.	The Italian Berlusconi Senate has abandoned its position.	The Italian Senate of Berlusconi has abandoned its position.
60	berlusconi face parliamentary ejection vote	Berlusconi faces a presidential ejection.	Berlusconi faces an ejection vote.	Berlusconi faces a parliamentary ejection vote.
60	berlusconi lawmaker pull italy coalition	Berlusconi's legislator has withdrawn the Italian coalition.	Berlusconi's legislator removed the Italian coalition.	Berlusconi's legislator removed the Italian coalition from power.
60	italian parliament poised expel silvio berlusconi	Italian Parliament s' ready to evict Silvio Berlusconi.	Italian Parliament s' ready to expel Silvio Berlusconi.	The Italian parliament s' ready to expel Silvio Berlusconi.
60	berlusconi forza italia move opposition	Berlusconi Forza Italia proposes the opposition.	Berlusconi Forza Italia proposed l' opposition.	Berlusconi Forza Italia proposes the following: 1.
60	future hold silvio berlusconi	Silvio Berlusconi's future.	In the future hold Silvio Berlusconi.	Apos; future hold Silvio Berlusconi.
60	italian budget vote test government post berlusconi stren	The Italian budget tests the government after Berlusconi hardens the government.	The Italian budget vote is testing the government after Berlusconi hardens the government.	The Italian budget vote tested the government after Berlusconi hardened it.
60	minute bid berlusconi trial	Berlusconi Trial to the Minute.	This is Berlusconi trial to the minute.	Berlusconi trial by the minute.
60	italian gov win senate confidence vote budget bill	The Italian government wins the vote of confidence of the Senate on the draft budget.	The Italian government wins the Senate's vote of confidence in the draft budget.	The Italian government wins the Senate's confidence vote on the budget.
60	italy berlusconi denounces coup etat	It is also the capital of the province of Bologna.	Berlusconi denounced the coup d'apos; state.	L' Italy, Berlusconi, denounces the coup d'apos; state.
60	berlusconi president pardon slam coup etat	Berlusconi president's sorry slam coup.	Berlusconi president pardon slam, stat.	Er, Berlusconi president pardon slam coup.
60	open thread silvio berlusconi best bit	Silvio Berlusconi, open-wire TV, c&apos, is the best time.	Silvio Berlusconi with open wire, c' is the best time.	Silvio Berlusconi open wire, c' is the best moment.
60	italy president confidence vote test government majority	The vote of confidence by the President of Italy is a test of the strength of the government.	The Italian President's vote of confidence is testing the majority of the government.	The Italian President's vote of confidence tests the majority of the government.
60	italy govt call confidence vote budget minister	The Italian government has called for a vote of confidence from the Minister for the Budget.	The Italian government is calling for a vote of confidence on the proposal of the budget minister.	The Italian government is calling for the budget minister to vote in favour.
60	berlusconi forza italia exit government collaboration	Berlusconi Forza Italia has left the Italian government.	Berlusconi Forza Italia to leave the collaboration of the Italian government.	Berlusconi Forza Italia leave Italian government collaboration.
60	italian government win senate confidence vote budget	The Italian government has won the Senate's vote of confidence.	The Italian government wins the vote of confidence of the Senate.	Italian government wins Senate vote of confidence budget.
60	silvio berlusconi minute fight senate seat	Silvio Berlusconi fighting moment in the Senate.	This is Silvio Berlusconi, a moment's battle in the Senate.	Silvio Berlusconi minute fight in the Senate.
60	berlusconi rise fall italy playboy politico	Berlusconi ascent in autumn, Italy playboy politico.	Berlusconi ascent autumn Italy playboy politico.	Berlusconi ascent autumn Italy playboy politico.
60	italian senate set vote berlusconi ouster	The Italian Senate decided Berlusconi would oust Berlusconi.	The Italian Senate decided that Berlusconi should oust Berlusconi.	The Italian Senate has decided that Berlusconi will oust President Berlusconi.
60	silvio berlusconi move opposition ahead vote kick	Silvio Berlusconi moves the vote of the apos; opposition.	Silvio Berlusconi put forward the vote of opposition.	Silvio Berlusconi brought the opposition vote forward.
60	silvio berlusconi claim evidence clear	Silvio Berlusconi says that the evidence is clear.	Silvio Berlusconi said the evidence was clear.	Silvio Berlusconi says evidence is clear.
60	berlusconi accuses left coup etat	Berlusconi blames Dapos, left-wing state.	Berlusconi blames the left-wing state for the coup d'apos.	Berlusconi blames the coup d'apos; left-wing state.
60	berlusconi waver ahead confidence vote italy budget	Berlusconi is reluctant to vote in favour of the trusted Italian budget.	Berlusconi is reluctant to vote for Italy's budget.	Berlusconi is reluctant to vote for the budget of confidence in Italy.
60	italy facing stability graveyard	L' L' L' Italy faces a graveyard of stability.	L' Italy faces a graveyard of stability.	L' Italy is facing a graveyard of stability.
60	berlusconi learn fate senate vote	Berlusconi learns that destiny is voting in the Senate.	Berlusconi learns that destiny votes in the Senate.	Berlusconi learns that the vote of fate in the Senate.
60	berlusconi face expulsion parliament tax fraud sentence	He is also a member of the Council of the European Union.	Berlusconi risks being expelled from Parliament on the grounds of tax evasion.	Berlusconi faces deportation from Parliament for tax evasion.
60	berlusconi forza italia party move opposition eve vote kick	Berlusconi forza italia proposed opposition the day before voting kick.	Berlusconi forza italia party propose opposition the day before the vote kick.	Berlusconi forza italia party propose opposition the day before voting kick.
60	berlusconi vote government confidence vote source	Berlusconi votes on the government's vote of confidence.	Berlusconi votes the source of the government's vote of confidence.	Berlusconi votes source of government vote of confidence.
60	letta win majority italy berlusconi ouster vote	Majority wins apo; Italy Berlusconi votes against.	May the majority win the apos; Italy Berlusconi votes against.	Let the majority win apos; Italy Berlusconi will vote against.
60	italy pm govt stronger cohesive berlusconi exit	The government in Italy strengthened cohesion after Berlusconi left.	In Italy, the government strengthened cohesion after Berlusconi left.	In Italy, the government made Berlusconi's exit cohesive.
60	berlusconi fight senate seat	Berlusconi fights in the Senate.	Berlusconi fights in the Senate.	Berlusconi has a fight in the Senate.
60	prot gain berlusconi awaits fate	Pro win berlusconi is waiting for destiny.	Berlusconi pro gain awaits fate.	Pro gainer berlusconi awaits fate.
60	berlusconi arrested expert	Berlusconi arrests expert.	So Berlusconi arrested an expert.	Berlusconi arrested an expert in the field.
60	italy president berlusconi obey law pardon	President Berlusconi obeys the law.	Italian President Berlusconi obeys the law.	Italian President Berlusconi has to obey the law.
60	berlusconi fight senate seat claim document	Berlusconi is fighting against the petition for a seat in the Senate.	Berlusconi is fighting against the Senate seat request document.	Berlusconi fights the Senate seat request document.
60	berlusconi senate vote	This is Berlusconi's Senate vote.	A vote in the Senate of Berlusconi.	Berlusconi's senate vote.
60	berlusconi lawmaker pull italy coalition party	Berlusconi's legislator has taken advantage of the Italian-led coalition.	The legislator of Berlusconi took advantage of the party of the Italian coalition.	The Italian coalition took advantage of Berlusconi's legislature.
60	berlusconi fraud case reopened ejection vote	The case of fraud by Berlusconi reopened the vote.	Berlusconi's fraud case has reopened the vote.	Berlusconi's fraud case reopened the vote.
60	berlusconi appeal lawmaker expulsion vote	Berlusconi has appealed against the D'apos vote; the legislators have been ousted.	Berlusconi is appealing the vote against the expulsion of the legislators.	Berlusconi appeals the vote d'apos; expulsion of the legislators.
60	italy premier accelerate reform winning confidence vote	The Prime Minister of l'apos; Italy, speeds up the vote of confidence in favour of the reform.	Prime Minister of l'apos, Italy, hastened the vote of confidence for reform.	Prime Minister of l'apos; Italy, hastened the vote of confidence in the reform process.
60	movie producer assistant center silvio berlusconi defense	L' Assistant to film producer Silvio Berlusconi Défense Centre.	L' assistant to film producer Silvio Berlusconi Defense center.	L' assistant Silvio Berlusconi film producer center.
60	berlusconi defiant ahead vote senate seat	It's not just a question of how much money you're willing to spend.	Berlusconi, provocateur, vote in the Senate of France.	Berlusconi, provocateur, vote in the apos; advance and seat in the Senate.
60	silvio berlusconi president pardon slam coup etat	Silvio Berlusconi, president, pardon, pardon, pardon, pardon, pardon.	Silvio Berlusconi President pardon slam coup state.	Silvio Berlusconi president pardon slam coup state.
60	italian government survives senate vote berlusconi	The Italian government has survived the Berlusconi Senate vote.	The Italian government survives the vote of the Berlusconi Senate.	Italian government survives Berlusconi Senate vote.
60	berlusconi request trial review ahead senate expulsion	Berlusconi is asking for a review of the trial before the end of his term of office.	Berlusconi requested a review of the trial before the Senate was dissolved.	Berlusconi requests trial review before sentencing; expulsion from the Senate.
60	fragile italian government call confidence vote budget	The frail Italian government announces a vote of confidence.	The fragile Italian government is announcing a vote of confidence budget.	Italy's fragile government announces a vote of confidence budget.
60	letter italy rome fiddle rest country burn	L' italia rome fiddle resto country burn.	L' Italy rome fiddle rest country burns.	Italy rome fiddle rest country burn.
60	italian senate poised expel berlusconi tax fraud	The Italian Senate s&apos, ready to kick Berlusconi out of tax evasion.	The Italian Senate s' ready to expel Berlusconi from tax evasion.	The Italian Senate is poised to expel Berlusconi from tax evasion.
60	letta senate majority cut paper	The majority of the Senate has cut down on paper.	The majority of the Senate cut paper.	The majority cut paper in the Senate.
60	sivio berlusconi face day italian parliament	Sivio Berlusconi facing Italian Parliament day.	Sivio Berlusconi will face day Italian Parliament.	Sivio Berlusconi face day Italian parliament day.
60	berlusconi face political exile senate prepares vote	Berlusconi in front of the senate; exile, the political exile, prepares the vote.	Berlusconi faces senate political exile preparing the vote.	Berlusconi in front of the apos; political exile senate prepares the vote.
60	napolitano grant berlusconi pardon	Napolitano please forgive Berlusconi Berlusconi.	Napolitano pardon Berlusconi Berlusconi.	Napolitano grant pardon Berlusconi Berlusconi.
60	key berlusconi political career	Berlusconi's Key Political Career.	Berlusconi's key political career.	Key political career of Berlusconi.
60	berlusconi face expulsion parliament tax fraud	He is also a member of the Council of the European Union.	Berlusconi risks being expelled from Parliament on the grounds of tax evasion.	Berlusconi faces deportation for tax evasion.
60	italy senate vote expelling berlusconi parliament	The Italian Senate expels Berlusconi's parliament.	The Italian Senate vote expels the Berlusconi parliament.	The vote of the Italian Senate expels the parliament of Berlusconi.
60	rome brace silvio berlusconi senate expulsion	Bravio Silvio Berlusconi expelled from the Senate.	Rome Bravio Silvio Berlusconi expelled from the Senate.	Rome Bravio Silvio Berlusconi's expulsion from the Senate.
60	berlusconi face vote oust permanently italy senate	Berlusconi is voting to remove the Italian Senate permanently.	Berlusconi's voting to oust the Italian Senate permanently.	Berlusconi votes to permanently oust the Italian Senate.
60	silvio berlusconi set senate vote expulsion	Silvio Berlusconi decided to expel the Senate.	Silvio Berlusconi made the decision to remove the Senate.	It's time to move on to the next level.
60	italy pm silvio berlusconi cabinet support	Silvio Berlusconi supports the Italian cabinet.	Silvio Berlusconi supported the cabinet in Italy.	Silvio Berlusconi supports cabinet in Italy.
60	berlusconi break government budget vote	Berlusconi breaks the vote on his government's budget.	Berlusconi broke the vote on the government budget.	Berlusconi breaks the government budget vote.
60	senate vote removing berlusconi conviction going	Senate deleting Berlusconi's conviction.	Senate vote to suppress the Berlusconi conviction.	A senate vote to suppress Berlusconi's conviction.
60	berlusconi break government ahead italy senate showdown	Berlusconi breaks the government before the Apostles, a test of the strength of the Italian Senate.	Berlusconi shattered the government before the power struggle of the Italian Senate.	Berlusconi breaks the government before the Italian Senate's showdown.
60	berlusconi party confirms quit italy coalition official	The Berlusconi party has confirmed that the leader of the Italian coalition has resigned from office.	Berlusconi confirms that the leader of the Italian coalition has resigned.	Berlusconi party confirms Italian coalition leader has resigned.
60	berlusconi move opposition	Berlusconi proposes the opposition.	Berlusconi suggested the apos; opposition.	This is the first time that Berlusconi has proposed an opposition.
60	silvio berlusconi face expulsion parliament tax fraud sentence	Silvio Berlusconi is at risk of being ousted from the House of Commons on the grounds of a tax eviction.	Silvio Berlusconi faces deportation for tax evasion.	Silvio Berlusconi faces expulsion from Parliament for tax fraud.
60	senate vote berlusconi expulsion	The Senate has voted to remove Berlusconi.	The Senate votes on Berlusconi's expulsion.	The Senate votes expulsion of Berlusconi.
60	italy berlusconi accuses left coup etat	L' Italy accuses Berlusconi of a left-wing coup.	The apos; Italy accuses Berlusconi of coup d'apos; state left.	Italy accuses Berlusconi of coup d'apos; state left.
60	berlusconi forza italia exit government collaboration	Berlusconi Forza Italia has left the Italian government.	Berlusconi Forza Italia to leave the collaboration of the Italian government.	Berlusconi Forza Italia leave Italian government collaboration.
60	berlusconi revived party withdraws support italian gov	The reinstated Berlusconi Party is withdrawing its support for the Italian government.	Berlusconi's reinstated party withdraws its support for the Italian government.	Berlusconi's reinstated party withdraws support for the Italian government.
60	italy pm letta win confidence vote berlusconi move opposition	Italy pm win vote of confidence Berlusconi move the apos; opposition.	Italy pm letta win the vote of confidence Berlusconi move l' opposition.	Italy pm letta win confidence vote Berlusconi move the opposition.
60	berlusconi break government	Berlusconi breaks the government.	Berlusconi's breaking the government.	And Berlusconi breaks the government.
60	silvio berlusconi withdraws support italy government	Silvio Berlusconi has withdrawn his support for the Italian government.	Silvio Berlusconi withdraws his support of the government.	Silvio Berlusconi withdraws support from Italian government.
60	italy berlusconi avoiding expulsion senate	Italy Berlusconi was expelled from the Senate of the United States.	Italy Berlusconi avoiding the apos; expulsion from the Senate.	Italy Berlusconi avoiding apos; expulsion from Senate.
60	berlusconi set lose italian senate seat	Berlusconi loses his Italian Senate seat.	Berlusconi lost the seat in the Italian Senate.	Berlusconi loses his seat in Italian Senate.
60	berlusconi minute pitch avoid senate expulsion	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.	Berlusconi minute pitch avoid the apos; expulsion from the senate.	Berlusconi minute pitch avoid the Senate expulsion.
60	evidence dismantle berlusconi evidence	Evidence breaks Berlusconi's evidence.	The evidence is breaking Berlusconi's evidence.	The evidence unravels the evidence of Berlusconi.
60	update berlusconi break government budget vote	Berlusconi Update to break the vote on the government's budget.	Berlusconi update break the vote on the government budget.	Update from Berlusconi to break government budget vote.
60	italian parliament debate berlusconi expulsion	The European Parliament adopted a resolution on the protection of human rights.	Italian parliamentary debate on the death penalty; expulsion of Berlusconi.	Italian parliamentary debate on expulsion of Berlusconi.
60	berlusconi ditch bid reopen case	Berlusconi quits and demands the reopening of the business.	Berlusconi drops the case and asks for it to be reopened.	Berlusconi says that he wants to reopen the case and that he wants to reopen it.
60	berlusconi face expulsion vote	Berlusconi may be subject to deportation by vote.	Berlusconi faces deportation by vote.	Berlusconi risks expulsion by vote.
61	bomb kill wound iraq	Iraq was killed by the bomb.	This bomb killed Iraq.	The bomb killed Iraq.
61	killed iraq attack	It was the first time in the world that Iraq had been killed in an attack.	Iraq was killed in an attack.	He was killed in an attack.
61	sixteen killed iraqi suicide bombing	Sixteen people were killed in a-suicide bomb attack in Iraq.	Sixteen people were killed in a U.S. suicide bombing in Iraq.	Sixteen people were killed in a suicide bombing in Iraq.
61	suicide bomber kill attack army base	Suicide bomber kills apo base; army.	A suicide bomber kills a base of the army.	A suicide bomber kills an army base.
61	body baghdad shot dead official	Baghdad kills official.	Baghdad killed an official.	Baghdad killed an official today.
61	st ld policeman killed suicide bomb attack western iraq	A police officer killed a suicide bomber in the west of Iraq.	The police officer killed a suicide bomber in the western part of the country.	A policeman killed a suicide bomber in the west of Iraq.
61	echo killing body baghdad	The echoes of Baghdad's death.	The apos; echo of the death of Baghdad.	L' echo of Baghdad's death.
61	double suicide bombing military base kill iraqi soldier north baghdad	The two-day-suicide bombing of the military base killed the Iraqi soldier in the north of Baghdad.	The two-time-suicide bombing attack at the military base killed the Iraqi soldier north of Baghdad.	The double attack-suicide bombing of the military base kills Iraqi soldier north of Baghdad.
61	latestnews killed iraq violence	The latest news kills the Iraqi violence.	The latest news has killed Iraqi violence.	The latest news has killed violence in Iraq.
61	stanchart launch iraq operation	Stanchart is now launching the Iraqi operation.	Stanchart launches the Iraqi operation.	Stanchart launches the operation Iraqi.
61	policeman killed suicide bomb attack western iraq	A suicide bombing was killed by a police officer in the west of Iraq.	The police officer killed a suicide bomber in the western part of the city.	A policeman killed a suicide bomb attack in West Papua, Iraq.
61	stanchart opening mark british bank iraq	Opening of British Bank will take place at Stanchart.	Stanchart marks d' opening of the British Bank iraq.	Stanchart marks d' opening British Bank iraq.
61	iraqi serviceman killed injured baghdad	An Iraqi soldier killed a man wounded in the attack.	One Iraqi soldier killed Baghdad, wounded.	Iraqi soldier killed Baghdad wounded.
61	killed baghdad attack	Baghdad killed.	Baghdad was killed.	Baghdad was killed last night.
61	deadly blast hit baghdad mosul	The explosion hit the city of Baghdad Mosul.	The deadly explosion has hit Baghdad Mosul.	The deadly explosion hit Mosul.
61	news stanchart bank iraq october business failure cut	In the meantime, the Bank of Iraq announced that it would reduce its spending by a further $1 million.	The October commercial failure of Iraqi bank Stanchart reduced its spending.	Iraqi bank Stanchart's October commercial failure reduced spending.
61	killed iraq suicide attack	The Council of Europe had a major role to play in that respect.	Iraq was the victim of a suicide attack.	Iraq was a suicide bomber.
61	killed wounded iraq	He killed injured Iraqis.	He has killed wounded Iraqis.	He killed wounded Iraqis!
61	iraq unrest suicide bomb kill	L' Iraqi commotion, an attack-suicide bombing kills.	L' Iraqi agitation, a suicide bombing-kills.	L' Iraqi agitation, a suicide bomb attack kills.
61	killed iraq violence	Killed the Iraqi violence.	He's killed the Iraqi violence.	He killed the violence in Iraq.
61	bomber north baghdad kill soldier	The North Baghdad bomber... kills the soldier.	The North Baghdad bomber killed the soldier.	North Baghdad bomber kills soldier.
61	suicide bomber kill attack army base baghdad	Suicide bomber kills soldier at Baghdad military base.	A suicide bomber killed a soldier at the Baghdad military base.	A suicide bomber kills a soldier at military base in Baghdad.
61	string bombing shooting kill iraq	The aerial bombardment by ropes is killing Iraq.	String bombardment kills Iraq.	The string bombardment kills the apos; Iraq.
61	bomb attack kill baghdad amid wave violence	Bomb attack, killing Baghdad in the middle of a wave of violence.	Bomb attack killing Baghdad in the middle of a wave of violence.	A bomb attack killing Baghdad in the middle of a wave of violence.
61	british bank iraqi branch hailed	The British branch of the Iraqi Bank has acclaimed the agency as a major success.	The UK branch of the Bank will be applauding the agency.	The British branch of the bank iraqi cheered the agency.
61	iraqi killed baghdad	They say Iraki killed Baghdad.	L'apos; Iraki killed Baghdad.	Iraki killed him.
61	separate attack iraq kill	Separate Iraqi attack, kill.	Separate attack iraqi kill.	Separate attack kill Iraqi.
61	killed wounded attack security force iraq	He killed Iraqi security forces, who were injured in an attack.	He killed the Iraqi security forces, who were wounded in an attack.	He killed Iraqi security forces wounded in an attack.
61	suicide blast religious procession kill iraq	Iraq is being killed by a suicide religious procession.	A suicide religious procession kills the apos; Iraq.	A suicide religious procession kills Iraq.
61	people die attack baghdad	People have been dying attacking Baghdad.	I mean, people are dying attacking Baghdad.	People die fighting Baghdad.
61	iraq violence shooting bombing leave dead	The violence in Iraq and the bombings have left many people dead.	Iraqi violence and bombings are causing deaths.	Iraqi violence and bombings leave people dead.
61	iraq executed corps attack kill	It was the first time in the history of the United States that Iraq had carried out an attack.	Iraq carried out the attack on the army.	Iraq executed the apos; attack of the army corps.
61	iraqi official separate attack baghdad kill people wound	Iraqi officials are separately attacking and killing the injured.	Iraqi officials will attack separately and kill those who are injured.	Iraqi officials attack separately and kill the wounded.
61	british bank open iraq	Opened in Iraq.	The Bank of Iraq was established in 1958.	British bank in Iraq.
61	stanchart iraq banking petrodollars boost economy	Stanchart's bank dollars are boosting the economy.	Stanchart's petrodollars will boost the economy.	Stanchart's iraq banking petrodollars boost the economy.
61	standard chartered british bank open iraq branch	The British Standard Charter Bank is opening a branch office in Iraq.	The British chartered bank is opening a branch office in Iraq.	The standard chartered British bank opens a branch in Iraq.
61	standard chartered bank launch operation iraq	In addition, the Bank of Canada is a member of the International Monetary Fund.	Standard launch operation for an Iraqi chartered bank.	Standard launch operation of Iraqi chartered bank.
61	baghdad suicide bomber	Kamikaze.	Baghdad kamikaze.	Baghdad suicide bomber.
61	killed violent attack baghdad	Kill him, kill him, and attack him violently.	Kill the apos; violent attack Baghdad.	Kill them; violent attack Baghdad.
61	suicide bombing iraq base kill official	The Iraqi base d' bomb attacks-suicide kills the official.	Iraqi base d' bomb attacks-suicide bombing kills the official responsible.	Iraqi base d' suicide bombing kills official.
61	attack kill iraq executes terrorist	Attack kills Iraq and terrorism.	The attack is killing Iraq and terrorism.	The attack will kill Iraq and terrorism.
61	iraq attack kill corps shot head	The Iraqi attackers killed the body and injured its head.	The Iraqi attack killed the body and injured his head.	L' Iraqi attack killed the body, wounded head.
61	killed bomb shooting attack baghdad wounded	He was murdered in a bomb attack.	It was killed in a bomb attack.	He was killed in a bomb attack that killed him.
61	killed wounded attack army base iraq	Killed some wounded at the Iraqi military base.	He has killed wounded at the Iraqi military base.	He killed wounded at Iraqi military base.
61	iraq twin blast kill	Two explosion-killed Iraqi twins.	Two Iraqi twins, blown up.	And two Iraqi twins were killed by an explosion.
61	iraq unrest including suicide bomb kill	L' agitation in Iraq, including the attacks-suicide bomb, kills.	L' unrest in Iraq, including suicide bombings, kills people.	Iraq agitation, including suicide bomb attacks, kills.
61	suicide bombing kill iraqi soldier police	Bombing-suicide kills soldiers of the Iraqi police.	Suicide bombings-are killing Iraqi police soldiers.	Suicide bomb attacks kill Iraqi police soldiers.
62	britain crackdown benefit tourism	Tourism benefits from British repression.	British repression benefits tourism.	The British crackdown benefits tourism.
62	david cameron bid bulgarian romanian migrant	David proposed a Bulgarian Romanian migrant.	David Cameron proposed a Romanian Bulgarian migrant.	David Cameron proposed a Bulgarian migrant from Romania.
62	pm curb eu migration tory plan power grab brussels	Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm.	Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm.	Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm Pm.
62	cabinet split forcing eu migrant wait longer unemployment benefit	The Committee asks for up-to-date information in the next report on the situation of migrant workers.	The division of labour forces migrants from Europe to wait longer for unemployment benefit.	The division of firms forcing migrants to wait longer for unemployment benefits.
62	britain risk nasty country image eu	It's a good place to start, but it's a good place to start.	La Grande-Bretagne may have a bad image of the country.	Grande-Brittany may have a bad image of the country.
62	cameron bid tackle migration	Cameron, two-time tackle migration.	Cameron bid tackle migration?	Cameron bid tackle migration program.
62	uk pm plan eu migrant benefit curb	Uk Pm also plans to have benefits for migrants.	Uk Pm plans to have advantages for migrants.	We plan to have benefits for migrants.
62	eu citizen three month rent cammo	J' had a citizen for three months rent camouflage camouflage.	J' had three months rent cammo camouflage.	J' had citizen three months rent cammo camouflage.
62	united kingdom cameron limit migrant benefit	The U.K. limits the benefits to migrants.	The UK-Cameron limits the benefits to migrants.	And the United Kingdom, Cameron, restricts the profits of migrants.
62	eu migrant face tough curb	Life is not easy for migrants.	Migrants can't have an easy life.	It is not easy for a person to become a migrant.
62	david cameron vow crackdown benefit received romanian	David Cameron was repressed in Romanian.	David Cameron received the benefit of repression in Romanian.	David Cameron received the benefit of the crackdown in Romanian.
62	european migration david cameron attack european union	David Cameron attacks the European Union.	European migration David Cameron has been attacking the European Union.	European migration David Cameron attacks the European Union.
62	day mail explosive poll cameron declares migration share	Day e-mail explosion cameron poll declares part of migration.	Day explosive mail cameron poll declares part of migration.	Day explosive mail cameron poll declares migration share.
62	clash eu migrant benefit	Migratory euro-conflict.	Conflict euro-migration.	Euro-Conflict @-@migratory.
62	cameron call tighter rule eu migrant	Cameron Call just made it hard to migrate.	Cameron Call hardened the migrant rule.	Cameron Call toughened the migrant rule a little bit.
62	mehdi morning memo curb benefit tourism exist	Mehdi morning profit tourism boarded memo exists.	Mehdi morning memo profit tourism tucked away exists.	Mehdi morning memo flanked tourism profit exists.
62	eu official deplores hysteria nasty britain cameron tightens screw	Cameron, the bad Englishwoman, is tightening the screws.	J' have officially lamented the hysteria, the bad English Cameron tightens the screws.	J&apos has officially lamented the hysterical English villain Cameron tightens the screws.
62	david cameron pledge eu migrant benefit crackdown	And David Cameron promised that the migrants would benefit from the crackdown.	David promised that migrants would benefit from the crackdown.	David Cameron promised that the crackdown would benefit the migrants.
62	dispute immigration widens britain eu	The dispute over immigration is widening the Great-Brittany.	The dispute over immigration and immigration widens the Great-Brittany.	The dispute over immigration widens Britain.
62	cameron call tighter eu migration	Cameron Call has tightened their migration.	Cameron Call has tightened her migration patterns.	Cameron Call tightened her migration patterns.
62	britain cameron call clampdown eu freedom movement	British Cameron is calling for a crackdown on the freedom movement.	British Cameron calls for repression of the freedom movement.	British Cameron calls for the freedom movement to be repressed.
62	pm pledge action eu benefit	Action has had a positive impact.	L' commitment to the project; and action has had a positive impact.	L' commitment of the participants; action had positive results.
62	britain nasty country eu benefit curb arrival	The wrong country in Britain has taken advantage of the fact that brakes are now coming in.	The bad country of Britain took advantage of the arrival of brakes.	The bad British country profited from the arrival of brakes.
62	migrant benefit clampdown pm fire	Migrants are repressed in the event of fires.	Migrants benefit from suppression of forest fires.	Migrants benefit from fire suppression.
62	pmqs pm call proper transition control immigration	It is not possible to determine if there is a change in the population.	Pmqs pm call for appropriate immigration transition control.	Pmqs pm call for appropriate transition control of immigration.
62	cameron isolated push free movement restriction	Cameron imposes restrictions on freedom of movement.	Cameron, isolated, imposes restrictions on freedom of movement.	Cameron, an isolated citizen, imposes restrictions on freedom of movement.
62	migrant benefit top david cameron agenda bid negotiate	Migrant Benefits at the Top of the Agenda David Cameron Negotiation of Immigrants; Offer of Employment.	Benefit of migrants at the top of the agenda David Cameron Negotiation of passports; job offer.	Migrants benefit top of the agenda David Cameron Negotiation of passports; offer of employment.
62	britain hysterical immigration risk nasty country	It's a great place to live, and it's a great place to live.	L' hysterical immigration of the Grande-Brittany risks to be a naughty country.	L' hysterical immigration of the Grande-Bretagne may be a nasty country.
62	business sigh cameron crack immigration	Businesses are driving Cameron to the breaking point of immigration.	Business is driving Cameron to crack immigration.	Business drives Cameron to crack immigration laws.
62	david cameron stricter rule migrant	David Cameron has stricter rules about how to deal with migrants.	David Cameron's got stricter rules about migrants.	David Cameron has stricter migrant rules.
62	britain quit europe tide	La Grande has left the Apos; Europe.	La Grande-Bretagne has left l' Europe.	La Grande-Bretagne has left the city of L&apos.
62	free movement europe free	Free-free-free-free-free-free circulation.	Free-circulation ...free-circulation ...free-circulation.	Free-free-free-free-free-free-free-free-free-free.
62	benefit restriction eu migrant work	Migrant's employment benefits are restricted.	Restriction of benefits for migrant workers.	Limitation of migrant work benefits.
62	eu migrant david cameron set benefit restriction	Benefits were restricted by David Cameron, who had emigrated to Canada.	David Cameron, who had emigrated to Canada, placed some restrictions on benefits.	David Cameron, who had emigrated to Canada, imposed benefit restrictions.
62	uk defies eu free movement tenet call settlement	The United Kingdom has defied the principle of freedom of movement.	The United Kingdom defies the principle of free movement.	The United Kingdom defies the free movement principle.
62	cameron vow cut eu migrant benefit	Cameron vowed that he would cut the apo; advantage to the migrants.	Cameron vowed to cut the apo; advantage to migrants.	Cameron vowed to cut the gap, which would benefit the migrants.
62	david cameron considers tightening migrant benefit rule	David Cameron is considering tightening the rules on benefits to migrants.	And David Cameron is considering tightening the migrant benefit rule.	Cameron is considering tightening the migrant benefit rule.
62	repeat migrant claim benefit indiginous briton	Repeat application for allocation to aboriginal Briton.	Repeat the application form; allowance to Aboriginal Briton.	Please repeat the application; allowance to the aboriginal Briton.
62	uk prime minister vow benefit tourism	The Prime Minister of the United Kingdom-expressed the hope that the benefits would be shared with tourism.	The Prime Minister of the Kingdom-United wishes that tourism would benefit.	UK Prime Minister-United vows that tourism will benefit.
62	britain restrict welfare benefit eu migrant	The Great-Britain limits social benefits to migrants d' European origin.	La Grande-Bretagne restricts the social benefits to d&apos migrants; European origin.	La Grande-Bretagne restricts social benefits to those who migrate abroad.
62	migrant benefit rule tightened cameron	The rules on migrant benefits have tightened Cameron.	The migrant benefit rule has Cameron tightened up.	The migrant benefit rule tightened Cameron.
62	cabinet split restricting migrant benefit	Firm fracture limiting benefits to migrants.	This is a cabinet fracture that limits the benefits granted to migrants.	Firm fracture limiting migrant benefits.
62	uk unveils plan migrant benefit restriction	The United Kingdom is unveiling its plan to restrict benefits to migrants.	The UK @-@United Kingdom unveils its plan to restrict migrant benefits.	The United Kingdom unveils its migrant benefit restriction plan.
62	cameron tightens britain migrant benefit rule	Cameron is tightening the British rule on the payment of benefits to migrants.	Cameron tightens the British migrant benefits rule.	Cameron tightens the British migrant benefit rule.
62	immigrant benefit crackdown	Immigrant benefits are severely curtailed.	There is a severe crackdown on immigrant benefits.	The crackdown on immigrant benefits is severe.
62	david cameron announces tough measure eastern european migrant	David Cameron announces harsh measures for the migrants from the countries of Eastern Europe.	David Cameron announces tough measures for the migrants from Eastern Europe.	David Cameron announces tough measures for migrants from Europe.
62	migrant eu man cameron fuelling hysteria	The migrants had left Cameron, which made them hysterical.	The migrants had already left cameron, which made them hysterical.	And the migrants had already left Cameron, which made them hysterical.
62	david cameron launch attack eu migration	David Cameron has launched an attack on the U.S. migration.	David Cameron launched the apos; attack on the migration had had.	David Cameron launches a migration attack on him.
62	minister break law immigrant benefit crackdown	Breaking the Immigration Benefits Act.	Minister who violated the Immigrant Benefits Act.	Minister of Health and Long-Term Care.
62	star comment cameron ahead game benefit migrant	The game is designed to be used by people who have migrated to Canada.	The Cameron ahead Star Comment game benefits migrants.	The Star Comment Cameron ahead game will benefit migrants.
62	cameron vow change rule eu benefit	I think Cameron's changing the rules had a benefit.	Cameron vow changing the rules had a benefit.	Cameron vow change rule had benefit.
62	david cameron target eu migrant benefit tourism	David Cameron targets migrant-friendly tourism.	David Cameron targets tourism that benefits migrants.	David Cameron is also targeting tourism for the benefit of migrants.
62	downing street defiant tougher eu benefit plan	Taking to the streets, defying the regime d'apos more harshly; benefits had.	As he took to the streets, defying the D&A regime more aggressively.	It's the first time I've been on the street, and it's the first time I've ever been on the street.
62	migrant speak cameron announces attack benefit	It's the first time that an emigre speaking cameron has announced a fund-raiser for the group.	An émigré speaking cameron announces a fundraiser for l'apos; Attack.	An emigre speaking cameron announces a fundraiser for l'apos; attack.
62	cameron vow change immigrant benefit rule	It's not like I don't know what I'm talking about.	Cameron vows to change the Immigration Allowance rules.	Cameron vowed to change the rule of unemployment.
62	eu david cameron migration curb uk nasty country	David Cameron, who has immigrated to Canada, has slowed down the process of migrating to a country that is not so famous.	David Cameron, who immigrated to Canada, stopped the migration to a notorious country.	David Cameron, who immigrated to Canada, slowed migration to a country that was not famous.
62	eleventh hour cameron buckle bulgarian immigration	This is the first time that a Bulgarian immigrant has arrived in the country.	Eleventh hour Cameron finishes the apos; Bulgarian immigration.	Cameron eleventh hour closes apo; Bulgarian immigration.
62	update britain cameron curb welfare benefit eu migrant	Updated list; British social insurance Cameron curb migrant.	Update of l' UK Social Insurance Cameron curb eu migrant.	British social insurance Cameron curb eu migrant update.
62	migration plan risk uk nasty country eu commissioner	It's a great place to live, but it's also a great place to live.	The migration plan could be a nasty place to be.	The migration plan might be a nasty country.
62	uk pm cameron announces measure immigrant welfare tourism	Uk pm Cameron reports a measure of well-being tourism-being immigrants.	Uk pm Cameron announces a measure of well-being tourism-being immigrants.	Uk pm Cameron announces a-be immigrants good tourism measure.
62	david cameron reacting restricting eu migrant stopping benefit	David Cameron reacted by curtailing the benefits of detained migrants.	David Cameron reacts by restricting the benefits of detained migrants.	David reacted by restricting the benefits of stopping the migrants.
62	pm collision course eu migrant benefit	Migrants benefited from the accident.	The accident had a beneficial effect on migrants.	It is also important to note that the effects of the accident on migrants have been positive.
62	britain cameron curb welfare benefit eu migrant	Cameron, in Great Britain, received social assistance for having had a migrant.	Cameron, in Grande@-@ Brittany, received social assistance for having a migrant.	Cameron, in Great Britain, has been on social assistance for her migrant status.
62	campaign romanian bulgarian cameron remove	Romanian Campaign Bulgarian cameron Bulgarians delete.	Romanian Campaign Bulgarian cameron delete.	Romanian campaign Bulgarian cameron delete.
62	cameron plan curb eu benefit overreaction	The cameroon plan's overreacting.	The cameroon plan just overreacted.	Well, the cameron plan had an overreaction.
62	cameron pledge restrict benefit immigrant	The benefits paid to immigrants are restricted by the Cameron Oath.	The Cameron Oath restricted benefits to immigrants.	The Cameron Oath restricts immigrant benefits.
62	david cameron labour monumental mistake allowing allow eastern	It's a huge mistake by David Cameron to make it possible for him to work.	David Cameron's monumental error makes it possible for people to work.	David Cameron's monumental error allows the apos; Est to work.
62	evening standard comment cameron move eu migrant	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Standard evening comment Cameron move e migrant.	Standard evening comment Cameron move eu migrant.
62	cameron plan crackdown immigrant claiming benefit	Plan opposes immigrants who apply for benefits.	Cameron Plan cracks down on the benefit-seeking immigrant.	Cameron Plan cracks down on the immigrant applying for benefits.
62	migrant benefit rule tightened cameron	The rules on migrant benefits have tightened Cameron.	The migrant benefit rule has Cameron tightened up.	The migrant benefit rule tightened Cameron.
62	cameron face voter fury immigrant	Cameron faced the Elector Fury furious immigrant.	Cameron facing the apostle; Fury voter in a fury.	Cameron faced l'apos; voter Fury immigrated enraged.
63	men wearhouse jos bank suited	The men wear the costume of the bank of jos jos.	They're wearing the jos jos bank costume.	Men wear jos jos bank suits.
63	men wearhouse proposes buy jos bank clothier stock shr	It's a great way to get your money back, and it's a great way to spend money.	The Men of the Sewing House proposes to buy our clothing bank down from shares.	The men of the house of sewing proposes to buy from our bank clothes down; shares.
63	men wearhouse offer buy suitor jos bank clothier	It's the first time I've been in the business, and it's the last time I've been in the business.	Men s' dress house offers to buy jos contending bank clothes more.	Men s' haberdashery offer d' buy jos jos claiming bank clothes more.
63	sartorial scuffle men wearhouse bid buy jos bank	Sartorium fights men to carry offers of money; buys money from Sartorium.	Sartorium fights the men to carry offers from them; buy jos bank jos.	Sartorium fights men to carry offers to buy jos bank jos.
63	stock wall street inch higher stren retailer	Stock Wall Street, a new, two-centimetre-long retailer.	Stock Wall Street, another two-inch retailer.	This is Stock Wall Street, a retailer that's just one more inch away.
63	men wearhouse bid rival	Men wear competing garments from men; offer.	The men wear the garments that rival the garments of the men.	The men wear clothes rival to l' offer.
63	men wearhouse jos bank tit tat	Men are wearing tattoos from the jos jos bank.	Well, the men have tattoos from the jos jos bank.	Men wear jos jos bank tattoos.
63	jos bank potential sale stir debate antitrust issue	It's just that the sale of our banks is likely to cause some controversy about the anti-trust regime.	The sale of our banks may spark a debate about anti-trust.	The sale of our banks may raise antitrust issues.
63	turning table men wearhouse pursues jos bank	The waiters turn the door of the house in pursuit of jos bank.	The waiters turn the door of the house chasing jos bank.	The servants turn the door of the house pursues jos bank.
63	men wearhouse offer jos bank	Men are walking around, offering them to jos bank.	All the men are walking around, offering to jos bank.	The men walk around, offer to jos bank.
63	men wearhouse rebrand jos bank remodel store	I mean, the men are wearing a brand-new brand-new bank remodel store.	The men are wearing a brand new jos bank remodel store.	Men carry a brand new jos bank remodel store.
63	men wearhouse mw jos bank josb deal high probability analyst	The men wear the house mw jos jos josb high probability analyst high probability deal analyst.	The men are wearing the house mw jos jos josb deal high probability analyst-analyst.	Men wear the house mw jos jos josb deal high probability analyst high probability analyst.
63	tuesday including tiffany jos bank men	Including Tiffany Joe's bankers.	Tuesday, including the bankers from Tiffany Joe.	And Tuesday, including Tiffany Joe's bankers.
63	reversal men wearhouse launch takeover bid jos bank	Reversing the men; getting used to the home of the launching company; buying our bank.	To reverse the men s' to accustom to the house of launching of l' public offer d' buy jos bank.	Reversing men quickly; getting used to the apo launch house; public offering d' buying jos bank.
63	men wearhouse turn table suitor	The men will carry the house round the table, sighing.	Men wear the house round the table sighing.	The men carry the round table house sighing.
63	thing morning	It's morning.	That thing, it's morning.	You know, this thing, it's morning.
63	men wearhouse proposes acquire jos bank	The Men of the Sewing House propose to buy our bank.	The men of the house of sewing propose to buy our bank.	The sewing house men propose to buy our bank.
63	men wearhouse offer buy jos bank share cash	Men of the sewing house offers to buy my bank part cash.	The men of the sewing house offer to buy our bank part of the cash.	The men of the sewing house offer to buy our bank part cash.
63	suitor jos bank target	And the suitor's target is the Bank of Jos Bank.	The suitor's target is Jos Bank.	The suitor's target is the bank Jos Bank.
63	retail stock gain wall street	Retail sales, Wall Street stock market winnings.	Retail, win Wall Street stock market.	Wall Street stock market winnings.
63	news summary men wearhouse court jos bank	They wear jos jos-banks.	Journalists wear jos jos-banks.	The journalists are wearing jos jos-banks.
63	marriage men wearhouse jos bank happen	The man-carrying-home wedding is on.	Man-carrying-home marriage is happening.	Marriage man wearing house jos bank goes on.
63	men wearhouse jos bank coming	People wear jos-banks.	Men wear jos-banks.	You know, men wear jos-banks.
63	sensible suit deal	It is an agreement between the two parties.	It's an agreement between the two parties.	It is not an agreement between the two parties, but rather an agreement between them.
63	men wearhouse hunter target	They carry the target of a barracks hunter.	The men carried the target of a barracks hunter.	The men carry the target of a barracks-hunter.
63	video quick tiffany sparkle suit company spar	Quick Video Tiffany glittering costume spar company.	Quick video Tiffany glittering spar company costume spar.	Quick video Tiffany sparkling costume company spar company.
63	news analysis investor november	L' l' l' l' l' l' l&apos.	L' investor in l' analysis of the new November.	L' investor in l' news analysis November.
63	stock watch men wearhouse jos bank barnes noble	Stockmen-surveillance wear jos banks barnes noble.	Stockmen-surveillance wear jos barnes noble banks.	Stock-surveillance men wear jos barnes noble banks.
63	men wearhouse bid jos bank	Men wear the clothes of jos jos bank.	Well, the men are wearing jos jos bank clothes.	Men wear jos jos bank clothes.
63	men wearhouse offer buy jos bank	It's a good idea to buy the bank, but it's a good idea.	The men get dressed, offer to buy the bank jos.	The men dress, offer d' buy the bank jos.
63	jos bank percent premarket men wearhouse	Jos banks for percentage of men's precommercial home door.	Jos banks for the percentage of men's pre-market house door.	For more information, please visit our Web site at http://www.cra.gc.ca/english/index.html.
63	pre market men wearhouse bid jos bank housing permit hit year	Men of pre-market carry tender house jos permit bank hit year.	Men of pre-market carry tender house jos bank housing permits struck year.	Pre-men's market to bid house jos bank housing permits hit year.
63	measuring jos bank men wearhouse	Measuring our house-carrying bankers.	Measuring our banker men carry home.	I mean, measuring our banker men carrying house.
63	buzz stock wal mart store blackberry intel corporation	The Blackberry Intel Stock Exchange.	The Blackberry Intel stock market.	The stock market of the company Blackberry Intel.
63	eminence capital offer presentation describing shareholder	It's a good idea to buy a car, but it's a good idea to buy it.	Presentation of the capital offer; eminence of the shareholder.	Presentation of capital offer dapos; eminence describing shareholder.
63	men wearhouse bid jos bank	Men wear the clothes of jos jos bank.	Well, the men are wearing jos jos bank clothes.	Men wear jos jos bank clothes.
63	hormel food earnings conference call	Telephone Conference on Hormonal Food Income.	Conference call on hormone food recipes.	This is a conference call on hormone food recipes.
63	men wearhouse letter jos bank chair robert wildrick	The men here are carrying a letter from the home of Robert Wildrick Bank President Jos.	The men carry a letter from the home of Robert Wildrick Bank president jos.	The men carry a letter from the house jos bank president Robert Wildrick.
63	men wearhouse pursuit jos bank	I mean, the men are wearing jos bank jos hunting clothes.	Men wear jos bank jos hunting clothes.	The men wear hunting clothes jos bank jos.
63	men wearhouse turn table bid jos bank	It is the first time in the world that men have had the opportunity to participate.	The men turn to the table at the beginning of the operation.	The men turn to table d' operation.
63	table turn men wearhouse buy jos bank	Men are turning the table, men, home, bank jos.	The men turn the table, the men, the house, the bank jos.	The men turn the table, the house, the bank jos.
63	men wearhouse buy jos bank billion	Men s&apos dress house to buy our banks billions of billions.	I mean, men s&apos dress house to buy our billion-billion-dollar bank.	Men s' dress house buy jos banks billions.
63	stock wall street cautiously inch extending record	Stock Wall Street prudently extends its personal best by a few centimetres.	Stock Wall Street is expanding its record by a few centimetres.	Cautiously extending his record by a few centimetres.
63	men wearhouse bid	Men wear household clothing.	The men are all wearing their own household clothes.	Well, men wear household clothes.
63	men wearhouse offer acquire jos bank	L' Offer d' Purchase of JOS Bank.	L' d&apos offer; purchase of jos bank.	L' d&apos offer; jos bank purchase.
63	golf cost	Golf costs.	Cost of the golf.	Well, that's golf money.
63	men wearhouse hunted hunter	Men of the Apos; exterior of the house of Apos; man of the Apos; future.	The men of the apos; outside of the house of the apos; man of the apos; future.	The men of the Apos; outside the house of the Apos; future man.
63	update men wearhouse turn table bid jos bank	Men are now turning their heads.	The men are now turning their heads.	The men of today are turning their heads.
63	men wearhouse turn table bid jos bank	It is the first time in the world that men have had the opportunity to participate.	The men turn to the table at the beginning of the operation.	The men turn to table d' operation.
63	men wearhouse dust pac man defense	Men are wearing-dust protective clothing.	Men wear protective clothing against-dust.	The men wear anti-dust clothing @-@.
63	men wearhouse buy jos bank	They get used to the jos jos bank.	It's just that men get used to the jos jos bank.	Men get used to bank jos jos.
63	business highlight	Company's focal point.	The focal point of the company.	It's a good place to start your business.
63	men wearhouse shareholder working restart talk jos bank	Men carry the householder while they work to restart their banks.	The men carry the shareholder of the house as they work to restart the bank.	The men carry the house shareholder while working to restart jos banks.
63	thing buy black friday	Buy a Black Friday.	Buy a black Friday.	To buy a black Friday.
63	brawl guy wearing suit	Suit fighter.	He's a fighter in a suit.	A suit fighter.
63	men wearhouse bid jos bank	Men wear the clothes of jos jos bank.	Well, the men are wearing jos jos bank clothes.	Men wear jos jos bank clothes.
63	stock wall street changed record high	Stock Wall Street has got a new record.	Stock Wall Street just changed the record.	Stock Wall Street changed the record.
63	men wearhouse bid jos bank	Men wear the clothes of jos jos bank.	Well, the men are wearing jos jos bank clothes.	Men wear jos jos bank clothes.
63	men wearhouse takeover bid rival good fit	They are the only ones who are willing to take advantage of the opportunities offered by the company.	The men are accustomed to the apo, the public offering of apo, the purchase of apo, a hand of apo, the artwork of apo, and rival takeovers.	The men are accustomed to the apos; public offer; buy of apos; a hand; rival OPA; work of apos.
63	men wearhouse men wearhouse turn table bid jos	The man carries the house, the man carries the house round the table.	L' man carries the house l' man carries the house round the table.	L&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos.
63	men wearhouse counter billion offer jos bank	L' man s' entourent contre le contre-billions d' workspaces josbanes.	L' man s' surround against against-billion d' workspaces jos banks.	L' man s' surround against the counter-billion d' jos bank workspaces.
63	trading place men wearhouse enters bid jos bank	Location of trade man-house sewing house enters the bank jos jos jos bank.	Place of commerce man couture house enters into the bank bid jos jos bank jos.	Sewing house place of commerce enters the bank bid jos jos bank jos.
63	men wearhouse counter jos bank offer	They are the only ones who are willing to pay for their services.	The men carry the money; a bank at their counter.	The men are offering a bank to counter them.
63	men wearhouse offer buy jos bank	It's a good idea to buy the bank, but it's a good idea.	The men get dressed, offer to buy the bank jos.	The men dress, offer d' buy the bank jos.
63	analysis men wearhouse eration backfire retailer	For more information, contact your local fire department at 1-800-959-5525.	Analysis men carry home eration retro-fire flashback retailer.	Home wear analysis men eration retro-fire retail flashback.
63	men wearhouse bid jos bank turning target suitor	Men are wearing clothes from the bank of l' offers of jos jos becoming the target suitor.	The men wear the clothes of the bank of l' offers of jos jos becoming the target suitor.	The men wear clothes from the bank of l' offers jos jos becoming the target suitor.
63	meet eminence capital hedge fund pushing men wearhouse deal	It's time to get to know each other and get to know each other.	Meet the eminent capital fund hedge fund push men to the apos; failure.	Meet people; eminent capital fund hedge fund pushes men to failure.
63	men wearhouse employ pac man defense jos bank clothier	The men are dressed as a pac man defender and the men are dressed as a bank clothier.	The men dress in pac man defenses to bank clothier.	S&apos men dress as pac man defense jos bank clothier.
63	jos bank potential sale stir antitrust debate	The potential sale of jos banks is also causing an anti-trust debate.	The potential sale of jos banks is generating antitrust debate.	There is an antitrust debate over the potential sale of jos banks.
63	obamacare application	Application of obamacare.	Application d' obamacare.	E-mail address: http://www.ec.gc.ca/english/e-mail.htm.
63	men wearhouse jos bank share rise latest proposal video	Men porter house jos jos banker of the last video proposal increase.	Men carry home jos bank jos the rise of the latest proposal video.	Men carry home jos bank of the latest proposal video increase.
63	men wearhouse bid turn table	It's a great place to spend time with friends and family.	Men dress from home to table d&apos.	The men dress from house to table d' auction.
63	atcha men wearhouse play jos bank	It's a fun game to play at the same time.	The men of Atcha s&apos play at jos bank.	Apos men, Atcha s&apos, play jos bank games.
63	men wearhouse turn table jos bank bid video	The men are all wearing clothes from the rotating table of the bank's video store.	The men are wearing clothes from the rotating table of the video bank of l&apos.	The men are wearing rotating table clothes from the bank jos video de l'apos; offer.
63	men wearhouse share offer jos bank	The guys at the sewing house are offering our bank jos.	The men at the sewing house offer our banks jos.	The men of the sewing house offer jos bank jos.
63	men wearhouse pac man joseph bank	Men wear the costume of pacman joseph bank.	Men wear the pacman joseph bank costume.	Men wear pacman joseph bank suits.
63	men wearhouse turn table offer buy rival jos bank	Men are turning the house over to buy the rival bank.	So the men turn the house over to buy the rival bank.	Men turn the house over to buy rival bank jos.
63	men wearhouse counter billion offer jos bank update	This is why we are proud to announce that we will be able to offer you the best of our products and services.	People surround themselves against billions of dollars; offer our banking update jos.	The men are surrounded against billions of dollars; offer jos actualisation bank jos.
63	men wearhouse bid rival jos bank	Men wear the clothes of rivals, the banks.	Men wear the clothes of rival banks.	The men wear the clothes of rival banks.
63	men wearhouse counter bid buy jos bank bln	It's the only way you can get the money you need to buy your money.	The men will dress the house against the offer of money; buy our bank bln.	The men se' dress house against offer; buy our bank bln.
63	wall street inch higher stren retailer	Wall Street... a two-centimetre-longer retailer.	Wall Street, another two centimeters.	Wall Street, an additional retailer 2 cm.
63	role reversal men wearhouse pursuit jos bank	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	The men of the apo; inversion of roles carry the pursuit jos bank jos.	The role reversal men carry the pursuit jos bank jos.
63	midday mover google autozone macy	Google-google-autozone-macy midday mover.	The noon mover google autozone macy.	Midday mover google autozone macy.
63	men wearhouse turn table competitor	They get used to competing rotating tables.	Men get used to competing rotating tables.	The men get used to the competing rotating tables.
63	men wearhouse bid jos bank	Men wear the clothes of jos jos bank.	Well, the men are wearing jos jos bank clothes.	Men wear jos jos bank clothes.
63	dealpolitik hostile merger equal men wearhouse jos	Deal politik fusion hostile equals men wearing home jos jos.	Dealpolitik hostile merger equals jos jos house wear men.	Dealpolitik hostile merger equals men carrying home jos jos.
63	men wearhouse turn table jos bank offer	The men are wearing the rotating table jos offer jos banker's offer.	The men carry the rotating table jos offers jos bank offer.	Men carry jos rotating table jos bank offer jos offer.
63	newscast yuletide shopping bright	This is a new Christmas newspaper making light purchases.	New Christmas newspaper shopping for light.	New Christmas newspaper shopping light.
63	pac man defense brings retailer cold	The defense of Pac Man cools the retailer.	Pac Man defense cools the retailer.	Pac Man's defense gets the retailer cold.
63	jos bank confirms receipt unsolicited acquisition proposal men	Bank JOS confirms unsolicited receipt of unsolicited proposal from Acquisitionsmen.	Bank jos confirms receipt of unsolicited men acquisition proposal.	JOS confirms receipt unsolicited proposal of men acquisition.
63	men wearhouse proposal acquire jos bank	It's a good idea to buy a lot of money.	Men make a proposal to buy jos jos bank jos.	The men propose to buy jos jos bank jos.
63	men wearhouse offer jos bank	Men are walking around, offering them to jos bank.	All the men are walking around, offering to jos bank.	The men walk around, offer to jos bank.
63	men wearhouse cheap suit bid raise	L' man is wearing a cheap suit, he's outbid on the list.	L' man wears a suit cheap outbid on the menu; offer.	L' man wears a cheap suit outbid it.
63	hot stock men wearhouse jos bank tiffany hormel	Men d' sexy business carrying home jos hormonal Tiffany bank.	Men d*apos; sexy house wear business jos bank hormonal tiffany.	Men d' business sexy carry home jos bank hormel tiffany.
63	men wearhouse offer buy jos bank share	The S&apos men are dressed to buy shares in the Jos Bank.	The men s' dress to buy shares of the jos bank.	The men s&apos dress to buy jos bank shares.
63	activist investor eminence capital leading role jos bank deal	L' investor activist Eminence capitalist role of the banker's main transaction role.	L' investor activist Eminence capital role main role jos transaction banking jos role.	L' activist investor Eminence capital role main role jos bank transaction jos role.
63	men wearhouse bid jos bank ktvn channel reno	You know, the men are wearing these clothes, the banks ktvn canal reno.	The men wear clothes jos banks ktvn canal reno.	The men wear clothes jos banks ktvn reno canal.
63	bidding war men wearhouse jos bank	The warriors will be asked to wear jos bank.	Well, we're asking warriors to wear jos bank.	We're asking warriors to wear jos bank now.
63	tiffany profit soar	Tiffany's profits skyrocketing.	Tiffany's profits skyrocket.	Tiffany's profit margins are skyrocketing.
63	share jos bank clothier men wearhouse popped	Sharing our banks, our banks, men's clothes to wear home broken.	Sharing our banks' clothes men wear home burst.	Sharing jos bank men's wear smashed housewear.
63	men wearhouse prey predator	Men carry homemade predatory prey.	Men are homemade predator prey.	All men carry homemade predator prey.
63	men wearhouse mw jos bank josb set high offer	Men wear jos jos josb mw clothing bank josb high offer.	Men wear mw jos jos josb clothing bank josb high offer.	Men wear mw jos jos josb bank josb high offer clothes.
63	heavy volume pre market movement jos bank clothier josb	Josb josb josb josb josb josb josb josb josb josb josb josb.	Large volume pre-market movement jos bank josb josb josb clothing josb.	Big volume pre-market movement jos bank clothing josb josb josb.
63	tiffany earnings golden nasdaq hit point	Golden Nasdaq's impact.	Tiffany wins Golden Nasdaq impact.	Tiffany wins point d' impact of Golden Nasdaq.
63	wall street excited cheap men suit	It's a very exciting street, it's a very cheap suit.	Excited mural street man cheap suit.	Rue mural excited cheap man suit.
63	jos bank confirms receipt men wearhouse proposal	Bank jos has confirmed receipt of man to carry house proposal.	Bank jos confirms receipt man porter house proposal.	The jos bank confirms receipt man porter house proposal.
63	disney lead dow building permit jump	Disney license to build lead dow, lead dow, skip license.	Disney permit to build lead dow skipping permit.	Disney lead dow building permit leap permit.
63	tiffany jump outlook jos bank bid	Tiffany JOS jump outlook has made an offer at the bank.	Tiffany jump outlook jos made an offer at the bank today.	Tiffany jump outlook jos made a bank offer.
63	men wearhouse retaliates offering usd billion bid acquire jos bank	Men offer billions of dollars for revenge.	Men get their revenge by offering billions of dollars.	You know, men get their revenge by offering billions of dollars.
63	men wearhouse eye jos bank investor win	Men wear eyes to your investor bank win.	I mean, men wear eyes, and your bank investor wins.	Men wear eyes jos bank investor win.
63	diamond suit handbag wall street	Diamond door handbag, Wall Street.	Diamond door, handbag, Wall Street.	Diamond door, handbag, wall street.
63	men wearhouse jos bank good fit	Men wear jose bank shoes, just right.	Men wear shoes jos bank right fit.	Men wear shoes jos bank good fit.
63	financial scheduled conference earnings guidance donation	Gifts on the table; financial orientation of the revenues of the conference.	Donations on the apos; financial orientation of conference revenues.	Donations on conference revenues; financial orientation.
63	men wearhouse pursuing jos bank	Men are wearing a barracks to sue the jose bank.	The men wear a barracks to sue the jose bank.	The men are wearing a barracks to sue jos bank.
63	men wearhouse bid jos bank	Men wear the clothes of jos jos bank.	Well, the men are wearing jos jos bank clothes.	Men wear jos jos bank clothes.
63	stock future point flat open record high	I would like to thank you for your time and for your help.	Store it; future open point open record high.	Store it all; future point open record high.
63	suit saga men wearhouse turn jos bank offer	Men's saga suits wear house tour jos bank is offering.	Costumes saga men carry house to jos bank jos offers.	Suits saga men carrying house tower jos bank offers.
63	men warehouse investor hopeful deal jos bank	Men store investors full of money, hoping to make deals with our banks.	Men are storing investors full of money, hoping to make a deal with them.	The men store investors full of money; hope of transaction jos bank jos.
63	jos bank board review offer	L' Offer d' Peer Review Board.	L' offer d' review of the bank's board.	L' offer d' jos bank board review.
63	jos bank clothier shareholder alert rigrodsky long	Joe Bank's long-term stakeholder alert Rigrodsky.	Joe Bank clothier shareholder alerts Rigrodsky long-lasting.	Joe bank clothier shareholder alert long-lasting Rigrodsky.
63	men wearhouse proposes acquire jos bank share cash	It's a good idea to buy the money from the bank.	L' man at home offers to buy money from the jos bank.	Man in the house proposes to buy money from the jos bank.
63	video men wearhouse offer buy jos bank	It's a great way to get your money back.	Video Home porter offers to buy our bank jos.	Homemaking men's video offers to buy our bank jos.
63	update men wearhouse turn table bid jos bank	Men are now turning their heads.	The men are now turning their heads.	The men of today are turning their heads.
64	keith urban	Urban.	Keith urban.	Keith urban urban.
64	keith urban cut hair	Keith Urban Cut Hate.	Keith urban cut hates you.	Keith urban cut hate.
64	keith urban darius rucker star	Urban Darius Rucker Star.	With l' Urban Darius Rucker Star.	It's called the Urban Darius Rucker Star.
64	keith urban cut hair	Keith Urban Cut Hate.	Keith urban cut hates you.	Keith urban cut hate.
64	keith urban chop long lock	Keith, urban chop, long lock.	Keith urban chop long lockdown.	Keith urban chop long lockdown.
64	keith urban buzz debuting short haircut twitter	Keith Urban Buzz will start Twitter with a haircut.	Keith Urban Buzz will start on Twitter with a short haircut.	Keith Urban Buzz will start with a short haircut on Twitter.
64	keith urban chop signature shaggy lock	Shaggy Lock has Chop's urban signature.	With Chop urban signature, shaggy lock.	With the urban signature of Chop, shaggy Lock.
64	keith urban chop signature hair	With haircuts urban, c&apos is a signature.	With urban haircuts, it' is a signature.	C&apos, with urban haircuts, is a signature style.
64	keith urban chop hair	Urban Keith cuts hair.	Keith Urban cuts hair.	Keith urban cuts hair.
64	keith urban miranda lambert ad libbed	Miranda Lambert was released in the city.	In the city, Miranda Lambert's been released.	And in the city, Miranda Lambert was released.
64	keith urban hair chop	Keith has got a city haircut.	Keith has an urban haircut.	Keith has urban hair.
64	photo keith urban jennifer lawrence haircut	Urban Keith Jennifer Lawrence haircut.	Urban Keith photo Jennifer Lawrence has a haircut.	Urban Keith photo Jennifer Lawrence haircut.
64	keith urban chop signature long lock	Chop Long Lock's city signature.	With the city-wide signature of Chop Long Lock.	With the urban signature of Chop Long Lock.
64	keith urban	Urban.	Keith urban.	Keith urban urban.
64	keith urban debut jennifer lawrence style haircut	With her urban beginnings, Jennifer Lawrence also had a Lawrence-style haircut.	With urban beginnings, Jennifer Lawrence has a Lawrence style haircut.	Jennifer Lawrence's urban beginnings included a Lawrence style haircut.
64	keith urban chop signature long hair	It's got the urban signature of Chop Chop, it's got long hair.	And with the urban signature of Chop Chop, long hair.	With the urban signature of Chop Chop, long hair.
64	keith cut hair keith trend	Keith has been cutting hair, and that's the trend.	Keith cut hair, and that's the trend.	Keith cut hair, and that's the trend here.
64	keith urban miranda lambert top country airplay	Urban Keith Miranda Lambert Top Country Radioplay.	Keith Urban Miranda Lambert Top Country Radioplay.	Keith urban Miranda Lambert Top Country Radioplay.
64	keith urban chop signature shaggy hair	With the urban signature Chop Chop Shaggy Shaggy Hair.	With urban signature Chop Chop Shaggy hair shaggy.	Chop Chop Shaggy's urban signature shaggy hair.
64	keith urban cut signature long lock	Keith urban-cut signature long lock.	Keith urban cut signature long lock.	Keith urban cut signature long lock.
64	keith urban land miranda lambert duet	With Miranda Lambert as a duo.	And with Miranda Lambert's urban land as a duet.	Miranda Lambert's urban land is a duet.
64	keith urban short haircut country crooner cut signature long hair	Keith Urban haircut short country crooner haircut signature hair long hair.	Keith urban hair cut short country crooner hair signature long hair long hair.	Keith urban haircut short country crooner haircut signature long hair long hair.
64	keith urban debut pixie haircut	With her urban beginnings, her hair style fetish, and her curly hair.	With her urban beginnings, fetish hair and curly hair.	With her urban beginnings, her fetish haircut and her curly hair.
64	keith urban haircut noticed	Keith Urban and Haircut noticed.	Keith urban haircut noticed.	Keith urban haircut noticed that.
64	male celebrity magnificent long hair	Male celebrity, long, beautiful hair.	Male celebrity, beautiful long hair.	You know, male celebrity, gorgeous long hair.
64	keith urban cut signature long hair	Keith Urban, long-hair signature.	Urban Keith haircut long hair signature.	Keith urban haircut long hair signature.
64	keith urban short haircut nice change	In the city, short haircuts make a change, you know?	In the city... short haircuts make a change.	In the city, short haircuts make a change.
64	american idol keith urban chop hair pic	American Idol, Keith Urban, Chop Hair Pic.	Canadian Institute for Health Information.	American idol keith urban chop hair pic.
64	keith urban chop famous lock	Keith City Chop famed lock.	Keith City Chop famous lockmaster.	Keith city chop famous lock.
64	keith urban	Urban.	Keith urban.	Keith urban urban.
64	keith urban cut famously long lock	Keith Urban just cut the famous long lock.	Keith Urban cut the famous long lock.	Keith Urban cut the famous long lock on the door.
65	kanye west kardashians teach people accept interracial relationship	The kardashian of the west kanye school teaches people to accept race relations.	The kardashian of West kanye teach people to accept race relations.	The west kanye kardashian teach people to accept race relations.
65	kim kardashian flaunt toned leg suede mini yeezus	Kim Kardashian flaunts a leg, your mini-yezus suede.	Kim Kardashian flaunts a leg your suede mini-yezus deer.	Kim Kardashian flaunts a leg your mini suede yezus.
65	kim kardashian bound funny	Kim Kardashian s&apos is strangled strangely.	Kim Kardashian s&apos, is strangely strangled.	Kim Kardashian s' is strangled in a strange way.
65	kim kardashian spent surgical baby weight	Kim Kardashian has had surgery on the baby's weight.	Kim Kardashian has undergone weight surgery.	Kim Kardashian's done baby weight surgery.
65	kanye west claim bigger wal mart interview kim	Kanye West claims greater Wal Mart interviewing Kim.	Kanye West claimed a bigger Wal Mart interviewing Kim.	Kanye West calls for a bigger Wal-Mart to interview her.
65	kanye west kim kardashian beautiful woman time	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman, Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman times Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman Kim kardashian beautiful woman.
65	kim kardashian rock sexy lbd black lipstick kanye west concert	Kim Kardashian rock sexy, red-lipped, kanye-black-lips-l'apos concert; West kanye.	Kim Kardashian sexy rock black-lipped lbd red kanye concert of l' West kanye.	Kim Kardashian rock sexy lbd red-lipped kanye concert of l' West kanye.
65	kim kardashian baby daddy kanye west issue plastic surgery ban	Kim Kardashian is the father of baby kanye West, and he's not allowed to perform any cosmetic surgery.	Kim Kardashian father of baby kanye West enact the apos; prohibition of cosmetic surgery.	Kim Kardashian father of baby kanye West to ban cosmetic surgery.
65	kanye west confirms yeezus follow pipeline album	Kanye West confirmed that Yeezus was following the album pipeline.	Kanye West confirms that Yeezus follows the apos; album pipeline.	Kanye West confirms that Yeezus follows the pipeline album.
65	kanye west leaf nike partner adidas	Kanye West Leaf nike adidas partner.	West Kanye sheet nike partner adidas.	Kanye West leaf nike partner adidas.
65	kanye working yeezus follow hope release year	Kanye, who works there, will follow the apos; year of release; hope.	Kanye who works yeezus follow the apos; year of release of the apos; hope.	Kanye who is working yeezus follow the apos; year of release; hope.
65	kanye west called walking contradiction interview	Kanye West called the apos, cross-examination, it's a walk.	Kanye West called the apos; a cross-examination.	Kanye West called the inter partes walking interview.
65	kim kardashian rock black dress kanye west madison square	Kim Kardashian black rock kanye West Madison black dress, square.	Kim Kardashian black dress rock kanye kanye, west-squared madison.	Kim Kardashian black rock dress kanye west wardrobe square.
65	kanye west yeezus tour msg	Kanye, Kanye, West yeezus, tower msg.	Kanye West yeezus tower msg.	Kanye west yeezus tower msg.
65	kanye west kim kardashian reveal deets filming engagement tv	Kanye West Kim Kardashian is revealing the details of the engagement party on TV.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian reveals details while filming the engagement on TV.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian reveals details while filming engagement on TV.
65	perfectly top thing kanye west relationship	Kanye West and Kanye West are among the best in the world.	The best part is the relationship with West Kanye.	The relationship with Kanye West is top of the line.
65	kanye west nike hedi slimane blast live madison square garden	Kanye West Nike Hedi Slimane Garden Madison living explosion.	Kanye West Nike Hedi Slimane explosion living square madison garden.	Kanye West Nike Hedi Slimane explosion living madison square garden.
65	kanye west yeezus follow arrive year	Kanye West Yeezus to follow the year of his death.	Kanye West Yeezus will follow year from here.	Kanye West Yeezus follow year of arrival.
65	kanye west leaf nike adidas cite provide family	Kanye West leaf nike adidas ciento familia para última.	Kanye West leaf nike adidas quote family provide.	Kanye West leaf nike adidas quote family provide.
65	kanye west announces adidas deal declares kim beautiful woman	Kanye West announces that she is going to be a winner.	Kanye West announces l' agreement adidas declares beautiful woman kim.	Kanye West announces l' accord adidas declares kim beautiful woman kim.
65	brody jenner invited kim kanye wedding defends	Brody Jenner has invited Kim Kanye to defend his marriage.	Brody Jenner invited Kim Kanye to defend her marriage.	Brody Jenner invited kim kanye to defend his marriage.
65	kim kardashian sasha fierce evening kanye west	Kim Kardashian Sasha ferocious kanye night in the West.	Kim Kardashian Sasha's fierce west kanye party.	Kim Kardashian Sasha fierce evening kanye west.
65	best kanye west quote radio interview	Best Kanye West is quoted as quoting from a recent radio interview.	Best Kanye West quotes a radio interview.	Best Kanye West quotes radio interview.
65	kanye west decision signing sneaker deal	Kanye West has signed an agreement on sneakers.	Well, Kanye West has decided to sign a sneaker agreement.	Kanye West decided to sign a sneaker deal.
65	kanye west hoping release album summer	Kanye West hopes to release the album this summer.	West hopes to release her album this summer.	Kanye West is hoping to release the album this summer.
65	kim kardashian post baby body	Kim Kardashian post-baby body-kim kardashian post.	Kim Kardashian post body baby kim kardashian post.	Kim Kardashian post baby body kim kardashian post.
65	kim kardashian kanye west step baby north west	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Baby Stage North-West.	Kim Kardashian Kanye stage west baby north-west.	Kim Kardashian Kanye stage west baby stage north-west.
65	kanye west confirms adidas deal anti nike rant	Kanye West confirms that they want to take advantage of the Nike rant.	Kanye West confirms that they are willing to deal with Nike rant.	Kanye West confirms that' Adidas deal anti Nike rantant.
65	story kim kardashian pining bridal quot voguequot cover	Kardashian kim story languishing nuptial quote voguequot cover voguequot.	Kim kardashian story languishing nuptial voguequot cover voguequot quote.	History kim kardashian languishing nuptial quote voguequot cover voguequot.
65	kanye west call fiance kim kardashian beautiful woman human	Kanye West calling fiancé Kim Kardashian beautiful human woman, beautiful human woman.	Kanye West is calling fiancé Kim Kardashian beautiful human woman beautiful human woman.	Kanye West calling fiance Kim Kardashian beautiful human woman beautiful human woman.
65	kanye west join hand adidas	Kanye West will join hands adidas adidas.	Kanye West join hands adidas adidas.	West kanye join the hand adidas adidas.
65	kanye west romance kim kardashian romeo juliet	You know, Kanye West romance Kim Kardashian Romeo Juliet.	Kanye West romance Kim Kardashian Romeo Juliet.	Kanye West romance kim kardashian romeo juliet.
65	kanye west kim kardashian wedding televised	Kanye West Kim Kardashian wedding, televised.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian wedding television.	Kanye West Kim kardashian televised wedding.
65	kanye west kim kardashian wedding televised	Kanye West Kim Kardashian wedding, televised.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian wedding television.	Kanye West Kim kardashian televised wedding.
65	kim kardashian big apple babe	This is Kim Kardashian Big Apple babe.	Kim Kardashian Big Apple babe!	Kim kardashian big apple babe.
65	super fan kim kardashian gush kanye west madison square	This is a very good game, very good game.	Great western madison square kanye kanye kanye fan kardashian gush.	Super fan kim kardashian gush kanye west madison square.
65	kanye west ditch nike head adidas roya dispute	Kanye West dit nike head adidas roya.	Kanye West dit nike head adidas roya tussle.	Kanye West dit nike head adidas roya dispute.
65	kanye sign nike deal bigger wal mart	Kanye signs nike deal larger wal mart.	Kanye signs nike deal bigger wal mart.	Kanye signs nike deal bigger wal mart.
65	kanye west nike pay roya air yeezy sneaker video	Kanye West Nike pay Roya air Yeezy sneakers video.	Kanye West Nike pay Roya air Yeezy sneakers video sneakers.	Kanye West Nike pay Roya air Yeezy video sneakers.
65	kanye west rant live nike madison square garden video	This is Kanye West ranting live, live from the Madison Square Jardin.	Kanye West ranting live video nike Madison Square Jardin.	Kanye West ranting live nike Madison Square Jardin video.
65	kanye west call nike louis vuitton lay plan fashion	Kanye West calling Nike Louis Vuitton Lay Plan Fashion.	"This is Kanye West calling ""Nick Louis Vuitton lay plan fashion."""	Kanye West calling Nike Louis Vuitton lay plan fashion.
65	kanye west slammed dj charlamagne tha god	Kanye West runs over DJ Charlamagne, that god.	Kanye West overthrew DJ Charlamagne, that god.	Kanye West overthrew that god DJ Charlamagne.
65	day rant kanye west designer hedi slimane	Day r west kanye slimane hedi designer kanye.	Day r r west kanye designer hedi slimane.	Day r r r kanye west designer hedi slimane.
65	brody jenner invited kim kardashian kanye	Kim Kardashian Kanye was invited by Brody Jenner.	Brody Jenner's invited Kim Kardashian Kanye.	Brody Jenner invited kim kardashian kanye.
65	kanye west leaf nike sign deal adidas	Kanye signs nike sheet nike sheet nike deal adidas.	Kanye signs nike sheet nike deal adidas.	Kanye will sign nike sheet nike deal adidas.
65	furious record exec order kanye west fiance kim kardashian	Kim Kardashian, Kanye West's fiancee, is ordered to make angry recordings.	L' ex-executor d' angry recordings orders Kanye West's fiancée Kim Kardashian.	L' ex-executor d' furious recordings instructs Kim Kardashian, Kanye West's fiancée.
65	kanye west bash nike confirms adidas deal video	Kanye West Bash Nike has confirmed adidas video deal.	Kanye West Bash Nike confirms adidas video deal video.	Kanye West Bash Nike confirms adidas deal video video.
65	brody jenner invited kim kardashian wedding	Brody Jenner invites Kim Kardashian to get married.	Brody Jenner invited Kim Kardashian to marry him.	Brody jenner invited kim kardashian to get married.
65	kanye west explains filmed engagement keeping	Kanye West explains the video engagement.	Kanye West explains the engagement filmed.	Kanye West explains the filmed engagement.
65	kanye west face tough talk latest radio appearance watch	Kanye West faced with the harsh last speech on the radio watching the last one.	Kanye West faced with the harshest speech last appearance on the radio watching the latest one.	Kanye West faces the harsh last radio appearance to watch the last one.
65	kanye west release album summer	"Kanye West released her new album, ""Kanye West"", on June 20."	Kanye West releases her summer album.	Kanye West releases her summer album on CD-ROM.
65	kim kardashian hot wear winter coat	Kim Kardashian warm clothing clothes clothes d' winter kim kardashian.	Kim Kardashian garment warm jacket d' winter kim kardashian.	Kim Kardashian warm clothing kim kardashian winter jacket.
65	kanye west kim kardashian beautiful woman time	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman, Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman times Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman Kim kardashian beautiful woman.
65	kim kardashian step brother invited wedding	Kim Kardashian's beautiful brother, @-@, invited the wedding.	Kim Kardashian's beautiful-brother has invited the wedding.	Kim Kardashian's beautiful brother invited the wedding!
65	kanye west label relationship kim kardashian dramatic	Kanye West label relationship Kim Kardashian dramatized kardashian.	Kanye West label relationship Kim Kardashian drama kardashian dramatic.	Kanye West label relationship Kim Kardashian dramatic kardashian drama.
65	kanye west interview power breakfast club	Kanye West interviewing Power Breakfast Club.	Kanye West to interview Power Breakfast Club.	Kanye West interviewing power breakfast club.
65	kanye west boycott fashion industry demand treated god	Kanye West is a boycott of the fashion industry, asking for God treated.	Kanye West boycott of l' the fashion industry demands God treated.	Kanye West boycott of the fashion industry asks Treated God.
65	kanye west call kim beautiful woman time	Kanye West calling Kim Woman Beautiful Time.	Kanye West calls Kim a beautiful woman.	Kanye west calling kim beautiful woman time.
65	kanye west charlamagne tha god head head	Kanye West Charlamagne with God's head.	Kanye West Charlamagne at the head of God.	Kanye West Charlamagne with the head of God.
65	brody jenner reveal family feud kimye wedding detail	Brody Jenner has revealed the details of the Kimye family's wedding.	Brody Jenner reveals the details of the Kimye family's wedding plans.	The details of the Kimye family wedding are revealed by Brody Jenner.
65	kanye west black people connection jewish people	Kanye West Black people's connecting Jews.	The Kanye West Black people connect the Jews.	Kanye West Black people connects the Jews.
65	kim kardashian kanye west concert night	Kim Kardashian Kanye West evening concert.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West, concert night.	Kim kardashian kanye west concert night.
65	kanye west build downton abbey style	Kanye West is building Downton Abbey Style now.	Kanye West builds Downton style abbey.	Kanye West builds downton abbey style.
65	brody jenner dish kim kardashian wedding kendall modeling	Brody Jenner Plat Kim Kardashian wedding Kendall modeling.	Brody Jenner Plat Kim Kardashian wedding Kendall modeling.	Brody Jenner Plat Kim Kardashian modeling wedding Kendall.
65	kim kardashian kanye west complement shopping nyc	Kim Kardashian Kanye West completes the online shopping experience.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West completes nyc shopping.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West complement shopping nyc.
65	kanye west visit radio kim talk romance confirms	Kanye West Visits Radio Kim talking romance confirms.	Kanye West radio visit Kim talking romance confirms.	Kanye West radio visit Kim talking about romance confirms it.
65	harry style command catwalk	Harry-style bridge of command.	This is a Harry-style command bridge.	Harry style command bridge.
65	kim half bro brody jenner invited kimye wedding	Kim Half Brody Jenner has invited Kimye to her wedding.	Kim Half Brody Jenner invited Kimye to marry her.	Kim Half Brody Jenner invited kimye to her wedding.
65	kanye west confirms adidas deal slam nike	Kanye West would like to confirm that we are happy to offer you Adidas deal.	Kanye West confirms that' Adidas deal slam nike.	West confirms that' Adidas deal slam nike.
65	kanye west sign deal adidas gonna bigger walmart	Kanye West signs l' Adidas Agreement goes bigger Walmart.	Kanye West signs l' agreement adidas goes bigger Walmart.	Kanye West will sign the apos; agreement adidas will go bigger Walmart.
65	extremely likeable kanye west	Kanye West is a very, very nice girl.	Kanye West is extremely sympathetic.	Kanye west is extremely sympathetic.
65	kim kardashian vampy suede fringing kanye west wear hot pink	Kim Kardashian vampy deer-fing fring kanye West wearing hot pink.	Kim Kardashian vampy kanye west kanye fing fest warm pink.	Kim Kardashian vampy suede kanye kanye west dressing hot pink.
65	kim kardashian shocking size weight loss plan	Kardashian Kim's shocking height-loss plan.	Kim Kardashian's shocking height-loss plan.	Kim Kardashian's shocking plan for a weight loss.
65	kanye west kanye west collaborate adidas	Kanye West Kanye West collaborated adidas.	West Kanye West Kanye collaborate adidas.	Kanye West Kanye West collaborate adidas.
65	nike ceo mark parker wrong kanye west air yeezy	Nike ceo mark parker, bad kanye air west yeezy yeezy.	Nike ceo mark parker bad kanye air west yeezy yeezy.	Nike ceo mark parker bad kanye west air yeezy yeezy.
65	kanye west leaf nike officially announces deal adidas	Kanye West leaf Nike is officially announcing that it will be released in 2008.	Kanye West leaf Nike officially announces l' agreement adidas.	Kanye West leaf Nike officially announces the adidas agreement.
65	romeo juliet	Juliet Romeo.	Romeo juliet.	Hey, hey, Romeo Juliet.
65	kanye west reportedly banned kim kardashian undergoing cosmetic	Kanye West forbids Kim Kardashian from taking cosmetics.	Kanye West reportedly forbade Kim Kardashian from taking cosmetics at all.	Kanye West reportedly banned Kim Kardashian from taking cosmetics.
65	kanye likeable lenny kravitz	Kanye likes Lenny Kravitz.	Kanye's into Lenny Kravitz.	Well, Kanye likes Lenny Kravitz.
65	kanye west kris jenner clause prenup kim kardashian	Kanye West Kris Jenner pre-up Kim Kardashian clause.	Kanye West Kris Jenner pre-up Kim Kardashian clause.	Kanye West Kris Jenner clause pre-up Kim Kardashian clause.
65	kim kardashian kanye west prenup kris jenner clause report	KIM Kardashian Kanye West prenup Kris Jenner will be reported back.	KIM Kardashian Kanye West prenup Kris Jenner clause postponement.	K.I.M. Kardashian Kanye West prenup Kris Jenner clause postponement.
65	kim kardashian kanye west gush hot interview	Kanye Kanye Kardashian Kanye West interview, very, very, very hot.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West interview really hot.	Kim kardashian kanye west interview very hot.
65	kanye west ditch nike deal rival adidas	Kanye West Nike deals rival Adidas.	Kanye West nike deals rival adidas.	Kanye West nike deal rival adidas.
65	kanye west kim kardashian beautiful woman time	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman, Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman times Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman Kim kardashian beautiful woman.
65	kanye west wanted bound video phony	Kanye West was after a fake linked video.	Kanye West wanted me to make a fake video link.	Kanye west wanted a fake linked video.
65	kim credit	Credit kim-kim.	Credit kim kim.	Okay, credit kim kim.
65	kim kardashian casual day north	Occasional north kardashian kim day.	Occasional kim kardashian day in the north.	Occasional north kim kardashian day.
65	kanye latest interview drop major news miley collab cruel winter	Kanye's last interview predicts a cruel winter, miley collab.	Kanye's last interview says it's a cruel winter, miley collab.	Kanye's latest interview is about a cruel winter, miley collab.
65	kanye west kim kardashian beautiful woman	Kanye West Kim Kardashian is a beautiful woman.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian beautiful kardashian woman.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian beautiful woman kardashian.
65	kim kardashian chic coat makeover	Kim Kardashian chic cloak makeover kim chic kardashian cloak.	Kim Kardashian chic coat make kooking kim kardashian chic coat.	Kim Kardashian chic coat makeover kim kardashian chic coat.
65	kanye west reveals reason appear keeping	Kanye West reveals reason, seems to keep it in mind.	Well, Kanye West reveals reason seems to keep reason.	Kanye West reveals reason seems to reason.
65	kim kardashian step north west bound motorcycle auction	Kim Kardashian not north-west-west-north-west-west @ auctions of motorcycles.	Kim Kardashian no nord-west auction of motorcycles to the north-west.	Kim Kardashian not north-west motorcycle auction to north-west.
65	kanye kim good	I like Kanye Kim.	Kanye Kim well.	Kim kanye good.
65	brody jenner kim wedding	Brody Jenner Kim getting married.	Brody Jenner Kim's getting married.	Brody jenner kim is getting married.
65	kim kardashian wear spring fringe trend	Kim Kardashian wears some of the most fashionable fringe clothes in the spring.	Kim Kardashian wears the fashionable spring fringe.	Kim Kardashian wears fancy spring fringe.
65	kanye west criticizes lenny kravitz front singer	Kanye West criticizes singer-songwriter Lenny Kravitz.	Kanye West criticizes singer Lenny Kravitz.	Kanye West criticizes the singer Lenny Kravitz.
65	kanye west rant lenny kravitz knowing listening kravitz	Kanye West heard Kravitz shout Lenny Kravitz.	Kanye West shouted Lenny Kravitz knowing how to listen to him.	Kanye west yelled Lenny Kravitz knowing how to listen to Kravitz.
65	kanye west step soho	Kanye West not Soho.	Kanye west, not Soho.	I mean, Kanye West, not Soho.
65	kanye west confirms adidas partnership	Kanye West has confirmed the partnership of Apos; Adidas.	Kanye West confirms the Adidas partnership.	Kanye West confirms partnership with Apos; Adidas.
65	brody jenner begs fame whore invite kim kardashian wedding	Brody Jenner is begging for fame, hooker invites Kim Kardashian to the wedding.	Brody Jenner begs for fame, hooker invites Kim Kardashian to the wedding.	Brody Jenner begs for fame, hooker invites kim kardashian to the wedding.
65	kim kardashian kanye west rock matching black outfit ny	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Rock is the perfect match for the new black outfit.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Rock matching ny black outfit.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Rock matching black outfit ny.
65	charlamagne challenge kanye west corporation money	Charlamagne has been challenging the Kanye West money.	Charlamagne challenges the money of the company West Kanye.	Charlamagne challenges the money of the company Kanye West.
65	kim kardashian kanye west nyc movie	Kanye West Nyc's Kim Kardashian film.	Image by Kim Kardashian Kanye West Nyc.	A film by Kim Kardashian Kanye West Nyc.
65	kim kanye love story forever	Kim Kanye's love forever.	D&apos history; love of Kim Kanye forever.	This is the story of the love of Kim Kanye forever.
65	kim kardashian amazing yeezus tour style photo	Kim Kardashian incredible photo, yeezus tour, yeezus-style photo.	Kim Kardashian incredible photo yeezus tour photo style yeezus.	Kim Kardashian amazing photo yeezus tour photo-style.
65	kanye west announces sneaker deal adidas	Kanye West announces the sale of a new pair of adidas.	Kanye West announces sale of shoes adidas.	Kanye West announces adidas shoe sales.
65	kanye west hit dior designer treating god	Kanye West beat up Dior Designer by treating God.	So Kanye West hit Dior Designer while treating God.	Kanye West hit Dior Designer treating God.
65	quote day kanye west keeping kardashians	Cite day Kanye West to keep kardashians kardashians.	Quitting day Kanye West keep kardashians kardashians.	To quote day Kanye West guard kardashians kardashians.
65	romeo juliet kanye west work	Romeo Juliet Kanye works in the west.	Romeo Juliet Kanye works at l' west.	It's a great place to work.
65	kanye west artpop yeezus tour	Kanye West Art pop yeezus tour.	Kanye West Artpop, yeezus tour.	Kanye West Artpop yeezus lat.
65	kim kardashian flaunt weight loss outing north west amid worry	Kim Kardashian flaunts her weight going north-west in the middle of l' worry.	Kim Kardashian shows off her weight loss by going north-west in the middle of l' worry.	Kim Kardashian shows weight loss going north-west in the middle of the apogee.
65	kanye west rant tight jean unknown nike air yeezy red october	Kanye West ranting tight jean nike unseen air red October yeezy.	Kanye West ranting tight jean nike unseen air yeezy red October.	West kanye rant tight jean nike unknown air yeezy red October.
65	trend alert kim boy winter wardrobe inspo	Keeps trend alert-dress d' winter inspo.	Fashion alert kim boy keeps-dresses d' winter inspo.	D&apos trend alert kim boy keeps-dress d' winter inspo.
65	kanye west ditch nike adidas hm promise living wage supplier	Kanye West gets rid of Niké Adidas and promises to pay him back in cash.	Kanye West gets rid of Niké Adidas and promises a living wage supplier.	Kanye West gets rid of nike adidas and promises a living wage provider.
65	kanye west confirms deal adidas shoe titled yeezi	Kanye West confirms the name of the company; agreement between the company and the company.	Kanye West confirms the agreement of the shoe titled yeezi.	Kanye West confirms it; agreement adidas shoe titled yeezi.
65	video kanye west kim yall actin beautiful woman	This is a video of a beautiful woman.	Video kanye kim west kim yall actin beautiful woman.	Video kanye kim west kim yall actin beautiful woman video.
65	kanye west bound video problem stupid	Kanye problem video towards l' West stupid problem video.	Kanye video problem to l' stupid video problem west.	Kanye video problem to l' west stupid video problem.
65	kanye west hoping release album	Kanye West hopes to release this album.	Kanye West hopes to release l' album.	Kanye West hopes release l' album.
65	kanye west leaf nike adidas	Kanye is a good place to stay.	Kanye West leaf nike adidas?	Kanye West leaf nike adidas.
65	kanye west hope album summer	Kanye West hopes that the album will be released by the end of the summer.	Kanye West hoped that the album would be released in summer.	Kanye West hopes the album will be released in the summer months.
65	kim kardashian cover famous curve black oversized coat picture	Famous kardashian kim cover black over-dimensional photo mantle.	Kardashian kim cover famous black curved over-dimensional photo mantle.	The kim kardashian cover is a famous black curved over-dimensional photo mantle.
65	kim kardashian kanye west luck leather nyc	Kim Kardashian Kanye West leather lucky nyc chance.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Luck leather nyc chance.	Kim kardashian kanye west lucky leather nyc chance.
65	oops kanye west rant lenny kravitz msg concert	Oops kanye western music ranting Lenny Kravitz msg concert.	Oops kanye western rant Lenny Kravitz msg concert.	Oops kanye western rant Lenny Kravitz msg concert.
65	kanye west declared kim kardashian beautiful woman time	Kanye West declared fine-weather kim kardashian woman beautiful time kardashian kim.	Kanye West has declared kim kardashian beautiful weather woman beautiful time kardashian.	Kanye West declared kim kardashian beautiful weather woman beautiful time kardashian.
65	kim kardashian kanye west televise wedding	Kanye Kardashian Kanye West gets married on TV.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West got married on TV.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West is married on the same day.
65	kim kardashian kanye west wedding news brody jenner attend	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Wing Wedding News Brody Jenner attending the ceremony.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Wedding News Brody Jenner to attend the ceremony.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West wedding news Brody Jenner attending.
65	kanye west hope album summer	Kanye West hopes that the album will be released by the end of the summer.	Kanye West hoped that the album would be released in summer.	Kanye West hopes the album will be released in the summer months.
65	kanye west working album hope release summer	Kanye West Work Album Hope release l' summer.	Kanye West Hope work album release l' summer.	Kanye West work album Hope release l' summer album.
65	kanye west compare kardashians cosbys talk filmed proposal	Kanye West compares the cosbys conversation Kardashians filmed proposition.	Kanye West compares the Kardashians cosbys proposition filmed conversation.	Kanye West compares cosbys conversation Kardashians filmed proposition.
65	kanye west plan release album summer	Kanye West is also planning to release the album in summer.	Kanye West plans to release l' album in the summer.	Kanye West plans release l' album in summer.
65	kim kardashian fire plastic surgery rumor	Kim kardashian's rumor about cosmetic surgery in case of fire.	The rumor of kim kardashian about cosmetic surgery in case of fire.	The rumor of kim kardashian about fire and cosmetic surgery.
65	brody jenner invited kim kardashian kanye west wedding	Brody Jenner invites Kim Kardashian Kanye West to get married.	Brody Jenner invited Kim Kardashian Kanye West to be married.	Brody Jenner invited kim kardashian kanye west to get married.
65	photo kanye west flash huge smile hold hand kim	Photo kanye West Flash huge smile holding kim kim hand.	Kanye West Flash photo huge smile holding hand kim kim.	Photo West kanye flash huge smile holding hand kim kim.
65	kanye west reveals plan yeezus follow talk cruel winter	Kanye West reveals the Yeezus Plan to follow the cruel lyrics winter.	Kanye West reveals the plan Yeezus follow the words of cruel winter.	Kanye West reveals the Yeezus Plan follow the cruel winter words.
65	kanye west planet sized ego talent match	Kanye West Planet and Waistline Ego match.	Kanye West Planet waist ego match talent.	Kanye West Planet height talent ego match.
65	kim kardashian kanye west fashion flair madison	You know, Kim Kardashian Kanye West fashion sense of madison.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West fashion sense madison.	Kim kardashian kanye west fashion sense madison.
65	kanye west call nike louis vuitton	This is Kanye West calling Nike Louis Vuitton.	Kanye West calling Nike Louis Vuitton.	Kanye West calling nike Louis Vuitton.
65	kanye west accidentally north west face best accident	West Kanye accidentally north-West facing the best accident.	Kanye West accidentally north-west face the best accident.	West Kanye accidentally north-west face the best accident ever.
65	coordinated couple kim kardashian leather biker jacket york	York leather motorcycle jacket co-ordinated kim kardashian.	Coordinated kim kardashian jacket of leather motorcycle York.	Coordinated kim kardashian leather motorcycle jacket York.
65	kim kardashian prof hand mum manages	Kardashian Kardashian teacher handles mom.	Kim Kardashian's teacher handles mom.	Hey, Kim Kardashian, teacher, mom's got it.
65	kanye west label kim kardashian beautiful woman time	Kanye West label kardashian kim beautiful woman times Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West label kim kardashian beautiful woman times Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West label kim kardashian beautiful woman Kim kardashian beautiful woman.
65	kanye west hot angie martinez turned nike deal	From Kanye West to Angie Martinez to Nike Deal.	Kanye West, Angie Martinez, became Nike Deal.	Kanye West, Angie Martinez, turned Nike Deal.
65	top reason kanye west switch nike adidas video	Main reason Kanye West change video nike adidas.	Kanye West main reason change nike adidas video.	Main reason Kanye West change nike adidas video.
65	kanye girl night town	This is Kanye Girl Night Town.	Hey, Kanye Girl Night Town.	Kanye girl night town.
65	kim kardashian spends day north	Kim Kardashian has been spending the day up north.	Kim Kardashian spends the day north.	Kim kardashian spends the day up north.
65	kanye west drake changed	Kanye West has changed.	Kanye West Drake changed!	Kanye West Drake has changed it.
65	kim kardashian family member wedding invite	It's an invitation to the wedding; a member of the Kim Kardashian family.	Invitation to wedding by Kim Kardashian family member.	Invitation to wedding d' family member Kim Kardashian.
65	kim kardashian turn nyc personal runway	Kim Kardashian turns Nyc into Nyc.	Kim Kardashian turns personal Nyc runway d' landing.	Kim Kardashian turns Nyc personal runway d' landing.
65	kim kardashian kanye west wedding guest list brody jenner invited	Kim Kardashian Kanye list of guests for the wedding at the Apos; West Brody Jenner invited.	Kim Kardashian Kanye list d' guests for the wedding at l' west Brody Jenner invited.	Kim Kardashian Kanye guest list for wedding at Apos; West Brody Jenner guest list.
65	kim kardashian incredible head kanye west nyc	Kim Kardashian incredible head, kanye West nyc.	Kim Kardashian's amazing head kanye West nyc.	Kim Kardashian incredible head kanye West nyc.
65	kim kanye city nyc photo	Photo by Kim Kanye City nyc.	Kim Kanye City nyc picture.	Kim kanye city nyc photo.
65	kanye west kim kardashian bound couple drake	Bonded drake couple kanye West kim kardashian.	Kanye West kim kardashian bound bound drake pair bond.	Kanye West kim kardashian bound couple drake bound.
65	kim kardashian reacts bound video	Kim Kardashian has responded to the linked video.	Kim Kardashian reacts to the linked video.	Kim Kardashian reacts to video link.
65	kim sign bother mom	Mom's embarrassed by the Kim sign.	The kim sign's bothering Mom.	Mom, the kim sign is getting in the way.
65	kanye west build downton abbey style kim kardashian	Kanye West built the Downton Abbey style of kim kardashian kardashian.	Kanye West has built Downton Abbey style kim kardashian kardashian.	Kanye West builds Downton Abbey style kim kardashian kardashian.
65	kanye west aim louis vuitton nike hedi slimane lenny kravitz	Kanye's goal is to the west of the city of Lutevuitton, where Lenny Kravitz is a slimy young man.	Kanye aimed at the apos; west louis vuitton nike hedi slimane lenny Kravitz.	Kanye aims at west louis vuitton nike hedi slimane lenny Kravitz.
65	kanye west louis vuitton hedi slimane	Kanye West Louis Vuitton Hedi Slimane.	Kanye West Louis Vuitton Hedi Slimane.	Kanye west louis vuitton hedi slimane.
65	kanye west love sight kim kardashian	Kanye West likes to see Kim Kardashian.	Kanye West likes seeing Kim Kardashian.	Kanye West likes to see kim kardashian.
65	kanye west yeezus tour american airline arena november	Tour Kanye West and American Airlines Arena November.	Kanye West yeezus American Airlines Tour Arena November.	Kanye West yeezus tour american airlines November.
65	brody jenner kim kardashian wedding invited	Brody Jenner Kim Kardashian has been invited.	Brody Jenner Kim Kardashian's been invited to the wedding.	Brody Jenner Kim Kardashian has been invited to the wedding reception.
65	top outrageous quote breakfast club kanye west	The most outrageous quotation is from the Kanye West Breakfast Club, which is a small one.	The most outrageous quote was from the Kanye West breakfast club.	The most outrageous quote is the Kanye West breakfast club.
65	kim kardashian wear curve hugging short black dress large tassel	Kim Kardashian's curvaceous curvaceous curvaceous style.	Kim Kardashian curve d'apos; wear embracing black dress short big pom-pom.	Kim Kardashian curved, wearing short black dress hugging big pom-pom.
65	kanye west partner adidas cut tie nike	Kanye Western Partner adidas cut nike nike tie cut.	Kanye partner west adidas cut tie nike nike cut.	Kanye west partner adidas cut tie nike nike cut.
65	watch kanye ignores kim uncool reality tv status	I mean, look at Kanye ignoring the status of Kim's uncool reality show.	Oh, watch Kanye ignore the status of Kim's uncool reality show.	Watch kanye ignore the status of kim's uncool reality show.
65	kanye west downton abbey replica mansion	Kanye West Downton Abbey Replica Mansion.	Kanye West Downton Abbey Replica Mansion.	Kanye west downton abbey replica mansion.
65	kim kardashian kanye west coordinated couple york city	Kim Kardashian Kanye is the coordinator of the West York City couple.	Kim Kardashian Kanye coordinated at Apos; West couple York City.	Kim Kardashian Kanye coordinated in the west couple York City.
65	kanye west appears breakfast club clash charlamagne	Kanye West comes the Breakfast clash club Charlemagne.	Kanye West appears as the buffet breakfast club Charlemagne.	Kanye West appears the breakfast club clash Charlemagne.
65	kim kardashian stay casual day north	Kim Kardashian to lay low day in the north.	Kardashian Kim stay relaxed day in the north.	Kim Kardashian stay casual day in the North.
65	biggest story week kim kardashian naked kanye west music	The Biggest Story of the Week Kim Kardashian nu kanye western kanye music.	This week's biggest story is Kim Kardashian nu kanye west kanye music.	The biggest story of the week Kim Kardashian nu kanye west music kanye music.
65	kim kardashian support kanye west hometown chicago shirt	Kardashian supports Kanye, the city's chicago shirt.	Kim Kardashian is supporting Kanye, the chicago shirt of the city of l'apos; west.	Kim Kardashian backs Kanye, the chicago shirt from the west.
65	kanye west open album watch throne cruel winter	Kanye West album opens watching the Winter Cruel Throne.	Kanye West album open to watch the throne winter cruel.	Kanye West open album watch the throne winter cruel.
65	ck fashion yeezus tour dissertation kanye west	Ck fashion yeezus thesis thesis west kanye thesis.	Ck fashion yeezus thesis tour kanye west kanye thesis.	Ck fashion yeezus tour thesis kanye west kanye thesis.
65	kanye fashion ranting god	Kanye, fashionable divine god.	Kanye fashion divine god.	Kanye fashion divine god.
65	kim kardashian support kanye west york concert pic	Kim Kardashian supports photo of Kanye West York concert.	Kim Kardashian supports the photo from the West York Kanye concert.	Kim Kardashian supports Kanye West York's concert photo.
65	rsvp brody jenner unsure invite kim	Brody Jenner, who is not sure about inviting Kim.	Brody Jenner, who's not sure if he invited Kim.	It's just that I don't think it's a good idea to invite Kim.
65	kanye kim family credit	This is a credit from the kanye kim kim family.	Family credit kanye kim kim kim.	Family credit kanye kim kim.
65	kanye west kanye west kuwtk shot	Kanye kanye West West kanye West kuwtk shot down.	Kanye kanye west kanye west kuwtk kanye shot and killed.	Kanye kanye west kanye west kuwtk shot down.
65	religious experience yeezus tour york	Religious experience... yeezus tour york.	Yeezus religious experience tour york.	You know, religious experience yeezus tour york.
65	kim kardashian wear chicago band shirt day baby north	Kim Kardashian wears the North Baby Chicago Band T@-@ shirt.	Kim Kardashian wears the Chicago Band T@-@ shirt, baby from the north.	Kim Kardashian wears the T@-@ shirt of the northern baby Chicago band.
65	kanye west hint signing adidas deal fallout nike	Kanye West suggested that they sign an agreement with Nike.	Kanye West suggests signing a d' adidas agreement with Nike.	West suggested signing an adidas agreement with Nike.
65	kim kardashian	Kardashian kim.	Kim kardashian.	Uh, Kim Kardashian.
65	discus kanye west partnership adidas	Discus kanye westbound adidas adidas partnership.	Discus kanye partnership adidas adidas.	Discus kanye west partnership adidas adidas.
65	kanye west filmed engagement kim kardashian happy	Kanye West filmed Kim Kardashian Happy's engagement.	Kanye West filmed Kim Kardashian Happy's engagement party today.	Kanye west filmed kim kardashian happy's engagement.
65	kanye hate keeping kardashians	Kanye hates guarding kardashian.	Kanye hates guarding kardashian.	Kanye hates keeping the kardashian.
65	kanye west claim kardashians drake change better	Kanye West claims drake kardashians kardashians change better.	Kanye West claims kardashians drake kardashians change better.	Kanye West claims kardashians drake change better.
65	kanye west dropping nike adidas	Kanye West dumping Niké Adidas.	Kanye West, dumping nike adidas.	Kanye west dumping nike adidas.
65	scene kanye west yeezus tour hit madison square garden	Kanye Tower scene yeezus west in Madison Square Garden.	West yeezus kanye tower scene in the square garden of Madison.	Stage kanye west yeezus tower in Madison Square Garden.
65	kanye west call kim kardashian beautiful woman time radio	Kanye West calling Kim Kardashian beautiful female radio time woman.	Kanye West calling Kim Kardashian beautiful female radio time woman.	Kanye West calls Kim Kardashian beautiful woman radio time wife.
65	kanye west confirms adidas partnership cut tie nike	Kanye West would like to confirm that we are happy to partner with you.	Kanye West confirms that we adidas partnership cut tie nike adidas.	Kanye West confirms that' adidas partnership cut tie nike adidas.
65	sweet picture north west baby	Beautiful photo of the northern baby-west.	Great picture of northern baby-west.	Great picture of baby from north-west.
65	kuwtk kim kardashian weight loss baby pressure mom	Kuwtk kim kardashian baby pressure mommy.	Kuwtk kim kardashian weight loss baby mom pressure.	Kuwtk kim kardashian weight loss baby pressure mom.
65	kanye west dump nike adidas	Kanye West dumps Niké Adidas.	And Kanye West drops nike adidas.	Kanye west drops nike adidas.
65	kim kanye wedding invite set brody jenner invited	Kim Kanye wedding invitation Brody Jenner together as a guest.	Kim Kanye wedding invitation together Brody Jenner invited.	Kim Kanye wedding invitation Brody Jenner invited together.
65	kim kardashian engagement style	Kim kardashian-style engagement party.	You know, the kim kardashian engagement kind of thing.	The kim kardashian engagement style.
65	kim kardashian party animal mother kris watch	Kim Kardashian's pet feast day Kris watching as Kris watches.	You know, Kim Kardashian's mother pet feast is Kris watching Kris.	Kim Kardashian mother pet festival Kris watch watching Kris.
65	kim kardashian kanye west prenup detail revealed	The details of Kanye West's marriage contract have been revealed.	The details of Kim Kardashian Kanye West's marriage contract were revealed.	Details of Kim Kardashian Kanye West's prenup were revealed today.
65	kanye west argue kim kardashian beautiful woman	Kanye West argues that Kim Kardashian is a beautiful woman.	West argues Kim Kardashian beautiful kardashian woman.	Kanye West argues Kim Kardashian beautiful woman kardashian beautiful.
65	adidas big day losing rose landing kanye	Adidas big-day lose pink kanye landing.	Adidas big day lose pink kanye landing pink.	Adidas big day lose pink landing kanye pink.
65	kanye west north west influenced sign adidas	Kanye west north-west influenced adidas sign adidas.	West Kanye North-West influenced sign adidas adidas.	Kanye west north-west influenced sign adidas adidas.
65	kanye west explains filmed proposal kim kardashian	Kanye West explains Kim Kardashian's filmed proposal.	Kanye West explains the filmed proposal Kim Kardashian.	Kanye West explains filmed proposal Kim Kardashian.
65	kim kardashian kanye west wedding detail post baby north west	Kim Kardashian Kanye details West wedding post-baby North-West.	Kim Kardashian Kanye western details post baby wedding north-west.	Kim Kardashian Kanye details west wedding post baby north-west.
65	top realest moment hip hop	Hip-hop at l' real time of the top.	Hip-hop at l' real time of the top.	Hip @-@hop at l' top time real.
65	kanye west super sized rant madison square garden	Kanye West big, big, square-sized Madison garden.	Kanye West is a big, big, square, rant-sized madison garden.	Kanye West great big garden square madison rante.
65	kim kardashian raf kanye west insane sold	Kim Kardashian raf Kanye West psycho has been sold.	Kim Kardashian raf Kanye West psycho, sold.	Kim kardashian raf kanye west psycho sold.
65	kanye west confirms deal adidas	Kanye West will confirm the list; agreement adidas.	Kanye West confirms the apos; agreement adidas.	Kanye West confirms the adidas agreement.
65	kanye west yeezus tour pop shop opened nyc	Kanye West yeezus pop shop tour is now open.	Kanye West yeezus tour pop shop is now open nyc.	Kanye West yeezus tour pop shop opened nyc.
65	kanye west slam hedi slimane msg yeezus tour rant	Kanye West slamedi msg yeezus tour rant.	Kanye West slamedi hs slimane msg yeezus tour rant.	Kanye West slamedi slimane msg yeezus tour rant.
65	kim kardashian relevant	Relevant Kim Kardashian.	Kim Kardashian relevant.	Kim kardashian relevant.
65	kanye west dis president obama cool	Kanye West says Obama cool.	Kanye West says President Obama cool.	Kanye west says president Obama cool.
65	kanye west talk fatherhood designer angie martinez video	Kanye West talks about the paternity of the designer Angie Martinez video.	Kanye West talks about the paternity video designer Angie Martinez.	Kanye West talks about fatherhood video designer Angie Martinez.
65	gallery kim kardashian flash thigh super short lbd	Galerie kim kardashian thighs flash ultra short lbd lbd.	Galerie kim kardashian thigh flash super short lbd lbd.	Galerie kim kardashian thigh flash super short lbd lbd.
65	kanye west ignores kim kardashian uncool reality star status	Kanye West ignores the status of the uncool kardashian kim star of reality.	Kanye West doesn't know the status of the uncool kim kardashian star of reality.	Kanye West ignores the status of apos; uncool kim kardashian star of reality.
65	kanye west rant lenny kravitz lenny	Kanye West criticized Lenny Kravitz Lenny Lenny.	Kanye West criticized Lenny Kravitz Lenny Lenny.	Kanye west criticized lenny kravitz lenny lenny.
65	kanye west matter kim kardashian cool	Kanye material from the west cool kardashian kardashian kardashian cool.	Kanye material from l' west Kim kardashian cool kardashian cool.	Kanye material from l' west kim kardashian cool kardashian cool.
65	kim kardashian kanye west night nyc baby north	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Night Nyc baby north.	Kim Kardashian Kanye night West Nyc baby north.	Kim kardashian kanye night west nyc baby north.
65	kanye west kim kardashian beautiful woman time	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman, Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman times Kim kardashian beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman Kim kardashian beautiful woman.
65	kim kardashian plastic surgery kanye west keeping kardashians	Surgery kardashian kanye kardashian kardashans keep kardashians kardashans.	Plastic surgery kim kardashian kanye West keep kardashians kardashans.	Kardashian kanye West kardashian plastic surgery keep kardashians kardashans.
65	kanye west rant msg treat god	Kanye West rant deals with God.	Kanye West rant msg deals with God.	Kanye West rant msg treats God.
65	kanye west bound video wanted phony	Kanye Westbound Video is a fake video.	Kanye Westbound wanted video.	Kanye Westbound Video wanted fake video.
65	brody jenner invited kim kardashian kanye west	Brody Jenner invites Kim Kardashian Kanye West.	Well, Brody Jenner invited Kim Kardashian Kanye West.	Brody Jenner invited kim kardashian kanye west.
65	kim kardashian step north west bound motorcycle auction	Kim Kardashian not north-west-west-north-west-west @ auctions of motorcycles.	Kim Kardashian no nord-west auction of motorcycles to the north-west.	Kim Kardashian not north-west motorcycle auction to north-west.
65	kanye west announces partnership adidas	Kanye West will announce the adidas partnership.	Kanye West announces the adidas partnership.	Kanye West announces partnership adidas.
65	kim kardashian toned butt skinny jean spotted nyc	Kim Kardashian your skinny-ass jean-stained-nyc tone.	Kim Kardashian... your skinny, jean-stained butt tones nyc.	Kim Kardashian, your skinny jean butt tone nyc stained.
65	kanye west readying album summer release	Kanye West is preparing the release of the album Kanye West.	Kanye West is preparing for the summer release of Kanye West.	Kanye West prepares the summer release of l' album Kanye West.
65	kanye west plotting summer release album	Kanye West Preparing the Apos; D&apos album; Summer.	"Kanye West preparing the album, ""D'apos""; summer album."	Kanye West preparing the apos; album d' summer album.
65	kanye west kim kardashian hot angie martinez watch	Kanye West Kardashian sexy Kim Angie Martinez watching.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian sexy Angie Martinez watching.	And Kanye West Kim Kardashian sexy Angie Martinez is watching.
65	kim muse shakespeare kanye west	Kanye West kanye Kim muse shakes.	Kim muse shakespeare kanye West.	Kim muse shakespeare kanye west.
65	kim kardashian hair damage free blonde lock	Kim kardashian hair damages blonde hair for free.	Kim kardashian hair damages your free blonde hair.	Kim kardashian hair can damage free blonde hair.
65	brody jenner invite kim kardashian	Kim Kardashian invited by Brody Jenner.	Brody Jenner invites Kim Kardashian.	Brody Jenner invites kim kim kardashian.
65	news kanye west yeezus single revealed	This is the first game to be released in Japan.	News kanye western yeezus single revealed.	News kanye western yeezus single revealed.
65	kanye west crazy rant treated god	Kanye West, a maniac, has been treating God like a god.	Crazy Kanye West treated God like a god.	Kanye West, crazy, treated God like a god.
65	kim kardashian kanye west coordinate york	Kanye Kim Kardashian West York coordinates.	Kim Kardashian Kanye, West York coordinates.	Kim Kardashian Kanye west co-ordinating York.
65	kanye west talk album watch throne jay cruel winter	Kanye West album talk about watching the jay throne winter cruel.	Kanye West album talk about watching the throne jay winter cruel.	Kanye West album talk about watching the throne jay cruel winter.
65	kim kardashian kanye west air wedding tv	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Air TV wedding.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Coast Air wedding TV.	Kim kardashian kanye west air wedding TV.
65	kim kanye head madison square garden	K.I.M. Kanye Head Madison Square Garden.	KIM Kanye Head Madison Square Garden.	KIM kanye head madison square garden.
65	kim kardashian kanye west spotted nyc north west kanye	Kardashian kanye kanye stained at l' west nyc kanye at l' west north-west kanye.	Kanye kardashian kardashian kanye stained at l' west nyc kanye stained at l' west north-west kanye.	Kim kardashian kanye spotted at l' west nyc kanye at l' west north-west kanye.
65	kanye west kardashians prepped america accept interracial	Kanye West Kardashians has been prepared at the Apos; America accepts interracial.	Kanye West Kardashians prepared at Apos; America accept interracial.	Kanye West Kardashians prepared in America accept interracial.
65	kim kardashian kanye west building castle los angeles photo	Photo by Kim Kardashian Kanye West Building Castle Los Angeles.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Building, Los Angeles.	It's the first time I've had a chance to talk to you about it.
65	kanye west bares ab surrounded nude woman yeezus tour	Kanye West Bares Ab is surrounded by the Nude Lady of Yeezus.	Kanye West Bares Ab, surrounded by naked woman Yeezus Tower.	Kanye West Bares ab surrounded by naked Yeezus Tower woman.
65	kanye likeable	I like Kanye.	Kanye's friendly to me.	Well, Kanye's a nice guy.
65	kim kardashian kanye west film wedding sell highest bidder	Kanye Kanye Kardashian Kanye Kardashian Kanye Kardashian Kanye Kardashian Kanye Kanye Kardashian Kardashian Kanye Kardashian Kanye Kardashian Kardashian Kanye Kardashian Kanye Kardashian.	Kim Kardashian Kanye Kanye West movie wedding video sell the highest-priced.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West film wedding selling highest-priced.
65	kanye west sign adidas provide family	Kanye West signs adidas to provide the family.	Kanye West signs adidas provide the family.	Kanye West signs adidas provide family.
65	kanye west explains kim kardashian family positive	Kanye West says Kim Kardashian is positive.	Kanye West explains that the Kim Kardashian family is positive.	Kanye West explains that Kim Kardashian family is a positive family.
65	kanye west receive air yeezy roya nike	"Kanye West receives the air ""yeezy roya"" nike yeya."	Kanye West receives air yeezy roya nike yeya.	Kanye West will receive air yeezy roya nike yeya.
65	thought kanye west defiant nut madison square garden	Thought Kanye West would challenge Madison Square Garden.	I thought Kanye West was gonna take Madison Square Garden.	I thought kanye west would challenge madison square garden.
65	kanye west plan yeezus follow summer	Kanye Plan is located in the heart of the city.	Kanye west plan yeezus follow the road map; summer.	Kanye west plan yeezus follow the summer map.
65	kanye west confirms adidas partnership severs tie nike	Kanye West confirms Apos; Adidas partnership.	Kanye West confirmed the partnership of Apos; Adidas.	Kanye West confirms the partnership of Apos; Adidas.
65	kim kardashian kanye west step soho nyc concert	Kanye Kardashian Kanye West Step Soho Nyc concert.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Step Soho Nyc concert.	Kim kardashian kanye west step soho nyc concert.
65	kanye west kim kardashian beautiful woman existence	Kanye West kim kardashian, beautiful woman kardashian life beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman kardashian beautiful existence beautiful woman.	Kanye West kim kardashian beautiful woman kardashian existence beautiful woman.
65	music video round kanye west katy perry king leon	Music Video of Kanye West Katy Perry King Leon.	Musical video about Kanye West Katy Perry King León.	This is a music video about Kanye West Katy Perry King Leon.
65	kim kardashian kanye west soho shopper photo	Kanye West Soho Shopper Photo Shopper.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Soho Shopper Photo Shopper?	Kim kardashian kanye west soho shopper photo shopper.
65	kanye west romance role model congrats	Kanye West, role-model romantic, congratulations.	Kanye West role model romantic congratulations.	Kanye West role model romantic congratulations.
65	kim kardashian refuse smile north west stroll	Kim Kardashian refuses to grin north-west promenade.	Kim Kardashian refuses to smile north-west boardwalk.	Kim Kardashian refuses to smile north-west stroll.
65	kanye west angie martinez kim beautiful woman	Kanye West Angie Martinez Kim pretty woman.	Kanye West Angie Martinez Kim beautiful wife.	Kanye West Angie Martinez Kim beautiful woman.
65	kanye west speaks adidas deal break nike video	Kanye West speaks video adidas deal break nike.	Kanye West talks adidas deal break nike video.	Kanye West speaks adidas deal break nike video.
65	kanye west recycles red jacket kim kardashian birthday party	Kanye West recycles Kim Kardashian's red vest, which celebrates her wedding anniversary.	West Kanye recycles the Kim Kardashian red jacket for a birthday party.	Kanye West recycles Kim Kardashian red jacket birthday party.
65	kim clever dressing	It's Kim's smart clothes.	It was Kim's clever outfit.	Kim's clever outfit.
65	news kanye west airing nike dis promise big	Kanye West news releases nike dit promise.	News kanye West broadcasts nike dit promet big promised.	News kanye west broadcasts nike dit promet big promised.
65	keeping kardashians shot kanye west	Keeping the Kardashian family in custody shot Kanye West.	Keeping the Kardashian family shot Kanye West.	Well, keeping the Kardashians shot Kanye West.
65	brody jenner invited kim kardashian kanye west	Brody Jenner invites Kim Kardashian Kanye West.	Well, Brody Jenner invited Kim Kardashian Kanye West.	Brody Jenner invited kim kardashian kanye west.
65	kanye west crack smile west village photo	Kanye West crack-smile West Village photo.	Kanye West crack West Village smile photo.	Kanye West crack smile west village photo.
65	people kim kardashian invite wedding brody jenner	Kim Kardashian people are inviting Brody Jenner to the wedding.	The kim kardashian people have invited Brody Jenner to the wedding.	Well, people kim kardashian invite Brody Jenner to the wedding.
65	kim kardashian baby north west shopping nyc photo	Kim Kardashian baby north-shopping nyc photo.	Kim Kardashian baby north-west shopping nyc photo.	Kim Kardashian baby #north @-@west shopping nyc photo.
65	kanye west ranting god	Kanye Divining God West.	Kanye West divine God.	Kanye west divine god.
65	kanye west call kim kardashian beautiful woman time	Kanye West calling Kim Kim Kardashian beautiful-time woman.	And Kanye West calling Kim Kim Kardashian beautiful time woman.	Kanye West calling Kim kim kardashian beautiful time woman.
65	kanye west kim kardashian love story love story age	Kanye West kardashian story, love story, love age story, love.	Kanye West kim kardashian story of apos; love story of apos; love age story of apos; love.	West kanye kim kardashian story of apos; love story of apos; age love story of apos; love.
65	kanye west keeping kardashians filmed	Kanye West guarding the Kardashians on camera.	Kanye West keeping the Kardashians on tape.	Kanye west keeping the Kardashians on camera.
65	kanye west claim kim kardashian modern day romeo juliet	Kanye West claims that Kim Kardashian is the modern-day leader of the Romeo Juliet era.	Kanye West claims Kim Kardashian modern from l' time Romeo Juliet.	Kanye West claims Kim Kardashian modern from l' time Romeo Juliet.
65	best complex staffer recall collective yeezus experience	The best and most complex member of staff remembers Yezus' collective experience.	The best member of the complex staff remembers the collective experience of Yezus.	The best complex staffmember remembers Yezus' collective experience.
65	kim invite brody rowe slam murray	Brody Rowe Slam Murray is invited by Kim.	Kim's inviting Brody Rowe Slam Murray.	And Kim invites Brody Rowe Slam Murray.
65	written cyrus langhorne	It says Cyrus Langhorne.	Cyrus Langhorne's writing.	Well, Cyrus Langhorne writes.
65	kanye west claim adidas deal bigger walmart	Kanye West claims that Adidas sells larger Walmart.	Kanye West claims that Apos; Adidas is selling bigger Walmart.	Kanye West claims that' Adidas sells bigger Walmart.
65	yeezus tour triumph	The Yezus Tour triumphs.	Yeezus Tour's a triumph.	And Yeezus Tour triumphs.
65	inside kanye west york city yeezus pop shop	It is located in the heart of the city of Kanye, in the west of York.	Inside Kanye, west of York, there is a pop store.	Inside Kanye, west of York, there's a pop store.
65	kanye call lenny kravitz concert realizing	Kanye calling Lenny Kravitz directing concert.	Kanye calling Lenny Kravitz concert director.	Kanye calls Lenny Kravitz concert director.
65	kanye kim beautiful woman time	Beautiful woman kanye kim kanye time beautiful woman kanye kim.	Kanye kim beautiful woman times kanye kim beautiful woman.	Kanye kim beautiful woman time kanye beautiful woman kanye.
65	kim kardashian kanye west prenup ban plastic surgery kris jenner	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Kardashian Kanye marriage contract prohibits kris plastic surgery Jenner kris.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West marriage contract banned kris plastic surgery Jenner kris.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West marriage contract prohibits plastic surgery kris Jenner kris.
65	kim kardashian kanye west smile big lucky fan	Kim Kardashian Kanye West smiling lucky fan.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West grin big, lucky fan.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West smile big lucky fan.
65	kanye west appearing keeping kardashians	Kanye West seems to keep kardashian.	Well, Kanye West seems to keep some kardashian.	Kanye west seems to be keeping kardashian.
65	inside yeezus tour barclays center	It is located in the heart of the city of Yeezus.	Inside Yeezus Tower barclays center.	To the interior of Yeezus barclays center tower.
65	kim kardashian kanye west soho sweetheart	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Soho darling.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Soho, darling.	Hey, Kim Kardashian Kanye West Soho, honey.
65	kim kanye wedding broadcast television	Kim Kanye wedding televised.	Kim Kanye wedding aired on TV.	Kim Kanye wedding broadcast on TV.
65	kanye west credit fianc kim kardashian family changing people	Kim Kardashian's fiancée, Kanye West, changed people.	Kim Kardashian's fiancée Kanye West changed people.	Kanye West, Kim Kardashian's fiancee, changed people for the better.
65	video kanye west contentious minute interview breakfast club	The room was very clean and the bathroom was very clean.	Video Kanye West minute d' contentious interview club breakfast interview club.	Video Kanye West minute d' interview contentious breakfast club interview club.
65	kanye west mid concert freak fashion slight	From the middle of the concert, Kanye West is a little fashionable.	Kanye West, middle of the concert, is slightly fashionable.	Kanye West, in the middle of the concert scene, is a little fashionable.
65	kanye west bound star kim kardashian beautiful	Kanye towards the apos; West star Kim Kardashian beautiful.	Kanye to the west star Kim Kardashian beautiful.	Kanye to the apos; west star kim Kardashian star is beautiful.
65	kanye west downton abbey replica mansion	Kanye West Downton Abbey Replica Mansion.	Kanye West Downton Abbey Replica Mansion.	Kanye west downton abbey replica mansion.
65	kanye west kim kardashian break touring baby north	"Kanye West Kim Kardashian break-touring ""baby"" North."	Kanye West Kim Kardashian break touring baby North.	Kanye West Kim kardashian break touring baby north.
65	live yeezus preaches word listen	It's not a game, it's a game.	Live Yeezus preaches the word.	"Live Yeezus preaches the word ""listen."""
65	kanye west describes kim kardashian love story age	Kanye West describes the Age of Initiation; History of Initiation; Love of Kim Kardashian.	West Kanye describes the apos; age of apos; history of apos; love of Kim Kardashian.	Kanye West describes the apogee; the age of the apogee; the story of apo; the love of Kim Kardashian.
65	kanye west rant onstage complains treated god	Kanye West ranting on stage complaining about God treated.	Kanye West rambles on stage complaining about God being treated like that.	Kanye West rambling onstage complains about God being treated.
65	kanye west joined naked dancer jesus stage picture	Kanye West S&apos is also joined by Jesus, a nude dancer on stage.	Kanye West s' is joined by Jesus, a dancer on stage.	Kanye West s' joins Jesus, naked dancer on stage.
65	kimye brangelina celebrity couple married child	Kimye Brangelina is a married couple.	Kimye brangelina couple famous married child.	Kimye brangelina famous married couple married kid.
65	kim kardashian kanye west wedding brody jenner invited	Kim Kardashian Kanye West wedding, Brody Jenner guest.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West wedding Brody Jenner guest.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West wedding Brody Jenner invited.
65	kanye west ditch nike adidas explains hot interview video	Kanye West fossé nike adidas explains the video of the video clip; hot interview.	Kanye West fossé nike adidas explains the video of l' hot interview.	Kanye West fossé nike adidas explains video from l' hot interview.
65	kanye west kardashians helping america	Kanye West Kardashians helping' America.	Kanye West Kardashians helping El' America.	Kanye West Kardashians helping America.
65	kim kardashian sexy dress shorter photo	Kim Kardashian hot dress, shorter photo.	Kim Kardashian dress sexy shorter photo.	Kim Kardashian sexy dress shorter photo.
65	kanye west ditch nike bigger wal mart	Kanye West throws itself to the water.	Kanye West empties into the water.	Kanye West is the largest city in the world.
65	khloe kardashian baby north kanye west	Khloe Kardashian baby North West Kanye.	Khloe Kardashian-born baby north kanye west.	Khloe kardashian baby north kanye west.
65	kim kardashian kanye west brody jenner wedding guest	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Brody Jenner invited to wedding.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West Brody Jenner invited to wedding.	Kim kardashian kanye west brody jenner invited to the wedding.
65	kanye west ink deal adidas	Kanye West sells a wide range of products.	Kanye West sells l' ink adidas.	Kanye West sells adidas ink.
65	kanye west slam hedi slimane	Kanye West slamedi slimane.	Kanye West, slamedi hedi slimane.	Sliman kanye west slamedi hedi slimane.
65	kanye west change sneaker trade nike adidas	Kanye West change trade shoes adidas nike adidas.	Kanye West change trade shoes nike adidas nike adidas.	Kanye West change sneakers trade nike adidas adidas.
65	kanye hedi slimane madison square garden yeezus tour	Kanye hedi slimane madison-squared garden yeezus tower.	Kanye hedi slimane madison square yard tower yeezus.	Kanye hedi slimane madison square garden yeezus tower.
65	kanye west working yeezus follow	Kanye West, working on Yeezus to follow.	West Kanye working Yeezus follow.	West Kanye working Yeezus to follow him.
65	obama cool dropping kanye west kim kardashian	Obama cooler to drop kanye kardashian kanye from l' west kardashian kardashian.	Obama cool to drop kanye kardashian from west kardashian kardashian.	Obama cool to drop kanye kim kardashian from l' west kardashian kardashian.
65	kanye west fill stage naked woman fill blank	Kanye West fills women's nude scene with empty space.	Kanye West fills up an empty naked woman scene.	Kanye West fills the stage naked woman fill empty.
65	kanye west call nike concert	This is Kanye West calling Nike concert.	Kanye West calling Nike concert.	Kanye west calling Nike concert.
65	kanye west announces partnership adidas shoe	Kanye West has announced its partnership with Adidas Shoe.	Kanye West announces its partnership with Shoe Adidas.	Kanye West announces partnership with Adidas Shoe.
65	raiding kanye closet kim kardashian swap boob baring top	Piller kanye cupboard kim kardashian swap tits barring top.	Piller kanye closet kim kardashian swap tits barring top.	Piller kanye closet kim kardashian swap tits barring top.
65	kim kardashian wrap warm nyc	Hot wrapped Kim Kardashian nyc.	And Kim Kardashian wrapped in hot nyc.	Kim Kardashian wrapped nyc hot.
65	kanye west talk album control cruel winter fashion power	"Kanye West talks about ""D'apos"", an album that controls the power of the cruelty of winter fashion."	Kanye West talks about d' an album that controls the cruel power of the winter fashion.	West talks about d&apos, an album that controls the cruel power of winter fashion.
65	kim kardashian ruin favourite music video parody	Kim Kardashian is ruining the parody of her favorite video.	Kim Kardashian has ruined the parody of her favorite music video.	Kim Kardashian is ruining the parody of her favorite music video clip.
65	brody jenner invited kardashian west wedding defends sister	Brody Jenner has invited Kardashian West to get married in defense of his sister.	Brody Jenner invited Kardashian West to be married to defend his sister.	Brody Jenner invited kardashian west to get married in defense of his sister.
65	kanye cut tie nike partner adidas	Kanye cut-off tie nike nike partner adidas.	Kanye cut tie nike partner adidas.	Kanye cut tie nike partner adidas.
65	kanye west working album	Kanye West has been working on an album.	Kanye West is working on an album.	Kanye West is working on an album right now.
65	kanye loved kim	Kanye was in love with Kim.	Kanye loved kim.	Kanye loved kim.
65	kanye leaf nike adidas	Kanye leaflet nike adidas.	Nike adidas leaf kanye.	Kanye leaf nike adidas.
65	kim kardashian kanye west wedding air television	Kim Kardashian Kanye Live Television from Kim Kardashian's Wedding.	Kim Kardashian Kanye Live television coverage of the wedding of Kim Kardashian.	Kim Kardashian Kanye Live wedding television from the west of Kim Kardashian.
65	kim kardashian transformed face reality star	Kim Kardashian has been transforming the apos, the star of facial reality.	Kim Kardashian transformed apos, the star of facial reality.	Kim Kardashian transformed the facial reality star.
65	week best celeb snap	Best celebrity of the week.	You know, the best celebrity of the week.	The best celebrity of the week.
65	kim family best kanye west brag kardashians	The best kim kanye family in the world boasts kardashians.	The best west kanye Kim family boasts kardashians.	The best kim kanye west family boasts of kardashians.
65	kanye yeezus pop shop raking cash	Kanye Yeezus Pop Shop collecting money.	Kanye Yeezus Pop Shop picking' up money.	You know, Kanye Yeezus Pop Shop picking up money.
65	kanye kendrick perform remember	Kanye Kendrick performer remember-you.	Kanye Kendrick performer remember-you.	Kanye Kendrick performer remember us-you.
65	love story love story age kanye west gush	History of Apos; Love; History of Apos; Love; Kanye West Gush.	History of Apos; love, history of Apos; love, West gush kanye.	History of apoes; love; history of apos; love; kanye west gush.
65	kanye west compare kim kardashian romance romeo juliet	Kanye West compares Roméo Juliet to Kim Kardashian.	Kanye West compares Kardashian romance Kim Romeo Juliet.	Kanye West compares Kim Kardashian romance Romeo Juliet.
65	kanye west visit hot kim kardashian confirms adidas deal video	Kanye West visit kardashian kim hot kardashian confirms video deal adidas video deal.	Kanye West visit kim kardashian hot confirms adidas video deal.	Kanye West visit kim kardashian hot confirms adidas deal video video.
65	kim wow black tasseled dress step hubby	It's not like you don't know what you're doing.	It's a good way to get a feel for what it's all about.	"Kim wow ""Kim wow"" Black tasseled dress step hubby &quot."
65	kanye west reportedly leaf nike adidas	Kanye West reports that adidas leaves nike nike adidas.	Kanye West reports that nike adidas leaves.	West reports that nike adidas leaves.
65	kanye west rant lenny kravitz yeezus concert realising	Kanye West ranting Lenny Kravitz Yeezus concert, directing.	Kanye West ranting Lenny Kravitz Yeezus concert directing.	Kanye West ranting lenny Kravitz Yeezus concert directing.
65	kanye west bizarre rant nice guy lenny kravitz concert	Kanye West weird ranting sweet guy Lenny Kravitz concert, Kravitz.	Hey, Kanye West weird ranting nice guy Lenny Kravitz concert Kravitz.	Kanye West bizarre ranting nice guy Lenny Kravitz concert Kravitz.
65	kanye west bound solidisco remix free download	Free download from Kanye Westbound solidisco remix.	Kanye Westbound solidisco remix download free of charge.	Kanye Westbound solidisco remix free download.
65	kanye west hate reality tv kim kardashian fianc refuse	Kanye West hates the reality kardashian kardashian fianc tv denial.	Kanye West hates the reality tv kim kardashian fianc refused.	Kanye West hates reality tv kim kardashian fianc refused.
65	kanye west bound drop nike adidas opinion video	Video Kanye Westbound Drop Niké Adidas d' opinion.	Kanye Westbound Drop Niké Adidas video d' opinion.	Kanye Westbound Drop Niké Adidas video d' opinion.
65	kim slam post baby plastic surgery rumour	Kim slam post baby surgery plastic surgery rumor baby surgery plastic surgery kim slam.	Kim slam post baby plastic surgery rumor baby plastic surgery kim slam.	Kim slam post baby plastic surgery rumor kim slam baby plastic surgery.
65	kim kardashian kanye west baby north family dinner	This is Kim Kardashian Kanye's family dinner, West Baby North.	Kim Kardashian Kanye Kardashian family dinner West Baby North.	Kim kardashian kanye family dinner west baby north.
65	kanye west substandard kuwtk	Kanye kuwtk kuwtk Western under kuwtk standards.	Kanye West under kuwtk kuwtk standards.	West kanye under kuwtk kuwtk standards.
65	kim kardashian kanye west sell wedding tape	Kim Kardashian Kanye West is selling wedding tapes for sale.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West sells wedding tapes.	Kim Kardashian kanye west is selling wedding tape.
65	kanye west drop nike deal adidas	Kanye West drop nike.	Kanye West drop nike deal adidas.com.	Kanye West drop nike deal adidas.
65	kanye west scrap nike deal adidas mma bigger wal mart	Kanye West Nike adidas mma's larger Wal Wal scrap market.	Kanye West market of Nike adidas mma scrap metal bigger Wal Wal market.	Kanye West Scrap market of Nike adidas mma bigger Wal Wal market.
65	kanye west taped wedding proposal kim kardashian wanted	Kanye West has just registered Kim Kardashian's proposal.	Kanye West has registered the proposal of Kim Kardashian.	Kanye West recorded Kim Kardashian's proposal of marriage.
65	kanye west plan build downton abbey replica mansion	Kanye West's plan calls for the construction of apos, a replica of the manor house at Downton Abbey.	Kanye West's plan calls for the construction of a replica of the manor of Downton Abbey.	The plan for Kanye West is to build apos, a replica of the Downton Abbey manor house.
66	kobe bryant extension good bad deal lakers poll	Kobe Bryant extension bad bad business polling lakers.	Kobe Bryant extension good deal bad lakers survey poll.	Kobe Bryant extension good bad business lakers poll poll.
66	lakers finalize deal bryant eye free agent	The lakers finalise the chord Bryant agent without eyes.	The lakers are finishing the album; chord bryant agent without eyes.	The lakers finalise the apos; bryant agent agreement without eyes.
66	kupchak lakers build kobe bryant	Kobe bryant kobe is built by kupchak lakers.	Kupchak lakers build kobe bryant kobe.	The kupchak lakers build kobe bryant kobe.
66	lakers improve free throwing xavier henry leading	Xavier Henry's free throw was improved by the lakers.	The lakers enhance the free throw Xavier Henry in the lead.	The lakers improve Xavier Henry's lead free throw.
66	carmelo anthony uncertain free agent join kobe bryant	Carmelo Anthony, Uncertain Free Agent, joins Kobe Bryant.	Uncertain free agent Carmelo Anthony joins Kobe Bryant.	Carmelo Anthony, free agent uncertain, joins Kobe Bryant.
66	kobe bryant leaving table finish career	When Kobe Bryant left the table, his career ended.	Kobe Bryant's career at the table is over.	Kobe Bryant leaving the table ends his career at the end.
66	kobe extension loya risk	Extension kobe.	Kobe extension is a risk factor.	Kobe extension loya risk.
66	kobe deal melo	Kobe deal-melo deal.	Kobe deal melo deal?	Kobe deal melo deal.
66	lakers bryant happy extension nears return	The lakers, bryanting happy extension, will be back soon.	The bryant happy extension lakers are gonna be back soon.	The lakers bryant happy extension will be back soon.
66	kobe bryant extension lakers negotiation	Kobe Bryant extended to include the Lakers.	Kobe Bryant extends lakers trading.	Kobe Bryant extension lakers negotiation.
66	monday sport	Monday sports.	Monday sports.	The monday sport.
66	kobe bryant extension year	Kobe Bryant Year 2000; extension.	Kobe Bryant, year 2000; extension.	Kobe bryant year d' extension.
66	kobe closer	Closer.	Kobe, closer.	Okay, Kobe, closer.
66	photo kobe responds criticism extension instagram	Photo by Kobe, responding to the blogger's criticism; instagram extension.	Photo by kobe responding to criticism of l' instagram extension.	Photo kobe respond to criticism of l' instagram extension.
66	kobe catch kareem	Kobe catch kareem kareem kareem.	Kobe catch kareem kareem?	Kobe catch kareem kareem.
66	kobe bryant signed contract lakers	Kobe Bryant's got laker contracts in place.	Kobe Bryant has signed some lakers contracts.	Kobe bryant signed some laker contracts.
66	breaking kobe bryant extension impact lakers future	Break Kobe bryant impact extension lakers future.	Breaking Kobe bryant extension impact lakers future.	Kobe Breaker bryant extension impact lakers future.
66	video kobe bryant comment signing extension	Kobe video comment bryant extension signature extension.	Kobe video comment bryant signature extension extension.	Kobe video bryant comment signature extension signature extension.
66	kobe selfish deal limit lakers free agency	Selfish Kobe deal limits Lakers free agency.	Selfish Kobe deal limits free agency Lakers.	Kobe selfish deal limits the free agency lakers.
66	lakers news kobe bryant unleashes twitter rant extension	Lakers news bryant kobe releases the' twitter rant extension.	Lakers news kobe bryant kobe releases it' twitter rant extension.	Lakers news kobe bryant releases twitter rant extension.
66	kobe bryant deal good los angeles lakers	Kobe Bryant deal good, Los Angeles Lakers.	Kobe Bryant deal good Los Angeles Lakers.	Kobe bryant deal good los angeles lakers.
66	lakers news mitch kupchak belief kobe bryant pay cut	Lakers News Mitch Kupchak believes Kobe Bryant has cut his salary.	Lakers news Mitch Kupchak believes that Kobe Bryant cut his salary.	Lakers news Mitch Kupchak thinks Kobe Bryant cut his salary.
66	top lakers quote week	Some of the city's best and brightest cite the week.	You know, the best people in town cite the week.	The best urbanites quote the week.
66	lakers sign bryant year	Bryant Year was signed by the Lakers.	The lakers signed Bryant's year.	The lakers signed bryant year.
66	mitch kupchak belief lakers build contender kobe deal	The Kobe deal is the only deal that Kobe has ever made with the Lakers.	Mitch Kupchak believed that the lakers formed the rival Kobe deal Kobe.	Kupchak believes the lakers are the rival Kobe deal Kobe.
66	carmelo anthony kobe bryant star worthy joining	It's the first time I've heard of it, and it's the first time I've seen it.	Carmelo Anthony Kobe bryant star worthy of epos; be joined.	Carmelo Anthony Kobe bryant star worthy to join.
66	kobe bryant deal good lakers	Kobe Bryant has great lakers.	Good lakers from Kobe Bryant.	Kobe Bryant offers good lakers for you.
66	breaking lakers kobe bryant agree year contract extension	Kobe Bryant is the name of the company and is the name of the company.	The broken Kobe Bryant lakers are due; agreement to extend the contract one year.	The broken Kobe Bryant lakers were agreed to extend the contract one year.
66	kobe bryant sign deal stay los angeles lakers	Kobe signed the apos; agreement to remain Los Angeles Lakers.	Kobe Bryant signs l' agreement remain Los Angeles Lakers.	Kobe bryant signs the apos; agreement to stay Los Angeles Lakers.
66	kobe bryant contract extension lakers	Kobe Bryant Extension of Lakers contract.	Kobe Bryant extended the lakers contract.	Kobe Bryant contract extension lakers.
66	lakers lock bryant year	Lakers Lock Bryant Year.	Lakers lock bryant year.	Lakers lock bryant year lock.
66	true hollywood story kobe crippling contract	The Hollywood Kobe contract is the only contract in the world that is paralyzing, and the only one that is paralyzing.	Hollywood Kobe paralyzing contract kobe paralyzing contract.	A true story about Hollywood Kobe contract paralyzing contract kobe contract paralyzing.
66	kobe bryant extension lakers	Kobe Bryant is a laker extension.	Kobe Bryant extension lakers, please.	Kobe bryant extension lakers.
66	admiring melo lakers kobe	J' admire the melo kobe lakers.	J' admire kobe melo lakers.	J' admire melo lakers kobe.
66	sizing kobe bryant extension lakers	Kobe-bryant extension.	Kobe bryant lakers extension.	Kobe bryant extension lakers.
66	kobe extension move lakers	Kobe extension moves lakers.	L' kobe extension moves the lakers away.	L' kobe extension moves lakers.
66	money pit selfish player sport killed laker franchise	The game of the mine's selfish players d'apos; silver killed the lakers franchise.	The Laker franchise was killed by the sport of selfish gamblers from the d'apos mine.	The mine's selfish player sport d'apos; silver killed the laker franchise.
66	bryant extension ensures long term contention	L' Bryant extension provides a long-term challenge.	L' bryant extension is a long-term challenge.	L' bryant extension ensures long-term protests.
66	nba bryant sign year extension lakers	The NBA Bryant extends the Year of the Lakers.	The NBA Bryant extended the year of signing of the lakers.	The NBA Bryant extends the year of lakers signing.
66	lakers news kobe bryant attends hublot watch dinner	Lakers News Kobe Bryant will be at the window dinner.	Lakers News Kobe Bryant attends the window dinner.	Lakers News Kobe Bryant attends the dinner window.
66	bryant sign extension lakers	Bryant also extends the apos; Ensign Lakers.	Bryant extends the apos; Ensign Lakers.	Bryant extends the sign Lakers.
66	best case scenario lakers	At best, they're just lakers.	Best case scenario, those are lakers.	Best case scenario, lakers.
66	reward outweigh risk kobe bryant contract extension	Kobe Bryant's contract was awarded to Kobe Bryant on the same basis as Kobe Bryant.	The risk of extending Kobe Bryant's contract is outweighed by the reward.	The reward outweighs the risk associated with the extension of the Kobe Bryant contract.
66	kobe bryant blast hypocrisy criticizing contract extension selfish	Kobe Bryant blast hypocrisy, criticizing the extension of a selfish contract.	Kobe Bryant hypocrisy blast criticizing the selfish contract extension.	Kobe Bryant blast hypocrisy criticizing selfish contract extension.
66	jim bus kobe extension bus family decision	Family decision regarding l' expansion of Jim Kobe Bus.	Family decision regarding extension of the Jim Kobe bus.	Family decision regarding Jim Kobe's bus extension.
66	kobe bryant ready	Kobe Bryant ready.	Okay, Kobe Bryant is ready.	Kobe bryant is ready.
66	lakers sign kobe bryant year extension	Kobe Bryant was the first Lakers to sign a contract with Kobe Bryant.	The lakers are signing Kobe Bryant year extension.	The lakers signed an extension year for Kobe Bryant.
66	kobe bryant worth	I think Kobe Bryant is worth it.	Kobe Bryant is worth it.	Kobe bryant is worth it.
66	nba lakers sign kobe year contract extension	The NBA lakers signed the Kobe year to extend the Los Angeles Lakers contract.	The NBA lakers signed the extension of the Kobe year.	The NBA lakers signed the Kobe year contract extension.
66	kobe bryant rich contract lakers achilles heel	Rich Lakers deal Kobe buys heel from D' Achilles.	Kobe's rich contract with the lakers buys the heel of the d' Achilles.	Kobe rich lakers contract achilles heel d' Achille.
66	basketball bryant sign year contract extension lakers	"Bryant has signed a one-year ""Basketball Extension"" contract with the Basketball Lakers."	Bryant signed a contract to extend d' one year with the basketball lakers.	Bryant signed a one-year extension contract with the basketball lakers.
66	kobe confident lakers money free agent	Kobe trusting Lakers to be a moneyless agent.	Kobe trusting Lakers money agent without money without agent.	Kobe trusting Lakers money agent without agent.
66	kobe bryant deal tie lakers salary cap carmelo anthony team	Kobe Bryant tie tie deal lakers pay cap Carmelo team anthony.	Kobe Bryant deal tie lakers pay cap Carmelo team anthony tie.	Kobe Bryant deal tie lakers pay cap Carmelo team anthony.
66	carmelo anthony lakers pay kobe bryant year	Anthony Lakers pays Kobe Bryant Year.	Carmelo Anthony Lakers pays off Kobe Bryant Year.	And Carmelo Anthony Lakers pays Kobe Bryant Year.
66	nba season team player	He played for the NBA's National Football League (NBA) team.	NBA team member of the team.	L'apos player; NBA season team.
66	lakers rumor kobe bryant sign year deal team free agency	The Lakers believe that Kobe Bryant signs the agreement of the year.	The Lakers believe that Kobe Bryant is signing the deal of the year.	The lakers believe that Kobe Bryant signed the year's agreement.
66	kobe bryant laker life	Kobe Bryant Laker Life.	Kobe Bryant Laker life.	Kobe bryant laker life.
66	ndg gossip kobe bryant sign year extension	Kobe gossip prolongation of the apos; year sign Bryant.	Ndg gossims kobe bryant prolongation of the apos; year sign bryantum.	Ndg gossip kobe bryant prolongation de l' year bryant.
66	update kobe bryant lakers agreeing year contract extension	Update kobe bryant lakers; d&apos kobe bryant; agreement year extension of contract.	Update kobe bryant lakers d' agreement year extension of contract.	To update kobe bryant lakers d' agreement year extension of the contract.
66	carmelo anthony kobe achilles key lakers free agency	Carmelo kobe anthony purchases key lakers agency without charge.	Carmelo anthony kobe buys key agency lakers free of charge.	Carmelo anthony kobe achilles key lakers retail agency no charge.
66	lakers guard kobe bryant return week day	Kobe Bryant is being guarded by the lakers on the week of his return.	The lakers got Kobe Bryant on the day of the week back.	The lakers guard Kobe Bryant on the week-end.
66	kobe bryant drop stay lakers year	Kobe bryant, drop lakers year.	Kobe bryant drop lakers year.	Kobe drop bryant lakers year drop lakers.
66	kobe bryant contract lakers roster	Kobe Bryant is the name of a group of lakers.	Kobe Bryant lists of contract lakers.	Kobe Bryant lists contract lakers.
66	mitch kupchak address medium	This is Mitch Kupchak at medium.	Mitch Kupchak goes medium.	Mitch Kupchak, address medium.
66	kobe bryant instagram refute criticism contract extension	Kobe bryant instagram has denied the extension of the critical contract.	Kobe bryant instagram denies the extension of the critical contract.	Kobe bryant instagram denies the critical contract extension.
66	kobe bryant sign year extension	Extension of the Kobe Bryant sign.	Extension of the year of the Kobe Bryant sign.	Extension of the apos; sign year Kobe Bryant.
66	kobe week returning talk contract	Kobe Week back discussion contract.	Kobe Week back discussion contract.	Kobe week back discussion contract.
66	kobe bryant signed lakers target	Kobe Bryant signed off on the Lakers' target.	Kobe Bryant signed the Lakers target.	Kobe bryant signed the lakers' target.
66	kobe bryant share picture signed contract extension	Photo by Kobe Bryant on the photo by Kobe Bryant; a contract signed by Kobe Bryant.	Photo by Kobe Bryant on photo d' contract signed by Kobe Bryant.	Kobe Bryant photo on d' contract signed by Kobe Bryant.
66	kobe bryant los angeles lakers agree contract extension	Kobe Bryant Los Angeles Lakers agreed to extend the contract.	Kobe Bryant Los Angeles Lakers agrees to extend the contract.	Kobe Bryant Los Angeles Lakers agreed to extend the contract for two years.
66	kaman kobe king	This is Kaman Kobe King.	Kaman kobe King.	Kaman kobe king.
66	lakers point guard kobe bryant play	Lakers point will keep Kobe Bryant play.	Lakers point guard Kobe Bryant play.	Lakers point guard kobe bryant play.
66	lakers kobe bryant contract ring	The Kobe Bryant Ring Contract Lakers.	The contract ring kobe bryant kobe lakers.	The lakers kobe bryant contract ring.
66	kobe bryant contract extension good business los angeles lakers	Kobe Bryant renewing bargain deal Los Angeles Lakers.	Kobe Bryant extended Los Angeles Lakers deal breaker.	Kobe Bryant extension of good business Los Angeles Lakers contract.
66	reason lebron james better kobe bryant	Lebron James prefers Kobe Bryant.	That's why Lebron James prefers Kobe Bryant.	And that's why Lebron James prefers Kobe Bryant.
66	carmelo anthony option limited lakers extend kobe	L' anthony carmelo option allows limited d&apos lakers; extend kobe.	L' option carmelo anthony allows the limited lakers to expand kobe.	L' option carmelo anthony allows limited lakers d' extend kobe.
66	lakers interested luol deng	I think Luol Deng was interested in the lakers.	The lakers got Luol Deng interested in them.	The lakers interested Luol Deng.
66	kobe farewell worth	Kobe is just as good as a farewell.	Well, Kobe's worth a goodbye.	Kobe's worth a good-bye.
66	kobe bryant driven winning nba title	Kobe won the NBA championship.	Kobe Bryant was the NBA Champion.	Kobe Bryant won the NBA championship at the 2010 Winter Olympics.
66	kobe bryant wall prove lakers call	Kobe Bryant Wall proves that the Lakers call.	Kobe Bryant Wall proved that the Lakers were calling.	And Kobe Bryant Wall proves that the Lakers are calling.
66	top nba free agent join kobe bryant	The number one free agent in the NBA... joins Kobe Bryant.	The best free agent in the NBA joins Kobe Bryant.	NBA's top free agent joins Kobe Bryant.
66	kobe extension hamper lakers	Kobe extension complicates the task of lakers.	L' kobe extension complicates the task of the lakers.	L' kobe extension complicates lakers.
66	lakers gm franchise build contender kobe	Lakers gm franchise to build the new Kobe competition.	Lakers gm franchise build Kobe competitor.	Lakers gm franchise build kobe competitor.
66	kobe bryant week day return	This is Kobe Bryant Day of the Week.	Welcome back from Kobe Bryant Week.	Kobe Bryant day of the week return.
66	kobe bryant deal wall lakers	Kobe Bryant is dealing in wall lakers.	Kobe Bryant deal wall lakers.	Kobe bryant deal wall lakers.
66	kobe bryant sign year extension	Extension of the Kobe Bryant sign.	Extension of the year of the Kobe Bryant sign.	Extension of the apos; sign year Kobe Bryant.
66	forget kobe lebron final	Never mind the Kobe Lebron finals.	Forget about the Kobe Lebron finals.	Oh, forget the Kobe Lebron finals.
66	kobe bryant salary cap ruining nba	And Kobe Bryant capping wages, ruining the NBA.	Kobe Bryant capping ruining the NBA.	Kobe Bryant's salary cap policy is ruining the NBA.
66	lakers post game video team buying mike antoni concept	Team post-game lakers buy Mike Antoni concept.	Team post-game lakers buy Mike Antoni concept game.	The lakers post video game team buy Mike Antoni concept.
66	kobe bryant lakers sign year contract extension	The contract was signed by Kobe Bryant Lakers, who signed the contract for the same year.	Kobe Bryant Lakers also signed the contract extension for the year.	Kobe Bryant Lakers signs the contract extension for the year.
66	kobe bryant year year salary	Kobe Bryant Year of Annual Salary.	Canadian Institute of Chartered Accountants.	Kobe Bryant Annual salary year.
66	bryant happy extension nears return	Bryant's merry addition should be back soon.	Bryant's merry extension will be back soon.	Bryant's happy extension will be back soon.
66	kobe bryant practice court	Kobe Bryant, he's out of practice.	Kobe Bryant ran out of practice.	Kobe Bryant practice short.
66	jim bus kobe deal thing	Jim's Kobe Bus thingy.	You know, the thing about Jim's kobe bus.	Jim's bus kobe thing.
66	bryant ink year extension lakers	Year-round Bryant ink; Lakers extension.	Bryant in year d' Lakers extension.	Browant in year d' extension Lakers.
66	kobe bryant sign extension lakers black mamba pay cut	Kobe Bryant Extension of Black Mamba Lakers panels reduced pay.	Kobe Bryant extended black mamba Lakers panels reduced pay.	Kobe Bryant Lakers black mamba board extension reduced pay.
66	mike antoni integrating kobe good problem	It's good to be able to do it in a good way.	Mike Antoni d'apos; integrate kobe good problem.	Mike Antoni is d'apos; integrating kobe good problem.
66	jim bus lakers point waiting kobe bryant extension	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Jim lakers point d' waiting bryant kobe extension.	Jim lakers point d' waiting kobe bryant extension.
66	nba news analyzing latest kobe bryant extension league	NBA News reviews Kobe Bryant's latest expansion.	NBA News reviews the latest expansion of Kobe Bryant.	NBA News is analyzing the latest Kobe Bryant expansion.
66	kobe bryant lakers easy choice	The choice of Kobe Bryant Lakers is easy.	Kobe Bryant Lakers is the easy choice.	Kobe bryant lakers is an easy choice.
66	kobe bryant contract extension negotiation	Negotiation of Kobe Bryant's extension.	Negotiation of the extension of the contract for Kobe Bryant.	Kobe Bryant's contract extension negotiated.
66	los angeles lakers sign kobe bryant year extension return	The Los Angeles Lakers signed a year-long Kobe Bryant extension.	Los Angeles Lakers signed Kobe Bryant in the second year of the season.	Los Angeles Lakers signed Kobe Bryant year extension back.
66	derrick rose officially year kobe bryant signed	Derrick Rose officially signed the contract with the company, the same year that Kobe signed the contract.	Derrick Rose officially signed on the same year as Kobe Bryant.	Derrick Rose officially signed the year Kobe Bryant signed.
66	lakers rumor pau gasol contract extension kobe bryant	Rumor has it that Kobe Bryant has extended his gasoline contract.	Kobe Bryant is rumored to have extended his contract with Petrol.	There's a rumor that Kobe Bryant extended his contract with Petrol.
66	kobe bryant lakers agree year contract extension	Kobe Bryant Lakers is late; agreement to extend the contract; one year.	Kobe Bryant Lakers is an agreement to extend the contract for one year.	Kobe Bryant Lakers is signed to extend the contract one year.
66	lakers rumor carmelo anthony option kobe bryant contract	The lakers say Carmelo Anthony's option is kobe bryant.	Lakers say that Carmelo Anthony option kobe bryant contract.	The lakers say carmelo anthony option kobe bryant contract.
66	lakers sign bryant year extension	The Lakers were the first lakers in the world to sign the treaty.	Lakers sign the extension of the year bryante.	The lakers sign the extension of the lapos; year bryante.
66	lakers news kobe bryant tweet contract extension	Lakers News kobe bryant prolongation of the contract of tweet.	Lakers News kobe bryant extension of the contract tweet.	Lakers News kobe bryant tweet contract extension.
66	miller bryant hit bank shot	Miller Bryant was hit by a bullet in the bank.	Miller Bryant was shot at the bank.	Miller Bryant got hit at the bank yesterday.
66	kobe bryant play kobe bryant	Kobe Bryant plays Kobe Bryant.	Kobe Bryant plays Kobe Bryant!	Kobe bryant plays kobe bryant.
66	lakers sign kobe bryant year extension	Kobe Bryant was the first Lakers to sign a contract with Kobe Bryant.	The lakers are signing Kobe Bryant year extension.	The lakers signed an extension year for Kobe Bryant.
66	lakers sign kobe bryant year contract extension	The Lakers signed an extension contract with Kobe Bryant for the remainder of the year.	The Lakers signed Kobe Bryant's extension contract for the next year.	The Lakers signed Bryant's contract extension for the year.
66	lakers lock kobe bryant	Kobe Bryant is locked down by the lakers.	Lakers lock down Kobe Bryant.	The lakers lock Kobe Bryant.
66	lakers sign kobe bryant insane deal	The Lakers signed the Lakers Agreement with Kobe Bryant.	The lakers signed l'apos; crazy agreement by Kobe Bryant.	The lakers signed the apos, a wild deal by Kobe Bryant.
66	mike antoni kobe bryant extension sense	It's the first time I've heard of it.	Mike Antoni Kobe bryant sense of apos; extension.	Mike Antoni Kobe bryant sense de l&apos.
66	lakers sign kobe bryant year contract extension	The Lakers signed an extension contract with Kobe Bryant for the remainder of the year.	The Lakers signed Kobe Bryant's extension contract for the next year.	The Lakers signed Bryant's contract extension for the year.
66	kobe bryant big contract extension hurt lakers long	Kobe Bryant, the big expansion of the deal hurt the long lakers.	Kobe Bryant, the extended contract hurt the long lakers.	Kobe Bryant, the big contract extension hurt long lakers.
66	kobe bryant contract extension pricey lakers cap space	Kobe Bryant Lakers Lakers Cap space contract extension.	Kobe Bryant contract extension lakers lakers price cap space.	Kobe Bryant Lakers lakers cap space contract extension.
66	kobe deal lakers future	Future of the Kobe Lakers.	The future of the Kobe-based Lakers.	L' future of Kobe Lakers.
66	injury leave lingering question	There are still questions about injuries.	The injuries still raise some questions.	These injuries still raise questions.
66	nba kobe confident lakers money free agent	Nba Kobe trusting Lakers to be a moneyless agent.	Nba Kobe trust money Lakers agent without money agent.	Nba Kobe trusting Lakers money agent without agent.
66	realistic free agent option lakers pair kobe bryant	Kobe Bryant is also a member of the Lakers team.	Realistic lakers from L' option of l' free agent pair Kobe Bryant.	The realistic lakers match Kobe Bryant's free agent option.
66	kobe bryant tim lincecum deal comparison team icon big money	Kobe Bryant Tim Lincecum Moose Jaw Comparison Team; iconic business of big money.	Kobe Bryant Tim Lincecum comparator team of l' business icon big money.	Kobe Bryant Tim Lincecum tax comparison team; big money icon business.
66	video kobe bryant jab nba vetoing chris paul trade espn	Jab nba kobe bryant video vetting Chris Paul Trade Espn.	This is a video of a kobe bryant jab nba vetting Chris Paul Trade Espn.	Kobe video bryant jab nba vetoing Chris Paul Trade Espn.
66	nothin net kobe deal bad business	There is no network Kobe Kobe Kobe T' has quite a lot of business.	You don't have a Kobe Kobe Kobe T&apos network; you don't have a lot of business.	It's a good place to start, but it's a good place to start.
66	twitter reacts kobe bryant year extension	Twitter is reacting to Kobe Bryant's long-awaited and brying year.	Twitter reacts to Kobe Bryant's long and bryan year.	Twitter reacts to the news of the extension of the year of Kobe Bryant.
66	kobe bryant deal worth lakers	Kobe Bryant is a worthwhile business to rent.	Kobe Bryant, a business opportunity worth renting.	Kobe Bryant, case worth renting.
66	struggling knicks biggest loss carmelo anthony offseason	The biggest loss of Knicks carmelo's anthony out of-season.	The biggest Knicks carmelo anthony loss outside @-@season.	The biggest loss of Knicks carmelo anthony off-season.
66	bad lakers worse kobe	Bad lakers, worst kobe kobe.	Bad lakers worst kobe kobe.	Bad lakers, worse kobe kobe.
66	kobe bryant sign year extension lakers reported	Kobe Bryant, Extension of the Year of the Signs, reported lakers.	Kobe Bryant, the year of the signs, reported lakers.	Kobe Bryant, sign year extension, reported lakers.
66	report kobe bryant week day returning game lakers	Kobe Bryant Week report-end-@ end return lakers.	Report by Kobe Bryant week-end return lakers.	Kobe Bryant week report-end return lakers.
66	bryant deal help lure superstar summer	Bryant helps attract superstars from the summer.	Bryant deal helps to attract superstars from the summer.	Bryant deal helps lure superstars from the summer.
66	los angeles lakers kobe bryant week	Los Angeles Lakers kobe bryant-week.	Los Angeles Lakers kobe bryant weekend.	Los angeles lakers kobe bryant week.
66	bull rose season surgery	Surgery of the bull-pink season.	Bull-pink season surgery.	Toral rose season surgery.
66	kobe bryant contract extension stick lakers middle	Kobe Bryant's newest contract is the newest one in the league.	Kobe Bryant contract extension match lakers in the middle.	Kobe Bryant contract extension stick lakers in the middle.
67	stadium hosting cup opener brazil collapse	Staade welcoming opening of Brazil Cup cups collapse.	Brazilian Cup opening stage welcoming collapse Brazil.	Staade welcoming Brazil collapse cup opening.
67	portion cup stadium collapse construction	It was built in the middle of the 19th century and built in the 1950s and 1960s.	Building d' a d&apos stadium; cup portion collapse.	Construction d' stadium d' collapse in portion of cup.
67	report three killed crane collapse sao paulo stadium	Three collapsed cranes in the São Paulo stadium.	Three cranes went down in Sao Paulo Stadium.	Three cranes have collapsed in the stadium of São Paulo.
67	flight cost uk brazil cup increase percent	Uk brazil cup flight cost increase per cent.	Uk brazil cup cost uk brazil increase per cent.	Flight cost uk brazil cup increase per cent.
67	football accident brazil cup stadium kill three medium	Soccer Accident Brazil Cup Stadium... kill three medium-sized ones.	Accident of football Brazil Cup Stadium kill three medium means.	Brazilian football accident Cup Stadium kill three medium means.
67	three dead stadium collapse	Three stadiums are now dead; they collapse.	Three dead stadiums s' collapse.	There are three stadiums, three dead stadiums.
67	stadium hosting wcup opener collapse	Stadium hosting wcup, wcup opening collapse.	Stadium hosting wcup opening collapse.	Stadium hosting wcup opening collapse.
67	reported dead stadium hosting wc opener collapse	There have been reports of a collapse of the toilet opening device in a stadium.	There have been reports of a collapse of the toilet opener in a stadium; dead welcome.	Lapos collapse reported; toilet opener in a stadium; dead welcome.
67	fifa cup brazil kick hybrid grass	FIFA mug Brazil kicks the seeds of the hybrid.	FIFA cup Brazil kick grass hybrid.	FIFA cup Brazil kick hybrid grass.
67	breaking news three people killed stadium set host brazil cup	Latest News Three people have just killed Stadium host set Brazil Cup.	Latest News Three people killed Brazil Cup host set Stadium.	Latest News Three people killed stadium host Brazil Cup set.
67	three die brazil cup stadium accident	Three separate accidents at the Die Brazil Cup stadium.	Three accidents at Die Brazil Cup stadium.	Die Brazil Cup stadium has three accidents.
67	three reported dead crane collapse stadium hosting opening	Three reported cases of sandhill crane collapse; a sandhill crane collapse; and a stadium opening.	Three reported sandstone cases; sandstone crane collapse; stadium opening reported.	Three reported cases; crane collapse sheltering the apos; stadium opening reported.
67	cup stadium collapse three killed	This was the first time that the stadium collapsed, killing three people.	L' collapse of the stadium of the cup killed three.	L' cup stadium collapse killed three.
67	portion stadium brazil bui host cup collapse dead	Part of the Brazilian Host Bui Stadium Cuts dead collapse.	Part of the stadium Brazil bui host cut collapse dead.	Part of the stadium Brazil bui host cup collapse dead.
67	killed collapse venue hosting wcup opener	The site of the collapse was killed while housing the apos; usurper of wcup.	The site of the collapse has been killed hosting the apos; wcup usher.	The collapse site was killed hosting the apos; wcup usher.
67	cup stadium hosting opening match brazil tournament	Opening of the Brazilian tournament.	Tournament venue for the match d' opening tournament in Brazil.	Cup stadium hosting the Brazilian tournament opening.
67	accident brazil cup stadium kill three medium	Brazil Cup Accident - Stadium kill three medium-means.	Brazil Cup Accident Stadium kill three medium means.	Staged Brazil Cup accident kill three medium means.
67	brazil source three dead cup stadium collapse	Brazil is now at the apo; origin of the apo; collapse of the stage of three dead cups.	Brazil is at the origin of the apos; collapse of the stage of three dead cups.	Brazil is at the apos; origin of the apos; three dead cup stage collapse.
67	three people killed collapse stadium hosting cup opener	Three people lost their lives in a d&apos stadium; an opening-cup hosted collapse.	Three people lost their lives in the stadium; collapse hosting an-cup.	Three people lost their lives in a collapsed stadium hosting an opening-cup.
67	three die crane collapse sao paulo stadium host cup	This is a very good place to stay.	Three sao paulo cranes cut stadium greeting.	Three sao paulo cranes cut from apos; stadium reception.
68	spike lee handle oldboy remake	Nique-nique-nique.	Pick,-nique,-nique.	Pique-nique-nique.
68	oldboy review heard	That's what the old critic heard.	The old critic heard.	The old critic heard you.
68	exclusive josh brolin talk oldboy	Josh Brolin speaks exclusively old boy.	Josh Brolin's exclusive, old boy.	Well, Josh Brolin speaks exclusively, old boy.
68	oldboy claw hammer time bloody remake	Dude, gory-spike gavel remake.	My old man, bloody hammer remake-piqueur.	My old, bloody remake gavel-spike.
68	spike lee unleashes josh brolin ra violent oldboy	Spike Lee releases Josh Brolin from prison.	Spike Lee releases violent old boy Josh Brolin.	Spike Lee releases Josh Brolin ra violent old man.
68	josh brolin oldboy role weirdest played exclusive	Josh Brolin as the weirdest, weirdest, old boy ever played exclusively.	Josh Brolin is the weirdest old boy ever, played exclusively.	The weirdest old boy Josh Brolin played exclusively.
68	movie review audacious oldboy bound	Good-natured film review, old boy bonded with daring.	This is a film review of a brave old boy with a daring bond.	You know, the movie review of a brave old boy with a daring bond.
68	monday morning critic spike lee oldboy nature plot	"On Monday morning, the reviewer highlights Lee Oldboy's ""L'apos"", an intrigue of nature."	On Monday morning, Lee Oldboy's nature intrigue was highlighted by the reviewer.	On Monday morning the reviewer highlights Lee Oldboy's epic nature intrigue.
68	spike lee oldboy cool thing orleans shot thriller	Spike, the cool old guy, Orleans, uh, he just pulled the thriller.	Spike the cool old guy Orleans shot thriller.	Spike the cool old guy orleans just shot thriller.
68	josh brolin oldboy	Old Josh Brolin.	Josh brolin, the old man.	Hey, Josh Brolin, old man.
68	spike lee oldboy review	Critical old boy Spike.	Spike the old boy criticizes.	Hey, Spike the Critical Old Boy.
68	review spike lee oldboy starring josh brolin elizabeth olsen samuel	Lee Oldboy features Josh Brolin and Elizabeth Olsen Samuel.	Feature of Lee Oldboy starring Josh Brolin and Elizabeth Olsen Samuel.	Featured Lee Oldboy starring Josh Brolin and Elizabeth Olsen Samuel.
68	oldboy pop parable early st century	Old turn-of-the-century pop dish.	This is an old pop parable from the turn of the century.	Old pop parable from the turn of the century.
68	oldboy review	Old boy critic.	It's the old boy's review.	You know, the old boy's review.
68	spike lee revenger tale oldboy dish reheated served hot hell	Spike Lee comes back to tell the tale of a warm, flat-warmed, old boy who served the apo; hot hell.	Spike Lee returns tale of old boy warmed flat served the apos; hot hell.	Spike Lee returns old boy's tale warmed flat served hot hell.
68	review josh brolin swinging spike lee oldboy land	Watch Josh Brolin swing Lee Oldboy Land Point again.	Get back to Josh Brolin swinging Lee Oldboy Land.	Look at josh brolin swinging the lee oldboy land.
68	spike lee oldboy remake stack original	"""Stack Original"" by Spike Lee Oldboy."	Spike Lee Oldboy remakes Stack Original.	Spike Lee Oldboy will remake Stack Original.
68	spike lee original three hour cut oldboy light day	Spike Lee Original Three-Hour Cut Oldboy Light Day.	Spike Lee's original three-hour cut-off of Oldboy Light Day.	Spike Lee, the original three-hour old boy light day cut.
68	oldboy movie review	An old film.	The review of D' an old film.	The review d' an old film.
68	oldboy immersion pure twistedness	Pure torsional old boy immersion.	Immersion of old boy, pure torsion.	Old boy's pure torsional immersion.
68	bd review spike lee oldboy surprisingly intact occasionally	B.B.D. reviews the occasional spike of the old boy surprisingly intact.	B.D. reviews spike the old boy surprisingly intact occasionally.	Bd spike critic old boy surprisingly intact occasionally.
68	spike lee oldboy remake find revenge	Spike Lee remakes his old boy, and he gets his revenge.	Spike Lee remake old boy to find revenge.	Spike Lee remake oldboy getting revenge.
68	spike lee hollywood young black filmmaker	This is Spike Lee Hollywood, a young black filmmaker.	Spike Lee Hollywood, young black filmmaker?	Spike Lee Hollywood, young black filmmaker.
68	spike lee version oldboy lost translation	Spike Lee version, old boy, lost translation.	Spike Lee old boy version lost translation.	Spike Lee version old boy lost translation.
68	oldboy pack plenty punch	He's so full.	The old man's packed to capacity.	Man, the old man is so full.
68	oldboy exclusive movie josh brolin watch repeatedly year	Exclusive old boy Josh Brolin watching Josh Brolin several times a year.	Exclusive old boy movie Josh Brolin, watch it several times a year.	Old boy exclusive movie Josh Brolin watch several times year.
68	oldboy screenwriter producer mark protosevich talk blasphemy honor	Mark Protosevich blasphemes the apos; honor.	The writer Mark Protosevich blasphemes l' honor.	It's an honor to meet the writer Mark Protosevich, who blasphes.
68	smoldering spike lee qa elizabeth olsen oldboy	Inflamed Lee Qa Elizabeth Olsen, the old boy.	Peaks fire Lee Qa Elizabeth Olsen, the old boy.	Flaming peaks, the old boy, Lee Qa Elizabeth Olsen.
68	oldboy spike lee vengeful respectful homage cu favorite	The old guy takes revenge, the old man takes revenge, the old man pays respectful tribute and the old man's favorite.	The old guy steals vengeance, l' respectful tribute and favorite.	Old guy steals revenge, apology, respectful homage and favorite.
68	oldboy reviewed josh brolin ravaged joe violent masterful chan	Josh Brolin's old critic ravaged Joe, who was violent and bossy Chan.	Josh Brolin's old-timey reviewer ravaged Joe, violent and bossy Chan.	Josh Brolin's old critic ravaged Joe, violent and bossy Chan.
68	oldboy review	Old boy critic.	It's the old boy's review.	You know, the old boy's review.
68	oldboy spike lee odd flawed remake	The old has a weird and imperfect remake.	Well, the old man has a weird, flawed remake.	Old man's got a weird, flawed remake.
68	sourcetv exclusive elizabeth olsen talk spike lee oldboy cast	Exclusive sourcetv Elizabeth Olsen spike talk oldboy cast.	Sourcetv exclusive Elizabeth Olsen talk spike oldboy cast.	Exclusive sourcetv Elizabeth Olsen spike talk spike oldboy cast.
68	original oldboy director park spike lee fan	Original director Park Spike Lee fan.	The original director of the film, Park Spike Lee, is a fan.	The original director Park Spike Lee fan.
68	oldboy review suffers american remake stigma	The old boy's critics are also suffering from the stigma of the American remake.	The old boy's criticism suffers from the stigma of the American-style remake.	Old boy criticism suffers from the stigma of American remake.
68	film review spike lee oldboy remake mysterious brutal	Spike Lee's movie review, old boy, mysteriously remakes brutal.	Spike Lee's film reviewer, an old boy, mysteriously remakes brutal.	Spike Lee's film review of old boy is mysteriously brutal.
68	film strip spike lee oldboy life	An old man on the cutting edge of the film.	The life of a very old man on the cutting edge of the film.	The life of an old man on the movie's edge.
68	interview oldboy screenwriter mark protosevich	Interview writer Mark Protosevich.	Interview writer Mark Protosevich.	And interview writer Mark Protosevitch.
68	fight feeling	A forward-propos, d' a forward-propos, d' a forward-propos, d' a forward-propos, d' a forward-propos, d' a forward-propos, d' a fore-propos, d' a foreword-propos, d' a foreword @-@about, d' a foreword.	It's called apos; a before-propos, d' a before-propos, d' a before-propos, d' a before-propos, d' a before-propos, d' a before-propos, d' a before-propos, d' a before-propos, d' a before.	It's a place where you can read, write, read, read, write, read, write, write, read, write, write, write, read, write, write, write, write, write, read, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, read, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write,
68	oldboy spike lee remake lack plausible motive	There is no reason to believe that the remake of Spike Lee is flawed.	The remake of Spike Lee n' has no plausible motive.	Spike Lee's remake has no plausible motive.
68	oldboy review thing spike lee remake	The old trick of the magazine, it's that; there's a remake of Lee.	The old thing of the magazine is that there is a remake of Lee.	The old thing about the magazine is that there's a remake of Lee.
68	oldboy homefront frozen movie week	Old Boy, Frozen Film Week on the Inner Front.	Old boy, the week of the movie's frozen-on-the-frontal interior.	Old boy, the week of the film frozen on the inside front.
68	trick oldboy	C&apos is a trick-pass.	C' is a trick-pass.	C' is a trick of pass-pass.
68	oldboy	Old man.	You old man.	Hey, buddy.
68	movie review oldboy fight feeling video	Film review, old boy, fighting video feeling.	Film review old boy fighting video sentiment.	Film review old boy fighting video feeling.
68	spike lee oldboy starring josh brolin	Spike Lee Oldboy, with Josh Brolin on the show.	"""Spike Lee Oldboy"" starring Josh Brolin."	Spike Lee Oldboy starring Josh Brolin.
68	spike lee oldboy grotesque incredible faithful adaptation	Spike, the grotesque old boy, is an incredible, unbelievable, faithful adaptation.	Spike the grotesque old boy incredible faithful adaptation.	Spike the grotesque old boy incredible faithful adaptation incredible.
68	oldboy movie review	An old film.	The review of D' an old film.	The review d' an old film.
68	interview spike lee shocking american audience oldboy	Interview Lee Peak shocking the American public, you old man.	Interview Lee Peak, shocking the American public, old boy.	And interview Lee Peak shocking the American public, old boy.
68	oldboy review	Old boy critic.	It's the old boy's review.	You know, the old boy's review.
68	oldboy movie review spike lee remake korean cu film	The film was rewritten by the veteran film critic Spike Lee, who remakes the film.	The old film critic Spike Lee remakes the Korean film, Corean cu film.	Old film critic Spike Lee remakes Korean film, Corean cu film.
68	oldboy review josh brolin spike lee cu classic remake add	Old critic Josh Brolin launches a classic new remake.	The old critic Josh Brolin has launched a new classic remake.	Old critic Josh Brolin launches a new classic remake of the game.
68	oldboy terrible guy	Bad old man.	Good ol' bad guy.	Hey, good old-fashioned bad guy.
68	spike lee release film	Get the leeward release film.	Get the release film downwind.	Steal release film downwind.
68	spike lee oldboy safe audience	You, old man, good crowd.	Pike,-you, old man, good crowd.	Hey, you, old man, good crowd.
68	oldboy review spiked ground	It's been a long time since the old magazine de l'apos.	The old l'apos; period magazine made a lot of money.	The old review of l' era has been a hit and run.
68	interview oldboy pom klementieff spill fighting josh brolin	Interview old pom klementieff, who's fighting with Josh Brolin.	Interview the old pom klementieff who's fighting Josh Brolin.	Interview the old pom klementieff fighting Josh Brolin.
68	film review oldboy	This is Oldboy Film Magazine.	An Oldboy film review.	Oldboy film review.
68	oldboy review spike lee uninspired retelling torture	The criticism of the old boy spike Lee without any inspiration about the torture.	Old Spike Lee's uninspired criticism of torture.	The old spike Lee boy's uninspired criticism of torture.
68	movie review oldboy remake suffers original	It's the first time I've seen a film about an old boy.	Film review remake of old boy suffers from l' original.	Film review remake of old boy suffers from l' original film.
68	oldboy movie review	An old film.	The review of D' an old film.	The review d' an old film.
68	review spike lee oldboy failed attempt	It's a good thing that the old boy didn't succeed in his attempt.	The old boy failed in his attempt to evaluate them.	The old boy failed in his attempt evaluation.
68	podcast josh brolin spike lee oldboy remake turkey day	Josh Brolin Podcast Spike Lee Oldboy Remake Turkey Day.	Podcast Josh Brolin Spike Lee Oldboy Remake Turkey Day.	Podcast Josh Brolin Spike Lee Oldboy Remake Turkey Day.
68	oldboy josh brolin star spike lee remake	Spike Lee star, old Josh Brolin, has remake.	Well, old Josh Brolin, star of Spike Lee, has remake.	Old Josh Brolin, star of Spike Lee, remakes.
68	interview josh brolin oldboy	Talk to Josh Brolin, the old man.	Interview Josh Brolin, the old man.	Well, interview Josh Brolin, old man.
68	top oldboy remake foreign film	My best friend makes foreign films all over again.	My best friend is making some foreign movies.	My best friend makes foreign movies.
68	oldboy film review	An old film.	The review of D' an old film.	The review d' an old film.
68	oldboy left	He's gone.	The old man's gone.	Well, the old man's gone.
68	oldboy apathetic violent remake	A violent, apathetic old boy remake.	Hey, you old, apathetic, violent remake boy.	Old, apathetic violent remake boy.
68	send kindle	Text him-a message.	Send him a message @-@.	Please send him-a message.
68	interview screenwriter mark protosevich oldboy	Interview writer Mark Protosevich oldboy.	I want to interview the screenwriter, Mark Protosevich oldboy.	Interviewing oldboy writer Mark Protosevich.
68	review spike lee reveals side oldboy	The old boy is revealed in Spike Lee's review.	Well, Spike Lee's review reveals the old-boy angle.	Spike Lee's review reveals the old boy side of it.
68	oldboy	Old man.	You old man.	Hey, buddy.
68	spike lee oldboy remake dead arrival	Spike Lee the old boy remakes the apos Arrival of the dead.	Spike Lee, the old boy, remakes the place of the dead.	Spike Lee old boy remakes the apos; arrival of the dead.
68	spike lee oldboy bringing thing broadway working	Spike Lee, my man brings his stuff, works on Broadway.	Spike Lee, my man, who brings his stuff, works on Broadway.	Hey, Spike Lee, old man, brings his stuff, works on Broadway.
68	spike lee boy remake lack original edge	Spike Lee Boy's remake lacks originality.	Spike Lee Boy's remake lacks a sense of originality.	Spike Lee Boy's remake album lacks originality.
68	classic south korean revenge thriller american reboot	A South classic-Korean thriller American reboot.	A classic South-Korean however thriller American reboot American.	A classic South-Korean thriller reboot American reboot.
68	shar copley talk oldboy darkest role	Shar copley, talking old, dark boy role.	Shar copley talking old, dark boy role.	Shar copley talk about old boy.
68	oldboy movie review spike lee orleans shot shock thriller	The old film critic shot Lee Orleans with a shocking thriller.	Well, the old movie critic shot Lee Orleans with a shock thriller.	The old movie critic shot lee orleans with a thriller.
68	oldboy performance top underfe	Old and old under-fife of high level performance.	Old under-fifre of high performance.	Old under-high performance fifer.
68	spike lee talk oldboy remake changing original comic book movie	Spike Lee talk, my old man, is remaking a very original cartoon film.	Spike Lee talk, my man, remakes original comic strip.	Spike Lee talk, old man, remakes original comic book footage.
68	oldboy remake	Old boy's remake.	Remake the old boy.	Hey, old boy's remake.
68	oldboy review cu fan find spike lee latest	Old boy, he's a critic when a fan finds Spike Lee last.	Old boy's a critic when a fan finds Spike Lee last.	Old boy critical when fan finds Spike Lee last.
68	josh brolin road fresh goonie oldboy	Josh Brolin Road &why; Josh Brolin Road &why.	What; Josh Brolin Road; and Josh Brolin Road.	It is also important to note that there is no single source of funding for this program.
68	spike lee oldboy remake echo superior original	Spike the old boy remakes the apos; echo top original.	Spike the old boy remakes I' original upper echo.	Spike the old boy remakes l' echo superior original.
68	blood improves redeem oldboy	The old boy redeems himself with blood.	Well, blood makes the old boy better.	The blood improves the old boy redeemed.
68	interview screenwriter mark protosevich bringing oldboy screen	It's a great way to get a sense of what it's all about; it's a good thing.	The writer d' interview Mark Protosevich brings the apos; screen to the old one.	The writer d'apos; interview Mark Protosevich brings the screen to the old.
68	oldboy man seek answer revenge	He's looking for revenge.	Old man's looking for revenge.	The old man wants revenge.
68	asian film remake wrong	It's a bad Asian movie.	One Asian movie hurts again.	Asian film hurts again.
68	oldboy review roundup spike lee remake mixed review	Spike lee's old synthesis report on the game remakes mixed criticism.	Spike lee's old review remakes mixed criticism.	The old spike lee synthesis report remakes the mixed criticism.
68	movie review oldboy star	I'm a film editor, old boy star.	Film magazine old boy star.	Famous old-boy movie magazine.
68	josh brolin call spike lee collaboration	Josh Brolin calls Spike Lee to collaborate.	Josh Brolin calls Spike Lee to collaborate.	Josh Brolin, call Spike Lee to collaborate.
68	oldboy screenwriter add twist korean horror classic	The writer has added a Korean classic of l' horror.	Writer added a Korean classic of l' horror.	The screenwriter added a classic Korean l' horror.
68	review spike lee riff oldboy remake	Spike Lee Riff magazine editors.	From the Spike Lee Riff Review.	"""Spike Lee Riff"" magazine."
68	spike lee oldboy safe audience	You, old man, good crowd.	Pike,-you, old man, good crowd.	Hey, you, old man, good crowd.
68	review oldboy	Work on the old man.	To revise the old man.	You know, overhaul the old man.
68	oldboy remake spike lee mess brilliant movie	Well, old boy remakes Spike Lee Mess brilliant movie.	Old boy remakes Spike Lee Mess brilliant film.	Old boy, remake Spike Lee Mess brilliant film.
68	oldboy review spike lee remake modern classic	The old magazine of the epoch, Spike Lee, is a remake of the old classic.	The old epochs, Spike Lee, a classic modern remake.	Old review of the epoch, Spike Lee, classic modern remake.
68	video josh brolin mark protosevich oldboy	Video footage from Josh Brolin Mark Protosevich, old boy.	Video Josh Brolin Mark Protosevich old boy.	Josh Brolin Mark Protosevich video old boy.
68	spike lee teach oldboy trick american remake	Spike Lee is a teacher of the old American remake.	Well, Spike Lee teaches the old American remake thing.	Spike Lee teaches old American remake stuff.
68	elizabeth olsen love spike lee wall fame video	Elizabeth Olsen loves the Lee Pike Wall video.	Elizabeth Olsen loves this video of Lee Pike's famous wall.	Elizabeth Olsen loves the video on the famous wall Lee Pike.
68	spike lee oldboy add original thriller	Spike Lee Oldboy adds a very original thriller.	Spike Lee Oldboy adds original thriller.	Spike Lee Oldboy add an original thriller.
68	remake film oldboy receives criticism	Remake movie, old boy, is getting a lot of reviews.	Remake old-boy movie gets bad reviews.	Remake old boy film is getting reviews.
68	box office analysis review oldboy defau spike lee worst film	Analyses from the @-@office box review Lee's classic worst movie spike.	Analyses from the @-@office box review the good old spike defau of Lee's worst film.	The analysis of the box @-@office reviews the old spike defau of the worst film of Lee.
68	young olsen oldboy	Young and old Olsen.	The young and the old Olsen.	Old and young Olsen.
68	oldboy add twist korean horror classic	Old boy add Korean classic twist horror Korean classic horror.	Old boy add Korean classic horror classic twist classic horror.	Old boy add twist Korean classic horror classic horror horror.
68	review oldboy fight feeling	Revisiting feelings of veterans.	Revisiting veterans' feelings.	To review the feelings of veterans.
68	oldboy reviewed spike lee thriller audience guessing	The old man commented on Spike Lee thriller as he guessed the audience, right?	The old man commented on Spike Lee thriller, guessing the audience.	Old man commented on Spike Lee thriller guessing the audience.
68	oldhat spike lee utterly unnecessary oldboy	Pointy old Lee absolutely useless old boy.	Old thing at a time Lee absolutely useless old boy.	Old thing at a time like this, Lee, absolutely useless old man.
68	oldboy	Old man.	You old man.	Hey, buddy.
68	spike lee elizabeth olsen mark protosevich discus oldboy	Elisabeth Olsen has made the protosevich record, old boy.	Elisabeth Olsen made the protosevich record, old boy.	Elisabeth Olsen marked the protosevich record, old boy.
68	spike lee studio edited shot hammer scene oldboy	Spike Lee gavel-edited studio-piqueur scene old boy.	Spike Lee studio edited hammer-piqueur scene old boy.	Spike Lee studio edited hammer-piqueur scene old boy.
68	spike lee oldboy offer review	Spike the old boy from the exam.	Spike the old boy from l' exam.	Spike, the old boy from L'apos.
68	elizabeth olsen love shocking people oldboy wait play	Oh, Elizabeth Olsen loves to shock people.	Elizabeth Olsen loves to shock.	Elizabeth Olsen likes to shock people a lot.
68	oldboy remake patch hole	Looks like the old man did the patch hole.	The old man's done the patch hole.	The old man did the patch hole again.
69	ten player file class action suit nhl concussion	Ten players sued collectively for concussion.	Ten players have filed a class action suit against a concussion.	Ten players filed a class action suit against a concussion.
69	concussion lawsuit nhl hit devil	Concussion charges against the devil.	Prosecution for concussion with the devil.	Concussion lawsuit against the devil.
69	ten nhl player file suit lack concussion	Ten-nhl bruise-free player file.	Ten nhl player file, no concussion.	File of 10 nhl player with no concussion.
69	player sue nhl concussion	He's being sued for concussion.	And the player is being sued for concussion.	The player was charged with concussion.
69	letter nhlers concussion lawsuit reminder hockey fighting	The letters and the concussions, they all remind me of hockey fights.	Well, the letters and concussions are reminiscent of hockey fights.	The letters and concussions are hockey wrestling.
69	report nhl player sue league concussion	Player is suing the league for concussion.	The player sues the league for a severe concussion.	The player sues the league for concussion.
69	hockey league sued player concussion injury	The National Hockey League has filed a lawsuit against a player who suffered a concussion.	The Hockey League filed a lawsuit against a player who suffered a concussion last week.	The hockey league sued a player who suffered a concussion.
69	hockey player sue nhl concussion	He's suing Nhl for concussion.	The hockey player is now suing Nhl for concussion.	The hockey player sues Nhl for concussion.
69	nhl facing concussion lawsuit	Nhl facing trial for concussion.	Nhl facing a concussion lawsuit?	Nhl facing concussion lawsuit.
69	concussion center nhl fray	Concussion Center nhl Fray.	Concussion center nhl Fray.	Uh, concussion center nhl Fray.
69	nhl player file class action lawsuit concussion injury	The player takes a class action against the injury to the neck caused by the head injury.	The player brought a class action against the head injury to the neck.	Player initiates class action against head injury to the neck.
69	willes playing hurt led head injury	Head injuries from gambling wills.	Head injuries from wills playing the game.	Wills head injuries while playing games.
69	nhl sued player head injury	Nhl has been suing the player for head injuries.	So Nhl sued the player for head injuries.	Nhl sued the player for head injury.
69	player sue nhl league concussion	Player pursues concussion league.	The player is still in pursuit of the concussion league.	The player sues concussion league.
69	top shelf concussion suit face uphill battle nhl	The top of the apos, the concussion suit, faces a height battle.	The top of the concussion suit shelf faces a height battle.	The top shelf of the concussion suit faces a battle in height.
69	response concussion lawsuit nhl denial	Legal action for concussion, nh refusal.	Legal reaction for concussion n' refused.	Legal reaction for concussion nhl refused.
69	nhl player suing league protect	The game is played by a player who is in pursuit of the Protective League.	The nhl player chasing after the league of protection.	The nhl player suing the Protective League?
69	sport concussion fear spread pro hockey player court	Fear of sports clashes is widespread on the field of professional hockey players.	Fear of sports clashes is widespread among professional hockey players.	The fear of sports clashes is widespread among professional hockey players.
69	jeremy roenick flyer speaks nhl lawsuit concussion	Jeremy Roenick flyer is talking about the trial commotion lawsuit.	Jeremy Roenick flyer talks about concussion trials.	Jeremy Roenick flyer speaks nhl trial commotion.
69	nhl concussion lawsuit league responds defend case vigorously	The Concussion Litigation League is responding vigorously to the defense's arguments in this case.	Well, the league of concussion trials is responding vigorously to the defense arguments.	The concussion trials league responds vigorously to the defense arguments.
69	paid nhl mu billion dollar canadian tv deal enriches	A $1-billion Canadian television deal, nh paid, will enrich the market.	A $1 billion Canadian television transaction enriches the market.	A $1 billion Canadian television transaction nhl paid enriches the market.
69	nfl concussion case offer clue hockey lawsuit	The case of a concussion... provides an indication of a hockey lawsuit.	Well, the concussion case provides a hint of a hockey trial.	The concussion case is a hockey trial clue.
69	ten nhl player sue league concussion	Ten players attacking concussion league.	Ten players attacking the concussion league.	And ten players are attacking the concussion league.
69	nhl player sue league concussion	Player pursues concussion league.	And the player is suing the concussion league.	The player pursues concussion league.
69	retired player sue nhl head injury	The retired player's suing his head injury.	The retired player is now suing the court for his head injury.	The retired player sues his head injury.
69	player sue nhl concussion	He's being sued for concussion.	And the player is being sued for concussion.	The player was charged with concussion.
69	nhl player sue league concussion	Player pursues concussion league.	And the player is suing the concussion league.	The player pursues concussion league.
69	nhl sued player concussion	Nhl has been suing the player for concussion.	So Nhl sued the player for concussion.	Nhl sued the player for concussion last week.
69	nhl concussion lawsuit lead settlement player	This case was filed in the U.S. at the time of the hearing.	Nhl lawsuit for concussion main settlement player of the case.	Nhl concussion lawsuit main settlement player of the case.
69	nhlers sue league concussion	Nhlers sues for concussion.	Nhlers is suing the league for concussion.	Nhlers is suing the league for concussion charges.
69	hockey player sue nhl concussion damage	Hockey player sued for concussion.	The hockey player is suing for concussion.	The hockey player sued for concussion.
69	player sue nhl head injury liability	Player continues to be responsible in the event of a head injury.	The player will continue to be responsible for any head injury.	The player continues to be responsible for head injuries.
69	nhl concussion lawsuit player claiming	L' author of apos; a concussion trial claims that he is a gambler.	L' author of apos; a concussion trial claims to be a player.	L' author of a concussion lawsuit claims to be player.
69	nhl hit concussion lawsuit player	Nhl punched the man in the face at the trial for concussion.	Well, Nhl punched the player at the concussion trial.	Nhl hit the player at the concussion trial.
69	nhl issue statement concussion suit	In case of concussion.	Nhl in case of concussion.	Uh, nhl in case of concussion.
69	nhl player ready league task concussion lawsuit	Player is willing to face a concussion lawsuit.	The player is now ready to face a concussion suit.	The player is ready to face a concussion lawsuit in the first place.
69	nhl face lawsuit concussion	It could cause a concussion.	He's at risk for a concussion.	He could have a concussion or something.
70	google map ireland entire public transport system	Google map all public transportation system of Ireland.	Search map of the whole public transport system of Ireland.	Google Map of the entire public transport system of Ireland.
70	google add street view imagery airport transit station	Google adds images of the street as seen from the nearby airport transit station.	Google add pictures of the street seen from the airport transit station.	Google add street images seen from airport transit station.
70	google street view updated include airport train station	The updated view of Google Street includes the Airport Station.	The view of the updated Google street includes the airport station.	The updated Google street view includes the airport station.
70	google street view update help find airport	Google Street View Updated to help you find your airport.	Updated view Google Street Help to find airport.	Google Street View updated help find the airport.
70	google street view add panoramic peek airport train station subway	View on Google Street add a panoramic overview of the metro station of the airport.	View on Google Street add a panoramic view of the metro station of the airport.	Google Street view add a panoramic view of the station de l&apos subway.
70	google launch public transport mapping ireland	Google launches Mapping Public Transport in Ireland.	Google maps public transport in Ireland.	Google launches public transport mapping in Ireland.
70	google street view offer view canada park web	Google Street Canada's Parks Web site provides a panoramic view.	Google Street Panoramic view on the Canada Park website.	Google Street Panoramic view on the Canada park web site.
70	plan mad dash airport google street view	The hotel is located in the heart of the city.	Plan the airport; crazy google street view on the street.	Plan airport crazy google street view on the street.
70	google add airport street view	Google also adds the view of the airport on the street.	Google adds the view of the airport on the street.	Google adds the airport view on the street.
70	google map help find airport check desk	Google map helps you to find the office of the airport; registration of the airport.	Google map will help you to find the desktop of the airport.	Google map helps you find the airport map office.
70	google launch street view transport hub	Google now launches the Streetview Transportation Center.	Google launches the streetview transportation center.	Google launches the transport center of the street view.
70	google street view add subway airport train station mix	Google Street View Adds metro station train mix from the airport.	Google Street View add metro station train mix of airport&apos.	Google Street View add metro train station mix airport.
70	london train station google street view	View of the Google Street London station.	London Train Station on Google Street.	London Train Station, view of the Google Street.
70	google add airport train street view	The hotel is located in the heart of the city.	Google add the view of the street from the airport train.	Google add the view on the train street of the airport.
70	google map includes airport railway station image	Google Map includes the apos; image of the station of the airport.	Google map includes the map; image of the station of the airport.	Google map includes the airport station image.
70	neurotic traveler holiday gift google street view	Google Street Viewed on Google Street.	Neurotic traveler Google Street Viewed on Google Street.	Traveller neurotic gift of holiday Google Street View on Google Street.
70	google map airport train subway station street view update	Google Map Airport Airport updates the view of the Street metro station.	Google Map Airport updates the view of Street metro station.	Google Map Airport updates the view of the metro station Street.
70	google add airport train station street view	The hotel is located in the heart of the city.	Google add the view to the street from the airport station.	Google add the street view of the station of the airport.
70	google street view expands airport train station	The view of the Rue Google will enlarge the station of the airport.	The sight of Google street enlarges the airport station.	The Google street view enlarges the station of the airport.
70	google street view inside airport train station	View on Google Street at the interior of Apos station; airport.	View on Google Street at the inside of Apos Station; Airport.	View of the interior of the train station at the airport.
70	google map airport train station street view update	Google map of the station's train station; airport update of the station's street view.	Google map of the train station of l' airport update of the street view of the railway station.	Google train station map of the airport update of the station street view.
70	google brings street view inside airport train station call	Google offers a view of the street at l' Inner l' Call from L&apos Station; Airport.	Google offers a view of the street to l' interior of l' call of the station of l' airport.	Google offers a street view to the interior of l' call from the station of l' airport.
70	google park canada panoramic park view online	Panoramic view of the park's google park canada park online.	Panoramic view of google park canada park, online.	Panoramic view of google park canada online.
70	time thanksgiving travel google add airport train station street	Thanksgiving Time Google Travel add rue de l&apos station; airport.	The time of Thanksgiving Travel Google add the street of the station of the airport.	Thanksgiving time Google Travel add train station street from the airport.
70	google map transit live ireland	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Google Map live transit ireland.	Google map live ireland transit.
70	google street view gatwick airport main train station map	View on Gatwick Plan of the Central Station of the airport.	Google Street View on Gatwick map of the Central Station Airport.	Google Street Gatwick view map of the main station of the airport.
70	google street view inside airport train station	View on Google Street at the interior of Apos station; airport.	View on Google Street at the inside of Apos Station; Airport.	View of the interior of the train station at the airport.
70	google map launch airport railway station feature	Google Map launches the Station de l' Airport feature.	Google Map launches the function of the airport station.	Google Map launches the train station feature at the airport.
70	street view helping prepare passenger journey	Sightseeing helps prepare passengers for their journey.	View of the street helping to prepare for the journey of the passengers.	Street view helping prepare passengers for their journey.
70	google street view inside airport	View on Google Street at the airport, at the interiors of the airport.	View on Google Street at the airport.	Google Street view at the interiors of the airport.
70	thing missed google street view	Something missed the Google Street view.	Something missed the view of the Google Street.	Something missed the view of google street.
70	ireland public transport schedule included google map	The Public Transport itinerary in Ireland included a Google Map.	L' route of public transport in Ireland included a map Google Map.	Ireland's public transport route included a Google Map.
70	google street view inside airport	View on Google Street at the airport, at the interiors of the airport.	View on Google Street at the airport.	Google Street view at the interiors of the airport.
70	google street view inside airport train station	View on Google Street at the interior of Apos station; airport.	View on Google Street at the inside of Apos Station; Airport.	View of the interior of the train station at the airport.
70	walk saskatchewan trail park armchair google	Google chair in Saskatchewan Park.	Walk in Saskatchewan Park, google chair.	Park walk in Saskatchewan, google chair.
70	google add street view airport train station	Google also offers a view of the street, from the station to the airport.	Google adds a view on the street, the airport station.	Google adds street view to the station of the airport.
70	google street view inside airport train station	View on Google Street at the interior of Apos station; airport.	View on Google Street at the inside of Apos Station; Airport.	View of the interior of the train station at the airport.
70	google street view indoors airport train station	View on Google Street at the inside of Apos Station; Airport.	View on Google Street, at the interiors of the airport terminal building.	View of the interior of the train station at the airport.
70	google street view transit inside airport train station subway	Google street to see the public transport to the interior of the metro station of the airport.	Google street see public transport to the interior of the metro station of the airport.	Google street see public transportation to the interior of the airport subway station.
70	google earth street view interactive map mapping global transit	Google Earth Interactive Map Mapping Global Public Transit.	Interactive map of Google Earth Street to help you map global public transit.	An interactive map of Google Earth Street mapping global public transit.
70	google street view land airport	The hotel is located in the heart of the city.	Google Street has a view of the airport.	Google Street view on the airport land.
70	google street view travel easier mapping airport train station	Google street view Travel is much easier to map the station of the airport.	Google street view Easier to map airport station.	Google street view Travel easier to map airport station.
70	google add airport train station street view	The hotel is located in the heart of the city.	Google add the view to the street from the airport station.	Google add the street view of the station of the airport.
70	google includes airport train station street view map	Google includes a view of the rue de l&apos railway station; Airport.	Google includes a view of the street from the train station.	Google includes the map of the view on the street of the train station of the airport.
70	google street view inside london train station	View of the interior of London Station on Google Street.	View on Google Street at l' interior of London station.	Google Street view at the interiors of London Station.
71	sexual remorse men woman	Sexual remorse, men, women.	Gender-based sexual remorse.	I have sexual remorse for women.
71	sex evolutionary reason regret hookup	Evolutionary Reason of Sex regretting the fact of sleeping with someone.	It's just that it's not a good idea to have sex with someone.	The evolutionary reason of sex regretting the fact of having slept with someone.
71	sex woman regret men study	Men miss studying men's studies.	Sex woman regrets men studying man studies.	Sex woman regrets that men study man studies.
71	men woman regret regard sex study	It is also a good place to learn about sexuality and sexuality.	Men women regret sex study.	Women men regret the study of sex.
71	study woman regret sexual encounter men regret	Studying women makes you wish you had sex with them.	You know, studying women regrets intercourse.	Studying women only makes you regret sexual intercourse.
71	men feel night stand opportunity conceive casual sex	Men get the impression they're having sex, get the chance to sleep at night.	Men have the impression of having sex; opportunity to sleep at night.	The men have the impression of having the opportunity to sleep at night.
71	regret sex depend gender	Sex, unfortunately, depends on sex.	Well, unfortunately, sex depends on sex.	Unfortunately, sex depends on sex.
71	men woman regret sex study	Men and women all miss the sex study.	It's just that men and women don't like sex studies.	Women men miss sex studies.
71	woman regret sex men study	Women miss the sex the men's been studying.	Women miss sex that men study.	Women miss the sex men study.
71	sexual regret men woman differ greatly	Men's sexual regrets are very different for women than for men.	Men's sexual regrets are quite different in women.	The sexual regrets of men are very different in women.
71	walk shame depends	Shameful walking is all about walking.	Shame walk depends on the walk.	Walking shame depends on walking.
71	study examines potential evolutionary role sexual regret human	The study examines the possible evolutionary role of sexual regret in the development of sexuality in men.	This study examines the potential evolutionary role of sexual regret in men.	The study examines the potential evolutionary role of sexual regret in men.
71	view sexy time	Sexy weather.	To see the sexy weather.	See sexy weather.
71	study woman regret casual sex men regret	It's just a matter of time before you know what you're doing.	Women don't like casual sex Studies Men don't like casual sex.	A woman regrets casual sex Men regret casual sex.
71	men regret moving slowly sexually	Men always wish they didn't move slowly sexually.	Men regret moving around sexually slowly.	Men regret moving slowly sexually.
71	men top sexual regret extremely woman	Men of the highest caliber regret sexually extremely female.	High-end men regret sexually extremely woman.	Top-of-the-range men regret extremely female sexually.
71	sexual regret changed men woman overtime study find	Sexual regret has changed men's study of overtime hours to find men.	Sexual regret changed men's overtime study to find men.	Sexual regret changed men women overtime study find men.
71	men woman sexual regret	Men and women regret their sexuality, you know.	Men women regret their sexuality.	Women men regret their sexuality.
71	study reveals gender difference sexual regret	The study found that there was a gender-based difference in reported sexual regrets.	L' study reveals a gender difference in the sexual regret.	The study reveals gender differences in sexual regret.
71	woman hard wired regret casual fling men regret	Wishful thinking.	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	I'm a wired woman, I'm sorry.
71	woman top sexual regret explained	I think the female sexual regret upstairs has been explained.	Explained the female sexual regret at the top.	Female sexual regret upstairs was explained.
71	sexual regret byproduct evolution	Sexual regret is just a sub-product of l' evolution.	Sex regret is a sub-product of l' evolution.	The sexual regret is a sub-product of l' evolution.
71	men woman regret sex study	Men and women all miss the sex study.	It's just that men and women don't like sex studies.	Women men miss sex studies.
71	study find men woman regret sex	Research shows that women's men miss sex.	The study shows that men miss sex.	L'apos; study reveals that men women regret sex.
71	men woman regret sex study suggests	It is also important to note that women's participation in the labour market is limited.	Men and women all regret the apos; sex study suggests.	Women's men regret sex; sex study suggests.
71	great gender divide sexual regret woman casual sex men	There is also a large gap between the sexes that is missed by women and occasional sex by men.	Large gap between the sexes regretted sex sex woman sex casual sex men.	Great gender gap regretted sex sex woman sex casual sex men.
71	sexual regret reproduction human	Human sexual reproduction is something I regret.	Well, I regret human sexual reproduction.	I regret human sexual reproduction.
71	lost virginity wrong person sexual regret differ gender	Loss of virginity bad person... sexual regret different sex.	Loss of virginity wrong person regrets sexual difference.	Lost virginity wrong person sexual regret sex difference.
71	men regret moving slowly sexually woman moving fast	It is also important to note that women's sexuality is not the same as men's sexuality.	Men regret to have slowly moved women sexually moving fast.	Men regret slowly displacing women moving fast sexually.
71	college men woman express sexual regret cave people	The women of the university express their sexual regrets to the men of the caves.	University women express sexual regrets to cavemen.	Women in the university express sexual regret to cavemen.
71	men woman regret sex	Men miss sex.	Male women don't like sex.	Women men regret sex.
72	homicide detective movember man	Movember man, detective.	Detective movember man.	Hey, detective movember man.
72	pm jealous movember moustache	I'm just jealous that I have a moving moustache.	I'm jealous that I've got a moving mustache.	I'm jealous of my mustache moving.
72	pm banditos jibe mike fabricant brings movember pmqs	The jibe mike banditos pm manufacturer brings more mobile pmqs.	The manufacturer of jibe mike pm banditos brings mobile pmqs.	The manufacturer of pm banditos jibe mike brings more mobile pmqs.
72	newsroom enters moustache stretch drive	The writing room falls into the field of stretching the mustache.	The newsroom goes into the field, stretching the mustache.	The newsroom enters the photo field; mustache stretch.
72	town player bit tackle prostate cancer	City gambler attacks prostate cancer.	The player of the city s&apos attacks prostate cancer.	City player s' attacks prostate cancer.
72	man hotel movember	I'm sorry I'm late.	Movember man hotel.	Man hotel movember.
72	mo money raise	Money.	I want to raise money.	Mo raise money.
72	movember raise money prostate cancer awareness	Movember raises funds to raise awareness of the importance of prostate cancer.	Movember raises funds for prostate cancer awareness.	Movember raises prostate cancer awareness funds.
72	check	I'm sorry, I'm the same way you are, and I'm the same way you are, and I'm the same way that I'm the same way.	I'm an idiot, I'm an idiot, and I'm an idiot, and I'm a traitor, and I'm a traitchchchchchchchuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccuccino	I'm an idiot, I'm an idiot, and I'm an idiot, and I'm an idiot, and I'm an asshole, and I'm a bachelor, and I'm a bachelor, and I'm a bachelor.
72	movember racist	Emotional racist.	Racist, moving.	Well, that's a moving racist.
72	calling movember moustache	Call it a mobile mustache.	Let's call it a mobile moustache.	Well, let's call it a movable mustache.
72	furness mp lose movember tache live tv	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Mp furniture lose movember spot live tv.	The furniture mp lose movember spot live tv.
72	men choosing movember moustache	Men choose moustaches in motion.	Men choose mustaches in motion.	The men choose the mustache in motion.
72	movember rule	Movement rules.	Movement rule.	The rule of motion.
72	lancashire college grows mo movember	Lancashire University becomes more mobile.	L' University of Lancashire became more mobile.	The University of Lancashire is located in Lancashire, France.
72	movember moustache fashion	Moving mustache, mustache mode.	Mustache on the move, mustache mode.	Moustache on the move, Moustache on the move.
72	movember prime minister reveals moustache growing shortcoming	The Prime Minister on the move has revealed that his mustache is becoming more and more deficient.	Moving Prime Minister reveals that the mustache is becoming more and more deficient.	The prime minister on the move reveals that the mustache is becoming more and more deficient.
72	bo news mo bros bring money movember	Bo new brothers bring faster money.	New brothers bring money; money quicker.	New brothers bring money faster.
72	sixth year movember close weekend	Grade 6 closing weekend-end.	On the weekend-the sixth year's closing day.	The sixth year closing weekend-end.
72	uk cameron frustrated missing moustache	Nasty cameron missing mustache.	Uk frustrated cameron missing mustache.	Uk cameron frustrated missing mustache.
72	column novembeard stand prostate testicular cancer	Column novembeard is a stand for testicular prostate cancer.	Column novembeard stand testicular cancer of the prostate.	Colonne novembeard stand prostate testicular cancer.
72	supporting movember pmqs	Support mobile pmqs.	To support mobile pmqs.	To support the use of mobile pmqs.
72	freeman prostate cancer	Prostate cancer, freeman.	Prostate cancer freeman.	Uh, prostate cancer freeman.
72	video movember	Movember video.	Movember video.	This is a movember video.
72	warm trendy lady love men keeping	Grown-up women like a man who guards that.	Oh, hipsters love a man who keeps it.	Trendy women love men who keep that.
72	team ken mo raising fund movember	Team Ken raised money.	L' Ken team raised money.	L' Ken team has raised funds.
72	mo ready	Ready for surgery.	We're ready for the operation now.	We're ready for surgery.
72	hea check sixth man	Check sixth man.	Hey, check out sixth man.	Hey check sixth man.
72	nah msayin	Nahsayin.	Nah msayin.	Oh, nah msayin.
72	hairy movember champion	Hairy mogul champion.	Hairy mocco champion.	Champion of the hairy mogmber.
72	movember fundraiser ready hair	Hair-ready animated fundraiser; job.	An animated fundraiser with hair clips ready for use.	Anime hair fundraiser ready for use.
72	movember raise awareness cancer men	Movember educates men with cancer.	Movember raise awareness among cancerous men.	Movember sensitize cancer men men.
72	movember mo	M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M.	Mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo bre.	Mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo mo bre.
72	baseball program movember	The basic-ball moves faster.	The basic-ball program is moving faster.	Basic-ball program moves faster.
72	mo growing fundraising going	Increased fundraising.	L' increase in fundraising.	L' increase fundraising efforts.
72	movember cracked	The crystal ball is cracked.	The crystal ball s&apos, cracked.	And the crystal ball s&apos is cracked.
72	david cameron lament grow full moustache	David Cameron's lamenting habit grows to full mustache.	David Cameron's lament grows out to full mustache.	David Cameron's lament has a full mustache.
72	checked prostate cancer	J' Checked out the cancer of the prostate.	J&apos, I checked prostate cancer.	J' checked prostate cancer.
72	movember send watford observer fantashtic photo	Movember send watford fantashtic viewer photo fantashtic.	Movember send watford observer watford fantashtic photo fantashtic.	Movember send watford observer fantashtic photo fantashtic.
72	student bit movember	Just a little more moving.	You know, studying a little more moving.	Studying a bit more moving.
72	williams gleeson raise money prostate cancer uk movember	William Gleeson raising funds for uk movember prostate cancer.	William Gleeson raises funds for prostate cancer uk movember.	William Gleeson raise money for prostate cancer uk movember.
72	police department creative season	This is Creative Season Police Service.	Creative season police service.	You know, creative season police service.
73	love hormone oxytocin remedy infidelity	Love, oocytocin, cures the apo; infidelity.	L'apos; l'apos hormone; love, l'apos; oxytocin, cures the apos; infidelity.	Apos, love hormone, oocytocin, cures apos; infidelity.
73	hormone reward monogamy	Hormone rewards monogamy.	Hormone is a reward for monogamy.	L' hormone rewards monogamy.
73	oxytocin monogamy hormone	Ocytocin monogamous hemorrhage.	Hormone monogamous of the apos; oxytocin.	Monogamous hormone of the apos; oxytocin.
73	oxytocin drive monogamy relationship study find	Study of monogamous relationships under effect of oocytocin.	Study of monogamous relationships under the effects of oxytocin.	Monogamous relationship studies under the effects of apos; oxytocin.
73	dousing men oxytocin allegedly allows faithful penis	It is important to note that this is not the case in the United States, but the United States.	The administration of oxytocin to men would also help to achieve a faithful penis.	A faithful penis could be obtained by administering ocytocin to men.
73	cuddling drug	Cuddling drug.	Hug drugs.	The cuddling drug!
73	love hormone work magic	Love works magic.	L' l&apos hormone; love magic.	Lapos; hormone of the apos; love works magic on you.
73	love hormone breed monogamy	Love begets monogamy.	The apo-hormoid love begets monogamy.	L'apos; hormone of l'apos; love breeds monogamy.
73	faithfulness hormone linked monogamy cheating	The fidelity hormone has been linked to monogamy and cheating.	The fidelity hormone linked cheating to monogamy.	Loyalty hormone linked monogamy to cheating.
73	oxytocin promotes monogamy dubbed love hormone study	Oxytocin promotes monogamy, which is also known as the study of apos; dapos hormone; love.	Ocytocin promotes monogamy, known as the Dapos study, love hormone.	The apos; oxytocin promotes monogamy, known as the study of apos; dapos hormone; love.
73	love hormone lead monogamy	L' lead hormone; monogamous lead love.	Lapos; lead hormone; lead monogamy love, lead.	L' hormone of l' lead monogamy love.
73	oxytocin stren hen monogamy men	Oxytocin reinforces male monogamy.	Oxytocin enhances monogamy in men.	L' oxytocin reinforces monogamy in men.
73	study light love hormone	It's a great way to learn about life.	Study the apos; hormone of the apos; light love.	To study the apos; hormone of the apos; light love.
73	oxytocin hormone released brain bond couple	L' oxytocin hormone, released the brain-linking couple.	L' oxytocin hormone has released the brain binding couple.	L' oxytocin hormone released brain binding couple.
73	hormone men high girlfriend	A man with high-risk, high-risk, high-risk hormones.	Hormones high girlfriend.	Man of high girlfriend hormones.
73	oxytocin key monogamy study find	It's a good way to learn more about how to make a difference.	Study of key monogamy of the apos; ocytocin find.	Key monogamy study of the ocytocin find.
73	love hormone oxytocin linked monogamy men faithful	L' D&apos hormone; love oxytocin bound monogamous faithful men.	L' d&apos hormone; love oxytocin bound monogamy faithful men.	Hormone; love oxytocin linked monogamy faithful men.
73	hormone monogamous relationship	Monogamous relationships.	Monogamous hormonal relations.	Hormonal monogamous relationships.
73	oxytocin fidelity hormone researcher	I'm a hormone-fidelity researcher.	Hormone researcher, fidelity to apos; oxytocin.	Hormone researcher fidelity to apos; oxytocin.
73	love hormone couple close	Couple d'apos; hormones; love.	Couple d'apos hormones d'apos; close love.	Couple d'apos; hormones d'apos; close love.
73	cuddle hormone oxytocin hold secret beautiful	Cuddling hormone, oxytocin, hides a magnificent secret.	L'apos, hormone of the hug, l'apos; oxytocin, hides a magnificent secret.	Cuddle hormone, oocytocin, hides a beautiful secret.
73	oxytocin lead monogamy	Ocytocin-lead monogamy.	Ocytocin lead monogamy.	Ocytocin lead monogamy.
73	love hormone oxytocin strong driving factor monogamy attraction	Lapos; lapos hormone; love, ocytocin, is a powerful motivator of monogamy.	Love, oocytocin, is a powerful factor in the attraction of monogamy.	Epos; love hormone, oocytocin, is a powerful factor in the attraction of monogamy.
73	oxytocin men attracted partner	Men on oxytocin, they attract their partners.	Men on oxytocin attract partners.	Partners are attracted to men on oxytocin.
73	oxytocin love	Love for the apos; oxytocin.	For love of the apo; oocytocin.	For love of oxytocin.
73	oxytocin lead monogamy	Ocytocin-lead monogamy.	Ocytocin lead monogamy.	Ocytocin lead monogamy.
73	chemistry love oxytocin drive monogamy relationship	Chemistry loves oxytocin, which leads to a monogamous relationship.	Chemistry likes the apos; oxytocin, which leads to a monogamous relationship.	Chemistry is about the apos; it's about oxytocin, which leads to a monogamous relationship.
74	prime suspect death kansa mother three child arrested	The main suspect is the Kansa mother, three kids arrested.	The prime suspect is the Kansa mother, three children arrested.	The prime suspect is the Kansa mother, three arrested children.
74	kansa man arrested connection quadruple homicide parson	Kansa Man has arrested the four-time pastor of the Apostolic Church.	Kansa Man has arrested the quadruple pastor of the apos; homicide.	Kansa Man arrested the apostle's quadruple pastor; homicide.
74	suspect sought death kansa mother child update	Suspect looked for kansa mother-child death update.	Suspect has been looking for the death kansa mother child updated.	Suspect has sought death kansa mother child updated.
74	body mom kid discovered	Found by the mother of the child.	Discovered by the child's mother.	This was discovered by the mother of the child.
74	man arrested slaying kansa mother child	She is the daughter of a woman who was killed in a car accident.	A man arrested the killer of the Dapos child; a mother kansa.	A man arrested the apo's killer; dapos child; mother kansa.
74	update suspect parson murder arrested	We have an update on the suspected murder of the arrested pastor.	Update on the arrested pastor's murder suspect.	Suspected priest's murder update arrested.
74	employer describes victim respected	It is also important to remember that the victim is not a victim.	The employer describes the victim as being respected.	The employer describes the victim as respected.
74	manhunt underway mother three child dead kansa	This is the first time in the world that a child has been hunted.	Hunting at apo; man in class mother three dead children kansa.	Hunting at the Apos; mother three dead children.
74	suspect sought death kan mother child	The unsub was looking for the death of a child's mother.	The unsub was looking for death kan mother child.	Suspect was looking for kan mother child death.
74	suspect death kansa mother child arrested	Kansa death suspect apprehended.	Death suspect kansa child mother apprehended.	Suspect death kansa child mother apprehended.
74	southeast kansa homicide suspect apprehended	Suspect, South East Kansa homicide, apprehended.	Suspect of the Apos; South East Kansa homicide apprehended.	Suspected South East Kansa homicide apprehended.
74	kbi suspect death parson woman child	The KBI suspects the death of a woman, a pastor, as a child.	The KBI suspects the death of apos; a woman pastor child.	KBI suspects death of a child pastor.
74	kansa authority locate man accused killing mother childre ktul	The authorities have found the man who was accused of killing the mother of the child.	The kansa authorities locate the apos; man accused of killing the mother of the apos; child Ktul.	The kansa authorities locate the man accused of killing the mother of the child Ktul.
74	suspect captured death kansa mom child	The suspect has captured the child of the mother of the dead.	The suspect captured the child of the kansa mother of death.	The suspect captured the child of the death kansa mother.
74	suspect captured slaying mom child	Suspect captured the mother killer's child.	Suspect has captured the child of the mother killer.	The suspect captured the killer mother's child.
74	parson investigation ruled homicide	The pastor's inquest concluded that the author committed a homicide.	The pastor's investigation concluded that it was a homicide.	The pastor's investigation ruled it a homicide.
74	suspect captured slaying woman three child kansa	Suspect has been captured killing wife three kansa kansa children.	Suspect captured killer wife three kansa kansa children.	Suspect captured three child kansa kansa.
74	suspect custody death parson woman child	Suspected custody, suspected death, female pastor as a child.	Suspecting custody, death, childhood preacher wife.	Suspecting custody, death, child preacher wife.
74	suspect caught mom kid dead southeast kansa	The suspect found the mother's son, who died in the south,-east of Kansa.	Suspect found mother's son dead in Kansa's South-east.	The suspect found dead mother's son in the south-east of Kansa.
74	suspect wanted murder kansa mom child	Suspect wanted in connection with the murder of kansa mother child.	Suspect wanted for kansa mom child murder.	Suspect wanted for murder kansa mom child murder.
74	mother three child dead kansa person interest located	Mother of three dead children kansa no one localized interest.	Mother of three dead children interest kansa no one located.	Mother of three dead children interest kansa no-one located.
74	suspect quadruple murder parson kan custody	Suspect quadruple murder, Pastor Kan, in custody.	Suspect quadruple Pastor Kan murder in custody.	Suspect quadruple murder Pastor Kan custody.
74	suspect captured death kan mom kid	The unsub captured the child of the Kan Kan Kan mother.	Suspect captured child of mother kan kan.	The suspect captured the kan kan mother's child.
74	suspect captured death kan mom child	The unsub captured the child of the Kan Kan Kan mother.	Suspect captured child of mother kan kan.	The suspect captured the kan kan mother's child.
74	woman three child killed parson kan suspect arrested	Three-year-old murdered Kan pastor wife, arrested.	Female three child killed suspicious Kan pastor arrested.	Wife three child killed pastor kan suspect arrested.
74	suspect captured death kansa mom young child	Suspected captured kansa mother mother young kansa mother of death.	Suspected captured mother kansa mother kansa young child mother of death.	Suspect captured kansa mother kansa young child mother of death.
74	cherryvale man arrested killing woman kid parson	L'apos; man with the cherry has arrested the murderer, the pastor of l'apos; child woman.	The cherry man arrested the murderer, the pastor of the woman child.	The cherry man arrested the murderer, the woman's pastor.
74	kbi seek suspect death parson woman child	The KBI is out looking for the murder suspect, Pastor Child Wife.	KBI is looking for the death suspect Pastor child-wife.	KBI's looking for the death suspect Pastor child-wrangler.
74	suspect death kansa mother child store	Suspect death kansa shop mother-child death kansa shop mother kansa.	Suspect death kansa shop mother mother child kansa mother store.	Suspect death kansa shop mother mother child store kansa mother.
74	manhunt underway suspect death kansa mother three child	He's a man in the process of being hunted down, suspected of the death of a mother of three.	Hunting to death; man in progress suspected of death mother of three children.	Hunting to the apo; man in progress suspect of death kansa mother of three children.
74	cherryvale man sought death thayer native three child	L' Cherry Man sought three indigenous children Thayer death.	L' cherry man sought the indigenous Thayer death three children.	Cherry man sought death Thayer indigenous three children.
74	illinois sex couple set	Illinois sex together.	Illinois sex couple together.	An illinois sex couple together.
74	david cornell bennett jr suspect murder parson kansa mother three	David Cornell Bennett, suspect in the murder of three-child Reverend Kansa.	David Cornell Bennett, suspect in the murder of Pastor Kansa, mother of three.	David Cornell Bennett, murder suspect of Pastor Kansa, mother of three.
74	death thayer native three child spark manhunt	Mortality Indigenous Tayer three Sparkling children hunting for humans.	Mortality Tayer native three children sparks hunting to the apos; man.	Mortality Tayer native three sparks hunting men.
74	kansa police seek suspect death mother three child	Kansa police are looking for the mother who suspects in the deaths of three children.	Kansa police are looking for the suspected mother of three children.	Kansa police are looking for suspect mother of death of three children.
74	kansa police hunt suspect allegedly killed mother three young	The suspect in the Kansa hunting operation is believed to have killed the mother of three young children.	Kansa-hunting suspect killed the mother of three young children.	Kansa hunting suspect allegedly killed the mother of three young children.
74	kansa mother child dead	Kansa, mother, dead child.	Kansa mother dead child.	Kansa mother child dead child.
74	cherryvale man arrested killing woman kid parson newson	He was the cherry man who caught the murderer, the child Pastor Newson.	The cherry man arrested the murderer, the pastor's child Newson.	Cherry man arrested the murderer, Pastor Newson's child.
74	parson investigation ruled homicide	The pastor's inquest concluded that the author committed a homicide.	The pastor's investigation concluded that it was a homicide.	The pastor's investigation ruled it a homicide.
74	suspect sought death kan mother kid	Suspect sought the death of a kan mother child.	The unsub's looking for death kan mother child.	Suspect sought death kan mother child kan.
75	judge order partial closure sriracha plant hunt odor	The judge ordered the partial closure of the house sriracha smell of plant-hunting.	Judge orders partial closure sriracha smell of hunting plants.	The judge orders partial closure sriracha odor of plant hunting.
75	judge order sriracha factory cool	The judge ordered that the Sriracha plant was to be decimated.	The judge ordered the Sriracha factory to cool.	The judge orders that the Sriracha factory cool down.
75	judge order cool sriracha factory	A judge orders a factory of cool sriracha.	Well, a judge orders a cool sriracha factory.	A cool sriracha factory is being ordered by a judge.
75	sriracha california factory partially shut	The plant in California sriracha has partially closed its doors.	The plant in California has been partially shut down.	California sriracha plant has partially shut down.
75	judge hot sauce maker curb smelly chili	Judge, you hot sauce maker, you're holding up the stinky chili.	Judge, hot sauce maker brakes the stinky chili.	Judge, hot sauce maker brakes stinky chili.
75	judge considers closing sriracha hot sauce factory	The judge plans to close down the factory of hot sauce sriracha.	The judge is considering closing the hot sauce factory sriracha.	Judge is considering closing l' sriracha hot sauce factory.
75	judge cool sriracha factory ordering partial shutdown	Oh, cool judge Sriracha factory ordering a partial shutdown.	Cool judge Sriracha factory ordering a partial shutdown order.	Cool judge Sriracha factory ordering partial shutdown.
75	judge smelly hot sauce factory cool	Judge the cool factory stinky hot sauce cool factory cool.	And judge the stinking hot sauce factory cool factory cool.	Judge the stinking hot sauce factory cool factory cool.
75	sriracha plant ordered partially shut	L&apos, a sriracha plant, has ordered a partial shutdown.	L' sriracha factory ordered a partial shutdown.	L' sriracha plant has ordered a partial shutdown.
75	sriracha hot sauce factory california told cool	Sriracha Hot Sauce Factory in California said cool California.	Sriracha hot sauce factory in California said cool California.	California hot sauce factory Sriracha said cool California.
75	judge order partial shutdown sriracha plant odor	Judge orders l' partial halt of l' smell of Sriracha plant.	The judge orders l' partial halt of l' smell of Sriracha plant.	The judge orders l' partial stop of l' smell of plant Sriracha.
75	judge order sriracha hot sauce factory partially shut	The judge ordered that the Sriracha Hot Sauce factory be partially shut down.	The judge ordered the Sriracha hot sauce factory to be partially closed.	The judge ordered that l'apos; sriracha hot sauce factory be partially closed.
75	sriracha factory irwindale closed county judge rule huy fung food	Sriracha Closed Irwind Plant County Rules Judge Closed Fungal Food Rules.	Sriracha closed irwind factory by-laws of the county deemed closed food fungus rule.	Sriracha irwindale factory closed by-laws of the county deemed closed fungal food rule.
75	judge hot sauce maker curb smelly chilli	Judge, make hot sauce at the edge of the stinky pepper.	Judge, hot sauce maker on the edge of the stinky chili pepper.	Judge, hot sauce maker on the stinky chili border.
75	sriracha hot sauce factory production partially ha	Sriracha sauce piquante plant of production partly ha ha.	Sriracha hot sauce production plant partly ha ha.	Sriracha hot sauce factory production partially ha ha.
75	judge order sriracha hot sauce plant cool	The judge orders the Sriracha Hot Sauce to be fresh.	The judge ordered the Sriracha hot sauce to be fresh.	The judge ordered the Sriracha hot sauce fresh.
75	hot sauce maker curb smelly chilli	A manufacturer of hot sauce, with a stinky chili edging.	Hot sauce maker with a stinky chili edge.	Makes hot sauce with stinky chili edges.
75	judge order sriracha shutdown irwindale	Irwindale is ordered closed by the judge.	The judge ordered the closure of the Irwindale.	The judge shall order the closure of Irwindale.
75	thing sriracha	Sriracha something.	Something from sriracha.	Uh, something from Sriracha.
75	huy fong pong judge	Hey, Judge Huy Fong Pong.	Huy fong pong judge.	Huy fong pong judge.
75	california ordered company sriracha inflaming	Sriracha d&apos was ordered by California to ignite.	California has ordered the Sriracha d&apos company to ignite.	California ordered the company Sriracha d' igniter.
75	california sriracha hot sauce plant ordered partly shut spicy smell	L' plant of hot sauce California sriracha has ordered a smell of d' spices partially closed.	L&apos, California sriracha hot sauce factory, has ordered a d&apos smell; spices partially closed.	L' California sriracha hot sauce factory ordered a d&apos smell; spices partially closed.
75	judge order cool calif sriracha hot sauce factory	A judge orders a califcha fresh hot sauce factory.	A judge ordered a hot sauce factory calif sriracha fresh.	A judge orders a fresh calif sriracha hot sauce factory.
75	judge order sriracha hot sauce factory irwindale cease operation	The judge orders sriracha Irregular Hot Sauce Factory to cease operation.	The judge orders sriracha iron hot sauce factory to stop the operation.	Judge orders irwindal hot sauce factory sriracha to cease operation.
75	judge sriracha maker curb smelly fume neighbor sick	Judge Sriracha Smelly Smoke Repelling Machine from Sick Neighbor.	Judge Sriracha Smelly Smoke Repellent Machine from a neighbor who's sick.	The judge Sriracha Smoke-Fouling Machine from the sick neighbor.
75	judge order partial shutdown calif sriracha factory complaint	The judge ordered the partial closure of the factory of calif sriracha.	The judge ordered the partial closure of the calif sriracha factory.	The judge ordered the partial shutdown of the calif sriracha plant.
75	sriracha factory ordered odor causing operation	L' plant of sriracha has ordered the apos; odor causing the apos; operation.	L' sriracha factory ordered the apos; smell causing the apos; operation.	L' sriracha factory ordered the smell causing the operation.
75	judge shuts stinky sriracha hot sauce plant	The judge closes down the factory of smelly Sriracha hot sauce.	The judge closes l' hot sauce factory Sriracha that stinks.	The judge closes l' sriracha hot sauce factory that stinks.
75	sriracha maker curb smelly odour judge	Sriracha brake machine judge smell smell smell judge smell smell smell judge.	Sriracha brake machine smell smell judge smell smell judge.	Sriracha brake machine judge smell odorant smell judge.
75	judge order sriracha hot sauce plant partly closed odor	Judge orders sriracha sauce piquante plant partially closed smell.	The judge orders sriracha sauce piquante plant partially closed smell.	Judge orders sriracha hot sauce plant partially closed smell.
75	sriracha plant irwindale ordered partially shut	Sriracha is a partially-closed, ordered irwind plant.	Sriracha ordered irwindale plant partially closed.	Sriracha plant irwindale ordered partially closed.
75	judge order calif sriracha plant cease operation odor	The judge ordered that the sriracha calif factory be shut down.	The judge ordered that the plant of sriracha calif cease its operations.	The judge ordered that l' sriracha calif plant cease operations.
75	return sriracha apocalypse judge order partial shutdown hot	Return Apocalypse sriracha judge ordered a partial partial warm shutdown.	Return sriracha apocalypse judge has ordered a partial, warm partial shutdown.	Return sriracha apocalypse judge order a partial warm shutdown.
75	sriracha factory told partly shut	L&apos, Sriracha's plant, said it was partially shut down.	L' Sriracha factory said partially closed.	L' sriracha factory said partially closed.
75	sriracha plant ordered cease operation odor judge rule	It was the first time in the history of the city that the people of Sriracha had been able to make use of it.	L' sriracha factory ordered the apos; cessation of the operation... the rule of the odors judge.	Sriracha factory ordered the shutdown of the operation... the odor judge rule.
75	city breathes easier sriracha sauce factory curbed	The city is located in the heart of the city, close to the city centre.	The city more easily breathes l' retarded sriracha sauce factory.	The city more easily breathes it; sriracha sauce factory with brakes.
75	judge order sriracha factory cease operation	The judge ordered that l'apos; sriracha plant be shut down.	The judge ordered that the sriracha factory was to be closed down.	The judge ordered the sriracha factory to cease its activities.
75	hot sauce factory hot town	Hot sauce factory, hot city.	A hot sauce factory, warm city.	A hot sauce factory, hot city.
75	stink judge hot sauce maker curb smelly chili	Stinking judge, hot sauce, brakes the stinking chili.	You know, a smelly judge, hot sauce maker, brakes the stinky chili.	A stinking judge, hot sauce maker, chili brakes stinky.
76	console buy playstation xbox buy	You can buy the game from the console.	Console buy Playstation xbox purchase.	Buy console playstation xbox buy.
76	microsoft officially launched xbox console gamers	The Xbox console gamers are officially released by Microsoft.	Microsoft has officially launched the Xbox console gamers.	Microsoft officially launched Xbox console gamers.
76	busted xbox free game microsoft	Free game Xbox broken microsoft game.	Xbox free game broken microsoft game.	Xbox free game broken game.
76	serious gamers xbox	Serious Xbox gamers.	Serious xbox gamers.	Some serious xbox gamers.
76	xbox owner violence broken console	Xbox owner Xbox console violence broken.	Xbox owner console violence broken.	Xbox owner broken console violence.
76	citi analyst estimate xbox console sold	L&apos, Citi analyst, thinks that the Xbox console has been sold.	L' Citi analyst estimates that the xbox console has been sold.	Citi analyst believes the xbox console has been sold.
76	microsoft acknowledges disc drive glitch small number xbox	Microsoft recognizes the bug in the small number disk drive xbox number.	Microsoft recognizes the small number xbox number disk drive bug.	Microsoft recognizes small number xbox number disk drive bug.
76	uk xbox sale shy wii lifetime total report claim	Uk xbox dirty shy wii total life report claim.	Uk xbox sale shy wii total life report claim.	Uk xbox sale shy wii total life report claim.
76	poll xbox suffer hardware failure	The Xboxes of sounding are suffering from some kind of hardware failure.	The sounding xboxes suffer from apos; a hardware failure.	Sounding xboxes suffer from hardware failure.
76	despite hot sale xbox billion loser	Despite the hot Xbox Billion Losing sale.	Despite xbox billion hot sale losing billion.	Despite the hot sale xbox billion losing.
76	swearing xbox live user banned profanity laden uploads	If you swear live on xbox, you won't be able to use blasphemy.	Swearing live on xbox prohibits blasphemy and loads uploads.	Upstream downloads are loaded by swearing live on xbox without blasphemy.
76	infamous xbox hz judder	It's the first game of the game.	The infamous xbox hz judder.	The infamous xbox hz judder.
76	xbox versus microsoft expects sell unit holiday	Xbox vs. Microsoft S' now waiting to sell vacation units.	Xbox v microsoft s' waits to sell some vacation units.	Xbox vs. microsoft s' waits to sell holiday packages.
76	xbox review	Xbox review.	Xbox.	It's an xbox magazine.
76	free game awaits broken xbox owner	Free play awaits the owner of the broken xbox.	The owner of broken xbox is waiting for the free game.	Free game awaits broken xbox owner.
76	xbox cost microsoft build msrp	Xbox is a freeware application.	Xbox costs microsoft build msrp.	Xbox costs microsoft build msrp.
76	competition xbox	Xbox Xbox Xbox Competition.	Xbox xbox competition.	Xbox xbox competition.
76	microsoft ban xbox user temporarily swearing skype upload	Microsoft xbox user ban swearing temporary skype upload upload upload.	Microsoft ban xbox user swearing temporarily skype upload upload upload.	Microsoft ban xbox user swearing temporary swearing skype upload upload.
76	xbox sold hour	Sold Xbox hourly.	Xbox sold by the hour.	Xbox sold hourly.
76	xbox initial thought impression	This is the first time you've tried to think about Xbox.	Xbox first impression of initial thought.	Xbox first initial thought impression.
76	xbox xbox	Xbox Xbox Xbox Xbox Xbox.	Xbox xbox xbox, xbox.	Xbox xbox xbox.
76	microsoft tease xbox japanese game dev partnership	You can also download the game from the Xbox Japanese Game.	Minisoft youase xbox japanese game dev partnership.	Minisoft tease xbox japanese game dev partnership.
76	xbox dodging game drought	Xbox gameplay and gameplay.	Xbox dodging the drought of the gameplay.	Xbox dodging game dryness.
76	consumer report playstation xbox	Xbox Playstation Consumer Report.	This is the first gameplay game to be released.	Playstation Xbox consumer reports.
76	persona kick sand xbox user face	Personally, the apos face, the Xbox user.	Personally the face of l' Xbox user.	Personal, the face of the' user of the Xbox.
76	hand designing xbox controller	Manual design of the xbox-based controller.	Manual design of xbox controller.	Manual xbox controller design.
76	review gift guide xbox disappoint gamers	Review the Xbox Gift Guide to Gamers' Disappointment.	Review the disappointing xbox gift guide for gamers.	Review xbox gift guide disappointing gamers.
76	xbox expensive report	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.	Xbox report expensive expensive report xbox.	Xbox report expensive report xbox.
76	microsoft explains lack halo xbox	Microsoft will explain the apos; no halo xbox.	Microsoft explains the 'absence of xbox halo.	Microsoft explains the xbox halo absence.
76	microsoft free game broken xbox console	Free game on the Xbox console broken.	Free game on broken Xbox console microsoft.	Xbox console free game broken microsoft.
76	microsoft acknowledges disc drive doom glitch xbox	Microsoft recognizes the plug-in doom glitch xbox.	Microsoft can recognize the doom glitch xbox circuit breaker.	Microsoft recognizes doom glitch xbox circuit breaker.
76	xbox console selling better	Xbox consoles sell better.	I think the xbox console is selling better.	The xbox console sells better.
76	microsoft acknowledges replaces fau xbox drive	Microsoft recognizes the replacement of the current Xbox Fade Player.	Microsoft recognizes replacing your xbox fau player.	Microsoft recognizes replacing the fau xbox player.
76	xbox digital base living room	This room is equipped with a bathroom with shower and toilet.	Living room xbox digital base.	Xbox digital base living room.
76	ihs xbox breakdown microsoft breaking	I'm sorry, but I don't know what to do.	Ihs xbox break microsoft break.	Microsoft break ihs xbox break.
76	microsoft ban user excessive profanity xbox video uploads	L' microsoft user ban excessive desecration xbox uploaded video uploads.	L' user of downloaded microsoft ban excessive xbox video desecration video uploads.	L' user of microsoft ban desecration excessive xbox video uploads uploaded.
76	xbox launch	Xbox launch.	Xbox launch.	Xbox launch now.
76	microsoft xbox sell launch	Microsoft Xbox sells the launcher.	Microsoft Xbox sold the launch launch.	Microsoft Xbox will sell the launch launch.
76	free game dodgy xbox	Unlikely xbox game.	Free game questionable xbox.	Unlikely free game xbox.
76	xbox game coming video	Xbox game, coming up next, video.	Xbox game coming up on video.	Xbox game coming video.
76	gamers feel xbox	They smell like xbox.	The players smell like xbox.	You know, players smell like xboxes.
76	closer cost building xbox	Closer build costs xbox.	Closer xbox construction costs.	Closer xbox building costs.
76	fifa highest selling xbox game return top chart	The best-selling Xbox game in the world is the first game on the list.	The best-selling Xbox game tops the charts, right?	The best-selling Xbox game is at the top of the charts.
76	microsoft ship kinect gesture sensor window developer	Vessel Microsoft Kinect Motion Sensor (VMS) window developer.	Microsoft kinect motion sensor window developer for ships.	Microsoft motion sensor window developer for ships.
76	forward buy xbox	Xbox term purchase.	Xbox term purchase.	Buy xbox term.
76	xbox cost kinect total	I'm sorry, I can't help you.	Xbox cost kinect total.	Xbox cost kinect total.
76	battle xbox	Xbox battle.	Battle-Xbox.	Hey, battle Xbox.
76	microsoft admits glitch xbox disc drive	Microsoft recognizes that there is a problem with the Xbox drive.	Microsoft admits that the Xbox drive is defective.	Microsoft admits that the Xbox drive is defective.
76	xbox kinect voice gesture control	Voice Motion Control xbox kinect.	Check xbox kinect vocal gesture.	Xbox kinect voice gesture control.
76	microsoft twitter team care xbox launch day buyer	Microsoft Twitter Care Team Xbox launch day Buy Buy Buyers.	Microsoft Xbox Twitter Care Team launch day buyer buyer.	Microsoft team twitter care Xbox launch day buyer buyer buyer.
76	xbox live ban user skype upload	Xbox Live User Skype upload user.	Xbox Live Ban user user skype upload.	Xbox Live Ban user skype upload.
76	xbox user caught swearing video clip face account suspension	One Xbox user was caught swallowing that the video clip was actually suspended from his account.	One Xbox user was caught swearing that the music video was suspended from his account.	An Xbox user was caught swearing the video clip was suspended in his account.
76	xbox launch fau	Xbox Foo Foo Foo Foo Foo Foo.	Xbox launches fau fau fau fau.	Xbox launch fau fau fau fau.
76	console debut guarantee success	Console start early start of the first hour of the company.	Start of the console early start of the first hour of the business.	Start of the console early in the first hour of business.
76	xbox boring black box lot promise	Xbox Boring Black Box Basketbox promise.	Xbox Boring Black Box lot promise promise.	Xbox annoying Black Box lot promise promise.
76	voice command work	Voice control work.	You know, voice-control work.	The voice command job.
76	uk xbox owner reporting tv issue hz output blame	Uk xbox owner reporting issue hz tv output blame output.	Uk xbox owner reporting tv issue hz output blame.	Uk xbox owner reporting tv issue hz output blame output.
76	xbox user punished swearing xbox live video	L' xbox user, was punished for swearing that there was a live video from xbox.	L' xbox user was punished for swearing that there was live xbox video.	L' xbox user was punished for swearing that there was live video from xbox.
76	xbox user banned excessive profanity	L&apos, an xbox user, has banned abusive language.	L' xbox user has forbidden excessive swearing.	L' xbox user banned excessive rudeness.
76	microsoft tolerate xbox game play clip excessive profanity	Microsoft are tolerating the game xbox video game excessive desecration.	Microsoft tolerate the game video game xbox game excessive desecration.	Microsoft tolerate xbox game video excessive desecration game.
76	microsoft responds xbox disc drive issue	Microsoft is responding to the problem with the Xbox drive.	Microsoft is responding to the xbox drive problem.	Microsoft responds to the xbox drive problem.
76	xbox hit shelf microsoft ponders sale gaming console division	Xbox hits the' Microsoft Weigher console console console console console sales console.	Xbox hits the' Microsoft Weigher shelf console console division console sale console sale console.	Xbox strikes l' shelf microsoft weighers console console console console division selling selling.
76	microsoft busted xbox owner free game	The Xbox owner's free gameplay has broken down into microsoft.	The Xbox owner's free game has been released as a microsoft.	The Xbox owner's free game is microsoft.
76	xbox microsoft financially broad market	The Xbox Microsoft is a freeware application.	Xbox microsoft market is financially large.	Xbox microsoft market financially large.
76	microsoft free game owner fau xbox	The owner of the xbox microsoft fau free game.	The owner of the free game microsoft xbox.	The microsoft fau xbox free game owner.
76	sell xbox hour	Sell the xbox hour.	Sell xbox hour.	So sell xbox hour.
76	xbox disc issue fixed punching console	Xbox Disk Fixed Fixed Punch Console.	Fixed Xbox problem disk fixed punching console.	Xbox fixed punching console problem disk fixed.
76	sharing cuss filled video xbox account suspended	Sharing swear to account with xbox video filled with suspended.	Share swear account xbox video filled suspended.	Share swear swipe video xbox account suspended filled.
76	xbox double week uk sale forza highest exclusive	Xbox double week sale uk forza the most exclusive sale.	Xbox double week uk sale forza the most exclusive.	Xbox double week uk sale forza exclusive sale.
76	microsoft corporation nasdaq msft xbox sale hit	Xbox sales of microsoft, nasdaq msft, have reached the highest level of sales.	The Xbox sale of the microsoft firm Nasdaq msft has reached the highest level of sales.	The microsoft Xbox sale of nasdaq msft has reached its peak.
76	xbox expensive teardown reveals true cost	Xbox Xbox and Teardown are just a few steps away from the real deal.	Xbox Dear Teardown reveals the true cost.	Xbox Dear Teardown reveals true cost.
76	console gaming generation forked	Game consoles have been replaced by a new generation.	The generation of gaming consoles has now been replaced by another generation.	The game console generation has been replaced by another.
76	playstation launch video game title cost xbox	Playstation to launch the title of the game costs xbox.	Playstation launch title video game costs xbox.	Playstation launch video game title costs xbox.
76	xbox live suspending user swearing uploaded video	Live Xbox suspending the' avowed downloaded video user.	Xbox Live suspending the' user swear video downloaded.	Xbox Live suspending the' user swearing video uploaded.
76	fau xbox owner free game	Free gameplay for the owner of the Xbox fau.	Free game for owner of Xbox fau.	Free game for Xbox fau owner.
76	xbox reason buy wii system	Xbox reason to buy the system wii.	Xbox reason buy wii system.	Xbox reason buy wii system.
76	xbox expensive	You can't afford Xbox.	Xbox costs money.	It's expensive Xbox.
76	microsoft confirms excessive profanity xbox upload studio video	Microsoft confirms xbox excessive desecration upload video studio.	Microsoft confirms excessive xbox profanation upload video studio.	Microsoft confirms excessive desecration xbox upload studio video xbox.
76	microsoft partner japanese developer game announced	Microsoft partner, the Japanese game for developers, is announced.	The Japanese game for developers, a partner of microsoft, is announced.	Microsoft's Japanese developer game partner is announced.
76	xbox launch news microsoft sell day	Xbox launches microsoft news sale day of sale.	Xbox launches news microsoft sell day of sale.	Xbox launch news microsoft sell day of sale.
76	xbox halo launch meant halo	The Xbox halo is the most popular game in the world.	The launch of the xbox halo game meant halo.	The halo xbox launch meant halo.
76	xbox sell console hour	Xbox sells hour-by-hour console.	Xbox is selling console hour hour.	Xbox sells console hour hour.
76	microsoft address xbox disc drive problem small number	Address microsoft xbox problem of disk drive small number.	Microsoft xbox small number disk drive problem address.	Microsoft address xbox disk drive problem small number.
76	microsoft xbox halo launch halo	Halo launch microsoft xbox-halo launch halo.	Microsoft launch halo xbox halo launch halo.	Microsoft xbox halo launch halo release.
76	xbox making family life easier	Xbox Making Family Life Easier.	Xbox makes the family life easier.	Xbox making family life easier.
76	xbox juddering plague uk tv watcher	Xbox Video Judgement Peste uk TV watcher watcher.	Xbox Judgment Peste uk TV watcher watcher.	Xbox Jugement Peste uk TV watcher watcher.
76	microsoft learning handle xbox	Management of' Xbox Microsoft Learning.	The management of' learning microsoft xbox.	Management of xbox microsoft learning.
76	microsoft squeeze profit xbox	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Microsoft squeeze profit xbox.	Microsoft squeeze profit xbox.
76	microsoft release xbox cheat sheet	The cheat sheet of xbox release microsoft xbox.	Microsoft release xbox cheat sheet.	The microsoft release xbox cheat sheet xbox.
76	swear	They are both apart from those who are not divorced; agreement.	They're both, except for the ones who aren't here.	They are the only ones who have the right to vote; they are the only ones who have the right to vote.
76	defective xbox owner free game microsoft compensation	Xbox defective free game owner microsoft compensation.	Xbox owner defective free game microsoft compensation.	Xbox owner defective free game microsoft compensation.
76	xbox profanity ban enforced	Blasphemy is not allowed on xbox.	No blasphemy on xbox in effect.	Blasphemy ban on xbox in effect.
76	dress xbox respectable game console	Dress up a respectable Xbox game console.	Dress up respectable Xbox game console respectable.	Dress up respectable game console Xbox.
76	microsoft xbox learning	Microsoft Xbox learning.	Learn how to use Xbox in a microsoft environment.	Xbox microsoft learning.
76	free game xbox problem	Free game problem xbox xbox problem.	Free game problem xbox problem xbox.	Free game problem xbox game xbox problem xbox.
76	skyline whitespace provide pop store game huge xbox launch	Skyline whitespace provide the game pop store huge huge launch xbox.	Skyline whitespace provide the pop store game huge huge xbox launch.	Skyline whitespace provide pop store game huge huge xbox launch.
76	microsoft xbox unit sold hour	Microsoft xbox Unit is sold on an hourly basis.	The microsoft xbox unit is sold hourly.	Microsoft xbox unit sold hourly.
76	microsoft acknowledges xbox issue offer free game user	The free xbox microsoft problem recognition offer game user.	The microsoft recognitions problem xbox offer free game user.	Microsoft Xbox problem recognition offer free game user support.
76	console war microsoft xbox sony playstation	It's a good way to play the game.	War console microsoft xbox sound playstation.	Console war microsoft xbox sony playstation.
76	xbox predator	X predator.	Xbox predator.	Xbox predator software.
76	xbox user experiencing serious issue xbox live uk	User xbox with serious problems xbox Live uk problem.	User xbox with serious problems xbox live uk problem.	Xbox user experiencing serious xbox live uk problem.
76	gizmo ninja xbox console great rush	Gizmo ninja Xbox Grand Dush console.	Gizmo ninja consoles xbox big rush.	Gizmo ninja console xbox grand rush.
76	inside xbox kinect	It's the only way to get the information you need.	At the inside of the xbox kinect.	To the inside of xbox kinect.
76	xbox game sale amazon day edition	Xbox game dirty-amazon day edition.	Xbox game fil amazon day edition.	Xbox game dirty amazon day edition.
76	xbox best error message	This is the best message you'll get from your xbox error.	Best message from' xbox error.	The best error message from xbox.
76	ihs microsoft xbox hardware cost retail price ihs	The price of the ihs ihs ihs retail is the same as the price of the ihs ihs ihs.	Xbox ihs microsoft costs the ihs ihs retail price.	The ihs microsoft Xbox costs the retail price ihs ihs.
76	microsoft sony battle gaming supremacy holiday season	This is the first game to be released in the United States.	Microsoft sony battle game supremacy of the holiday season at the end of the year.	Microsoft sony battle game supremacy of the holiday season d' year.
76	xbox game crash dashboard ram issue unofficial	Xbox game crash dashboard game come back out unofficially.	Xbox game crash dashboard come back out unofficially.	Xbox game crash dashboard re unofficially released.
76	xbox patch crash video game hooray	Xbox patch video game crash hurra.	Xbox patch crash video game hurra.	Xbox patch crash video game hurra.
76	full list xbox kinect command	Complete list of xbox kernel commands.	Complete list of xbox kinect commands.	Complete list of xbox kinect commands.
76	reason buy xbox christmas	Reason d' buy Xbox Christmas Xbox.	Reason to buy xbox Christmas xbox.	Reason d' buy xbox Christmas xbox.
76	freak xbox user reporting issue	Reporting problem-xbox users.	Reporting problem-reporting xbox users.	-xbox user reporting problem.
76	microsoft xbox sell unit hour worthy rival	Xbox microsoft sells time unity of l' time worthy rival.	Xbox microsoft sells time unit of l' worthy rival hour.	Xbox microsoft sell time unit of l' hour worthy rival worthy.
76	xbox release update news microsoft launch disc drive issue	Update of the xbox version of the Microsoft Starter Disk (MDS) drive.	Microsoft launch disc player xbox update update.	Update of microsoft launch disc player xbox version.
76	microsoft limit xbox live user curse	Minisoft limits the use of xbox Live User Curses.	Minisoft limits xbox live user curse.	Minisoft limits xbox live user curse.
76	microsoft partner japanese developer tease announcement	L&apos announces the teasing of the Japanese firmware partner, the Japanese firmware developer, has been made.	The Japanese microsoft partner, the Japanese developer, has been teased.	L' teasing announcement from the Japanese microsoft partner, the Japanese developer, was made.
76	chris capossela microsoft loyalist survival kit includes smartphones	Smartphones are included in the Chris Capossela Loyalist Microsoft Survival Kit.	The Chris Capossela Loyalist Microsoft Survival Kit includes smartphones.	The Chris Capossela Microsoft Loyalist Survival Kit includes smartphones.
76	rovi supply entertainment data oneguide xbox	I'll give you some unguide xbox entertainment data.	Rovi provide unguide xbox entertainment data.	Provide unguide xbox entertainment data rovi.
76	xbox sell console weekend	Xbox sell week console-end.	Xbox sell console week-end.	Xbox sell console week-end.
76	xbox clear sale hour	Clear Xbox time of sale.	Xbox clear time of sale.	Xbox clear sell time.
76	xbox kinect extension cable woe	Cable d' Xbox kernel add-on misfortune.	Cable d' misfortune Xbox extension kinect.	D&apos cable Xbox extension kinect malheur.
76	microsoft explains halo debut xbox	Microsoft explains how to start halo Xbox at the beginning.	Microsoft explains the beginning halo Xbox beginning.	Microsoft explains the start halo Xbox beginning.
76	console war xbox hot debut	Xbox Hot Startup War Xbox Hot console.	Console War Xbox Hot Startups Xbox Hot.	You can also use the War Xbox Xbox Hot Startup console.
76	problem xbox free game	Xbox Free Game Issue xbox problem.	Free game xbox problem xbox problem xbox problem.	Xbox free game problem xbox free game problem.
76	playstation netherland fun xbox coming	Playstation netherland fun xboxes coming up.	Coming playstation netherland fun xbox.	Playstation netherland fun xbox coming up.
76	xbox midnight start console war launched officially	Xbox Midnight is the beginning of the official Xbox console war.	Xbox midnight beginning of the officially launched console war.	Xbox midnight beginning of the console war officially launched.
76	best music xbox	Best xbox music in the world.	The best xbox music in the world.	The best music xbox xbox.
76	microsoft responds xbox problem disc drive	Microsoft reacts to xbox problem drive drive problem disc.	Microsoft reacts to the xbox problem disc drive problem.	Microsoft responds to xbox problem disc drive problem.
76	xbox unit sold	This Xbox has been sold.	Xbox has been sold.	They sold the Xbox.
76	sony win opening round gen game console battle	Sony win' Gen console game opening battle battle console.	Sony win the' Gen console battle battle opening game.	Sony win the 'opening gameplay round gen console battle battle battle.
76	microsoft free xbox game defective console	Faulty Xbox Free Microsoft Game Console.	Console defective free Xbox microsoft game.	Faulty Xbox free game console microsoft game.
76	indie game increasingly competing aaa title game console	Independent game more and more in competition aaa game of game title console.	Independent game more and more in competition aaa game of game console title.	Independent game more and more in competition with title game console game.
76	microsoft offer free game xbox owner burned bad hardware	Free Microsoft Offer owner xbox hardware burnt game defective.	Free offer microsoft owner xbox game burn hardware defective.	Free microsoft offer owner xbox game burned hardware defective.
76	xbox family album	L' Xbox Family Album.	L' Xbox family album.	L' album by the family Xbox.
76	hate xbox colour slap big sticker	I hate Xbox-colored stickers.	I just hate Xbox color stickers.	God, I hate Xbox color stickers.
76	xbox review xbox game download carefully	Xbox Critical Xbox game downloads carefully.	Xbox critical xbox download game carefully.	Xbox critical xbox game download carefully.
76	spin spin microsoft xbox	Spin the Xbox microsoft.	Run the spinning Xbox microsoft.	Spin the Xbox microsoft spin.
76	tech tuesday playstation xbox console record debut	The game will be available on the Playstation Xbox console.	Technique Tuesday Playstation Xbox console record the beginnings.	Technique Tuesday Playstation Xbox console record debut.
76	microsoft deal xbox disc drive doom	Microsoft Xbox Deal Doom Disc Player.	Microsoft deal xbox Doom disk drive xbox.	Microsoft deal xbox drive Doom disc.
76	xbox teardown close break	Xbox Teardown near the break.	Xbox Teardown near break.	Xbox Teardown near break time.
76	xbox comparison	Xbox Comparison Comparison.	This is an xbox comparison.	Comparison xbox compared.
76	xbox counting	Xbox counting.	You know, the xbox count.	The xbox count.
76	xbox user banned swearing skype upload studio	Xbox user forbids swearing in the studio of d' Skype upload.	An xbox user will not swear in a d&apos studio; Skype upload.	An xbox user prohibits swearing in studio d' upload Skype.
76	playstation poised outsell xbox	Playstation s&apos ready to sell more xbox.	Playstation s' ready to sell more xbox.	Playstation s' ready to sell more of the game.
76	xbox cost esram kinect	Xbox Xbox is a freeware application.	Xbox costs esram kinect.	Xbox costs esram kinect to install.
76	xbox stock contrary microsoft sold claim	Xbox reverse microsoft stock sold claim sold.	Xbox stock contrary microsoft sold to sell.	Xbox stock contrary microsoft sold claim sold.
76	microsoft offer free game fau xbox owner	Free gameplay from Microsoft Xbox Xbox.	Microsoft offers free xbox proprietary fau game Xbox.	Microsoft offers free game fau owner xbox xbox.
76	swearing video uploaded xbox banned	You can't swear to a video upload of xbox.	Video sworn uploaded xbox xbox forbidden.	Swear video uploaded xbox prohibited.
76	spencer assure gear war stay xbox exclusive installment	Spencer is the world's only Xbox player; it's the only Xbox player in the world.	Spencer ensures the apos; xbox exclusivity of the apos; war equipment.	Spencer secures the exclusive xbox of the war equipment.
76	xbox hit sale hour	Xbox strikes time of sale, time of sale.	Xbox has hit the sell-hour clock.	Xbox hit sale time.
76	microsoft xbox issue small number customer	Xbox Microsoft also distributes small numbers of clients.	The Xbox microsoft distributes small numbers of customers.	Xbox microsoft distributes a small number of clients.
76	microsoft crack profanity xbox video uploads	Microsoft Xbox video crack sniffer downloads video downloads.	The microsoft xbox video cracker downloads video downloads.	The microsoft xbox video crack sniffer downloads video downloads.
76	black friday deal xbox launch title amazon	Black Friday xbox business launch Amazon Amazon Amazon title.	Black Friday business xbox launch title title Amazon amazone.	Black Friday business xbox launch title Amazon amazone.
76	microsoft video excessive profanity lead xbox live ban	Microsoft Video Too Much Lead Blasphemy Xbox Blasphemy No live.	Microsoft video too blasphemy lead xbox blasphemy ban online.	Video microsoft too blasphemy xbox live ban lead blasphemy.
76	report microsoft banning xbox user video skype call	Report a Microsoft Skype video call that prohibits the use of xbox.	Report a Skype video call from microsoft, which prohibits xbox use.	Report a Skype video call from microsoft banning xbox use.
76	xbox problem fixed brute force	Xbox has corrected the raw force.	The xbox problem has corrected the brute force.	The xbox problem fixed brute force.
76	black friday best buy xbox deal stock	Black Friday Best Buy Xbox Deal Stock.	Black Friday Best Buy Xbox Deal stock.	The Black Friday Best Buy Xbox Dealer Stock.
76	xbox owner disc drive problem free game	Xbox, which owns game-based discs, and has no problems with disc drives.	Xbox game disk owner without problems without disk drive problems.	Xbox disk game owner with no disc drive problems.
76	review sony xbox gaming console	Review the Xbox game console.	Review sound game console xbox.	Review the xbox sony game console.
76	porn find gen console course	Porno will find the Gen console classes.	Porn find console courses gen.	Porn find gen console courses.
76	microsoft replace xbox console fau disc drive	Replace the Xbox console's hard drive with a microsoft drive.	Replace the xbox console with a microsoft drive for the fauce disc drive.	Replace the xbox console fau disc drive with a microsoft drive.
76	create mini selfies kinect app	Mini selfies kinect app.	Create mini selfies kinect app.	To create mini selfies kinect app.
76	xbox review	Xbox review.	Xbox.	It's an xbox magazine.
76	broken xbox disc drive punch microsoft	Xbox disc player broken microsoft player punch.	Xbox disc broken microsoft player punch broken.	Xbox broken microsoft drive punch disc.
76	tv dying xbox crown jewel big trouble	Xbox Crown Jewel TV is about to die big problem.	Xbox TV Crown Jewel, dying big problem.	Xbox Crown Jewel TV dying big trouble.
76	xbox	Xbox Xbox.	Xbox, Xbox.	Uh, Xbox Xbox.
76	design studio original xbox review xbox	Original Xbox Studio Design and Critical Xbox Xbox.	Original xbox Xbox critical xbox studio design.	Design studio original xbox Xbox Critical Xbox.
76	broken drive fau working sound infuriate xbox holder	Broken driver has to work on the xbox carrier Xbox Infuriated sound.	Broken driver works with xbox carrier Xbox Infuriate sound.	Broken driver works with xbox Infuriate sound carrier.
76	xbox code conduct banned xbox live	The Xbox Code of Conduct does not allow the use of xbox live.	Xbox Code of Conduct prohibits xbox live.	Xbox Code of Conduct xbox live is not allowed.
76	xbox microsoft finally succeeded making controller	Finally, Xbox microsoft was able to do the controller.	Xbox microsoft finally managed to make the controller.	Xbox microsoft finally made the controller.
76	xbox arrived best xbox franchise	The Xbox Xbox franchise is the best in the business.	Xbox came in the best xbox franchise.	Xbox came as the best xbox franchise ever.
76	xbox news kinect voice command revealed game feature	The game's functionality was revealed by the xbox news kinect voice command.	The xbox news kinect voice command revealed the functionality of the game itself.	The xbox news kinect voice command revealed game functionality.
76	playstation xbox best	Best Xbox Playstation.	Playstation Xbox best.	Xbox playstation best.
76	gen launch weekend ebay outsells xbox	The weekend-end of launching gen ebay sells better than xbox.	The weekend-end of the launch of gen ebay sells better than xbox.	The-end launch weekend of gen ebay sells better than xbox.
76	review top game microsoft xbox	Check out the main game of microsoft xbox.	Review the main game microsoft xbox.	Review the microsoft xbox main game again.
76	gamesbeat community xbox	Gamebeat Xbox Community.	Gamebeat community xbox.	Gamebeat xbox community.
76	xbox disc drive defect net free launch game	Xbox Drive Defect Net Free Launch Game.	Xbox Disc Drive Defect Net Free Launch Game.	The Xbox Drive Defect Net Free Launch Game.
76	xbox online uk tv problem persist	Online Xbox uk tv persistent problem persist.	Online Xbox uk tv problem persist.	Xbox online uk tv problem persist.
76	gift guide xbox disappoint gamers	Xbox Gift Guide - disappointing gamers.	Xbox Gift Guide let gamers down.	Xbox gift guide disappoint gamers.
76	xbox move console hour	Xbox gameplay moves console time.	Xbox move console hour.	Xbox move console hour.
76	knockout game xbox edition	This game is available in the Xbox Edition.	Game KO, xbox edition.	Game KO xbox edition.
76	xbox sold launch day	Xbox has sold the game since the launch of the game.	Xbox sold out on launch day.	Xbox sold on launch day.
76	microsoft free game fau xbox owner	Free game of xbox microsoft owner fau xbox.	Free game of microsoft owner fau xbox xbox.	Free game microsoft owner fau xbox xbox.
76	xbox disc drive broken free game	The Xbox Disk Player has just released the game.	The Xbox disc player broke the free game.	The free game has been broken by the Xbox disc player.
76	microsoft swear xbox	Microsoft Xbox Sword.	Microsoft sword xbox.	This is Microsoft Sword Xbox.
76	people selling xbox day achievement ebay	People who sell Xbox ebay's achievements for sale.	People selling the achievements of Xbox ebay day.	People selling Xbox ebay Day's achievements.
76	xbox kinect universal remote	Xbox Kinect Universal Remote Control.	Xbox kinect universal remote control device.	Xbox kinect universal remote control.
76	fau xbox disc drive free game	Free game of the Xbox Fae Disk player.	Free game Xbox fau disc player.	Free game of xbox fau disc player.
76	xbox day achievement bought ebay	It's the first game in the world.	The success of Xbox Day bought ebay!	The success of Xbox day bought ebay.
76	player jury pricey xbox	Jury gameplayer Xbox Xbox.	Xbox player chery Xbox Jury.	Xbox player jury chery Xbox.
76	microsoft xbox console support logitech harmony remote controller	The xbox microsoft console supports the remote controller from the d' harmony logitech.	The microsoft xbox console supports the d&apos remote controller; harmony logitech.	The microsoft xbox console supports the logitech harmony remote controller.
76	xbox sold erm feeling deja vu	Xbox has been released.	Xbox sold erm to feel already seen.	Xbox sold erm feeling already seen.
76	xbox reportedly cost build	The Xbox Xbox would have been expensive to build.	The Xbox would have cost a lot to build!	The xbox would have cost a lot to build.
76	xbox live streamed nudity excessive profanity highlight	Live nudity Xbox in streaming excessive blasphemy highlight nudity.	Xbox live nudity in excessive blasphemy streaming highlight nudity.	Xbox live nudity streaming excessive blasphemy highlight nudity.
76	microsoft grounding user upload cuss filled video xbox live	L' user of upload microsoft grounding cuss video fill live xbox.	L' user of microsoft grounding upload cuss video fill live xbox.	L' microsoft grounding user upload cuss video fill live xbox.
76	xbox tv integration suffers hz issue	L' integration xbox tv suffers from the problem hz.	L' xbox tv integration has the hz problem.	L' xbox tv integration suffers from hz.
76	day online video news view november	View the November Online Video News.	View the November online video news.	View the online video news from November.
76	microsoft offering free game fau xbox	Free gameplay from the Microsoft Xbox game.	Microsoft provides free game fau xbox game.	Microsoft offers free game fau xbox game.
76	xbox post release issue game store employee	L' employee of Xbox Post Release Game Store.	L' employee of the post release Xbox game store.	Xbox post release game store employee L&apos.
76	xbox talk gaming	Play game console Xbox.	To play the Xbox Game Console.	You know, play the Xbox game console.
76	xbox manufacture cost kinect full teardown	Full Xbox cost-making shredded complete kinect.	Xbox full-size, shredded Xbox cost kinect manufacturing.	Xbox full shredded cost kinect manufacturing.
76	xbox phantom dust remake	Remake Xbox Phantom dustbox.	Xbox Phantom dust remake.	Phantom dust remake Xbox.
76	xbox issue small number customer	Xbox issues small numbers of clients.	Xbox emits only a small number of clients.	Xbox issues a small number of clients.
76	uk chart xbox double xbox opening weekend	Double Weekend Uk Xbox Card-end d' Double Xbox Opening.	Double week-end d' double xbox opening.	Double weekend uk xbox card-end d' double xbox opening.
76	xbox model coming early	The Xbox comes early.	The Xbox model comes early.	The Xbox model comes early today.
76	xbox sell hour	Xbox Sell Hourly Sales Time.	Xbox sell the hour hour sale.	Xbox sell hour hourly sale.
76	xbox news price cut expected analyst claim	Xbox News has reduced the price charged by l&apos, the analyst.	Xbox News has reduced the price of the analyst.	Xbox News reduced the price charged by the analyst l&apos.
76	neoseeker holiday gift guide xbox	Neoseeker Xbox Holiday Gift Guide xbox.	Holiday Gift Guide neoseeker xbox xbox.	Holiday gift guide xbox neoseeker xbox.
76	profanity xbox video app trigger hour ban	Xbox blasphemous video application triggers apo time ban.	L' blasphemous video application xbox triggers apo time; prohibition.	L' blasphemous video application xbox will trigger the apos time; prohibition.
76	xbox microsoft sell unit hour	Xbox Microsoft is a freeware solution.	Xbox microsoft sell hour unit of sale.	Xbox microsoft sell unit selling time unit.
76	playstation xbox winner close call	Playstation Xbox winning at point-blank range.	Playstation Xbox wins at close range.	Xbox Playstation winning close range.
76	microsoft xbox user account suspended swearing	D&apos account; user xbox microsoft suspended the curses.	D&apos account; xbox user microsoft suspended curses.	D&apos account; suspended microsoft xbox user swears.
76	black friday xbox deal cyber monday sale review	The Xbox Black Friday Deal sales report.	The black Friday deal cyberlundi xbox sales balance.	The black Friday xbox deal cyberlundi balance of sales.
76	microshafted microsoft apologizes xbox problem free game	Microshafted microsoft s' apologies for the gameplay.	Microshafted microsoft s' excuse for the game without problems xbox.	Microshafted microsoft s' excuse for the game without xbox problems.
76	people history xbox playstation wii console generation	History of the Xbox Playstation wii-generation console.	History of the people Xbox Playstation wii console generation.	History of Xbox Playstation wii console generation people.
76	microsoft xbox cost build sony	Built Microsoft xbox building costs sony sony.	Microsoft xbox building costs sony sony built.	Microsoft xbox cost of building sony sony built.
76	teardown peg microsoft xbox bom manufacturing cost	Microsoft Xbox bom chip manufacturing costs.	The cost of making the xbox bom microsoft chip.	Cost of microsoft xbox bom chip manufacturing.
76	microsoft acknowledges xbox problem disc drive	Microsoft does recognize the problem with the xbox drive.	Microsoft recognizes the xbox drive problem.	Microsoft recognizes the xbox disc drive problem.
76	gaming indie game	Playing l' indie, c' is playing l' indie.	To play at l' indie, c' is to play at the game of l' indie.	Playing poker; indie poker, c' is playing the game of l' indie.
76	uk xbox child account creation issue fixable support report	If you want to create a D&apos account, you will be able to create an Adjustable Support Report.	The creation of a D&apos account; child uk xbox gives rise to an adjustable support report.	Creating apos; a d' child uk xbox account results in a support report that can be adjusted.
76	xbox sell unit hour tie	Xbox Sell Hourly Unit Tie.	Xbox sell time tie unit hour.	Xbox sell hour hour tie unit.
76	xbox disc drive issue	Xbox Disk Drive Problems.	Xbox disk drive problem.	Xbox disc drive problem!
76	video game system king	Video game systems king.	The king of the video game systems.	The king of video game systems.
76	xbox smartphone finally visualized pic	The photo has finally been shown on the Xbox smartphone.	The Xbox smartphone has finally visualized the photo.	The Xbox smartphone finally visualized the photo.
76	microsoft ban xbox user swearing	Microsoft xbox users are not allowed to swear to anything.	Swearing by xbox microsoft users is prohibited.	No swearing by xbox microsoft users.
76	microsoft punishes xbox gamers dirty	Microsoft will punish xbox players badly.	And Microsoft punishes xbox players badly.	Microsoft punishes xbox players bad.
76	microsoft sell xbox console launch day	Microsoft sells the Xbox console on the day of the launch.	Microsoft sells the Xbox console launch day.	Microsoft sells Xbox console launch day console.
76	bought play xbox	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Bought xbox play.	I bought xbox play.
76	future unclear gear war xbox	The future, dark, Xbox Warfare gearbox.	The future dark gears war xbox.	Future dark xbox war gear.
76	microsoft suspends xbox user swear	Microsoft suspend the' sworn xbox user.	Microsoft suspends the' xbox user under oath.	Microsoft suspends xbox user under oath.
76	xbox cost buy build	Xbox cost d' purchase of the building.	Xbox cost d' purchase construction.	Xbox cost d' purchase construction.
76	choose gaming console	Choose the game console.	You can play the game on the game console.	You choose the game console.
76	xbox black friday infographic sony playstation microsoft	Black Xbox Playstation music video on Friday.	Xbox Black Friday infographic Playstation sony microsoft.	Playstation sony microsoft black Xbox infographic Friday.
76	xbox release familiar pattern	The Xbox version of the game has a very familiar layout.	The xbox version shows a familiar scheme.	There is a familiar pattern in the xbox version.
76	xbox news disc drive problem addressed microsoft potential	The problem with the xbox news s&apos CD player is being tackled at the microsoft level.	The problem of xbox news s&apos is being tackled to the microsoft potential.	The xbox news s&apos drive problem is being tackled at the microsoft level.
76	teardown suggests xbox manufacturing cost	The landfill suggested a cost to build xbox.	The landfill suggests a cost of manufacturing Xbox.	An xbox manufacturing cost is suggested by the landfill.
76	xbox console fall short promise	The Xbox doesn't keep its promises.	The xbox console doesn't really live up to its promises.	The xbox console doesn't deliver.
76	big holiday decision xbox playstation	Big Playstation Xbox vacation decision.	This is a big Xbox Playstation vacation decision.	Playstation Xbox big holiday decision Xbox.
76	microsoft record best console launch move xbox day	Best console Microsoft Xbox day xbox motion launch console ever.	Microsoft record best console game Xbox day xbox motion launches.	Microsoft record best console launch motion xbox day xbox.
76	xbox defective console	This is a faulty Xbox console.	Defective Xbox console.	Xbox console malfunction.
76	xbox sale winning console war	Xbox Dirty Winning War Console.	Xbox dirty winning war console.	Xbox dirty winning console war.
76	microsoft sell xbox unit twenty hour	Microsoft Sell xbox Unit 20 hours.	Microsoft sell the xbox unit 20 hours.	Microsoft sell xbox unit 20 hours.
76	xbox review spec news microsoft pay sony	Xbox update microsoft payment sony specials.	Xbox review the new special microsoft payment sony sony.	Xbox review the new microsoft sony payment special.
76	halo arrive xbox	Halo comes xbox.	Halo's coming xbox.	And Halo is coming in xbox.
76	microsoft responds xbox disc drive death complaint	Microsoft will respond to any complaints of death from your xbox drive.	Microsoft responds to death complaints from the xbox drive.	Microsoft responds to xbox drive death complaints.
76	xbox comparing gen launch	Xbox Comparing Gen Launch.	Xbox comparing the launch of gen.	Xbox comparing gen launch.
76	future xbox	Future, xbox.	To the future, xbox.	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
76	albert penello talk xbox sale future console	Albert Penello is the name of the upcoming Xbox Dirty console.	Albert Penello talks about xbox dirty future console.	Albert Penello speak Xbox future console dirty.
76	microsoft defect small number console	A small, microsoft, digital console defect.	Small microsoft digital console defect.	Microsoft defect small digital console.
76	best best year	Best Year of the Year in the Best Year of the Year.	Best year in the best year of the year; year.	Best year of the best best year in the year.
76	microsoft acknowledges xbox disc drive issue	Microsoft does recognize the problem with the xbox drive.	Microsoft recognizes the problem of xbox drive.	Microsoft recognizes the xbox drive problem.
76	uk software chart xbox dominates	Uk Xbox Software Card dominates.	Uk Xbox software card dominates.	Xbox uk software card dominates.
76	xbox owner rage hdmi snafu judders brit euro telly	Xbox owner hdmi snafu hdmi rage judges brit euro TVly.	Xbox owner rage hdmi snafu brit euro TVly judges brit.	Xbox owner rage hdmi snafu judges brit euro TVly.
76	microsoft sony shatter sale console	Microsoft's solution for sound loss sales.	Microsoft console for sound loss sales.	Microsoft console for the sale at a loss of sound.
76	microsoft small profit margin xbox hardware	Microsoft Small Material Margin xbox Profit Margin.	Microsoft's small profit margin xbox's small profit margin.	Microsoft small material profit margin xbox profit margin.
76	xbox error bricking xbone	Xbox brick xbone xbone xbone error.	Error xbox brick xbone xbone xbone.	Error xbox brick xbone xbone.
76	teardown reveals xbox cost	The dump shows the xbox's cost.	The dump shows the cost of the xbox.	The dumpster shows the cost of the xbox system.
76	xbox lift launch pad	Plate-is a platform for launching Xbox lift.	Plate-form of launch of the Xbox lift.	Plate-Xbox lift launch form.
76	xbox user banned swearing	L&apos, an xbox user, has banned cursing.	L' xbox user has banned swearing.	L' xbox user banned swearing.
76	microsoft free game owner xbox hardware problem	Hardware problem for the owner of the xbox free software game.	Hardware problem for the xbox free game owner.	Hardware problem of free game owner microsoft xbox.
76	report xbox cost build	Indicate the cost of building the new xbox.	Indicate the building cost of xbox.	Indicate the cost of xbox build.
76	xbox disc drive break free game	Xbox disc player breaks free game.	The xbox disc player breaks the free game.	The free game is broken by the xbox disc player.
76	ihs xbox console teardown reveals microsoft loss	Tardown console ihs xbox reveals the loss of microsoft.	Ihs xbox console teardown reveals the loss of microsoft.	The ihs xbox console teardown reveals the loss of microsoft.
76	xbox perfect box	Xbox Box Perfect box.	Xbox box box perfect box.	Xbox box perfect box.
76	swearing xbox upload studio banned	Swear that the d&apos studio; xbox- upload is not allowed.	Swear that the d&apos studio; xbox upload is prohibited.	Swear that the xbox upload studio d&apos is forbidden.
76	microsoft step fau xbox console	Microsoft's step-by-step Xbox console.	The Xbox microsoft step-by-step rewire console.	The Xbox console from microsoft step by step.
76	xbox online feature	The Online Xbox feature.	The online xbox.	The online xbox function.
76	uk xbox sale double xbox launch week	Uk xbox double-week Xbox launch sale.	Sell uk xbox double week of launch xbox double.	Double launch week uk xbox uk xbox sale double xbox.
76	free xbox game defective console	It's a good way to play the game.	Faulty console for free Xbox game.	Faulty console for the free game Xbox.
76	xbox customer hardware problem free game	Xbox customer problem hardware game with no problems without any problems of free game.	Xbox client hardware game problem without problems without free game problem.	Xbox customer hardware game problem no problem without free game problem.
76	xbox sell day sale	Xbox Sell Day Sale.	Xbox to sell day sale.	Xbox sell day sale.
76	microsoft learning xbox	Intelligent Xbox Xbox Microsoft Learning.	Learn xbox xbox microsoft learning.	Xbox microsoft learning xbox.
76	news broken xbox problem resolved physical violence free	The problem of the xbox has solved the problem of physical violence without physical violence.	The xbox problem has solved physical violence without physical violence.	The xbox problem solved physical violence without physical violence.
76	xbox controller design contest	Xbox Controller Design Contest.	Contest for xbox controller design.	This is an xbox controller design contest.
76	xbox hit doom fau	Xbox punched Doom fau.	Xbox hit Doom fau.	Xbox hit doom fau.
76	xbox great voice functionality guide kinect command	Xbox great Voice Guide Kinect command feature.	Xbox great voice-guide and kinect command feature.	Xbox great voice guide kinect command functionality.
76	microsoft ship kinect window developer preview kit	Pre-Visualization Kit for the Development of Ship Microsoft Kinect Windows.	Pre-visualization kit for ship's microsoft kinect window development.	Pre-Visualization for the development of microsoft ship kinect windows.
76	xbox machine game	The Xbox Machine Game.	The game of the xbox machine.	The xbox machine game.
76	xbox sell unit hour	Xbox Sell Unit Hour Unit Unit.	Xbox sell unit hour hour unit.	Xbox sell unit hour unit.
76	teardown xbox reveal tight margin	And the Xbox is unassembled, revealing a tight margin.	The disassembled Xbox is a tight one.	The disassembled Xbox shows a tight margin for the game.
76	microsoft record xbox sold hour	Microsoft Xbox Hourly Record Sold.	Microsoft xbox hourly sales record.	Microsoft record xbox sold hourly.
76	gift guide xbox disappoint gamers	Xbox Gift Guide - disappointing gamers.	Xbox Gift Guide let gamers down.	Xbox gift guide disappoint gamers.
76	xbox release arrives disc drive error force microsoft respond	The xbox output comes disk d' force error microsoft answer.	The xbox output arrives disc d' force microsoft error respond.	Xbox output arrives disk d' error force microsoft answer.
76	xbox kinect dictionary understand	The xbox Kinect Dictionary includes.	The xbox kinect dictionary also includes the xbox kernel.	The xbox kinect dictionary includes.
76	microsoft close eye analytics xbox	Microsoft Closed Eye Analysis xbox.	Microsoft analysis of closed eyes xbox.	Microsoft analysis of xbox closed-eye files.
76	halo xbox launch microsoft explains	Halo xbox launches microsoft.	Halo xbox microsoft launches explains it.	Halo xbox launch microsoft explains how to do it.
76	xbox online mu iplayer gaming currently unavailable uk	Xbox Online mu iplayer games currently unavailable uk.	Xbox online games mu iplayer currently unavailable uk currently.	Xbox online mu iplayer games currently unavailable uk.
76	xbox tv integration suffering tech problem uk europe	It's a technical problem that you'll have to deal with in Europe.	Xbox tv integration is a technical problem in Europe.	The xbox tv integration suffers from apos; a technical problem uk europe.
76	gamespot staff gen console choice	The room was very clean and the bathroom was very clean and comfortable.	Choice of gamespot staff gen console.	Gamespot staff gen console choice.
76	xbox playstation release success depends gamers	Playstation Xbox is a game based on the Playstation Xbox gameplay.	The success of the Playstation Xbox release depends on who is playing the game.	Playstation Xbox's success depends on the players.
76	xbox reason tv long start error	Xbox reason tv long, long, bootable error.	Xbox reason tv long boot error long.	Xbox reason tv long error long boot.
76	microsoft sell xbox console launch day	Microsoft sells the Xbox console on the day of the launch.	Microsoft sells the Xbox console launch day.	Microsoft sells Xbox console launch day console.
76	xbox playstation	Playstation Xbox.	Xbox playstation.	It's called Xbox Playstation.
76	xbox upload studio user temporarily banned	L' user of the xbox&apos studio; upload xbox has been temporarily banned.	L' user of the studio d' upload xbox temporarily prohibited.	L' d&apos studio user; xbox upload temporarily banned.
76	hryb microsoft listening feedback	Microsoft Hryb at l' listen.	Hryb microsoft at l' listen.	Hryb microsoft at l&apos.
76	microsoft replace fau xbox gaming console	Microsoft is replacing the Xbox fau game console.	Microsoft replaces the fau Xbox game console.	Microsoft will replace the Xbox fau game console.
76	problem xbox	Xbox problem xbox problem xbox problem xbox problem.	Xbox problem xbox problem.	Xbox problem xbox problem.
76	halo prioritised xbox launch installment phil spencer	Halo has given priority to the Xbox Phil Spencer Xbox launch facility.	The xbox launch facility Phil Spencer was given priority by Halo.	Halo prioritized the apos; xbox launch facility phil Spencer.
76	xbox fau disc drive issue acknowledged microsoft	The problem with the xbox hard drive has been recognized as microsoft.	The xbox fau disk drive problem was recognized as microsoft.	The xbox fau disc drive problem has been recognized as microsoft.
76	travel time amazing nintendo skin xbox	The Nintendo Xbox Nintendo Xbox Nintendo is the perfect place to stay for your next trip.	The incredible travel time nintendo skin xbox nintendo.	The amazing nintendo skin xbox nintendo travel time.
76	swear xbox upload studio microsoft ban hammer	I swear xbox microsoft studio upload microsoft hammer hammer.	I swear xbox upload studio microsoft bawl hammer.	I swear xbox upload studio microsoft hammer hammer.
76	uk xbox user suffering tv integration issue	Uk xbox user with tv problems and apos; integration problems.	Uk xbox user suffering tv problem d' integration problem.	Uk xbox user suffering tv problem d' integration problem.
76	xbox uk launch outsells xbox	The uk xbox launch sells better than the xbox launch.	The launch of xbox uk sells better than the launch of xbox.	The xbox uk launch sells better than the xbox.
76	microsoft responds disc drive problem xbox	Microsoft is a solution to the xbox drive problem.	Microsoft addresses xbox problem xbox disk drive problem.	Microsoft solves xbox drive problem xbox problem.
76	xtravision revers policy xbox pre order	D&apos policy; xtravision xbox pre-inversion pre-command.	Xtravision xbox pre policy-command.	Policy d' xtravision xbox pre inversion-command.
76	xbox smash launch day sale mark	Xbox dunk day of launch mark of sale day of launch.	Xbox smash launch day mark of the sale day of launch.	Xbox smash launch day mark of sale launch day.
76	xbox mini printing level	Xbox mini-level printer.	Xbox mini level d' printing.	Xbox mini level d&apos.
76	call duty ghost embraced xbox owner	Call phantom kiss kissed xbox owner.	Call ghost duty kissed owner xbox.	Call duty ghost kissed owner xbox.
76	microsoft xbox gamers suspended cursing crackdown	The Xbox microsoft players have suspended the repression by swearing.	Microsoft xbox players have suspended swearing repression.	The xbox microsoft gamers have suspended their swearing-based repression.
76	xbox sell unit day	Xbox Sell unit day unit unit sales.	Xbox sell unit day unit unit of sale.	Xbox sell unit day unit unit sale.
76	xbox sale surpass st day	Sales of Xbox have exceeded the first day.	The sales of xbox have exceeded the first day.	Xbox sales exceeded day one.
76	xbox review	Xbox review.	Xbox.	It's an xbox magazine.
76	microsoft team nfl xbox feature	The xbox function of the xbox microsoft team.	The xbox function of l' team microsoft nfl xbox.	The xbox function of l&apos.com; microsoft team nfl xbox.
76	xbox fau blu ray drive fixed hitting console	Xbox fau blu rad drive drive fixed typing console.	Xbox fau blu ray drive station typing console.	Xbox fau blu ray drive fixed type-console.
76	upcoming xbox game montage best	It's the best game you'll ever see in a game.	The best game montage of xbox to come.	The best xbox game montage yet to come.
76	microsoft sell xbox console hour	Microsoft Sell Xbox Console Hour.	Microsoft Sell Xbox console hour.	Microsoft sell Xbox console hour.
76	closer xbox capable kinect	The Xbox-capable kinect is nearer than the Xbox-capable kernel.	Closer, the xbox-capable kinect is close.	Closer, the xbox capable kinect is close.
76	defective xbox guarantee free launch title	If you have a faulty xbox, you'll get a free license to launch the game.	A faulty xbox ensures you get a free launch title.	Faulty xbox ensures a free launch title.
76	uk sale chart fifa ryses tearaway debut	U.K. sales chart-U. FIFA owes its beginnings as far as the eye can see.	Sales diagram in the UK-Uni FIFA ruys its beginnings as far as the eye can see.	Sales chart in the UK-Uni FIFA is as far as the eye can see.
76	xbox fifa top uk format gaming chart	Xbox fifa top uk graphic format of graphics game.	Xbox fifa top uk graphics game format.	Xbox fifa top uk format graphic game.
76	microsoft signed japanese devs unannounced game coming	A Japanese game, signed by microsoft, is now on its way.	A Japanese game by microsoft comes to improv.	A Japanese game signed by microsoft arrives at l' improviser.
76	playstation xbox best gamers	The Best Playstation Xbox Gamers.	The best Playstation Xbox gamers.	The best gamers in the Playstation Xbox.
76	xbox disc drive issue acknowledged microsoft	Microsoft recognized the problem with the xbox drive.	The xbox drive problem has been recognized by the microsoft.	The xbox drive problem has been recognized by microsoft.
76	xbox kinect sensor universal remote	Universal Remote Xbox Kinect Sensor.	Universal remote Xbox kinect sensor.	Universal Xbox kinect sensor remotely.
76	ssd upgrade xbox speed reliability	The DSV improves the reliability of the speed of the xbox.	DFS enhances the reliability of xbox speed.	DFS improves xbox speed reliability.
76	xbox sale shifting fast uk microsoft reach rest	Xbox dirty quickly changes microsoft uk to rest.	Xbox dirty quickly changes uk microsoft reaching the rest.	Xbox dirty quickly changes uk microsoft reach rest.
76	microsoft losing money xbox	Microsoft loses l' silver xbox.	Microsoft is losing a lot of money; money xbox.	Microsoft's losing l' money xbox.
76	xbox designed incredibly powerful gen console bui	Xbox makes the gen console incredibly powerful.	Xbox designed incredibly powerful bui gen console powerful.	Xbox designed incredibly powerful gen console bui powerful.
76	xbox dashboard currently absolute rubbish	Xbox Dashboard is actually a total piece of crap.	Xbox Dashboard currently absolutely absolute crap.	Xbox dashboard currently absolute shit.
76	microsoft admits xbox console fau disc drive	Microsoft accepts the fau disk of the xbox console.	Microsoft will accept the fau disc of the console.	The fau disc of the xbox console is accepted by Microsoft.
76	xbox sensitive user expectation	L' waiting for l' xbox-sensitive user.	L' waiting for l' user sensitive to xbox.	L' waiting for l' xbox sensitive user.
76	xbox disc drive broken	L&apos, the Xbox Disk Drive, is broken.	L' Xbox disk drive is broken.	L' Xbox drive is broken.
76	xbox full japanese game coming announced	The complete Japanese game of Xbox is about to be announced.	The complete Japanese game of the xbox will be announced.	The full game of the xbox will be announced.
76	ten best gen game xbox	Best Gen Xbox game ever.	Best game of gen xbox.	Best game of gen xbox.
76	watch language microsoft watching xbox user banned	Xbox users are not allowed to use the xbox Xbox microsoft monitoring language.	The xbox microsoft monitoring language will not be used by xbox users.	The monitoring language microsoft xbox is forbidden to xbox users.
76	xbox ban resu excessive profanity	I don't know if you'll be able to do that.	Xbox banish resu blasphemy excessive.	Xbox ban resu blasphemy excessive.
76	xbox upload studio user banned swearing	L' user of d&apos studio; upload xbox prohibits cursing.	L' user of the d&apos studio; xbox upload prohibits swearing.	L' studio user d' upload xbox prohibits cursing.
76	xbox game	Xbox game.	Xbox-game.	Hey, Xbox game.
76	microsoft xbox soar unit hour	Xbox microsoft s' Flies to apos; Unit Time.	Xbox microsoft s' takes off at l' unit time.	Xbox microsoft s' flight to unit time.
76	microsoft admits xbox disc drive issue	Microsoft recognizes that there is a problem with the xbox drive.	Microsoft recognizes an xbox drive problem.	Microsoft admits an xbox drive problem.
76	xbox news microsoft offer free game fau console banning	Xbox microsoft news offer free fau console game ban.	Xbox microsoft news offer free game fau console ban.	Xbox news microsoft offer free game game fau console banner.
76	xbox uk tv unwatchable frame rate blame	Xbox uk tv also blames the rate of d' invisible images.	Xbox uk tv blames the high level of pixels.	Xbox uk tv blames apo rate; invisible images.
76	xbox match playstation launch day sale user report fau	Xbox match playstation launches day of sale report fau user fau.	Xbox match playstation launch day sale report fau fau fau report.	Xbox match playstation launch day sale report fau fau user.
76	game console compare	It's a good way to compare.	Game console compare and contrast.	Game console compare compare.
76	xbox midnight launch officially start console war	The launch of the Xbox at midnight is the official start of the war on the Xbox.	The Xbox launch at midnight officially begins the war with the console.	The midnight Xbox launch officially begins the console war.
76	microsoft huge xbox	Huge Microsoft xbox.	Microsoft huge xbox, please.	Microsoft huge xbox.
76	initial thought microsoft xbox	Originally thought of as an xbox-based microsoft.	Originally thought of xbox microsoft.	Initially thought microsoft xbox.
76	xbox command spot uk sale chart	Xbox orders uk uk spot sales table uk.	Xbox orders spot uk uk sales table uk.	Xbox orders spot uk uk sales chart uk.
76	xbox pull sale fau	Xbox Draw Xbox re-sale re-sale.	Xbox draw sale reu sale reu sale.	Xbox pull re-sale re-sale.
76	gamestop black friday ad xbox	This is the first gameplay game of the year.	Gamestop black Friday ad xbox.	Gamestop black Friday ad xbox.
76	xbox launch smash previous sale record	The release of the Xbox was the first of its kind in the history of the game.	The launch of the Xbox breaks the previous sales record.	The Xbox launch broke the previous record for sales.
76	uk chart xbox release boost fifa	Uk chart xbox release is a good way to keep track of the game.	Uk chart xbox release boost fifa.	Uk chart xbox release boost fifa release.
76	xbox respect authority guide xbox voice command	Xbox Xbox Voice Control Xbox Respect Authority.	L&apos guide; xbox xbox respect authority, xbox voice command.	L&apos guide; xbox xbox respect authority xbox voice command xbox.
76	troy wolverton xbox playstation manage underwhelm	Troy Wolverton Xbox Playstation manages below the threshold.	Troy Wolverton Xbox Playstation manages below the threshold.	Troy Wolverton Xbox Playstation will manage below the threshold.
76	xbox skype streaming apps ban user swearing	Streaming applications from Skype xbox do not allow users to swear.	The Skype xbox streaming applications forbid users to swear.	Skype xbox streaming applications don't allow swearing.
76	xbox sale top worldwide day	C&apos is the world's largest and best-selling xbox player.	C' is the world top selling xbox.	C&apos is the world's top xbox seller.
76	worrying xbox hardware failure	Worrying about the Xbox Xbox hardware failure.	Worrying about hardware failure in the xbox.	Worrying about xbox hardware failure.
76	top wii game console holiday shopping season	Top wii Christmas shopping console game.	Top wii console game of Christmas shopping season.	Top wii game console Christmas shopping season.
76	kotaku xbox	Xbox kotaku.	Kotaku, Xbox.	I don't know.
76	fifa xbox graphic engine power future sport title	FIFA Xbox graphics engine future sports title power.	FIFA Xbox graphics engine power future power sports title.	FIFA Xbox graphics engine power future sports title.
76	xbox achievement people selling ebay	Accomplishments xbox salespeople selling ebay.	Achievement xbox people selling ebay.	Achievement x people selling ebay xbox.
76	user malfunctioning xbox compensated free game	The malfunction of l' user xbox has been compensated free game.	The malfunction of l' xbox user compensated free game play.	The malfunction of l' user xbox compensated free game compensated.
76	microsoft xbox sale surpass hour	It's too late to sell Microsoft Xbox.	The sale of Microsoft Xbox is out of date.	Microsoft Xbox sale exceeds the deadline.
76	xbox outsell xbox uk week	Xbox is selling better than the Weekly Xbox uk.	Xbox sells more than the xbox uk Week.	Xbox sells better than xbox uk Week.
76	xbox disc drive issue anger microsoft fan	Xbox drives cause the wrath of the microsoft fan.	The wrath of the microsoft fan is caused by the xbox drive.	The xbox disc player causes the microsoft fan anger.
76	xbox console	Xbox console.	Xbox console!	You console xbox.
76	xbox kinect cost manufacture controller cost report	Xbox kinect manufacturing cost ratio cost controller.	Cost ratio xbox kinect cost controller xbox.	Manufacturing cost ratio xbox kinect cost controller.
76	xbox release news microsoft offer free game fau system apology	Xbox release microsoft news provide fau game system system excuses free system game.	Xbox release microsoft news offer free system game fau game system excuses.	Xbox release news microsoft offer excuses system game fau game free system.
76	free xbox game broken disc drive	Broken Xbox Game Disc Player for free.	Broken disc player from the free Xbox game.	Free broken disc player from the Xbox game.
76	cod ghost xbox graphic	Graphical Cod Ghost xbox.	Graphic Ghost xbox Cod, please.	Cod Ghost xbox graphics.
76	microsoft learning xbox	Intelligent Xbox Xbox Microsoft Learning.	Learn xbox xbox microsoft learning.	Xbox microsoft learning xbox.
76	xbox owner disc drive problem free game download	Download the game from the original Xbox disc player without any problems.	Unload game with no problem from the xbox disc player owner.	Problem-free game download from the proprietary xbox disc player.
76	forza motorsport best selling xbox exclusive uk chart	Forza motorsport best-seller xbox exclusive graphic uk.	Forza motorsport best-seller xbox exclusive graphic uk.	Forza motorsport best-seller xbox exclusive uk graphics.
76	ea cut price game downloads higher xbox	You can also download a game from the Xbox.	Discount game downloads more xbox.	A discounted game downloads more than the xbox.
76	fifa xbox current gen difference	FIFA xbox currently running gen difference of current.	FIFA xbox current gen current difference.	FIFA xbox current gen difference current.
76	xbox selling strong uk microsoft europe	Xbox is a good place to start a new game.	Xbox will sell strong uk microsoft europe strong.	Xbox sale strong uk microsoft europe strong.
76	microsoft offer offline system update diagnostic tool xbox	Offline microsoft diagnostic xbox system upgrade tool.	Offer microsoft offline diagnostic tool to update the xbox system.	Offline Microsoft diagnostic tool xbox update system.
76	xbox news release launch exclusive reviewed	Exclusive review of the release of the release of the xbox press release.	Exclusive review of the launch of the xbox press release.	Exclusive review of xbox press release release launch.
76	xbox smartglass playstation app battle second screen	The Xbox Smartglass Playstation app Battle 2nd screen.	Xbox Smartglass Playstation app Battle Second screen.	Xbox Smartglass Playstation app Battle second screen.
76	microsoft sign japanese devs xbox game	It's called the Japanese microsoft sign, devs xbox game.	The Japanese microsoft sign devs xbox game.	Japanese microsoft sign devs xbox game.
76	microsoft struggle meet xbox demand	Microsoft wrestling software meets the demands of xbox.	Microsoft wrestling meets the demands of xbox.	Xbox's demand for microsoft wrestling is being met.
76	xbox hot debut console war rev	Xbox start hot console war rev.	Xbox hot debut console war rev.	Xbox hot debut console war rev.
76	xbox kinect voice gesture cheat sheet released	The cheat sheet xbox kinect voice gesture has been released.	The xbox kinect voice gesture cheat sheet has now been released.	The xbox kinect voice gesture cheat sheet was released.
76	harmony remote compatible xbox	It's the perfect Xbox to work with.	A remotely compatible and harmonious Xbox.	Remote compatible and harmonious Xbox.
76	review xbox great game player	To review the gameplayer Xbox.	Revise big game player xbox.	Revise xbox great game player.
76	xbox live social gaming	Xbox Live Social Gaming game live.	Live social game Xbox live live.	Xbox live social game live.
76	xbox launch exclusive	Exclusive Xbox launch.	Xbox launch exclusively.	Xbox exclusive launching.
76	report xbox sold microsoft claim	The Xbox Report has sold the microsoft claim.	Xbox Report sold microsoft claim.	Report xbox sold microsoft claim.
76	xbox start watching language	Xbox starts looking at the language.	Xbox starts looking at the language.	Xbox is starting to look at the language now.
76	xbox beat sale record apple patent motion control video	Xbox beats record selling patented motion video-control apple patent.	Xbox beat apple patent-patented motion video control record sale.	Xbox beats sale record apple patented motion control video.
76	microsoft xbox sale	Xbox Microsoft sales.	Sale of Xbox Microsoft.	Selling of the microsoft Xbox.
76	xbox tv integration broken europe tv expert claim	It's a good idea to have a little more of the same.	Xbox tv broken europe tv integration claims from the expert.	Xbox tv integration broken europe tv claim from Expert.
76	good reason xbox cost	That's why xbox costs a lot of money, man.	Good xbox reason cost money.	Good reason xbox cost money.
76	xbox alert launch day title	The name of the day of the launch of l&apos.	The title of the launch day of l' alert xbox.	The launch day title of l' xbox alert.
76	xbox release spec news microsoft sale match sony	Xbox announces special microsoft sale, match sony sony.	Xbox releases special microsoft sale match sony sony news.	Xbox announces special microsoft sale match sony sony.
76	microsoft sell xbox console hour	Microsoft Sell Xbox Console Hour.	Microsoft Sell Xbox console hour.	Microsoft sell Xbox console hour.
76	xbox worth playstation	Xbox is like a Playstation game.	Xbox is Playstation.	Xbox is worth playstation.
76	xbox problem worsen smoking console green screen death	The Xbox problem aggravates the death of l&apos, a smoky green-screen console.	The problem of Xbox aggravates the death of l' green screen of the smoky console.	The Xbox problem aggravates the death of the smoking console green screen.
76	outsells xbox ebay launch weekend	Xbox ebay is sold more than the weekend-launch end of Xbox ebay.	Xbox ebay is now sold more than the Xbox ebay launch weekend.	Xbox ebay is sold more than the Xbox ebay launch weekend.
76	console war real money online	War War Console Real Money Online.	War War console real money online.	War console real money online.
76	xbox sale xbox controller review	Xbox Controller Review dirty xbox.	Xbox filthy xbox controller review.	Xbox dirty xbox controller review.
76	microsoft ban xxxxbox gamers cursing online combat	Microsoft ban xxxxbox gamers, cursing online combat.	Microsoft ban xxxxbox gamers cursing combat line.	Microsoft ban xxxxbox gamers cursing online combat.
76	xbox sold unit launch day	Xbox has sold the mobile phone unit on the launch day.	Xbox has sold the' unit on the launch day.	Xbox sold the unit on launch day.
76	microsoft xbox user disc drive issue free game	Disc player of l' user xbox microsoft delivers a free game.	The disc player of l' user xbox microsoft delivers a free game.	The microsoft xbox user disc player delivers a free game.
76	huge hit microsoft sell xbox hour	An enormous success selling xbox hour xbox sale microsoft.	A huge microsoft success selling xbox hour xbox sale.	A huge hit microsoft sell xbox hour xbox sale.
76	microsoft phil spencer talk xbox	Microsoft Phil Spencer speaks xbox.	Microsoft Phil Spencer speaks xbox.	Microsoft Phil Spencer is an xbox player.
76	xbox gamers suspended cursing crackdown	Xbox gamblers have suspended their oppressive oaths of secrecy.	All the xbox players have suspended their repressive oaths.	The xbox players suspended their repressive oaths.
76	xbox clockspeed battle sony ahead	Xbox clockspeed battlefield sony straight ahead.	Xbox clockspeed battle sony straight ahead.	Xbox clockspeed battle sony straight ahead.
76	microsoft ban potty mouthed xbox owner xbox live	Microsoft proprietary Xbox Xbox Xbox Live jar ban.	Microsoft ban jar owner xbox Xbox Live.	Microsoft ban jar mouth owner xbox live xbox.
76	xbox upload studio user banned excessive profanity	L' user of the d&apos studio; xbox user upload has forbidden excessive rudeness.	L&apos user of the studio xbox upload xbox has forbidden excessive rudeness.	L' user of the studio d' xbox upload banned excessive rudeness.
76	xbox microsoft cloud gaming device finally hit shelf	The Xbox Xbox Microsoft game is now available on the Xbox and Xbox Xbox.	L' Xbox microsoft games device is finally on the shelf.	Xbox microsoft games device is finally on the shelf.
76	microsoft sell xbox console opening day	Microsoft releases the Xbox Console D&apos, the first of its kind.	Microsoft sells Xbox console day d' openings.	Microsoft sells Xbox console opening day d&apos.
76	uk chart fifa top xbox launch	Uk chart FIFA is a freeware application.	Uk chart FIFA top Xbox launch.	Uk chart FIFA top xbox launch.
76	xbox arrives work	Xbox is coming to work.	Xbox comes into work.	Xbox arrives at work.
76	check full list kinect voice command	Verify the complete list of all the commands for vocal kinectin.	Please check the complete list of vocal kinectin commands.	Check the complete list of kinectin voice commands.
76	microsoft sell xbox hour	Sale of xboxhours xboxhours xboxhours.	Xbox microsoft xbox hour xbox hour sale.	Xbox hour xbox hour microsoft sale.
76	win produce nuc chassis bui microsoft kinect	Earn to produce the Bui microsoft kinect nuc chassis.	Earn to produce chassis bui microsoft kinect nuch.	Produce chassis bui microsoft kinect nuc.
76	microsoft break sale record xbox	Xbox is the record selling microsoft.	The record selling microsoft is the xbox.	The microsoft record is xbox.
76	xbox fau console owner offered free game microsoft	Xbox fau consoles are available for free.	Free free Xbox fau console microsoft game.	Xbox fau console owner offered free microsoft game.
76	microsoft decision halo xbox launch	Decision Halo Microsoft Xbox is released.	Launch of the Microsoft Decision Halo Xbox.	Launch of the Decision Halo microsoft Xbox.
76	microsoft admits xbox hardware failure	Microsoft recognizes that there may be some hardware failure in the xbox.	Microsoft allows hardware failure in the xbox.	Microsoft admits an xbox hardware failure.
76	xbox console sale top day microsoft video	Xbox console selling high-end microsoft video.	Xbox console is a high-end, high-end, microsoft video console.	Xbox console sale of high-end microsoft video.
76	quick xbox grinding noise death	Xbox grind fast dead noise.	Xbox fast grind dead noise.	Xbox fast grinds noise dead.
76	xbox user banned swearing uploads skype	L' user of xbox forbidden to swear puts online skype.	L' xbox user forbidden to swear puts online skype.	L&apos xbox user prohibits swearing puts skype online.
76	xbox disc drive blue microsoft acknowledges small number	The Blue Microsoft Xbox Disc Player recognizes a small number.	The microsoft blue xbox disc player recognizes a small number.	The blue microsoft xbox disc player recognizes only a small number.
76	xbox match sony day sale	Xbox game is the only game available.	Xbox match sale sony sale sale day sale.	Xbox sale match sony sale day sale.
76	xbox kinect cheat sheet list gesture voice command	Xbox kinect voice gestural command checklist.	Cheating list xbox kinect gestural voice command.	Voice gestural control xbox kinect cheat list.
76	xbox price cut	Discount xbox.	Reduced xbox price.	Reduced xbox prices.
76	voice command detailed explained	I'll explain the speech command in detail.	The command of voice explained in detail.	The voice command explained in detail.
76	xbox release microsoft offer free game buyer buggy	Xbox release microsoft offers free purchaser buggy game free buggy game.	Xbox release microsoft offers free game purchase buggy buggy game.	Xbox release microsoft offers free buggy buggy game buyer game.
77	chest pain woman heart attack	Chest pain, heart attack.	Chest pain female heart attack.	Chest pain, woman heart attack heart attack.
77	woman experiencing heart attack symptom	Female, male, female, male, female, female, female, male.	Female showing symptoms of heart attack.	Female with heart attack symptoms.
77	study report chest pain woman unreliable indicator heart attack	It is important to note, however, that these findings are not consistent with the findings of other studies.	The study reports chest pain in a woman who has not been diagnosed as a reliable indicator of a heart attack.	The study found that chest pain is not a reliable indicator of heart attack in a woman who has not been diagnosed.
77	heart attack chest pain fatal	Heart attack, terminal chest pain.	Heart attack, fatal chest pain.	Heart attack, chest pain fatal.
77	difference chest pain men woman	Difference thoracic pain, male, female.	Difference in chest pain, male, female.	Difference of chest pain male female.
77	study woman misdiagnosed doctor heart attack symptom	The woman's study misdiagnosed the doctor's symptoms of the heart attack.	The woman from the study has misdiagnosed the symptoms of the heart attack at the doctor.	The woman from the study misdiagnosed symptoms of the heart attack in the doctor.
77	heart attack	Stroke.	Heart attack.	A heart attack.
77	heart alert young hispanic woman	Hispanic female cardiac alert.	Uh, cardiac alert, young Hispanic woman.	Heart alert young Hispanic woman.
77	study heart attack pain sex	Study the pain of a heart attack sex pain.	I mean, studying heart attack pain sex pain pain pain.	Studying heart attack pain sex pain pain.
77	difference heart attack pain men woman	Males differ in heart attack.	Different heart attack pain men women.	Different heart attack pain men women.
77	heart attack chest pain woman men	Cardiac Attack Cardiac Pain Female Male Male Cardiac Pain.	Heart attack - chest pain - female - male - male - male.	Heart attack chest pain Female Male Male Male.
77	venus mar chest pain	Chest pain.	Venus, chest pain, chest pain.	Venus mar chest pain.
77	woman heart attack symptom men	Female heart attack... symptomatic male.	Symptomatic female heart attack male.	Female heart attack symptomatic male.
77	chest pain trait identify mi woman	Chest pain identifies my wife.	Chest pain identifies my wife's condition.	The chest pain identifies my wife.
77	type pain help ing mi woman	Pain helps my wife.	The pain of a guy helps my wife.	Guy's pain really helps my wife.
77	chest pain factor diagnosing heart attack	Chest pain factor that diagnoses a heart attack.	This is a chest pain factor diagnosing a heart attack.	Chest pain factor diagnosing heart attack.
77	chest pain woman lot men	Breast pain, a lot of women, men.	Pain of the chest woman a lot of men.	Breast pain woman a lot of men.
77	woman suffered chest pain ac	She has been diagnosed with a history of chest pain.	One woman suffered from chest pain.	One woman suffered chest pain.
77	woman chest pain unreliable sign heart attack	Female chest pain, unreliable means heart attack.	Unreliable female chest pain indicates heart attack.	Female chest pain unreliable means heart attack.
77	finding supportive woman specific chest pain symptom heart attack	Find a woman-specific support for chest pain, symptom of a heart attack.	Find chest pain support specific to the woman, symptom of a heart attack.	Finding a woman-specific chest pain support, heart attack symptom.
77	evaluating characteristic chest pain early diagnosis	Evaluation of the pain of the thoracic, characteristic early diagnosis.	Assessment of chest pain characteristic early diagnosis.	Assessment of chest pain, characteristic chest pain early diagnosis.
77	heart attack chest pain men woman	Heart attack, chest pain, men, women, men.	Heart attack, chest pain, men, women.	Uh, heart attack, chest pains, men, women.
77	dr marla shapiro heart attack chest pain sex	Dr. Marla Shapiro heart attack chest pain pain sex pain.	Dr. Marla Shapiro heart attack chest pain sex pain.	Dr. Marla Shapiro heart attack chest pain sex pain.
77	woman chest pain misdiagnosed heart attack	Undiagnosed chest pain, heart attack.	Female chest pain misdiagnosed as a heart attack.	Female chest pain misdiagnosed heart attack.
77	putting heart place	Heartbreak.	Make way for the heart.	Make way for the heart now.
77	chest pain characteristic help diagnose ami woman	The characteristics of the chest pain... help to diagnose the female friend.	Characteristics of chest pain help to diagnose female friends.	Characteristics of chest pain help diagnose the friendly woman.
77	chest pain reliable indicator heart attack woman	Chest pain is a reliable indicator of a heart attack, female heart attack.	Chest pain is a reliable indicator of heart attack female heart attack.	Chest pain is reliable indicator heart attack woman heart attack.
78	girl imprisoned bedroom year arizona police	Daughter Imprisoned Bedroom Year Apos police; Arizona.	Girl Imprisoned, year-round bedroom police officer from the Apos; Arizona.	Girl imprisoned year bedroom police from l'apos; Arizona.
78	girl tucson police imprisoned year	Daughter of the Tucson Police Department in prison for a year.	Tucson police girl, in jail for a year.	Tucson police girl imprisoned for a year.
78	three girl freed tucson az year held captive cop	Three girls released Tucson Azan, a police officer who's been in captivity for over a year.	Three girls released Tucson Azan, a cop who's been in captivity for over a year.	And three girls released Tucson Azan, a cop who's been in captivity for over a year.
78	parent imprisoned girl video court morning	Imprisoned parent, young girl, video from court.	A jailed parent, a young video girl morning from court.	Imprisoned parent, young girl video from court.
78	neighbor helped save girl imprisoned year speaks	The neighbour helped to save the girl trapped in the Apos; year speaks.	The neighbor helped save the girl who was in prison; year speaks.	The neighbor helped save the girl imprisoned l'apos; year speaks.
78	teenage sister reportedly held captive arizona year	It was reported that the teenage sister was being held captive in the city of Arizona during the year.	Teenage sister was reportedly held captive in Arizona during the year.	The teenage sister was reportedly held captive in Arizona during the year.
78	parent released child imprisonment case	The Committee asks for up-dated information in the next report.	One parent was released for imprisonment; one child.	One parent was released for child imprisonment.
78	girl imprisoned arizona	Girl's in prison in Arizona.	A girl locked up in Arizona.	A girl in Arizona.
78	tucson police investigating child abuse imprisonment case	The police in Tucson are investigating a case of apos; imprisonment for ill-treatment of children.	Police in Tucson are investigating a case of child abuse imprisonment.	Tucson police are investigating a child abuse case.
78	arizona parent held girl captive year police	She is a member of the Los Angeles Police Department and is a member of the Los Angeles Police Department.	A relative of the apo; Arizona held a girl captive of the police of the apo; year.	Arizona held a girl captive in the Apos police force; year.
78	three teen rescued year captivity	Three teenagers who've been in captivity for over a year.	Three teenagers rescued in captivity over the last year.	Three teenage boys rescued in captivity in the last year alone.
78	tucson daughter held captive year	Daughter of Tucson.	Daughter of Tucson captive year?	Tucson's daughter held captive year.
78	three sister rescued arizona imprisoned parent	Three sisters rescued Arizona, a relative in prison.	Three of the sisters rescued Arizona, one of the imprisoned relatives.	Three sisters rescued Arizona, a parent in prison.
78	tucson police mother stepfather arrested child abuse case	The police's mother's father has arrested a case of ill-treatment of a child.	The beautiful-father of the Tucson police mother arrested a case of child abuse.	Handsome-father of the Tucson police mother has arrested a child abuse case.
78	girl imprisoned tucson parent jailed	Tucson's imprisoned daughter Tucson.	Imprisoned daughter, parent Tucson, jailed.	Girl imprisoned parent Tucson imprisoned prison.
78	tucson sister police imprisoned year	Tucson's sister department has been in prison for a year.	Tucson's sister police have been locked up for a year.	Tucson's sister police have been imprisoned for a year.
78	couple held three teenage girl captive fi hy malnourished	One couple has detained three adolescent captives who are chronically malnourished.	In one case, three teenage girls were held captive and suffered from chronic malnutrition.	One couple held three teenage girls captive who were chronically malnourished.
78	child held captive	Captive child.	Child being held captive.	Kid held captive.
78	tucson police parent girl face kidnapping abuse charge	The daughter d'apos; a relative of the police in Tucson is at risk of being charged with abduction with violence.	Apos' daughter; a relative of the Tucson police is at risk of being accused of kidnapping.	The daughter of a Tucson police relative is at risk of being charged with kidnapping; kidnapping with violence.
78	three girl imprisoned tucson	Three jailed girls in Tucson.	We got three girls locked up in Tucson.	Three girls imprisoned in Tucson.
78	girl imprisoned malnourished	Girl who's been jailed under-powered.	Girl trapped under fed @-@.	Girl imprisoned under-fed.
78	malnourished girl prompt investigation arrest mother stepfather	An undernourished girl immediately gets investigated and stops the beautiful maternal father.	A malnourished young girl is immediately taken to the hospital, which is the subject of an investigation and stops the beautiful maternal father.	A malnourished young girl immediately makes the scene; an investigation and stops the beautiful maternal father.
78	tpd girl malnourished fi hy imprisoned year	Toronto police girl-fed and has been in jail for one year.	Toronto police girl-has been in jail for a year.	Toronto police girl under-fed and in jail for a year.
78	three young daughter claim year imprisonment abuse parent arrested	Three young girls allege that the abusive parent who was arrested has been in prison for a year.	Three young girls claim that the arrested violent parent has been in prison for over a year.	In fact, three young girls claim that the abusive parent who was arrested has been in prison for a year.
78	girl held tucson year	The girl, she held down the Tucson year.	And the girl held down the Tucson year.	The girl held the year Tucson.
78	stepfather captive tucson girl charge dropped	The beautiful-father has dropped the charges against the daughter of the captive Tucson.	The beautiful-father dropped the charges against the tucson captive girl.	Handsome-father dropped charges against the captive tucson girl.
78	child abuse stats skyrocket az	Child abuse statistics are skyrocketing.	The statistics on child abuse are skyrocketing.	Statistics on child abuse are skyrocketing.
78	three sister rescued family locked inside room	Three sisters rescued a room-locked family.	Three sisters rescued a family locked in a room last night.	Well, three sisters rescued a family locked in a room.
78	news tucson live team coverage girl held captive	New direct female captive cover team tucson.	New direct tucson cover team girl held captive.	New direct cover team girl held captive tucson direct.
78	mom stepfather arrested girl imprisoned tucson	Mummy's handsome father-has arrested the girl in Tucson prison.	Mom's beautiful-father arrested Tucson's imprisoned daughter.	Mom's beautiful-father has arrested the girl imprisoned Tucson.
78	three tucson girl held captive year	Three Tucson girls are kept in captivity for one year.	Three young Tucson girls who were kept in captivity for one year.	Three captive Tucson girls for one year.
78	reaction neighbor alleged imprisoned girl	A very similar reaction, believed to be a girl in prison.	Next-door reaction, alleged girl in prison.	Neighbor reaction alleged girl imprisoned.
78	tucson girl held captive year	The Tucson girl was retained captive the following year.	The Tucson girl was held captive the following year.	Tucson girl was held captive the following year.
78	police tucson girl imprisoned year break free	The daughter of the police of Tucson, who had been in prison for the last year, was released.	The daughter of the Tucson police jailed year s&apos is released.	The daughter of the Tucson police imprisoned year s' is released.
78	arizona sister imprisoned year	Arizona Sister was jailed for a year.	Sister Arizona went away for a year.	Sister Arizona imprisoned for a year.
78	three girl locked bedroom tucson arizona rescued	Three girls locked up in the master bedroom, Arizona Tucson rescued.	And three girls locked up in Arizona Tucson's bedroom, rescued.	Arizona Tucson rescued three girls locked up in their bedrooms.
78	three girl escape year captivity	Three young girls who escaped from prison; one year in captivity.	Three girls escaped from prison; one year in captivity.	Three escaped girls, one year in captivity.
78	three arizona sister free reportedly held captive	It was reported that three sisters of the Free Society of Apostles, Arizona, were held in captivity.	Allegedly, three free sisters of the Apos; Arizona were held in captivity.	Three sisters were reportedly held in captivity.
78	police girl held captive arizona year	A girl from the police department was held captive in the state of Arizona last year.	A police girl was held captive in a Arizona island last year.	A police girl was held captive in Arizona last year.
78	sister escape arizona horror house	Her sister, S&apos, has escaped from Apos, Arizona.	His sister s' escaped from apos; Arizona.	Her sister escaped from Arizona.
78	police tucson parent locked daughter year	The parents of the police have locked down the year of their daughter.	The Tucson parent of the police locked her daughter's year.	Police Tucson parent locked down his daughter's year.
78	three young girl claim held captive arizona	Three girls are claiming the apos; Arizona in captivity.	Three young girls claim to be the victims of the crime; Arizona, in captivity.	Three young girls claim Arizona in captivity.
78	three girl imprisoned tucson year	Three girls were incarcerated during the Tucson year.	It was the first time that a girl had been imprisoned in the United States.	Three girls were imprisoned during the year tucson.
78	tucson couple held daughter captive bedroom year police	During the year of the police bedroom, the Tucson couple kept their daughter captive.	The Tucson couple kept their daughter captive during the year of the police bedroom.	The Tucson couple held their daughter captive during the police bedroom year.
78	tucson sister imprisoned year break free reportedly	Sister Tucson has been jailed and released.	Sister Tucson jailed year of free release reported.	Sister Tucson imprisoned year of free release reported.
78	girl held captive tucson police investigating case child abuse	A young girl is being held captive by the police in Tucson investigating cases of child abuse.	A young girl being held captive by the Tucson police investigating child abuse cases.	A young girl held captive by Tucson police investigating child abuse cases.
78	imprisoned girl	Jailed girl.	Prison girl.	She's a girl in prison.
78	tucson police girl held captive year fox carolina	Tucson police girl captive fox carolina year.	Tucson Police Detained captive year fox carolina.	Daughter of the police of Tucson held captive year fox carolina.
78	tucson sister locked bedroom girl forced live fi year	Sister Tucson locked up a girl's bedroom for five years.	Sister Tucson locked up bedroom girl forced to live for 5 years.	Sister Tucson locked up bedroom girl forced to live five years.
78	three girl imprisoned parent	Three girls are parents imprisoned.	Three girls are imprisoned relatives.	And three little girls are imprisoned parents.
78	three sister held prisoner year	Three imprisoned sisters during the year.	Three sisters detained during the year.	He was sentenced to three years in prison.
79	video kim kardashian verdict bound spoof	The verdict of the video kardashian kim is a travesty.	The verdict of kim kardashian video is a travesty.	The verdict of the video kim kardashian is a travesty.
79	seth rogen james franco parody kanye west music video	Seth rogen james kanye kanye parody franco western music video.	Seth rogen james franco parody kanye western music video?	Seth rogen james franco parody kanye western music video.
79	franco rogen spoof kanye video	It's not a game.	Free rogen spoof kanye video.	Free rogen spoof kanye video game.
79	zac efron seth rogen kanye west kim kardashian bound parody	It is not possible to do this, but it is possible to do the same.	Zac efron seth rogen kanye kardashian parody linked to the kanye kardashian.	Zac efron seth rogen kanye kardashian parody linked to west.
79	zac efron seth rogen shirtless tease bound music video	Zac efron seth rogen tee-shirtless tease.com.	Zac efron seth rogen tee-shirtless tease music video bound.	Zac efron seth rogen tee-shirtless tease bound music video.
79	seth rogen james franco kimye video worth watching video	Seth rogen James franco video kimye which is worth watching video.	Seth rogen James franco video kimye that is worth watching video video.	Seth rogen James franco kimye video that's worth watching video.
79	utah cameo james franco parody kanye west video	Utah caméo james franco kanye western video parody.	Utah caméo james franco parody kanye western video.	Utah caméo james franco parody kanye video west.
79	kanye west explains bound cheese problem lookin	Kanye West explains the problem of bound cheese by looking around the house.	Kanye West explains the problem of bound cheese by looking around him.	Kanye explains the problem of bound cheese by looking around him.
79	seth rogan james franco recreate kanye west bound music video	Sethgan James franco recreates Kanye Westbound's video.	Sethgan James franco recreates the video of Kanye Westbound.	Sethgan James franco recreates the music video of Kanye Westbound.
79	kim kardashian amused bound spoof	Kim Kardashian s' she had a lot of fun doing bonded parody.	Kim Kardashian s&apos had fun doing bound parody.	Kim Kardashian s' amused in bound parody.
79	kanye west approves bound parody	Kanye West has approved of the linked parody.	Kanye West approves of parody tied to it.	Kanye west approves of the bound parody.
79	kanye west video kim kardashian supposed phony	Kanye West videos Kim Kardashian himself-saying that it's not true.	Kanye West video Kim Kardashian selves-saying false.	Kanye West video Kim Kardashian himself-saying fake.
79	kim kardashian kanye west react james franco seth rogen bound	Kim Kardashian West Kanye reacted to the news of James Franco seth rogen.	Kim Kardashian West Kanye reacts to James Franco seth rogen bound.	Kim Kardashian West Kanye reacted James franco seth rogen linked.
79	seth rogen kim kardashian shot shot parody kanye west video	Seth rogen kim kardashian shot is a kanye Western video parody.	Seth rogen kim kardashian shot parody kanye western video.	Seth rogen kim kardashian shot parody kanye video west.
79	kimye react james franco seth rogen hilarious bound	Kimye reacted to James Franco seth rogen's hilarious tie.	Kimye reaction James franco seth rogen hilarious tie.	Kimye reaction James franco seth rogen hilarious bound.
79	bound james franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim	It's a game that you can play on your computer.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kim.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kim.
79	video james franco seth rogen release parody version kanye	This is the first video version of the kanye version.	James franco seth rogen kanye version parody video kanye.	James franco seth rogen video parody version kanye kanye version.
79	kim kardashian kanye west react seth rogen james franco bound	Kanye Kanye West reacts to Seth Rodgen James franco-freedom.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West reacts to Seth Rodgen James franco-freedom.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West reacts to Seth Rodgen James franco @-@liberty.com.
79	james franco seth rogen hysterically recreate kanye bound video	James Franco seth rogen re-create the video about Kanye in a very hysterical way.	James Franco seth rogen hysterically recreate the video related to Kanye.	James franco seth rogen hysterically recreate Kanye-related video.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof kim kardashian kanye west bound	It's the only way you can get the information you need.	James franco seth rogen spoof kim kardashian kanye towards the west.	James franco seth rogen spoof kim kardashian kanye to west.
79	kim kardashian bound parody nailed	You know, Kim Kardashian is bound by the nailed parody.	Kim Kardashian bound by nailed parody.	Kim kardashian bound by the nailed parody.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kim kanye bound video	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	James franco seth rogen parody kim kanye link video.	James franco seth rogen parody kim kanye video link.
79	kim kardashian kanye west laughed hard james franco	Kim Kardashian Kanye West has been laughing at James Franco.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West laughed at James Franco's performance.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West laughed so hard about James Franco.
79	james franco seth rogen hilariously recreate kanye west bound	James Franco seth rogen, recreate in a hilarious way Kanye to the west.	James franco seth rogen recreate hilariously Kanye towards the west.	James franco seth rogen hilariously recreate Kanye to the west.
79	kim kardashian reacts bound	Kim Kardashian has been reacting in a coercive way.	Kim Kardashian reacts in a coercive way.	Kim Kardashian reacts positively.
79	video seth rogen james franco hilariously recreate kanye west	Video seth rogen james, in a hilarious way, re-create kanye west.	Video seth rogen james play hilariously recreate kanye west.	Video seth rogen james franco hilariously recreate western kanye.
79	kanye west kim kardashian love bound parody video	Kanye West kim kardashian love-bond parody video.	Kanye West kim kardashian love bond parody video.	Kanye West kim kardashian love parody video bond.
79	seth rogen topless kiss james franco hilarious spoof kim	I'm so happy for you, I'm so happy for you.	Seth rogen topless kiss james franco hilarant spoof kim kim.	Seth rogen topless kiss james franco hilarant spoof kim kim.
79	zac efron tease kim kardashian kanye west bound parody	Zac efron tease kardashian kanye parody kardashian to the west.	Zac efron tease kim kardashian kanye parodies to the west.	Zac efron tease kim kardashian kanye parodies west.
79	today news video james franco seth rogen kiss	It's the first time I've seen a movie.	Today, the new James Franco seth rogen fuck video.	Today, the new video James Franco seth rogen fuck.
79	kim kardashian ordered strip youtube topless bound	Kim Kardashian ordered topless topless band youtube.	Kim Kardashian ordered that youtube band tied topless topless.	Kim Kardashian ordered that youtube band bound topless topless.
79	james franco seth rogen lock lip parody video kanye west kim	This is the first gameplay video game to be released in the United States.	James franco seth rogen lock parody lip video kanye west kim kim.	James franco seth rogen lock lip parody video kanye kim west kim.
79	zac efron join bound parody	Zac Efron has joined the linked parody.	And Zac Efron joins the bound parody.	Zac efron joins the bound parody.
79	watch seth rogen james franco shot shot recreation kanye west	Watch Seth rogen James Franco pull West Kanye recreation.	Watching as Seth rogen James Franco pull the recreation Kanye West.	Watching seth rogen james franco pull kanye west recreation.
79	kanye west reacts bound parody james franco seth rogen spoof	Kanye West reacted with the parody of James Franco seth rogen spoof.	Kanye West reacts with James Franco seth rogen spoof's parody.	Kanye West reacts with the parody of James franco seth rogen spoof.
79	seth rogen james franco parody kanye west bound	It's the only place where you'll be able to get a good look at it.	Seth rogen james franco parody kanye to the west.	Seth rogen james franco parody kanye to west.
79	bound spoof kanye west seth rogen james franco	Kanye West fake Seth rogen James franco.	False West Kanye Seth rogen James frank.	Fake Kanye West Seth rogen James a freebie.
79	kim kardashian kanye bound music video kim responds seth	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Kim kardashian kanye linked video music kim seth respond seth.	Kim kardashian kanye linked video music kim responds seth seth.
79	kim kardashian reacts seth rogan james franco bound spoof	Kardashian reacts to Seth Rogan James franco-protester.	Kim Kardashian reacts to Seth Rogan James franco-protester.	Kim Kardashian reacts to the Seth Rogan James franco-protest.
79	kim kanye loving spoof video	Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye Kanye.	Kim Kanye video magnet spoof love kim kanye.	Kim Kanye spoof love kim kanye video magnet.
79	best spoof video james franco seth rogen reenact kanye west	The best video parody of Kanye West by James Franco seth rogen.	Best video parody by James franco seth rogen re-enacts Kanye West.	Best video parody James franco seth rogen re-enacts Kanye West.
79	kanye west bound video parody guess play kim	Kanye video parody towards l' west guess to play the kim kim.	Kanye video parody towards the apos; west guess play kim kim.	Kanye video parody towards l' west guess play kim kim.
79	watch hilarious parody kanye execrable video bound	Watching Kanye's hilarious video-related parody.	Watching Kanye's hilarious parody linked to some hideous video.	To watch Kanye's hilarious parody linked to a vile video.
79	video james franco seth rogen recreate kanye west video	This is the first time you'll be able to create a new video.	James franco seth rogen video re-create Kanye West Video.	James franco seth rogen video recreate video Kanye West.
79	gossip guide bound kanye kim	Guide to related gossip, kanye kanye kanye kim.	Gossip guide related kanye kanye kanye kim.	Kanye kanye kanye kim kim gossip guide.
79	bound spoof zac efron seth rogen star bound	Spoof Zac efron seth rogen.com.	Zac Spoof efron seth rogen star bound.	Spoof Zac efron seth rogen star bound.
79	seth rogen james franco bang motorcycle shot shot remake	Seth rogen james, franco bang shot moto remake.	Seth rogen james franco bang shot moto remake.	Seth rogen james franco bang shot motorcycle remake.
79	kim kardashian seth rogen james franco bound parody	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen, James Franco bonded parody.	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen James Franco bonded parody.	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen james franco bonded parody.
79	lol dying tvd nina dobrev reacts seth rogen james franco	Lol dying tvd nina dobrev is reacting to seth rogen james.	Lol dying tvd nina dobrev reacts seth rogen james french.	Lol dying tvd nina dobrev reacts seth rogen james franco.
79	james franco seth rogen recreate kimye bound	This is the first game you'll ever see.	James franco seth rogen recreate bound kimye.	James franco seth rogen recreate kimye bound.
79	kanye west laughed hard seth rogen james franco spoof	Kanye West made fun of Seth Rogers, James Franco Spoof.	Kanye West laughed at Seth Rogers and James Franco Spoof.	Kanye West laughed at Seth Rogers, James Franco Spoof.
79	bound gifs seth rogen james franco bound spoof	Gives you the freedom to choose your own game.	Gives you seth rogen james franco fof spoof.	Gifs seth rogen james franco fof spoof.
79	rogen franco hilarious kanye video spoof	Roger Franco hilarant kanye spoof video kanye spoof video.	Roger Franco hilarant kanye video spoof kanye video spoof.	Roger Franco hilarious kanye video spoof kanye video spoof.
79	james franco seth rogen kanye west bound tribute video	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the first time I've seen it.	James franco seth rogen kanye tribute video to the apos; west to the apos; west.	James franco seth rogen kanye video tribute to west towards west.
79	rosen james franco seth rogen bound parody suck	Rosen james franco seth parody rogen sucks.	Rosen james franco seth rogen parody sucker.	Rosen james franco seth rogen parody succe.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kim kardashian bound	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kardashian bound kardashian.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kardashian bound kardashian.
79	watch james franco seth rogen create best kanye west bound	Watch as James Franco seth rogen creates the best of all kanye to the west.	Watch James franco seth rogen create the best kanye to the west.	Watch James franco seth rogen create best kanye to west.
79	kanye west admits wanting bound video phony	Kanye West admits that she wants a fake linked video.	Kanye West admits she wants fake video linked to it.	Kanye west admits she wants a fake video bound.
79	seth rogen james franco parody kanye west bound video	It's not a game, it's a game, it's a game.	Seth rogen james franco parody kanye video towards the west.	Seth rogen james franco parody kanye video to west.
79	rogen franco kimye	Roger franco-kimye.	Roger franco-kimye.	Roger franco @-@. kimye.
79	seth rogen james franco recreated kanye west bound video	Seth rogen James franco has recreated the video of Kanye to the west.	Seth rogen James franco recreated the video of Kanye towards l'apos; west.	Seth rogen James franco recreated the video of Kanye west.
79	seth rogen james franco bound parody garner lot laugh	Seth rogen james franco bonded parody garner a lot of laughter.	Seth rogen james franco bonded parody garner lot laugh.	Seth rogen james franco bonded parody garner lot rire.
79	kanye west laughed hard james franco seth rogen bound	Kanye West laughed at James Franco seth, tied up.	West laughed at James Franco seth rogen tied up.	Kanye West laughed at james franco seth rogen tied up.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye west bound video	I've got a lot of stuff going on here.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye video towards l' west.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye video to west.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west bound video kim	I'm not sure if it's the right thing to do.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye kanye video to the' west kim.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye kanye video to west kim.
79	james franco seth rogen bound parody kanye west	"It's called ""Kanye West"" by James Franco seth rogen."	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west?	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west.
79	james franco seth rogen recreate kim kanye bound music video	This is the first time you'll be able to create a music video.	James franco seth rogen recreate kim kanye link music video.	James franco seth rogen recreate kim kanye music video link.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kim kardashian bound	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kardashian bound kardashian.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kardashian bound kardashian.
79	seth rogen james franco spoof kanye west bound video	I've got a lot of good stuff going on here.	Seth rogen james franco spoof kanye video towards the west.	Seth rogen james franco spoof kanye video to west.
79	seth rogen james franco sexy topless kanye west parody	Seth rogen sexy topless james West kanye parody.	This is Seth rogen james, franco sexy topless kanye west parody.	Seth rogen james franco sexy topless kanye west parody.
79	james franco seth rogen remake kanye west music video bound	It's not a game, it's a game, it's a game.	James franco seth rogen remake kanye west music video bound.	James franco seth rogen remake kanye west music video bound.
79	rogen franco mock kanye bound video	Roger Franco doesn't even care about the Kanye video.	Roger Franco laughs at the video clip on Kanye.	Roger Franco mocks Kanye's video clips.
79	seth rogen james franco recreate kanye west bound bound	It's the first time you'll be able to do this.	Seth rogen james franco recreates kanye towards the west.	Seth rogen james franco recreates kanye towards l' west.
79	fan parody kanye west kim kardashian bound watch	Parody of the fan kanye kardashian kanye kardashian of l' west watch tied kim kardashian.	L&apos fan kanye kardashian fan parody; west watch linked kim kardashian kanye kardashian.	L&apos fan kanye kardashian fan parody; west kardashian bound kim kardashian watch.
79	james franco seth rogen remake kanye bound	It's a good thing you're looking for something to do.	James franco seth rogen remake kanye bound kanye.	James franco seth rogen remake kanye bound kanye.
79	kim kardashian kanye west react seth rogen james franco bound	Kanye Kanye West reacts to Seth Rodgen James franco-freedom.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West reacts to Seth Rodgen James franco-freedom.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West reacts to Seth Rodgen James franco @-@liberty.com.
79	zac efron tease bound parody seth rogen	If you don't like it, you don't like it.	Zac efron teases parody seth rogen.	Zac efron tease parody seth rogen.
79	james franco lip synced word bound parody	James Franco lip-synchronized word-linked parody.	James franco synchronized word bound synchronized parody.	James franco lip synchronized word bound parody.
79	james franco seth rogen bound	James franco-seth rogen bound.	James franco-seth rogen bound.	E-mail: james franco@-@ seth rogen bound.
79	official kanye westhas sense humour	Kanye West has a sense of humor, you know.	Kanye West has a sense of humour.	Kanye West has sense of humor.
79	watch seth rogen james franco spoof kanye bound music video	Watch Seth rogen james, franco spoof kanye link music video.	Watch Seth rogen james franco spoof kanye link music video.	Watch Seth rogen james franco spoof kanye music video link.
79	kanye bound video spoofed seth rogen james franco	Kanye linked video set set seth video rogen james free.	Kanye linked video spoofed seth rogen james french.	Kanye linked video spoofed seth rogen james franco.
79	seth rogen james franco top kim kanye bound gif	Seth rogen james french kim kanye bond gif.	Seth rogen james franco top kim kanye bond gif.	Seth rogen james franco top kim kanye gif bond.
79	seth rogen release bound spoof starring james franco video	Seth Rodgen makes a parody of James Franco.	Seth Rodgen launches James franco parody.	Seth rogen launches a James franco parody.
79	huh honey zac efron tease bound parody photo	Efron tease parody photos.	Uh, zac efron tease parody photos.	Uh, zac efron tease you parody photos.
79	seth rogen james franco star kanye west bound parody	Seth rogen james franco kanye star parodies towards the west.	Seth rogen james franco star kanye parodies in the west.	Seth rogen james franco star kanye parodies west.
79	kim kardashian laugh bound music video parody	Kim Kardashian laughs at the video music parody.	Kim Kardashian laughing linked video music parody video.	Kim Kardashian laughing linked music video parody video.
79	kim kanye laugh seth rogen james franco bound parody	Kanye laughed at Seth Rodney James franco-parody.	Kim Kanye was laughing at Seth Rodney James, franco-parody.	"Kim Kanye laughed at Seth Rodney's ""James"" at-parody."
79	seth rogen win praise kanye kim video spoof	Seth rogen earn praises kanye video kanye video spoof kanye video kanye.	Seth rogen earn praises kanye kim video spoof video kanye.	Seth rogen earn praises kanye kim video spoof kanye video.
79	suggestion bound inspired music video	Suggestion linked to music inspired video.	Related suggestion music inspired video music.	Related video inspired music suggestion.
79	kim kardashian kim kardashian bound funny	Kim Kim Kardashian Kim Kardashian bonded strangely.	Kim Kim Kardashian Kim Kardashian used to bond weirdly.	You know, Kim Kim Kardashian Kim Kardashian was weirdly bonding.
79	kim kardashian seth rogen james franco bound parody	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen, James Franco bonded parody.	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen James Franco bonded parody.	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen james franco bonded parody.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west bound video	I'm not a fan, I'm a fan, I'm a fan.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye video towards the west.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye video to west.
79	franco rogen spoof kimye music video bound remake	This is the first time you'll be able to enjoy the music of the game.	Franco rogen spoof kimye video music linked remake.	Franco rogen spoof kimye linked music video remake.
79	kim kardashian responds seth rogen james franco spoof bound	"Kim Kardashian answers to Seth Rogen James's ""Spoof Bound"" speech."	Kim Kardashian replies to Seth Rogen James franco spoof bound.	Kim Kardashian answers to Seth Rogen James franco spoof bound.
79	kanye dirt bike bound video sold ebay	Kanye, the video of a dirty motorcycle has been sold to ebay.	Kanye, the video clip from a dirt bike was sold to ebay.	Kanye, the dirt bike video was sold to ebay.
79	imma finish bound best video time	L' imma-finish ensured the best possible time for the video.	L' imma-finishes best video time.	L' imma-finish has been the best video time ever.
79	kim kardashian seth rogen james franco bound spoof	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen James franco-protesters.	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen James franco-protesters.	Kim Kardashian Seth rogen James franco-protesters.
79	seth rogen james franco recreated kim kanye bound music	Seth Rogen James Franco recreated music related to Kim Kanye.	Seth rogen James franco recreated music that was related to Kim Kanye.	Seth rogen James franco recreated kim kanye-related music.
79	kim responds seth rogen james franco bound parody video	"Kim answers to Seth rogen james's ""Franco Bounce"" video."	Kim answers to Seth rogen james franco parody bond video.	Kim responds to Seth rogen james franco parody bond video.
79	kanye west reacts rogen franco bound parody	Kanye West is reacting to the French-German parody.	Kanye West reacts to the Franco-German parody.	Kanye West reacts to the German-based French-language parody @-@.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kardashian bound video	This is the first game to be released in the United States.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kardashian link video.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kardashian video link.
79	kim kardashian kanye west loved rogen franco bound	Kim Kardashian Kanye West liked Roger Francobound.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West loved roger Francobound.	Kim kardashian kanye west loved roger frankobound.
79	james franco seth rogen music video top link love	It's the first time I've ever heard music like that.	James franco seth video music of high link of l' love.	James franco seth music video high-link from l' love.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kardashian film	It's the first time I've seen a movie.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye western kim kardashian movie.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye western kim kardashian film.
79	kim kardashian kanye west find seth rogen james franco funny	Kanye Kanye West thinks Seth Rodgen James Franco is funny.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West thinks Seth Rodgen James Franco is funny.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West thinks Seth Rodgen James Franco is a funny guy.
79	james franco seth rogen remake kanye west bound video watch	It's the first time you'll be able to watch the game.	James franco seth rogen remake Kanye West Video Watch.	James franco seth rogen remake kanye west video watch.
79	kim kanye react seth rogan james franco spoof video	Kim Kanye reacts to Seth Rogan James's free video.	Kim Kanye reacts to Seth Rogan James Franco spoof video feed.	Kanye reacts to Seth Rogan James franco spoof video.
79	kanye parody bound happen lol	Kanye parody bound's happening lolol.	Kanye parody bound goes on, lolol.	Kanye parody bound goes lolol.
79	james franco seth rogen bound parody	James Franco-seth rogen, parody.	James franco-seth rogen parody.	James franco-seth rogen parody.
79	kanye west responds seth rogen james franco bound parody	Kanye West answers to Seth Rogen James Franco crowded parody.	Kanye West responds to Seth Rogen James Franco in a parody crowd.	Kanye West responds to Seth Rogen James Franco's parody crowd.
79	seth rogan james franco parody kanye west bound video	Sethgan James franco parodies Kanye video to west.	Sethgan James franco parodies Kanye video to the west.	Sethgan James franco parody Kanye video towards l' west.
79	parody kim kardashian bound video sexier original video	Kim kardashian parody linked video plus sexy original video original video.	Parody kim kardashian linked video more sexy original video original video.	Video-bound kim kardashian parody plus sexy original video original.
79	zac efron join seth rogen bound parody work	Zac efron joins Seth rogen parody.	Zac efron joins Seth rogen parody.	Zac efron joins Seth rogen in a parody.
79	seth rogen topless james franco parody kanye	Seth rogen topless jams parody kanye kanye franco.	It's like, Seth rogen topless james franco parody kanye kanye.	Seth rogen topless james franco parody kanye kanye.
79	kimye eat heart saturday una husband ben bound	Kimye heart-eating on Saturday a husband who's well-connected.	Kimye eat heart on Saturday a well-connected husband.	Kimye eat heart saturday a husband well bound.
79	showbiz family guy delivers shock death james franco seth rogen	The guy from the showbiz family, he's got James Franco seth rogen, and he's in a state of shock.	The guy in the showbiz family knocked out James franco seth rogen in shock.	The showbiz family guy dropped James franco seth rogen into shock.
79	franco rogen kimye spoof viral	This is the first time you'll be able to use a virus.	Franco rogen kimye kimye spoof viral.	Free rogen kimye kimye spoof viral virus.
79	mocked watch seth rogen james franco parody kanye west bound	Making fun of Seth rogen james, franco parody, kanye to the west.	Making fun of Seth rogen james franco parody kanye to the west.	Mocking Seth rogen james franco parody kanye to west.
79	seth rogen recreates kanye video	This is Seth Rodgen recreating Kanye's video.	Seth Rodgen is recreating the video of Kanye.	Seth Rodgen recreates Kanye's video!
79	james franco seth rogen kim kardashian kanye video	This video is about the gameplay of the game and the gameplay.	James franco seth rogen kim kardashian kanye video kanye.	James franco seth rogen kim kardashian kanye video kanye.
79	kanye west laughed hard franco rogen spoof topless kimye video	Kanye West s' is mocked by Franco rogen by imitating the video from topless kimye.	West S&apos is mocked by Franco rogen by imitating the kimye topless video.	Kanye West s' is mocked by Franco rogen imitating topless kimye video.
79	zac efron join seth rogen spoofing kanye west	Zac efron joins West kanye Seth rogen spoofing.	Zac efron joins Seth rogen spoofing kanye west.	Zac efron joins Seth rogen spoofing kanye west at the same time.
79	james franco seth rogen bound spoof kim kardashian kanye	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	James franco seth rogen spoof kim kardashian kanye kanye koof.	James franco seth rogen spoof kim kardashian kanye kanye.
79	rogen franco bound britney spear stream album music note	"The album was written by Rogen Franco bound Britney spear stream ""note de l'apos; album."	Rogen franco bound Britney spear stream and album.	"Rogen franco bound Britney spear stream ""musical note from album."
79	hilarious spoof james franco recreates kanye west bound video	James Franco recreates a hilarious video clip from Kanye to the west.	James Franco recreates hilarious video from Kanye to west.	James franco recreates a hilarious video of Kanye towards l' west.
79	comedic duo recreates magic frame frame	The comedy duo's recreating the magical frame.	Comic duo re-create the magic frame.	The comedy duo recreates the magic.
79	james franco seth rogan mock kanye kim kardashian hilarious	James Franco seth rogan simulates kanye kardashian.	James franco seth rogan simulates hilarious kanye kim kardashian.	James Franco seth rogan is a mock kanye kim kardashian hilarious.
79	zac efron pal seth rogen spoof kanye west video bound	Zac efron pal seth rogen spoof western kanye video related to the video.	Zac efron pal seth rogen spoof western video linked video.	Video related efron pal seth rogen spoof kanye west video.
79	listen kanye west bound solidisco remix	It's the only way you're going to be able to do that.	Listen Kanye, solidisco remix to the west.	Kanye, solidisco remix to the west.
79	kim kardashian responds seth rogen spoof video	Kim Kardashian is responding to a Seth Robgen Spoof video.	Kim Kardashian answers to the video of Seth Robgen Spoof.	Kim Kardashian responds to Seth Robgen Spoof's video feed.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye west bound	It's a great place to go, but it's a great place to go.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye to the west.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye to west.
79	james franco seth rogen shot shot remake kanye kim	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	James franco seth rogen shot shot remake kanye kanye kanye kim remake.	James franco seth rogen shot shot remake kanye kanye kim kanye.
79	seth rogen james franco recreated crazy kanye video shot shot	And Seth rogen James franco re-created a crazy video clip of Kanye that was shot on video.	Seth rogen James franco has re-created a crazy Kanye music video shot on video.	Seth rogen James franco recreated a crazy Kanye video clip.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof kanye bound video	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye link video.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye video link.
79	seth rogen james franco mock kanye kim bound video	This is the first time you've seen a gameplay video.	Seth rogen james franco mock kanye kime video link.	Seth rogen james franco mock kanye kim video link.
79	seth rogen james franco recreate kanye west bound video	It's a game that you can play on your computer, and you can play it on your computer.	Seth rogen james franco recreate kanye video towards l' west towards l' west.	Seth rogen james franco recreate kanye video to west to west.
79	kardashian love franco rogen bound spoof	Kardashian loves the French language.	Kardashian loves Franco rogen bound spoof.com.	Kardashian likes franco rogen bound spoof.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kardashian	It's a game that you can play on your computer.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kardashian?	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kardashian.
79	seth rogen james franco parody kimye	Seh rogen james, french parody kimye.	Seh rogen james franco parody kimye?	Seh rogen james franco parody kimye.
79	james franco smile bound parody seth	James Franco smiles parody.	James Franco smiles parody.	James Franco smiles parody on me.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west bound music video	It's a game that you can play on your computer.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye westernbound music video?	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye westernbound music video.
79	bound better kanye west kim kardashian james franco	I think it's better to have a kanye kim kardashian kim kardashian James.	It's better to kanye kim kardashian kim kardashian James frank.	Better kanye kim kardashian kim kardashian James straight.
79	james franco seth rogen recreate kanye west bound video	It's the first time you'll be able to watch the game and you'll be able to enjoy it.	James franco seth rogen recreate kanye video to icos; west to Kanye video.	James franco seth rogen recreate kanye video to the west to Kanye video.
79	james franco seth rogen recreate kanye west bound music video	This is the first time you'll be able to create your own music video.	James franco seth rogen recreate Kanye Westbound music video.	James franco seth rogen recreate Westbound music video.
79	seth rogen james franco kanye west bound spoof	It's a good idea to have a nice place to live.	Seth rogen james franco kanye spoof to the west.	Seth rogen james franco kanye spoof to west.
79	hilarious james franco seth rogen recreate kanye west bound video	James franco-seth rogen hilarious re-create the video from Kanye's video to the west.	James franco-seth rogen hilarious re-create video from Kanye to west.	James franco-seth rogen hilarious recreate video of Kanye towards the west.
79	kim kardashian laugh james franco seth rogen bound music video	Kim Kardashian laughs james franco seth rogen video of music related to the music.	Kim Kardashian laughs james franco seth rogen music-related video.	Kim Kardashian laugh james franco seth rogen music-related video james.
79	james franco seth rogan spoof kimye bound music video	It's not a game, it's a game, it's a game.	James franco seth rogan spoof kimye link music video.	James franco seth rogan spoof kimye music video link.
79	seth rogen james franco recreate kanye west bound video spoof	This is the first gameplay game to be released in the United States.	Seg rogen james franco recreer kanye spoof video towards l' west.	Seth rogen james franco recreate kanye video spoof to the west.
79	james franco seth rogen create bound	James Franco seth rogen... create bond.	James franco seth rogen create a bond.	James franco seth rogen create leap.
79	kim kardashian seth rogen bound parody	Kim Kardashian Seth Rodgen parodies a parody.	Kim Kardashian Seth Rodgen parody bound by a parody?	Kim Kardashian Seth Rodgen parody bound by parody.
79	kim kardashian prof sense humour praising james	Kim Kardashian has been showing a sense of urgency, humour and praise for James.	Kardashian shows a sense of urgency; a sense of humour praising James.	Kim Kardashian shows a sense of humour praising James.
79	seth rogen james franco skewer kanye kim music video parody	Seth rogen james franco skewer kanye kanye video music is parody.	Seth rogen james franco skewer kanye kim video music parodies.	Seth rogen james franco skewer kanye kim music video parodies.
79	kim kardashian responds james franco seth rogen spoof bound	Kim Kardashian answers to James Franco seth rogen, spoof bound.	Kardashian answers to James Franco seth rogen spoof bound.	Kim Kardashian answers to James franco seth rogen spoof bound.
79	shirtless zac efron join bound parody fun seth rogen costar	Zac efron torso nude joins the parody of the seth rogen costar.	Naked torso efron joins the seth rogen costar parody.	Zac efron shirtless will join the seth rogen costar parody.
79	seth rogen james franco parody kanye west kim kardashian bound	Seh rogen james parody kanye kanye kardashian west bound kardashian.	Seh rogen james franco parody kanye kyim kardashian west bound kardashian.	Seh rogen james franco parody kanye kardashian west bound kardashian.
79	watch james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kim kardashian	Check out James Franco seth rogen spoof kanye spoof west kim kardashian.	Look at James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kim kardashian.	Watch James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kim kardashian.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof bound watch	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	James franco seth rogen spoof bound watch?	James franco seth rogen spoof bound watch.
79	kim zolciak twin james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west	I've got a lot of fun stuff going on here.	Kim Zolciak twins james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west.	Kim Zolciak twin james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west.
79	james franco topless seth rogen parody kanye west bound bound	It's the first time I've been in the world and I've been there.	James franco topless seth rogen parody kanye to the west.	James franco topless seth rogen parody kanye to west side.
79	james franco seth rogen create kanye west bound video	It's a great way to create a new album, a new album.	James franco seth rogen create kanye video towards l' west towards l' west.	James franco seth rogen create kanye video to west to west.
79	james franco seth rogen create parody kanye west video bound	James franco seth rogen create kanye western video parody related to the video.	James franco seth rogen create kanye parody west video related to the video.	James franco seth rogen create parody kanye west video related to the video.
79	james franco seth rogen recreate kanye west bound video	It's the first time you'll be able to watch the game and you'll be able to enjoy it.	James franco seth rogen recreate kanye video to icos; west to Kanye video.	James franco seth rogen recreate kanye video to the west to Kanye video.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye	Kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye kanye kanye.	Jams franco seth rogen parody kanye kanye.
79	video james franco seth rogen kiss spoof kanye west	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	James franco seth rogen video kiss spoof kanye West.	James franco seth rogen kiss video spoof kanye west.
79	james franco seth rogen bound music video	This is a great way to get a feel for your music.	James franco seth rogen lige music video.	James franco seth rogen lige music video album.
79	nailed franco rogen kimye spoof spot dailydish	This is the first time you'll be able to do this.	Franco rogen nailed kimye spoof daily spot.	Franco rogen nailed kimye spoof spot daily.
79	james franco seth rogen laugh kanye west exactly	James Franco seth rogen laughter kanye kanye kanye.	James franco seth rogen laugh kanye just west.	James franco seth rogen laugh kanye west exactly.
79	james franco seth rogen recreated kanye controversial bound	James Franco seth rogen recreate Kanye linked controversy.	James franco seth rogen has recreated controversial Kanye.	James franco seth rogen recreated controversial Kanye.
79	kanye west bound dirt bike ebay	Kanye towards l'apos; westbound Ebay motorcycle.	Kanye to the apos; west Ebay motorcycle.	Kanye towards l'apos; west bike Ebay.
79	james franco seth rogen mock kanye west kim kardashian sexy video	James Franco seth rogen simulates kanye kayim kardashian video sexy kam kardashian.	James franco seth rogen simulate kanye kayim kardashian sexy video kam kardashian west.	James franco seth rogen simulate kanye kim kardashian sexy video kam west kardashian.
79	kanye west bound parody video starring seth rogen james franco	Kanye West parody is a video starring Seth rogen James franco.	Kanye West parody video starring Seth rogen James franco.	Kanye West parody video starring Seth rogen James franco.
79	james franco seth rogen release parody kanye west bound music	It's the first time that you've seen a game that you've seen.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye to the west.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye to the west side.
79	kim kardashian kanye west laugh seth rogen james franco	Kim Kardashian Kanye West laughs seth James James straight.	Kanye Kardashian Kanye West laughs seth rogen James free.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West laughs seth rogen James franco.
79	video james franco topless seth rogen brilliant parody kanye	James Franco topless seth rogen is a brilliant kanye parody.	James franco topless seth rogen brilliant parody kanye.	James franco topless seth rogen brilliant parody kanye.
79	seth rogen james franco recreate kanye west bound	It's the first time you'll be able to do this.	Seth rogen james franco recreates kanye to the west.	Seth rogen james franco recreates kanye to west.
79	kanye west kim kardashian love bound video starring james	Kanye West Kim Kardashian loves James James James video.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian loves video related to l' love with James James.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian loves video related to l' love with James James.
79	jerry sa kanye kim uncanny	Jerry's kanye kim, disturbing kim.	Jerry his disturbing kanye kim kim.	Jerry's disturbing kanye kim kim.
79	james franco seth rogen kiss spoof kanye west bound	It's a good thing you're looking for something to do.	James franco seth rogen kiss spoof kanye Westbound.	James franco seth rogen kiss spoof kanye Westbound.
79	kanye west laughed hard seth rogen james franco bound	Kanye West made fun of Seth Rodgen James Franco.	Kanye West laughed at Seth Rodgen James Franco.	Kanye West laughed at seth Rodgen James Franco.
79	seth rogen james franco remade kanye west bound music video	This is the first album to be released in Europe.	Seth rogen james franco remake kanye westbound music video.	Seth rogen james franco remake westbound music video kanye kanye.
79	kim kayne seth rogen james franco bound	This is the first time I've had a good time.	Kim kayne seth rogen james loaded free.	Kim kayne seth rogen james franco packed.
79	seth rogen james franco parody kanye bound video	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.	Seth rogen james franco parody kanye link video.	Seth rogen james franco parody kanye video link.
79	best james franco parody bound justin bieber boyfriend	Best Justin Bieber boyfriend-related James Franco parody.	Best James Franco parody related to Justin Bieber boyfriend ever.	Best James Franco parody bound Justin Bieber boyfriend.
79	james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kim kardashian bound	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kardashian bound kardashian.	James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west kardashian bound kardashian.
79	watch james franco seth rogen brilliant parody kanye kim	To watch a brilliant parody of James Franco seth rogen kanye kim kanye.	Watching James franco seth rogen shiny parody kanye kim kanye kanye.	Watch James franco seth rogen brilliant parody kanye kim kanye.
79	james franco seth rogen recreated kanye bound video	James Franco seth rogen has re-created the video about Kanye.	James franco seth rogen recreated the video related to Kanye.	James franco seth rogen recreated the Kanye-related video.
79	kim kardashian kanye west replaced james franco seth rogen	Kim Kardashian Kanye West replaced James Franco seth-rogen.	Kanye Kardashian Kanye West replaced James Franco seth rogen.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West replaced James franco seth rogen.
79	kanye west kim kardashian bound music video james franco seth	Kanye West kim kardashian linked video album james franco seth.	Kanye West kim kardashian linked video music james franco seth.	Kanye West kim kardashian linked video james franco seth music.
79	kim kardashian loooooved mocked seth rogen	Kim Kardashian Loooo loved s' is ridiculed Seth Rodgen.	Kim Kardashian Looooove s&apos is mocked for Seth Rodgen.	Kim Kardashian Loooooved s&apos, mocked Seth Rodgen.
79	kim kardashian feel seth rogen james franco parody	Kardashian feels very comfortable with James Franco parodies.	Kim Kardashian feels good about James Franco.	Kim Kardashian feels great about james franco parodies.
79	james franco seth rogen ride parody kanye bound	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	James franco-seth rogen ride parody kanye bonded.	E-mail:james franco@-@ seth rogen ride parody kanye bonded.
79	bound viral james franco seth rogen kimye sexy video	James franco-seth rogen kimye Sexually Linked Viral Video.	James franco-seth rogen kimye viral video linked sexy.	James franco-seth rogen kimye viral video linked to the sex.
79	seth rogen james franco kimye	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Seth rogen james franco kimye.	Seth rogen james franco kimye.
79	seth rogen nuzzles james franco bound spoof	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Seth rogen nuzzles james franco fofof spoof?	Seth rogen nuzzles james franco fofof spoof.
79	pic bound starring zac efron	Photo courtesy of Zac efron.	Linked photo with efron zac in the spotlight.	Related photo with zac efron starring.
79	kim kardashian approves james franco seth rogen spoof bound	Kim Kardashian approves of James Franco seth spoof bound.	Kim Kardashian endorses James Franco seth rogen spoof bound.	Kim Kardashian approves James franco seth rogen spoof bound.
79	zac efron seth rogen making bound	You'll see that you've got a lot of fun.	Zac efron seth rogen popping.	Zac efron seth rogen popping.
79	kanye west kim kardashian thumb bound parody	Kanye West Kim Kardashian Thumb-bound Parody by Kim Kardashian.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian Tied-to-the-thumb parody by Kim Kardashian.	Kanye West Kim Kardashian Thumb-bound parody by Kim Kardashian.
79	watch franco rogen spoof kimye bound	Check out the latest news from the web site.	Watch the franco rogen spoof kimye bound.	To watch franco rogen spoof kimye bound.
79	watch james franco seth rogen parody kimye bound	Look at James Franco seth rogen, parody kimye bound.	Look at James franco seth rogen parody kimye bound.	Look at James franco seth rogen parody kimye bound here.
79	kimye laughed rogen franco parody	Kimye laughed at Roger Franco, and he's a joke.	Kimye laughed at Roger Franco's parody.	Kimye laughed at roger franco parody.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye west bound video	I've got a lot of stuff going on here.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye video towards l' west.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye video to west.
79	awesome seth rogen james franco parody kanye ridiculous bound	Beautiful seth rogen James Franco parody kanye.	Superb seth rogen James franco parody kanye ridiculously narrow-minded.	Superb seth rogen james franco parody kanye ridiculously stubborn.
79	rogan franco bound spoof matter time	"""Rogan franco@-@"" is a travesty of time."	"Rogan franco-français ""is a parody of time."	Rogan franco-French is a time travesty.
79	watch hilarious james franco seth rogen spoof kanye west	It's a good place to get a feel for your life.	Look at the hilarious James Franco seth rogen spoof kanye west.	Look at the pictures; hilarious James franco seth rogen spoof kanye west.
79	kim kardashian claim kanye west loved franco rogen bound spoof	Kanye West loved Franco rogen bonded spoof.	Kim Kardashian claims that Kanye West loved Franco rogen bonded spoof.	Kim Kardashian claims that Kanye West liked franco rogen bonded spoof.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye bound video	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye link video.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye video link.
79	zac efron seth rogen shirtless tease bound	Efron seth rogen tee-shirtless tease bound.	Zac efron seth rogen tee-shirtless tease bound.	Zac efron seth rogen tee-shirtless tease bound.
79	zac efron shirtless seth rogen tease bound	Zac efron tee-shirtless seth rogen tease-bound.	Zac efron tee-shirtless seth rogen tease bound.	Zac efron tee-shirtless seth rogen tease bound.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye west	James Franco seth rogen, parody kanye west.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye West.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye west.
79	kimye hit serious low bound fail music video	Kimye has hit a really low-hanging video-video-music-video-check.	Kimye has hit seriously low leap video check video music video.	Kimye has hit a serious low leap video failure video music video video.
79	rogen franco kimye spoof	You know, like french kimye spoof spoof.	French kimye spoof spoof.	Like franco kimye spoof spoof.
79	franco rogen redo raunchy kimye vid	It's not a good idea.	Free rogen redo raunchy kimye video.	Franco rogen redo raunchy kimye vid.
79	seth rogen zac efron spoof kimye bound	I'm sorry, but I can't do that anymore.	Seth rogen zac efron spoof kimye bound.	Seth rogen zac efron spoof kimye bound.
79	zac efron seth rogen team bound parody	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.	Zac efron seth rogen teammates bound parody.	Zac efron seth rogen team bound parody.
79	kanye west video seth rogen james franco spoofed hilarity	Kanye West video rogen james seth free spoofed hilary.	Kanye West video seth rogen james franco spoofed hilary.	Kanye West video seth rogen james franco spoofed hilary.
79	video seth rogan james franco create spoof kanye west	Video seth rogan james franco create a game of fake kanye.	Video seth rogan james franco create false kanye west.	Video seth rogan james franco create fake kanye west.
79	kim kardashian approves james franco seth rogen kanye parody	Kim Kardashian approves of James Franco seth kanye parody.	Kim Kardashian approved of James franco seth rogen kanye parody.	Kim Kardashian endorses James franco seth rogen kanye parody as the winner.
79	kim kardashian kanye west praise bound spoof video	Kim Kardashian Kanye West rents the fake video.	Kim Kardashian Kanye West rents the fake video.	Kim Kardashian kanye west rents the fake video.
79	zac efron tease bound parody kim kardashian kanye west sex	Zac efron tease parody kim kardashian kanye kangaroo kangaroo kangaroo kangaroo kangaroo kangaroo kim.	Zac efron tease parody kim kardashian kanye Western sex bound kim kardashian.	Zac efron tease parody kim kardashian kanye west sex bound kim kardashian.
79	kim love bound parody	Kim Love continues the parody.	Kim Love followed the parody.	Kim Love did the parody thing again.
79	james franco seth rogen remade kanye west bound epic	It's a good thing you're looking for something to do.	James franco seth rogen remake kanye westbound epic.com.	James franco seth rogen remake westbound epic kanye.
79	james franco seth rogen recreate kanye west bound video	It's the first time you'll be able to watch the game and you'll be able to enjoy it.	James franco seth rogen recreate kanye video to icos; west to Kanye video.	James franco seth rogen recreate kanye video to the west to Kanye video.
79	james franco seth rogen parody	It's a parody of James Franco seth rogen.	James franco seth rogen is a parody.	James franco seth rogen parodies.
79	kanye west james franco seth rogen bound spoof highest	Kanye West James franco seth rogen, bound spoof the highest.	Kanye West James franco seth rogen bound spoof the highest.	Kanye West James franco seth rogen bound spoof highest spoof.
79	seth rogen james franco spoof kanye west bound video	I've got a lot of good stuff going on here.	Seth rogen james franco spoof kanye video towards the west.	Seth rogen james franco spoof kanye video to west.
79	watch james franco seth rogen spoof kanye bound	Check out James Franco seth rogen spoof kanye, which is packed.	Look at James franco seth rogen spoof kanye crowded.	See James franco seth rogen spoof kanye crowded.
79	seth rogen james franco mock kanye west kim kardashian hilarious	Seth rogen James fran kanye kanye west kardashian hilarious.	Seth rogen james franco kanye west kim kardashian hilarious.	Seth rogen James franco mock kanye west kim kardashian hilarious.
79	kim kanye respond franco rogen bound parody	Kim kanye answer Franco rogen parody-related.	Kem kanye respond to the following questions.	Kim kanye respond franco rogen parody bound.
79	seth rogen james franco remade kanye west bound music video	This is the first album to be released in Europe.	Seth rogen james franco remake kanye westbound music video.	Seth rogen james franco remake westbound music video kanye kanye.
79	omg video kim kardashian kanye west laughed hard seth rogen	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Omg video kardashian kanye kanye kanye west kanye kanye kardashian kanye kardashian kanye kanye kanye rogen durh rogen.	Omg video kim kardashian kanye West has lived on seth rogen.
79	seth rogen james franco viral spoof kanye west	Seth rogen french viral james spoof kanye west.	Seth rogen jes franco viral spoof kanye West.	Seth rogen james franco viral spoof kanye west.
79	viral video bound kanye west parody star james franco seth rogen	A viral video linked to kanye West, starring James Franco seth rogen.	Viral video linked to western kanye star James franco seth rogen parody.	Viral video linked to kanye west parody star James franco seth rogen.
79	zac efron joke bound shirtless photo	Zac Efron joke... linking naked shirt photography.	Zac Efron joke binding photo shirtless.	Zac Efron joke linking photo shirtless.
79	watch james franco seth rogen shot shot remake kanye west	Watch as James Franco seth rogen shot shot remake kanye west.	Look at James franco seth rogen shot shot remake kanye west.	See James franco seth rogen shot shot remake kanye West.
79	kim kardashian kanye west react bound parody funny tweet kim	Kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kanye kay.	Tweet kim kanye kanye kanye west react linked by parody funny tweet kim kanye kim.	Kim kardashian kanye west react linked by parody funny tweet kim kanye kim.
79	seth rogen james franco spoof kanye music video	I'd like to thank you very much for your time.	Seth rogen james franco spoof kanye music video.	Seth rogen james franco spoof kanye music video album.
79	james franco seth rogen parody kanye west kim kardashian sexy	James Franco seth rogen parody... kanye kanye kardashian west sexy kim kardashian.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye kanye kardashian west sexy kim kardashian.	James franco seth rogen parody kanye kanye kardashian west sexy kim kardashian.
80	flacco thrilled lining wide receiver	Flacco just brushed up against the great understudy catcher.	Flacco brushed the understudy's big receiver.	Flacco brushed the big receiver of understudy.
80	flacco furthers express distaste wildcat formation	Anthers of flasks express a filthy wildcat.	The flask anthers express a repugnant wildcat formation.	Bottle anthers express a repugnant wildcat formation.
80	roethlisberger fared flacco	Roethlisberger flacco.	Roethlisberger made flacco.	Roethlisberger's done flacco today.
80	joe flacco raven wildcat high school offense	And Joe Flacco ravens Wildcat in high school.	Joe Flacco raven Wildcat attacks in high school.	Joe flacco raven wildcat attacks high school.
80	joe flacco wildcat formation raven high school offense	Joe flacco formation, wildcat raven, high school student.	Wildcat raven high school joe flacco formation.	Joe flacco wildcat raven high school joe flacco formation.
80	flacco fume wildcat	Flacco smokes wildcat.	Flacco's smoking wildcat.	You know, Flacco smokes wildcat.
80	joe flacco wildcat raven high school offense	Joe Flacco, a wildcat, committed a felony in the high school.	Joe Flacco, a wildcat, has committed a high school offense.	Wildcat Joe Flacco committed a high school offense.
80	joe flacco fan wildcat offense	Joe Flacco fan, Wildcat fan, offense.	Joe Flacco fan Wildcat offending.	Joe flacco fan wildcat offense.
80	late work joe flacco earned speak mind	Worked late, and learned to talk.	J' worked late, and j' learned to speak.	J' J&apos, J&apos, J&apos, J&apos, J&apos, J&apos, J&apos.
80	joe flacco rip wildcat call high school offense	Joe Flacco Rate Wildcat calling The Apos; High School Attack.	Joe Flacco Rate Wildcat, calling the apos; attack from the high school.	Joe Flacco Rate Wildcat calling the high school attack.
80	joe flacco sound wildcat	Joe Flacco sounds like wildcat.	Joe Flacco sounds like a wild cat.	Joe flacco sounds like a wildcat.
80	raven joe flacco volcano	Joe Flacco Volcano Raven.	Raven Joe Flacco Volcano.	Raven joe flacco volcano.
80	perception reality cown steelers	It's like a steel of perception and of reality.	Steel of perception and reality.	Steel perception and reality.
80	joe flacco fan wildcat offense	Joe Flacco fan, Wildcat fan, offense.	Joe Flacco fan Wildcat offending.	Joe flacco fan wildcat offense.
80	raven playoff race beating jet	Playoffs versus Jet Racing.	Playoffs versus jet race.	You know, playoff versus jet race.
80	joe flacco wildcat formation	Joe flacco wildcat.	Wildcat joe flacco formation.	Joe flacco wildcat formation.
80	flacco rip high school wildcat	Flacco is tearing up the wildcat at the school, man.	Flacco is tearing up the high school wildcat.	Flacco's tearing the high school wildcat.
80	joe flacco wildcat high school offense	Joe Flacco Wildcat has committed a felony in high school.	Joe Flacco Wildcat committed a crime in high school.	Joe flacco wildcat committed a felony in high school.
80	flacco criticizes raven wildcat offense	Flacco criticized the apos; attack the wildcat.	Flacco criticizes l' attack of the wildcat.	Flacco criticizes the wildcat attack.
80	joe flacco continues rip raven wild cat offense	Joe Flacco keeps tearing up the attack on the wildcat.	Joe Flacco is still tearing up the back of the car; the attack on the wildcat.	Joe Flacco continues to rip the wildcat's throat out.
80	torrey smith week fantasy outlook	Torrey Smith's Fantastic Week Prospects.	Fantastic perspectives of Torrey Smith Week.	Fantastic perspectives from the week Torrey Smith.
80	problem flacco	Flacco problem.	Flacco problem is problem.	Uh, flacco problem.
80	flacco rip raven wildcat offense	Flacco tearing the raven's wildcat.	And Flacco tears the wildcat crow.	Flacco tearing the wildcat crow.
80	ba imore raven ray lewis ridiculous comment joe flacco	I don't know what to say, but I'm not sure what to say.	What, Imore raven strikes ridicule comment Joe Flacco.	Imore raven ray lewis ridiculous comment Joe Flacco.
80	joe flacco blast raven wildcat offense	This is Joe Flacco Blast Raven Wildcat offending.	Joe Flacco Blast Raven Wildcat offense.	Joe flacco blast raven wildcat offense.
80	joe flacco wildcat raven high school offense	Joe Flacco, a wildcat, committed a felony in the high school.	Joe Flacco, a wildcat, has committed a high school offense.	Wildcat Joe Flacco committed a high school offense.
80	joe flacco wildcat raven high school team tweet	Joe Flacco, the wildcat, l&apos team; high school, tweets on Twitter.	Joe Flacco, the wildcat, l' team of high school, tweets on Twitter.	Joe Flacco, wildcat, l' high school team, tweets on Twitter.
80	countdown steelers raven	Raven steel countdown.	Raven Raven steel countdown.	Countdown raven steelers.
80	tyrod taylor time	This is Tyrod Taylor Time.	Tyrod Taylor time!	Tyrod taylor time.
80	joe flacco mildly interesting thing	Joe Flacco something slightly interesting.	Joe Flacco is a slightly interesting thing.	Joe Flacco, slightly interesting stuff.
80	joe flacco joe flacco trash raven wildcat	Joe flacco joe joe flacco flacco raven trash raven wildcat.	Joe flacco joe flacco flacco trash raven flacco wildcat.	Joe flacco joe flacco flacco trash raven wildcat trash.
80	bill wagner raven utilize dynamic backup qb taylor	Bill Wagner Raven uses a qb Taylor Dynamic Backup.	Bill Wagner Raven uses a Taylor qb dynamic backup.	Bill Wagner Raven uses a dynamic backup qb Taylor.
80	tyrod taylor raven version read option	Tyrod Taylor Raven version option read read option.	Tyrod Taylor Raven version read option read read option.	Tyrod Taylor Raven version read option read read.
80	ryan clark joe flacco talk	Ryan Clark Joe talking about the flacco.	Ryan Clark Joe said flacco.	Ryan clark joe mentioned the flacco.
80	raven steelers prediction wrong	Raven steels are a bad predictor.	Raven steels are a bad predictor.	Well, raven steels don't predict well.
80	call raven qb offense high school	Call High School Offensive Raven.	Well, call Raven qb High School Offensive.	Call Raven qb high school offense.
80	joe flacco wild cat	It's Joe Flacco Wild Cat.	Uh, Joe Flacco Wild Cat.	Joe flacco wild cat.
80	reason joe flacco voice displeasure wildcat formation	Motive Joe Flacco voices dissatisfied with the Wildcat Wildcat formation.	Motive Joe Flacco dissatisfied voice from the Wildcat Wildcat formation.	Motive Joe Flacco dissatisfied voice from Wildcat Wildcat formation.
80	joe flacco rip wildcat high school offense	Joe Flacco is tearing up a wild cat in high school.	Joe Flacco tore up a wildcat in high school.	Joe Flacco tearing up a high school wildcat.
80	joe flacco thrilled raven wildcat	Joe Flacco excited the wild crow cat.	Joe Flacco excited the wildcat crow.	Joe flacco thrilled the wildcat crow.
80	eisenberg tyrod wildcat rest season	Eisenberg Tyrod, Wildcat, off-season.	Eisenberg Tyrod Wildcat resting season.	Eisenberg Tyrod Wildcat rest season.
80	raven optimistic based flacco play jet	An optimistic raven, based on the flacco, plays the game of the jet.	An optimistic raven based on the flacco is playing on the jet.	An optimistic raven based on the flacco plays on the jet plane.
80	film study raven win york jet	The Raven of L' Film Studies wins York's jet.	Raven of the Apos; film study wins the York jet.	The raven of l' film study wins York jet.
80	joe flacco hate wildcat lined receiver	Joe Flacco hates cat receivers.	Joe Flacco hates wildcat receivers, man.	Joe flacco hates wildcat receivers.
80	finding genius nfl playbook	Finding the great game book of the NFL.	To find the awesome NFL game book.	You know, find the awesome NFL game book.
80	joe flacco rip raven wildcat offense	Joe Flacco is tearing up the wildcat, Crow.	Joe Flacco tearing up the wildcat crow.	Joe flacco tore the wildcat crow.
80	joe flacco wildcat high school offense	Joe Flacco Wildcat has committed a felony in high school.	Joe Flacco Wildcat committed a crime in high school.	Joe flacco wildcat committed a felony in high school.
80	big ben wildcat	This is Big Ben Wildcat.	Big Ben Wildcat!	Big ben wildcat.
80	raven qa mike preston	This is Raven Qa Mike Preston.	Raven Qa Mike Preston.	Raven qa Mike Preston.
80	flacco criticizes raven wildcat offense nbc wvir charlottesville	Flacco is a critic of the NBC Wvir Charlottesville wildcat attack.	Flacco criticizes the attack on the wildcat NBC Wvir Charlottesville.	Flacco criticizes the NBC Wvir Charlottesville wildcat attack.
80	wake caw joe flacco shut	Wakey, wakey, wakey, wakey, wakey.	Wake that joe flacco closed.	Hey, wake up, joe flacco closed.
80	flacco wildcat formation left high school	High school's out of wilderness training.	Wildcat training dropped out of high school.	Wildcat training dropped out of high school today.
80	joe flacco frustration understandable	I can understand Joe Flacco's frustration.	Joe Flacco's frustration was understandable.	Joe Flacco's frustration is understandable.
80	joe flacco appears unhappy raven tyrod tayor	Joe Flacco seems to be a very unhappy Raven Tyrod Tayor.	Joe Flacco seems unhappy Tyrod Tayor crow.	Joe Flacco appears unhappy raven Tyrod Tayor.
80	flacco wild raven wildcat	Wildflake, wildcat, wildcat, wildcat.	Wild flacco raven wildcats wildcat.	Wild flacco wild raven wildcat.
81	german consumer sentiment year high	The feeling of German consumers has been high for a year.	Consumer sentiment in Germany has been high over the last year.	German consumer sentiment has been high for a year.
81	german gfk confidence confirms growth outlook	Growth prospects are confirmed by the confidence of the German public.	The German public's confidence confirms that the outlook for the future is positive.	German public confidence confirms growth prospects.
81	european stock hold gain german gfk report dax	Gfk dax report on Germany's state of the art.	Win the stock market in Europe German report gfk dax report dax.	Win on the stock market in Germany report dax gfk report.
81	european stock climb german confidence bond risk decline	In addition, there is a growing number of European bonds and bonds, a growing number of European bonds and a reduction in risk.	Growth of European equities, reduction of risk associated with German trust obligations, reduction of risk.	European equity growth, German confidence bond risk reduction, risk reduction.
81	european market higher german confidence data	Confidence in the German market is higher than in the European market as a whole.	The confidence levels of the German market are higher than those of the European market.	The confidence data of the German market are higher than those of the European market.
81	table german gfk dec consumer sentiment rise year high	Consumer confidence has been on the rise since the early days of the new millennium.	Consumer sentiment has been on the rise since the beginning of the new year.	The consumer sentiment has been on the rise since the beginning of the year.
81	german gfk consumer climate rise year high december	German gfk consumption climates high December.	German gfk consumption climate is increasing high December year.	German Gfk consumption climates high year high December.
81	german consumer confidence rise	There is a growing confidence among consumers in Germany.	German consumer confidence is on the rise.	German consumer confidence increases.
81	eur usd reach fresh month high german consumer confidence	Consumer confidence in Germany has been high for the past month.	The German consumer confidence in Germany has been high for the last month.	German consumer confidence in Germany has been high for a month.
81	weather	Weather.	It's weather.	Oh, weather.
81	german stock rise consumer confidence beat forecast	Consumer confidence in Germany's rising inventory levels has outstripped expectations.	Consumer confidence in the rising stock in Germany has outstripped expectations.	Forecasts were buoyed by consumer confidence in Germany's rising inventory.
81	german french data difference	Difference between French and German data.	Difference between German and French data.	French and German data are different.
81	copper future regain position strong europe data fed stimulus outlook	The future of copper, returning to strong European positions, has fuelled the outlook for stimulus.	The future of copper returning to its strong position in Europe has fuelled the stimulus outlook.	The future of copper has fuelled the stimulus outlook to regain its strong position in Europe.
81	european stock rise ahead german data dax	The European shares are climbing ahead of the German dax data dax.	European actions climb ahead of German dax data dax.	Germany's dax data dax is on the rise for European action.
81	german consumer morale year high	Consumer morale in Germany has been very high over the last year.	Consumer morale in Germany has been high for a year.	German consumer morale has been high for a year.
81	euro mixed german gfk consumer sentiment	It's a good idea to get a good price.	Euro German gfk mixture consumer feeling.	Euro German blend gfk consumer sentiment.
81	european investor cheer german consumer data	European investors are cheering for the data on German consumers.	European investors applaud the German consumer data.	German consumer data is applauded by European investors.
81	german gfk consumer confidence top expectation hit year long	Consumer confidence in the U.K. is expected to increase in the second quarter of 2004.	German consumer confidence peaked throughout the year.	German consumer confidence peaked throughout the course of the year.
81	economic data breathe life market wednesday	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the second time I've seen it.	Economic data in the life market on Wednesday.	The economic data reeks of the life market on Wednesday.
81	european stock continue rise	The number of European actions continues to increase.	European actions will continue to increase.	European actions continue to increase.
81	german consumer sentiment set improve gfk	The feeling of the German consumer together will improve gfk.	The German consumer feeling together improve gfk.	The feeling German consumer together improve gfk improve.
81	european stock rise economic data yen oil	In addition to the above, there are a number of projects in the region.	Economic data on l' increase in shares in Europe.	Economic data on the stock market; increase in shares in Europe.
81	european economics preview german gfk consumer confidence data	In addition to the above, there are a number of other issues that need to be taken into account.	L' European forecasting economy Germany gfk consumer confidence data.	Germany's forecasting European economy gfk consumer confidence data.
81	euro mixed ahead german gfk consumer sentiment	In addition, there are a number of other currencies that are not included in the basket.	L'apos; euro mixte allemand gfk consumer sentiment at ease; gfk German advance.	Germany's mixed euro gfk consumer sentiment at ease; German gfk advance.
81	german consumer confidence perk	There is a lot to be gained from the confidence of German consumers.	German consumer confidence is beneficial.	German consumer confidence benefits.
81	gfk survey reveal december consumer sentiment rise	Consumer confidence in the U.S. is expected to increase in the second quarter of 2004.	Gfk survey shows an increase in consumer sentiment in December.	L'apos; gfk survey shows an increase in consumer sentiment in December.
81	german consumer confidence hit year high	Consumer confidence in the U.K. is expected to increase in the second quarter of 2004.	German consumer confidence has peaked last year.	German consumer confidence peaked last year.
81	german consumer confidence hit year high	Consumer confidence in the U.K. is expected to increase in the second quarter of 2004.	German consumer confidence has peaked last year.	German consumer confidence peaked last year.
82	yale shiller housing uncharted territory	Yale Shiller in Uncharted Territory.	Yale Shiller, in uncharted territory.	Uh, yale shiller in uncharted territory.
82	case shiller price rise biggest gain february	The largest increase took place in February.	L' largest increase occurred in February.	L' the biggest increase came in February.
82	sp case shiller price rise september	Raise prices in September if necessary.	The price of the product is the price of the product.	If necessary, price increase in September.
82	denver price set record	Denver's prize set a record.	Denver's price set a new record for the game.	The denver price set a record.
82	housing market roar	The market for the real estate market is in a state of crisis.	The real estate market is in a tailspin.	The real estate market is boiling.
82	price rise september yearly gain highest february sp	Price increase September gain the highest annual February sp.	Price hike September highest annual price gain February sp.	Top price increase September annual gain highest February sp.
82	price continue climb growth rate cool	Prices continue to increase at a fresh fresh growth rate.	Prices continue to rise fresh fresh growth rate.	Prices continue to rise growth rate fresh fresh growth rate.
82	housing market better expected	The market for real estate is much more predictable than in the past.	The real estate market is more predictable.	The housing market is more predictable.
82	atlanta price gain continued september	Price hikes in Atlanta are continuing in September.	Price hikes in Atlanta s&apos are continued in September.	The price hike in Atlanta is continued in September.
82	higher interest rate rising price dampen housing market momentum	It's just that it's a lot of money, it's a lot of money, it's a lot of money.	L' hike in interest rates; rising interest is holding back growth in the housing market.	Rapos; rising interest rates; rising interest is slowing down; housing market buoyancy.
82	price rising september	Price hike in September.	Price increase in September!	September price increase.
82	building permit year high	Building permit, senior year.	Permit to build a building site in the high school year.	Building permit high year.
82	price rise expected september	We're looking at a price hike in September of this year.	We're climbing; expecting a price hike in September.	Expect a price hike in September.
82	housing price building permit marked recovery	The rise in real estate prices has led to a recovery.	There is a marked upturn in real estate prices.	The rise in real estate prices has led to a marked recovery in real estate prices.
82	price increase	Pricing increase.	Price increase!	Uh, price increase.
82	price rose slower pace september	Prices have been rising more slowly in September.	Prices rose more slowly last September.	Prices rose at a slower rate in September.
82	price rise fastest pace february sp case shiller	Fastest price hike came in February.	The fastest price hike came in February.	And the fastest price hike was in February.
82	price rising gain slowing	Price hikes slow the gain.	Rising prices are slowing down the gains.	And rising prices are slowing the gain.
82	housing market shifting slower growth sp data	The Housing Market displaces data on slower growing spas.	The housing market moves the data on the slower growing sp.	The housing market moves data on slower growing sp.
82	business event scheduled tuesday	D&apos event; Tuesday business.	Event d' business meetings scheduled for Tuesday.	Events d' business scheduled on Tuesday.
82	voxeljet workday today best stock	Voxeljet is the best in the world today and is the best in the world.	Today's working day; oil best stock today; oil.	Voxeljet workday today; oil best stock today.
82	price post biggest annual gain	The price is the same as the price of the game.	After the greatest annual gain.	Price after the biggest annual gain.
82	video price rise fastest annual pace february update	The price hike for the videos is the quickest update available in February.	The fastest video upgrade in February is the price hike.	The video price hike is the fastest February update.
82	housing better boring	Boring lodgings.	Best boring house ever.	Best boring housing.
82	price post best gain sp case shiller	Prices are not included in the price.	Post price best win sp case shiller price.	Price post best gain sp case shiller price.
82	sp case shiller price grow steady pace	Retail prices have been rising steadily.	Retail prices have been rising at a steady rate.	The retail price increases at a steady rate.
82	price grew slower pace september	Prices rose more slowly in September.	Prices were rising at a slower pace in September.	Prices rose at a slower pace in September.
82	price slowing growth	Slowing down growth.	And the price slows down growth.	Price slowing growth.
82	price rise modestly september	Prices increase modest in September.	Modest price hike in September.	Prices rise modestly in September.
82	price rose slower rate september	Prices were rising at a slower pace in September.	Prices rose at a slower pace in September.	However, prices rose at a slower rate in September.
82	builder stock surge rising price building permit	Builder's inventory soaring; increase in allowed pricing construction prices.	The soaring of the builders' inventories l' increase in the allowed prices of construction prices.	The surge in builders' inventories; allowed price construction price increases.
82	dallas area price gain sign leveling	Raising prices in the Dallas area marks the levelling of prices.	Raising prices in the Dallas area is also a sign of the levelling of prices.	The price hike in the Dallas area is the sign of the rising price.
82	seattle price lag national increase	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence price differentials.	The national price mismatch increase is small.	L' national increase in price mismatch is small.
82	price rise fast	It's going up fast.	The prices are rising rapidly.	And prices are rising fast.
82	price solid gain third quarter	Strong third-quarter price gain, huh?	Solid gain in third quarter prices.	Strong third quarter price gain.
82	dallas area price rise percent	Price increase percentage of Dallas area.	Raising Dallas area prices as a percentage.	Dallas area price increase in percentage.
82	san diego housing price percent year	San Diego, San Diego, San Diego, San Diego, San Diego.	San Diego, the price of condos; percentage real estate per year.	San Diego, apartment price in percentage per year.
82	sp case shiller price rise	L' increase in shiller's prices sp.	L' increase in shiller prices sp.	L' shiller price increase sp.
82	housing permit leap year high october	This was the first year in which housing permits were issued.	The leap year for housing permits peaked in October.	The housing permit leap year peaked in October.
82	price september	September prices.	Price September.	The price is September.
82	price post biggest gain	After the most important gain.	Price after the most important gain.	Well, price after the most important gain.
82	price city rise february	Prices will increase in the cities in February.	Price increase in February in cities.	City price hike in February.
82	sector sign stren	Sign of reinforced area.	This is a sign of a reinforced sector.	Reinforced sector marker.
82	robert shiller housing trust momentum	Robert Shiller of Fiducie d' Habitation.	Robert Shiller, of the D&A Trust; Housing.	It's the first time I've heard of it.
82	price jump big city	Raising prices in major cities.	The hotel is located in the heart of the city.	Major city price increases.
82	charlotte price september year	Price tags September of the year.	Prix charlotte September of the year.	September of the year charlotte price.
82	case shiller housing october housing start shake	L' Real estate investigation in October is starting to rock.	L' real estate survey in October starts to shake up the real estate market.	Real estate investigation in October is starting to shake up.
82	price city rise february	Prices will increase in the cities in February.	Price increase in February in cities.	City price hike in February.
82	higher price impact sale	The higher the price, the greater the impact of sales on price.	The higher the price, the greater the impact of the sale on the price.	The higher the price the greater the impact of the sale on the price.
82	case shiller rise percent september highest monthly increase	The most significant increase in the monthly increase in the month of September was recorded in September.	The highest monthly increase in September was recorded in September.	September's highest monthly increase was recorded in September.
82	price city rise february	Prices will increase in the cities in February.	Price increase in February in cities.	City price hike in February.
82	price rise consumer confidence dip	Rising prices, falling levels of consumer confidence.	Price increases, lower consumer confidence.	Price increases, lower consumer confidence levels.
82	price growth slowing bubbly west	Western bubbles are slowing down as prices rise.	Price growth slows Western bubbles.	Price growth is slowing Western bubbles down.
82	case shiller price	I'll shave it for you.	Case shiller price?	Case shiller prize.
82	case shiller metro area	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Shiller metro zone shiller case shiller.	Case shiller metro area shiller.
82	price rise sept yearly gain highest feb sp	Prices are increased seven times a year at the highest price.	Price increase seven times a year the highest sp sp sp.	Price increase seven times a year the highest gain feb sp.
82	price climb fastest pace	These prices are going up as fast as they can.	Prices are rising as fast as they can.	The price goes up as fast as possible.
82	housing data boost outlook	The outlook is brightened by the housing data.	The data on the housing sector stimulate the outlook for the future.	Housing data boost prospects.
82	report san diego housing price increased september	According to the report, real estate prices in San Diego were up in September.	According to the report, the price of real estate in San Diego rose in September.	According to the report, the price of condos in San Diego increased in September.
82	price climb year year september biggest jump	Price increase in September of the previous year.	Price increase in September of the previous year.	Price increase in previous year in September.
82	case shiller price level yearly increase	Annual price increase-head.	Annual increase in the price level of @-@head breakers.	Annual increase in the price level of breaks-head.
82	san diego price rising slowly	The price of San Diego goes up slowly.	San Diego's price is rising at a slow rate.	The price of san diego is rising slowly.
82	spotlight economy rising price homebuilding	Spotlight on the housing market; saving on housing construction prices.	It's the only way to get the job done in a timely manner.	Spotlight on the apo; rising home construction price economy.
82	price rise market slowing	Price hikes slow the market.	Rising prices are slowing it down.	The price hike is slowing the market.
82	house price rise fastest rate	The price of real estate is the highest in the world and the price of real estate is the highest.	L' increase in the price of housing is the fastest.	L' increase in the price of real estate.
82	house price gain downshift abruptly year	Le prix de l&apos, le prix de l&apos, le prix de l&apos, l&apos.	Gain of the price of housing down sharply in the year.	Gain of the price of luxury; abruptly falling property; year.
82	week ahead	It's all right, I'm sorry.	One week later, advances.	One week forward.
82	cctv script	Cctv scenario.	Cctv scenario.	Okay, cctv scenario.
82	sp case shiller price price third quarter	Shiller case price, third quarter.	The price of the shiller case third quarter.	The third quarter shiller case price.
82	sept price year ago	He won seven prizes a year ago.	Seven awards a year ago.	Seven prizes a year ago.
82	price rise	Pricing increase.	Price increase!	Uh, price increase.
82	price jump largest city pace slowing	Price hikes in major cities slow the pace.	Rising prices in major cities are slowing it down.	Rising prices in the largest cities are slowing the price hike.
82	price rise percent	Percentage increase in prices.	Percentage increase.	Percentage price increase.
82	house price rose slower pace september	House prices have been rising at a slower rate in September.	House prices rose at a slower rate in September.	House prices rose at a slower pace in September.
82	washin price rise slower pace rest	Rising car wash prices are slowing down the rate of rest.	Rising car wash prices are slowing the pace of rest.	The rise in the price of washing products is slowing the pace of rest.
82	housing permit hit year high	Accommodation permits peaked last year.	The housing permit has peaked last year.	The housing permit peaked last year.
82	chicago area price gaining ground	The Chicago-area prize is on the rise.	The Chicago area award is gaining in popularity, right?	Chicago area prize is gaining ground.
82	mixed message housing abound	Mixed messages are plentiful.	There are so many mixed messages.	Well, mixed messages abound.
82	housing permit price rise spdr sp homebuilder etf ishares dow	Housing prices have been rising for homebuilders and homeowners.	Housing prices for homebuilders and property owners have risen.	For builders and homeowners, the price of housing has risen.
82	price rise september	Price hike in September.	Price increase in September!	September price increase.
82	price rise slowed september	The price hike started to slow down in September.	Price hikes slowed in September.	The price hike slowed down in September.
82	price post smallest gain february	The price is the same as the price paid in February.	Price after the smallest gain in February.	Price after smallest gain in February.
82	sp case shiller price september	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Sp case shiller price in September.	Sp case shiller price September.
82	housing fine	The most recent is Bill C@-@35.	Bill C, @-@35, is the most recent.	And Bill C-35 is the most recent.
82	green housing data	Statistics Canada, Green Housing Data.	Environmentally friendly housing data.	Green housing data.
82	price advance third quarter sp case shiller	Price Advancements in the Third Quarter sp Shiller.	Price advancement in the third quarter sp. shiller.	Price advancement in the third quarter sp case shiller.
82	price rising slower pace	The price of a product is higher than the price of a product.	Raising prices at a slower rate.	Price increases at slower rates.
83	dollar stepped euro sterling currencyshares euro trust	While the dollar has risen in euros, cash flows in euros are shared.	The dollar has risen in euros, and the euro cash flow is now shared.	The dollar rose in euros, euro cash flows are shared.
83	euro stren hens german coalition accord year high yen	In addition, the EU has been able to play an important role in the fight against terrorism.	The euro strengthened Germany's early chicken coalition in the year 2000; high-year agreement.	The euro strengthened the German coalition of fleets in the year 2000; agreement high yen yen year.
83	ecb financial system stress fallen pre crisis level	The stress on Scotland's financial system... fell before the crisis.	The stress on Scotland's financial system fell before the financial crisis.	Scottish financial system stress fell before the crisis.
83	ecb marked decline systemic stress banking system	Bankruptcy and Insolvency Act (BSA) and Bankruptcy Act.	Ecb marked systemic decline banking stress banking system.	Eb marked decline systemic stress banking system.
83	german government deal boost euro support share	In addition, there are a number of measures to improve the quality of services.	L' agreement with the German government increases the share of support in euros.	L' agreement with German government increases share of euro support.
83	early trade york dollar slump basket major	York Early Trade Dollar major collapsed basket.	York early trading buck collapsed major basket York.	York early trading dollar major collapsed basket.
83	talk ecb easing lift euro zone bond	Talk about lightening the eurozone's obligations.	Talk about easing eurozone obligations.	To talk about easing the eurozone's obligations.
83	global market german government deal boost euro support share	In addition, there are a number of countries that are not members of the European Union.	L' agreement between the German government and the global market increases the share of euro support.	L' agreement between German government and global market increases share of euro support.
83	euro jump asia ecb easing speculation	Speculation is eased by the leaping of the euro asia.	The leaping euro asia eases the risk of speculation.	The euro asia boom eases speculation.
83	ecb ready introduce negative deposit rate	For more information, see the French description.	Ecb ready to introduce a negative deposition rate.	Ecb ready introduce negative deposition rate.
83	ecb rate threat spark fear	It is important to note that this is not the case.	The threat of low birth rates causes fear.	Low birth rate threatens ecb causes fear.
83	european share rise german government deal	European action increases; agreement with the German government.	L' European action increases; agreement with the German government.	L' European action increases; agreement with the government of Germany.
83	inflation pick risk remain ecb official	Inflation risk remains official.	The risk of inflation remains official.	The risk of inflation remains official.
83	european stock euro buoyed german coalition deal	Europe supported the germano coalition-Canadian.	The euro stockpile of l' Europe supported the German coalition-in Canada.	The stock d' euro l' Europe supported the Canadian germano coalition.
83	ecb financial stability risk market turmoil risen	Economic stability has increased, and there is a risk of further turbulence in the markets.	Economic stability is also at risk of market turbulence.	Economic financial stability risked market turbulence has increased.
83	spanish note yield decline year low ecb speculation	The post in Spanish gives us a year of low speculation.	The Spanish post gives a year of low speculation ecb decline.	The Spanish post gives a year of low ecb speculation.
83	euro zone bond rise investor eye ecb speaker	Eurozone Bond Rising Investor View-Ec Ecb Eye-Word.	The eurozone's rising bonds look investors-ec ecb eye.	The rise in bonds in the euro area look investors-word ecb ec.
83	eu set market stand weak bank	A market, the market, the market, the credit, the bank.	J&apos have set the market have the air from them; a market, the market, the market, credit, the bank.	J&apos has set the market as a market, market, market, credit, bank.
83	daily currency report	Daily reporting of foreign currency.	Daily currency reporting, please.	This is a daily currency declaration.
83	money fund anxiety euro zone	Ananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananana.	Funds; funds; funds; funds; funds; ananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananan.	Funds d' money d' funds funds fund fund d' anananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananananaanananananananananananananananananananananan
83	currency briefing euro stren set curb eurozone growth	The euro was the most important currency in the euro area, and it was the most important currency in the world.	The currency briefing of the euro dampened growth in the euro area.	The euro currency briefing dampened eurozone growth.
83	top ranked europe etf buy	Buy l' Europe, and be the first on the list.	Buy Europe at the top of the list.	To buy l' Europe etf at the top of the list.
83	euro rise year high versus yen german deal baht drop	The euro's annual increase relative to the German yen is falling.	Year-on-year growth in the euro against the German yen is on the decline.	The annual rise in the value of the euro vis-à-vis the German yen is falling.
83	yen stren hens dollar boj minute euro advance	Yen strong hens dollar boj-minute euro advances.	Yen strong hens dollar boj minute euro advances.	Yen strong hens dollar boj minute euro advance boj.
83	yen stren hens versus major boj minute euro advance	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the last time I've seen it.	Strong yen hens against big euro boj minute is advancing.	Strong yen hens against big boj minute euro advance.
83	ecb rate threat leaf money fund fearing extinction	In addition, the Bank of Canada's interest rate is expected to decline in the near future.	The currency exchange rate is threatening the bottom of the money sheet, fearing extinction.	The exchange rate is threatening the money sheet's bottom, fearing extinction.
83	ecb improvement fragile financial market	Canadian Environmental Protection Act, R.S., 1985, c.	L' environmentally fragile financial market improvement.	L' environmental improvement fragile financial market.
83	europe outlook recession crisis continues	The outlook for Europe from a recessionary period to a continuing recessionary period continues.	The outlook for the world: Europe from recession crisis continues to recession crisis continues.	Europe's outlook from recession crisis continues to recession crisis continues.
83	ecb bank fee income subject swing study	The income from the bank fees is subject to study swing study.	Bank fees ecb subject study swing study.	Bank fee income ecb study swing study topic.
83	dollar fall versus basket currency london	Dollar-to-basket-currency exchange rate down London.	Dollar-to-basket exchange rate, London.	Downside of the dollar versus basket currency London.
83	sterling rise outperforms euro	The increase in the pound outpaces the performance of the euro.	The increase in the pound outpaces the euro.	L'apos; increase of the pound sterling exceeds the performance of the euro.
83	rpt ecb rate threat leaf money fund fearing extinction	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.	Rpt ecb rate threat leaf money fund fear extinction.	Rpt ecb rate threat leaf money fund fearing extinction.
83	resilience euro test	Resilience testing has been put in place.	We have a resilience test in place.	A resilience test is in place.
83	german coalition deal lift euro year high versus yen	It was the first time in the world that the United States had joined the European Union.	L' agreement of German coalition makes rise the euro of l' year against yen.	Lapos; German coalition agreement ratchets the euro de lapos; year against yen.
83	euro gain versus major peer ecb speculation real tumble	The euro's share of the world's gross domestic product (GDP) is expected to decline from the previous year's level.	The euro's gain relative to the main speculation in the world is plummeting in real terms.	The euro gain relative to the main speculation by peers is plummeting.
83	forex german coalition deal help euro year high versus yen	In addition, there are a number of other currencies, such as the U.S. dollar and the U.S. dollar.	Lapos; German Forex coalition agreement contributes to the rise in the exchange rate of the euro against the yen.	Germany's Forex coalition agreement contributes to the appreciation of the euro against the yen.
83	euro rise day versus yen german accord baht drop	On the day of the rise of the U.S. dollar against the German yen, the deal is going down a lot.	On the day of the rise of the apos; euro against the German yen agreement baht decrease.	The day of the rise of the apos; euro against the German yen agreement baht decrease.
84	adolescent falling gap hiv service	Adolescent HIV testing service.	Adolescent HIV testing service.	The adolescent HIV testing service.
84	government grant reduce hiv infection study	The Government of Canada's HIV/AIDS prevention and control program is designed to address HIV/AIDS.	Government of Canada; Public Health Agency of Canada; Public Health Agency of Canada.	Government grant to research; study on reduction of risk; HIV infection.
84	adolescent living hiv	HIV-infected teens.	Teens living with HIV/AIDS.	Teenagers living with HIV.
84	documentary screening featured event cumberland county observance	The film was screened in the Cumberland County Film Festival, and screened in the Cumberland Film Festival.	The documentary screening highlighted the Cumberland County Celebration of Apos.	The documentary screening featured the Cumberland County Apos Celebration.
84	trust aid organization	What is-what do you say about that?	What's @-@what do you say about that?	So what are you saying about this?
84	hiv rise europe	In Europe, HIV is on the rise.	HIV is on the rise here in Europe.	HIV is on the rise in Europe.
84	aid death soar young inadequate hea service	Helping Death s' fledgling youth and unfit for duty.	Helping Death s' fled, young and unfit for duty.	Help death s' fled young and unfit for service.
84	shsu student hea center offer free hiv aid testing	The Hea Student Centre in Shsu offers free testing, free of charge, for HIV testing.	The Hea Student Centre in Shsu offers free HIV testing.	The Hea Student Centre in Shsu offers free testing for HIV.
84	abbvie partner hiv community launch international awareness	The Canadian HIV/AIDS Clearinghouse is a partnership between the Government of Canada and the Canadian Institutes of Health Research.	The HIV community partners with Abbvie raises international awareness.	The HIV partner community launches international awareness.
84	adolescent falling gap hiv service	Adolescent HIV testing service.	Adolescent HIV testing service.	The adolescent HIV testing service.
84	starbucks donating money fight aid	Starbucks that donate money to charity are fighting with charity.	Starbucks donate money to fight crime; help.	Starbucks donating money fight help.
84	free hiv testing offered oc aid day	Free HIV tests available on the day of the visit; Oc help.	Free HIV testing available on the day of the visit; Oc Help.	You will receive free HIV testing on the day of your visit.
84	qld hea minister determined hiv	What's-Minister Determined for HIV?	What are-what has the Minister determined for HIV?	What's-what the minister has determined for HIV?
84	mac pro gold earbuds ridiculously cool item raise	Mac Pro Gold headphones are ridiculously cool.	These Mac Pro Gold headphones are ridiculously cool.	And Mac Pro Gold headphones are ridiculously cool.
84	number teen hiv jump	Teenage H.I.V. jumps.	Uh, teenage number H.I.V. jumps.	The teen phone number H.I.V. Jumps.
84	quick drop hiv testing offered bath	Rapid HIV tests were a great opportunity.	Rapid HIV testing was a bath.	A bath was offered by the rapid HIV tests.
84	regular test urged hiv risk	Regular testing has increased HIV risk.	Regular testing increased the risk of HIV.	And regular testing has increased the risk of HIV.
84	adolescent neglected african hiv program	Teenagers' Neglected African HIV Program.	Africa Neglected HIV Program for Adolescents.	Neglected adolescent HIV program.
84	ut organization team face aid	It's a good idea if you don't like it.	L' team; organization needs help.	L' team of volunteers; organization needs help.
84	sight war conquer hiv aid	Watching the war... conquering the Apos; helping HIV.	See the war conquer the apos; aid to HIV.	Seeing war conquer HIV/AIDS assistance.
84	aid manageable disease longer deadly condition	Assist in the management of life-threatening conditions.	Manageable aid illness, longer fatal condition.	Manageable aid disease longer fatal condition.
84	district aim eradicate hiv	Eradicating HIV.	District Goal: to eradicate HIV.	The goal of the district is to eradicate HIV.
84	mu ivitamin mineral delay hiv progression fiu led study find	The results of the study are summarized below.	L' mineral ivitamin mu delays the progression of HIV study has found.	L' ivitamin mineral mu delays the progression of HIV study has found.
84	child support grant prevent spread hiv study	AIDS Grant; Helping Children Prevent the Spread of HIV/AIDS.	Subsidy; assistance to children to prevent the further spread of HIV/AIDS.	Children's aid to prevent the spread of HIV/AIDS.
84	taming global aid epidemic	They have passed the apo test; infidelity to the apo; world scale.	J' has passed the test of the apos; infidelity to the apos; world scale.	J' has passed the apo test; cheating on a global scale.
84	top reason hiv positive potent weapon mother nature	Nature is the main reason why HIV is a powerful weapon.	And the main reason that HIV is a powerful weapon is nature.	The main reason HIV is a powerful weapon is nature.
84	lot people suffering	Lots of suffering.	A lot of people are getting hurt.	A lot of people do.
84	hiv testing offered bath mark aid day	In addition, the Canadian HIV/AIDS Legal Network (CHRLN) has developed a national HIV/AIDS Legal Network.	HIV testing provided a day of counselling and branding assistance.	HIV testing offered one day of brand assistance.
84	fahass sponsor aid day awareness month dec	Godfather Fahass helps Awareness Day Dec.	Godfather fahass helps raise awareness on a monthly basis.	Godfather fahass helps to raise awareness month dec.
84	time retire aid africa	Helps with retirement in Africa.	Retirement time helps Africans in Africa.	Retirement time helps Africa.
84	red tape grant delayed care hiv patient global fund	HIV/AIDS Patients' Global Fund.	The Global HIV/AIDS Patient Fund.	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
84	hope aid vaccine	Hope helps vaccine.	L' hope will help you vaccinate.	L' hope vaccine helps.
84	vitamin supplement delay progression early stage hiv	Vitamin supplementation delays the progression of HIV at an early stage.	Vitamin supplements delay the progression of HIV at an early stage.	Vitamin supplements delay the early progression of HIV.
84	community hea unveils aid qui square	The community of Hea is now revealing its help, which is square.	The community of Hea unveils its help, which is now square.	The Hea community unveils their square helping hand.
84	free hiv testing campaign launched	A free HIV test drive had been launched.	A free HIV test campaign was launched.	A free HIV testing campaign was also launched.
84	south africa child support grant protect hiv	The South Africa Children's Grant protects HIV.	The South Africa HIV-Positive Child Grant.	The child subsidy d' South Africa protects HIV.
84	athens hea hcare office offer free hiv aid testing honor aid day	The Canadian HIV/AIDS Legal Network (CHRN) is a national network of HIV/AIDS legal and policy experts.	The Athens Health Care Office offers a free day of assistance to test for HIV.	The health care office in Athens offers a day of free help in testing for HIV.
84	naca bos lament lack effective remedy hiv infection	Naca lamentably lacks effective HIV-related remedies.	Naca lamentably lacks the effective remedies for HIV infection.	Naca bos lamente lacks effective remedies for the HIV infection.
84	cash hiv aid	Cash assistance for HIV.	HIV cash.	HIV cash assistance.
84	aid day focus adolescent	Help days are usually focused on teenagers.	It is also a good place to learn about the environment.	Help days focus on teenagers.
84	hea department offering free hiv testing	Testing for HIV is provided free of charge by this department.	This department offers free HIV testing.	This department offers free HIV testing services.
84	free hiv aid testing offered	Free HIV testing and help available.	Free HIV testing; free help.	Free HIV testing and free help.
84	wichita group observe aid day	The Wichita Group is observing the Day of L' help.	The group Wichita observes the day of l' help.	The Wichita group will observe the day of l' help.
84	test beat hiv	The test beats the hell out of me, man.	Test beat HIV.	The test beat HIV.
84	largest aid awareness ribbon draped brighton level	The most important of these aids was the Brighton Awareness Raising Tape.	The most important aid was the ribbon for raising awareness of the importance of the level of Brighton.	The most important aid awareness tape covered the Brighton level.
84	op aid action committee mark aid day	Help marks the Day of Our Apostles; Help.	The Action for Change Committee will help mark the Day of Our Apos.	The committee of experts; action for help; help mark the day of help.
84	aid day contracted hiv night stand	On the day of the event, help was received from the HIV/AIDS night stand.	On the day of the disaster, the assistant contracted the night stand of the HIV.	On the day of the help contracted the night stand of HIV.
84	cocktail	Cocktail cocktail.	Cocktail cocktail.	cocktail cocktail.
84	waiting aid revolution	Help is on hold.	Revolution of the Apostles; standby aid.	Revolution of the Apostles; help waiting there.
84	revenge hiv widow story	Story of HIV Widow Vengeance.	History of HIV widow revenge.	HIV widow revenge story.
84	indonesia accelerates hiv response	L' indonesia speeds up the response to HIV.	L' L' indonesia accelerates the response to HIV.	L' indonesia accelerates HIV response.
84	improved service hiv testing	Improved HIV-testing services.	HIV testing services improved.	Improved HIV testing services.
84	researcher vitamin mineral supplement slow progression hiv	Vitamin-mineral supplements research, slow progression of HIV.	Research on vitamin mineral supplements and the slow progression of HIV.	Research on vitamin mineral supplements, slow progression of HIV.
84	second lady donates item hiv aid victim	Second Lady gives an article on the HIV/AIDS victim.	The second lady gave an article on the HIV/AIDS victim.	The second lady writes about the victim of HIV/AIDS.
84	child support grant sugar daddy	Piece of cake child support.	Child support allowance, sugar daddy.	This is a child support allowance for a child, Daddy cake.
84	girl infected aid virus sa	Girl infected with the AIDS virus; helps her.	Infected girl with the virus of l'apos; helps her.	Apos virus infected girl; helps her.
84	aid day message	Help us with today's message.	Message of the Day; Help.	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
84	micronutrient supplement reduce risk hiv progression study	In addition, a study of the prevalence of HIV/AIDS in the United States was carried out.	A study on the progression of HIV, using a micronutrient supplement, reduces the risk of HIV infection.	A micronutrient supplement reduces the risk of HIV progression.
84	social medium partly blame hiv case year sa	This is the year in which the case of HIV/AIDS was first reported.	Social media partly blames the year of the HIV case.	The social media is partly blaming the year of the case of HIV.
84	watch talk aid ignorance	You know, watching people talk helps them feel ignorant.	Watching talk helps at ease; ignorance.	It helps ignorance to watch people talk.
84	aid death increase year	Number of deaths due to suicide increased; assistance Year.	Increase in number of deaths due to apo; assistance Year.	Increased death due to apo; assistance Year.
84	queenslanders living regional area free access hiv test	HIV-positive women who are HIV-positive are also infected with HIV.	Queenslanders living in the free zone have access to the HIV test.	Queenslanders living in the area free of HIV; access to HIV test.
84	guideline address specific adolescent hiv	It specifically addresses HIV among adolescents.	The guidelines specifically address HIV in adolescents.	The guidelines specifically address adolescent HIV.
84	vitamin combination supplement slows hiv progress	Vitamin supplements slow the progression of the HIV virus.	The combination of vitamin supplements will slow the progression of HIV.	L' combination of vitamin supplementation slows HIV progression.
84	aid love	Help them; love.	To help people; love.	You know, helping people; love.
84	red scarf project return	Return of the Red Scarf Project.	Back from the red scarf project.	And here's the red scarf project back.
84	aid africa tag progress differs campaigner	Progress on African Aid is different from that of activists.	African Aid's progress is different from that of its activists.	African Aid's progress differs from that of activists.
84	aid africa tag progress differs campaigner	Progress on African Aid is different from that of activists.	African Aid's progress is different from that of its activists.	African Aid's progress differs from that of activists.
84	hiv infection plummet	HIV infection; human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection; collapse.	HIV infection; human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection; collapse.	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the development of HIV/AIDS in Canada.
84	south african grant save girl dude hiv	Subsidy money from South Africa to save the girl, HIV guy.	Grants from l' South Africa to save the girl HIV man.	Apos subsidy; South Africa to save girl HIV guy.
84	doh highlight aid day celeb	Doh focuses on the celebrity of the day; help.	Doh puts the spotlight on the celebrity of the day; Help.	Doh puts the emphasis on the celebrity of the day of apos; help.
84	people honored helena aid day	The Day of Apostles was celebrated by people; Helena helped them.	People celebrated the day; Helena helped them.	People honored the day of birth; help from the helena.
84	aid day nigerian living hiv nacala bos	Help Nigerian daycare living HIV nacala bos living bos.	Help Nigeria day living HIV nacala bos living bos.	Helps Nigerian day living HIV nacala bos living.
84	spike aid adolescent death raise alarm	Death of a teenager triggers alarm.	Teenage death triggers alarm.	The alarm is triggered by the death of a teenager.
84	garrett selected poz	Garrett choose Poz.	Garrett's chosen Poz.	Well, Garrett chose Poz.
84	pizza dinner kick aid awareness week	Pizza dinner Awareness Week help.	Pizza dinner Awareness week at l' help.	Pizza dinner awareness week at l' help.
84	supplement combo lessens hiv progression	Adding a combo game reduces the spread of HIV.	Adding combo reduces the spread of HIV.	Add combo reduces the progression of HIV.
84	high risk people urged hiv test	HIV testing was emphasized by those at high risk.	And high-risk people insisted on HIV testing.	Those at high risk insisted on HIV testing.
84	regional hiv aid connection hand free gift londoner	It's a great place to visit, but it's a great place to visit.	Regional connection to apo; help for HIV-positive people, free gift, free, London.	Regional connection at l' free help for HIV-positive people, London.
84	woman living hiv share story photography	It's the first time I've had sex with someone I've ever met.	Women living with HIV/AIDS share photos of their experiences.	Women living with HIV share photos of history.
84	researcher reveal infection hpv associated higher subsequent risk	The study found that there was a high risk of infection associated with the use of hpv.	The researcher found that the hpv associated with the infection was associated with a higher subsequent risk.	The researcher reveals that hpv associated with infection is associated with a higher subsequent risk.
84	aid day raise awareness deadly disease	D'apos Day; Fatal Diseases Awareness Support.	Days of Activism; Helping raise awareness of the deadly diseases.	Helping raise awareness of killer diseases.
84	fg aid defied technology	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Help defied the technology.	L' aid defied technology.
84	power shared responsibility fight aid	Sharing power, sharing power, sharing responsibility.	Shared power, shared responsibility.	Shared power shared responsibility.
84	government grant reduce hiv risk teenage girl south africa	Government Grant to Reduce the Risk of HIV Among Adolescent Girls in Durban, South Africa.	Government grant to reduce the risk of HIV among adolescent girls in Brazil; South Africa.	Government grant to reduce HIV risk among adolescent girls in South Africa.
84	hea guideline hiv address adolescent	HIV guidelines addressed to adolescents.	The guidelines on HIV are addressed to adolescents.	HIV/AIDS is a major health issue in Canada.
84	national hiv infection drop report	Canadian HIV/AIDS Legal Network.	HIV infection and hepatitis C. National report.	National report on cases of HIV infection in Canada.
84	high time control spread aid africa	It is now time to control the spread of the disease; it is time to do something about it.	It is high time to control the spread of HIV/AIDS in Africa.	It's high time to control the spread of HIV/AIDS; aid from Africa.
84	aid day medtalk	Help, help, help, help, help.	D&apos d' aide, se' interpose.	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.
84	drop hiv testing bath aid day	Help with bathing for HIV testing.	D&apos day; bathing aid for HIV testing.	D'apos Day; bathing aid for testing for HIV.
84	vitamin mineral help aid patient	Mineral vitamins are helping patients.	Mineral vitamins help patients better.	Well, mineral vitamins help patients.
84	series event held aid day	It was also the first day of the festival, which took place in May.	A series of events took place during the day.	A series of events were also held during the day.
84	vital hiv status	HIV status.	Lifeline status of HIV.	The vital status of HIV.
84	aid lingering stigma hinder progress	Continued stigmatization hinders progress.	Persistent stigma of stigma is an impediment to progress.	The persistent stigma of the stigma of aid hampers progress.
84	adolescent risk hiv infection	HIV/AIDS among at-risk adolescents.	Adolescent HIV infection at risk.	HIV infection among at-risk adolescents.
84	qld aid day	It was the Day of Apostles; help.	C' c' was the day of l' help.	It was the day of apo; help.
84	number adolescent hiv third decade	Number of HIV-infected adolescents during the Third Decade.	Number of infected adolescents in the third decade.	Number of HIV-infected adolescents in the third decade of life.
84	hiv epidemic fight shot arm hea care reform	It's time to start the fight against HIV/AIDS, and it's time for the health care reform.	Fighting AIDS; the HIV epidemic has spurred health care reform.	Health care reform has been an integral part of the response to HIV/AIDS.
84	vitamin stall hiv progression	The spread of HIV is decreasing due to a lack of vitamins.	Vitamin deficiency is reducing the progression of HIV.	HIV progression decreases due to vitamin deficiency.
84	david furnish dramatic appeal routine hiv testing	David has a dramatic interest in HIV screening.	David also has a dramatic appeal for routine HIV testing.	David has a dramatic appeal for routine testing for HIV.
84	event leicester mark hiv testing week	The event marks the beginning of the week of HIV testing.	Leicester event marks HIV testing week.	L' event leicester marks HIV testing week.
84	aid prof stubborn europe hiv infection rise	Helping the world; Europe will stubbornly increase the number of HIV infections.	Helping others; stubborn Europe is increasing the number of HIV infections.	Europe stubborn to increase the number of HIV infections.
84	living hiv thurrock	HIV-positive Thurrock.	Thurrock living with HIV?	Thurrock living with HIV.
84	qld hea announces free hiv testing clinic biala	Qld hea announces the Free Biala HIV Testing Clinic.	Qld hea announces the free HIV clinic biala.	Qld hea announces free biala HIV testing clinic.
84	aid day	Help on Apos Day.	Day of the Apostle; help.	I'm sorry, but I can't.
84	sugar daddy major contributor spread aid africa	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of young people.	Papa cake main contributor to the spread of the apos; African aid.	Papa cake main contributor to spread of the apos; African aid.
84	hopeful sign hiv aid war	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Hope, hiv aid war.	A sign of hope, hiv aid war.
84	hiv progression delayed micronutrient mu ivitamin	HIV/AIDS is a major health problem in the developing world.	The spread of HIV has delayed the supply of ivitamin-containing micronutrients.	HIV progression has delayed the supply of muivitamin micronutrients.
84	positivesingles donating percentage income	These are positive indices that give a percentage of income.	A positive indication of a percentage income.	Positive income percentage indices.
84	record breaking number hiv case recorded gay men highest risk	There has been a record number of cases of HIV among the most-at-risk gay men.	The highest number of HIV cases was among most-at-risk gay men.	The highest number of HIV cases among gay men most at risk.
84	warming conversation red scarf project	Conversation heating project red scarf.	Heating conversation project red scarf.	Conversation heating red scarf project.
84	education needed combat high saskatchewan hiv number	Education required that HIV be fought in Saskatchewan.	Education required that we fight HIV in Saskatchewan.	This was the first time in the history of HIV/AIDS in Canada.
84	aid africa anachronism	African anachronism.	Help the apos; African anachronism.	Helping the apos; anachronism in Africa.
84	study small grant protect saf teenage girl hiv	Study a small grant program to protect a teenager at risk of HIV infection.	Study small grant to protect adolescent girl at risk from HIV.	To study a small grant to protect a teenage girl at risk from HIV.
84	paphr brings awareness hiv aid	Paphr educates people about HIV prevention.	Paphr raises awareness about HIV/AIDS and HIV/AIDS.	Paphr raises awareness about HIV assistance.
84	mu ivitamin help fight hiv progression study	It is important to know what to do about HIV infection and what to do about it.	Immunization helps to combat AIDS; HIV progression studies.	Immunization helps to fight HIV; study the progression of HIV.
84	gauteng loses track ten aid patient jack bloom	Gauteng has lost track of ten patients from the apogee; helps Jack Bloom.	Gauteng loses track ten of the patients; he helps Jack Bloom.	Gauteng loses track ten patients from l' helps Jack Bloom.
84	identifies fuse hiv	I.D. the H.I.V. Fuse.	ID the HIV fuse.	HIV fuse identification.
84	mu ivitamin mineral latest treatment hiv progression	Treatment of HIV-related complications.	Mu ivitamin mineral treatment for the latest progression of HIV.	Mu ivitamin mineral treatment of HIV latest progression.
84	dinner	Dinner.	Let's have dinner.	Oh, dinner.
84	grant hiv sugar daddy bay	H.V.H. Sugar daddy bay.	Grant H.V.H. Sugar daddy bay.	Give H.V.H. Sugar daddy bay one.
84	free hiv testing regional queenslanders	Free HIV tests for all the local Queenslanders.	Free HIV tests for regional queenslanders.	Free HIV testing for regional Queenslanders.
84	anti retroviral drug aid ambassador	Ambassador of Anti-Retroviral Drugs.	Anti-retrovirals ambassador.	I'm an anti-retroviral drug ambassador.
84	sydney taylor square minute pop hiv testing clinic	Sydney Taylor Taylor Square Minute HIV Testing Clinic.	Sydney Taylor Taylor Square Minute HIV Testing Clinic.	Sydney Taylor Taylor square minute HIV testing clinic.
84	kyrgyzstan hold european hiv testing week aid day	Kyrgyzstan is hosting a week-long campaign to support HIV testing in Europe.	Kyrgyzstan organizes a week of HIV testing assistance in Europe.	Kyrgyzstan organizes a week of HIV testing assistance in Europe.
84	time register sex worker	Statistics Canada, Statistics Canada, Catalogue no.	Sex worker time record.	Sex worker time record.
84	number adolescent hiv jump third	Number of third-place HIV-positive adolescents.	Number of HIV-positive adolescents who are in third place.	Number of HIV-positive adolescents who jump to third place.
84	indian river county hea dept recognize aid day	Indian River County recognizes the Day of Apos; assistance.	The Department of the County of Apos; Indian River recognizes the Day of Apos; assistance.	The Department of the County of Apos; Indian River recognizes the day of Apos; assistance.
84	student aid awareness rally	Student assistance and awareness-raising rally.	Apo Awareness Gathering; student assistance.	Student awareness rally; student assistance.
84	hiv positive people suffer stress isolation	In addition, there is a risk of HIV infection and a risk of infection.	People living with HIV experience isolation from stress.	HIV-positive people experience isolation from stress.
84	micronutrient supplement reduce risk hiv disease progression illness	An additional dose of os' oligo@ elements reduces the risk of the progression of the HIV disease.	A micronutrient supplementation reduces the risk of further spread of HIV.	A supplement of micronutrients reduces the risk of HIV disease progression.
84	aid key anti aid goal track lag	Helping against-key targets helps with delay.	Helping key anti-targets helps with delay.	Helping the key anti-targets helps with delay.
84	number adolescent hiv jump third	Number of third-place HIV-positive adolescents.	Number of HIV-positive adolescents who are in third place.	Number of HIV-positive adolescents who jump to third place.
84	regional queenslanders witness free hiv testing	Regional Queenslanders are watching for free HIV testing.	Regional Queenslanders witness the free HIV testing.	Regional Queenslanders witness free HIV testing.
84	risk group urged hiv test	HIV testing was emphasized by the at-risk group.	The at-risk group insisted on HIV testing.	The group at risk emphasized the importance of screening for HIV.
84	urge aid test baby	Baby helper needs to be tested urgently.	There's an urgent need to test the apos; baby help.	It's urgent to test baby help.
84	nation step aid prevention effort	Step-by-step help from the nation.	L' the prevention effort of l' step-by-step assistance of the nation.	L' prevention effort of the nation step by step.
84	aid death youth rise globally warns	Helping Death Young people warn of the whole world.	Helping Death: Youth S' student warns from all over the world.	Helping Death The youth s' student warns from all over the world.
84	hiv thurrock	Thurrock.	Viv thurrock, huh?	Hey, hey, hey.
84	grant help fight sugar daddy peril south africa	Help @-@Me Fight Sugar Dad Peril South Africa.	Help @-@me fight peril sweet papa South Africa.	Help @-@me fight sugar daddy peril South Africa.
84	launch guideline help neglected adolescent fight hiv aid	Launch a Guideline to Assist Neglected Adolescents to Fight HIV.	To launch a guideline to assist neglected adolescents in the fight against HIV.	Launch a guideline to help neglected adolescents fight HIV.
84	conference tackle stigma surrounding hiv aid	The Consensus Conference; Attacks the Stigma around HIV/AIDS.	The conference s' attacks the stigma surrounding HIV/AIDS.	The conference addresses the stigma surrounding HIV/AIDS.
84	free testing aid day	Free evaluation. l&apos day.	Apo Day; apo assistance; free evaluation.	Celebration Day; free evaluation.
84	battle hiv aid	Battle hive aid.	Helps to the battle hive.	Help with battle iv.
84	hiv infection rising europe	HIV/AIDS is on the increase in Europe.	HIV infection is on the increase in Europe.	HIV infection increasing in Europe.
84	beat hiv	Beat HIV.	To fight HIV.	I'm gonna fight HIV.
84	census bureau data visualization hiv aid impact africa	Census Bureau Data Visualization of AIDS; Impact of HIV on Africa.	Data from the census bureau visualization of AIDS; impact of HIV on Africa.	Census data visualization of HIV impact on Africa.
84	dhmh commemorate aid day anniversary dec st	Celebration of St. Joseph's Day; Help Dec.	Celebration of the Apostles; Anniversary of the Day of Apostles; Help Dec.	Celebration of apo; anniversary of Thanksgiving; Help Dec.
84	long term mu ivitamin supplementation delay aid symptom	Apos; prolonged administration of apo supplements; delays symptoms of apo; helps.	Long-term use of apo supplements; ivitamin delays symptoms of apo; help.	Lupos; prolonged use of additives; ivitamin delays symptoms; help.
84	number adolescent hiv jump	Number of jumps among adolescents.	Number of HIV jumps in adolescents.	Number of adolescent HIV jumps.
84	talking openly partner linked hiv testing teen	Talk openly about HIV-related partners.	Speak openly HIV-related partner adolescent test.	To speak openly HIV-related partner teen test.
84	uaid honor aid week speaker series	Lectures Series on the Week of Hope; Help from the Honour.	A series of lectures on the theme of the Week of Our Lives; Help from the Honour.	Lectures on the week of l' aide d' honor.
84	positive woman secures large grant aid fund	Positive women get a lot of help.	A positive woman receives significant help from a fund.	A positive woman gets a fund of important assistance.
84	project jordan target hiv infection black	Project Jordan, HIV-infected black target.	Project Jordan, black target of HIV infection.	Project Jordan, black target of HIV infection.
84	partner communication commitment influenced hiv testing adolescent	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the development of HIV/AIDS.	HIV testing among adolescents has been influenced by partner communication.	HIV/AIDS; partner communication engagement influenced HIV testing among adolescents.
84	oro remains hiv aid hotspot	Oro hotspot hiv hotspot hiv hotspot hiv hiv hotspot hiv hiv hotspot.	Oro oro remains hiv hiv hotspot hiv hotspot hiv hotspot hiv hiv hotspot.	Oro oro remains hiv hiv hotspot hiv hotspot.
84	story survivor living hiv aid	It's a long time ago, and it's been a long time since.	History of a living survivor from AIDS; HIV help.	History of a living survivor of HIV/AIDS.
84	record breaking number hiv case recorded hong kong gay men	The highest number of cases of HIV has been among the gay population in Hong Kong.	Record numbers of HIV cases among gay men in Hong Kong.	The record number of HIV cases was recorded among gay men in Hong Kong.
84	promoting aid awareness tillsonburg	The project is expected to be completed by the end of 2007.	Promote awareness; help tillsonburg tillsonburg.	Promote awareness of tillsonburg tillsonburg.
84	hiv test offered bradford campaign raise awareness	HIV testing is available through the Bradford Campaign.	HIV test offered bradford awareness campaign to raise awareness.	HIV test offered bradford awareness campaign.
84	aid longer fatal condition	Helping to prolong life-threatening conditions.	To help prolong the apo; fatal condition.	Help prolong apo; fatal condition.
84	aid south africa grant fight sugar daddy peril	To help the countries of South Africa and the Caribbean to combat the danger of the sugar daddy.	Help the countries of South Africa to fight the danger of the sugar daddy.	Help countries in South Africa fight the sugar daddy's danger.
84	nsw hea authority introduce pop rapid testing site combat rise hiv	It's a good way to get a feel for the game, but it's a good way to get a feel for it.	L' authority nsw hea has set up a pop hive test site for combat.	L' authority nsw hea has set up a site for quick combat pop hiv testing.
84	county jail refuse hiv aid medication	County prison refuses HIV drugs.	County jail is refusing HIV meds.	Well, county jail doesn't accept HIV meds.
85	overweight woman reap benefit morning pill	Overweight woman harvesting morning pill.	Overweight woman taking morning pills.	You know, overweight woman harvesting morning pills.
85	weigh pound plan work	You know, weighing the work of the book plan.	Weighing the work of the plan of the book.	Weigh the plan work of the book.
85	french drugmaker morning pill work woman lb	Morning Pill for French Drug Addict Work Woman lb.	The morning pill for French drug addict Working woman lb.	French drug addict's morning pill Work woman lb.
85	plan lose effectiveness woman pound	It's just that the plan is losing momentum; it's becoming more effective.	The plan now loses momentum; effectiveness defeated Woman.	The plan loses effectiveness beaten woman.
85	european morning pill norlevo deemed ineffective woman	The European morning pill, Norlevo, has found the woman to be ineffective.	The European morning pill Norlevo found the woman ineffective.	The European morning pill Norlevo deemed the woman ineffective.
85	morning pill effective overweight woman	Overweight, effective morning pill.	Effective overweight woman's morning pill.	Morning pill effective overweight woman.
85	average american woman weigh morning pill	The average American woman, she weighs the morning pill.	Well, the average American woman weighs the morning pill.	The average American woman weighs the morning pill.
85	manufacturer morning pill work woman	The man who made the morning pills is a working woman.	The morning pill maker works as a woman.	The morning pill maker works, woman.
85	emergency birth control work woman pound	Pregnancy emergency.	Apos intervention; pregnancy emergency.	D&apos intervention; emergency in case of pregnancy.
85	morning pill work woman lb	Morning pill works, woman lb.	This morning pill works, woman lb.	The morning pill works woman lb.
85	contraceptive pill prevent pregnancy heavy woman	Contraceptive pills prevent pregnancy.	Contraceptive pills prevent pregnancy Heavy woman.	The contraceptive pill prevents heavy pregnancy.
85	fda reviewing evidence morning pill work woman	FDA's looking at evidence, morning pills help women get jobs.	FDA's looking at evidence, and the morning pill helps women get jobs.	The FDA reviews the evidence, the morning pill helps women work.
85	morning pill work woman	Morning pills work, woman.	The morning pill is working woman.	The morning pill works, woman.
85	plan ineffective woman weighing pound	Ineffectual plan, woman, weight pounds sterling.	Ineffectual plan woman weighing pounds sterling.	Plan ineffective woman weighing pounds sterling.
85	morning pill recommended woman weighing	A weighty woman was recommended on the morning pill.	The morning pill recommended a very heavy woman.	The morning pill recommended heavy woman.
85	eu warning label emergency contraceptive effective woman	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I don't think I'll be able to help you.	The Emergency Contraceptive Contraception (ECC) label is a warning label for women.	Had warning label Urgence contraceptive effective woman.
85	breaking news morning pill work woman pound	Latest morning labor pill stuff.	Latest news morning work-life pill stuff.	Latest news morning pill of labor woman stuff.
85	woman weigh morning pill effective	Good morning pill-wielding woman.	Woman weighing down the morning pill effective.	Woman weighing morning pill effective.
85	morning pill effective overweight	It's a good way to keep your weight down.	Effective morning pill in effective overweight.	Effective morning pill effective overweight.
85	regulator label change needed morning pill	This was the first time that the product had been approved for use in Canada.	The morning pill was required for the change of the regulator label.	The regulator label change required the morning pill.
85	scientist morning pill effective overweight woman	You know, you're an effective morning pill scientist, overweight woman.	Scientific morning pill effective woman overweight.	Scientific morning pill effective overweight woman.
85	pill identical plan ineffective woman pound	I'm sorry, but I'm on the same ineffective plan as you.	Identical plan ineffective pill woman delivers.	Pill identical plan ineffective woman delivers.
85	morning pill work heavier woman	Morning pills make heavier women work.	This morning's pill makes a heavier woman work harder.	The morning pill makes a heavier woman work.
85	fda reviewing efficacy plan contraception woman pound	Fda reviews the effectiveness of the plan; woman's contraception book.	Fda examines the effectiveness of contraception plan woman delivers.	Fda reviews the' effective plan contraception woman delivers woman book.
85	morning pill effective heavier woman	Heavier woman's morning pill.	You know, you're a heavier woman on the morning pill.	Effective heavier woman morning pill.
85	morning pill work obese woman	Morning pills work for women who are obese.	I guess the morning pill works for fat women.	The morning pill works on obese women.
85	plan ineffective woman weight	A woman, a woman, a woman, a woman, and a weight.	The plan is to have a woman, a woman, a woman, a woman, and a weight.	The plan is: a woman, a woman, a woman, a woman, a weight of weight.
85	obese top morning pill work	Morning pills for obese people are effective.	Well, the morning pill for the obese is working.	The obese morning pill works.
85	european regulatory authority change emergency contraceptive labeling	The European Regulatory Authority (ERA) is changing the labelling of birth control pills.	The European regulatory authority is changing the labelling of the contraceptives.	European regulatory authority modifies labelling of contraceptives; emergency.
85	morning pill ineffective heavier woman	I can't get a morning pill, heavier woman.	Uh, ineffective morning pill, heavier woman.	Morning pill ineffective heavier woman.
85	doctor morning pill loses effectiveness overweight woman	Morning pills are becoming less effective in obese women.	The morning pill, it loses its effectiveness in obese women.	The morning pill loses its effectiveness in obese women.
85	morning pill ineffective overweight woman	Overweight, ineffective morning pill.	Inefficient morning pill for overweight women.	Morning pill ineffective overweight woman.
85	report morning pill ineffective woman lb	If you have any questions, please contact your doctor or pharmacist.	Please report the morning pill's ineffectiveness.	Report the morning pill as ineffective.
85	morning pill ineffective woman pound	Morning Pill Inefficient female pound.	Morning Pill Female ineffective pound.	Morning pill Inefficient woman pound.
85	morning pill work woman pound	Morning Pill for women.	It's called the morning pill for women.	The morning pill for women.
85	plan morning pill effective woman weighing	Plan the morning pill, effective weight woman.	Plan the morning pill for effective weight-weight woman.	Plan the morning pill effective weight woman.
85	morning contraceptive pill fails obese	If you are pregnant or breastfeeding, you may have to take birth control pills.	If you are obese, the morning contraceptive pill fails.	The morning contraceptive pill fails in case of obesity.
85	morning pill work woman pound	Morning Pill for women.	It's called the morning pill for women.	The morning pill for women.
85	drugmaker warns morning pill	Well, the drug addict's warning us of the morning pill.	The drug addict, he warns of the morning pill.	It's the drug addict's morning pill warning.
85	european morning pill warns effective woman pound	European morning pills prevent pregnancy; women's effectiveness.	The European morning pill prevents the effectiveness of women.	The European morning pill helps prevent pregnancy.
85	morning pill effective overweight woman	Overweight, effective morning pill.	Effective overweight woman's morning pill.	Morning pill effective overweight woman.
85	morning pill effective woman pound	Morning Pill Effective female pound.	Morning Pill, Female, effective impound.	You know, morning pill... effective impound woman.
85	tga consider regulatory action norlevo furore	Tga Consider Regulatory Action Norlevo furore.	Consider regulatory action Norlevo furore.	Tga consider regulatory action Norlevo furore.
85	report morning pill work woman pound	I've got a morning-crazy work-woman report.	Morning Pill report labor woman stuff.	Report morning pill work woman stuff.
85	study morning pill equally effective obese woman	Studying the same effective morning-campus pill as an obese woman.	Study morning pill also effective fat woman.	Studying the morning pill equally effective obese woman.
85	dr manny plan work woman weighing pound	Dr. Manny, countertop, female, 300-pound.	Uh, Dr. Manny, countertop, woman who weighs 300 pounds.	Dr. Manny, 300-pound woman on the counter.
85	morning pill work obese woman	Morning pills work for women who are obese.	I guess the morning pill works for fat women.	The morning pill works on obese women.
85	morning pill work woman lb	Morning pill works, woman lb.	This morning pill works, woman lb.	The morning pill works woman lb.
85	french drugmaker warns morning pill	Well, the French drug addict is warning of the morning pill.	The French drug addict, he warns of the morning pill.	French junkie warns about morning pills.
85	morning pill work woman pound	Morning Pill for women.	It's called the morning pill for women.	The morning pill for women.
85	morning pill ineffective american woman	I can't get an ineffective morning pill, American woman.	Inefficient morning pill American woman ineffective.	Inefficient morning pill ineffective American woman.
85	morning pill touted liberal work woman pound	The morning pill, it was praising the virtues of liberal workers.	The morning pill praised the virtues of the liberal workers.	The morning pill praised liberal laborers.
85	report morning pill effective overweight woman	Overweight woman report on the effective morning pill.	Report on the effective morning pill overweight woman.	Report on the morning pill effective overweight woman.
85	french plan work heavy woman	It's a great way to learn more about women's rights.	Check out this action plan for a woman over the age of 50.	Check out a plan to date a woman over 50.
85	wtf wednesday morning pill work woman	Wednesday morning, pill working woman.	Wednesday morning, the pill is working, woman.	Wednesday morning pill working woman.
85	morning pill ineffective woman pound	Morning Pill Inefficient female pound.	Morning Pill Female ineffective pound.	Morning pill Inefficient woman pound.
85	drug maker add weight warning morning pill	Drug manufacturer adds morning weight-warning pill.	The drug manufacturer adds the morning weight-warning pill.	The drug company has added the morning pill warning of weight.
85	morning pill work woman weight	Morning pills work for women, weight-weight women.	The morning pill works woman-weight woman-weight.	The morning pill works woman weight weight woman.
85	warning morning pill weight limit	Morning warning.	Weight limit of d&apos pill; morning warning.	D&apos pill weight limit; morning warning.
85	morning pill work heavier woman drugmaker	The morning pill's working on heavier women who make drugs.	The morning pill is working on heavier women who make drugs.	The morning pill works on heavier drug-making women.
85	morning pill shock	Morning-pill shock.	The shock of the morning pill.	Uh, morning pill shock.
85	plan effective woman pound photo reuters	Effective planning woman photo book reuters photo.	Effective planning woman book photo photo reuters photo.	Effective planning woman photo reuters photo book.
85	planned parenthood money news morning pill ineffective	Family planning morning pills are ineffective.	Well, the family planning morning pill is ineffective.	The family planning morning pill is ineffective.
85	morning pill ineffective obese woman warning	Morning pills help prevent obese, ineffectual women.	Well, the morning pill prevents obese, inefficient women.	The morning pill prevents ineffective obese women.
85	fda review efficacy issue morning pill	The FDA is reviewing the effectiveness of the use of the morning pill.	FDA reviews the effectiveness of the morning pill.	FDA reviews morning pill effectiveness.
85	morning pill ineffective heavier woman drugmaker	Ineffectual morning pill, heavier female drug addict.	Inefficient morning pill heavier female drug addict.	Morning pill ineffective heavier female drug addict.
85	morning pill effective woman pound	Morning Pill Effective female pound.	Morning Pill, Female, effective impound.	You know, morning pill... effective impound woman.
85	morning pill work overweight woman	The morning pill, it works for women who are overweight.	You know, the morning pill works for overweight women.	The morning pill works overweight women.
85	plan morning pill effective american woman	Plan effective morning pill, American woman.	Plan effective morning pill for effective American woman.	Plan effective morning pill American woman effective.
85	woman warned morning pill	Morning pill alert.	Woman warned about the morning pill?	Woman on morning pill alert.
85	morning pill work weigh	Morning pills are a big deal.	Well, the morning pill weighs a lot.	The morning pill weighs heavy.
85	weight limit render emergency contraceptive pill ineffective average	Weight limits make the birth control pills ineffective, on average.	The weight limit makes the contraceptive pill d'apos; emergency ineffective on average.	The weight limit makes the emergency contraceptive pill ineffective on average.
85	morning pill effective heavier woman	Heavier woman's morning pill.	You know, you're a heavier woman on the morning pill.	Effective heavier woman morning pill.
85	weigh pound morning pill work report	Morning Pill report.	Morning pill progress report.	Uh, morning pill report.
85	morning pill prevent pregnancy woman lb	Morning pills keep a woman from getting pregnant, lb.	The morning pill prevents the woman from becoming pregnant lb.	The morning pill keeps the woman from getting pregnant, lb.
85	fda investigates effectiveness morning pill heavier woman	FDA is studying the effectiveness of morning pills for women with heavier weight.	The FDA is studying the effectiveness of the morning pill for heavier women.	FDA studies morning pill effectiveness for heavier women.
85	american woman worry plan	Worried about his wife's future.	They're American, worried about his wife's future.	She is also concerned about the future of her husband.
85	fda reviewing weight limit morning pill	FDA is reviewing morning pills to limit the weight.	The F.D.A. is reviewing the morning pill to limit the weight.	FDA is reviewing the morning pill weight-limiting pill.
85	study morning pill work woman pound	Studying the morning-curriculum, a woman's got a lot of baggage.	Studying the morning work pill is tricky, you know.	Studying the morning pill work woman stuff.
85	european morning pill effective size woman	The European Morning Pill effective womens size.	Women's effective size European morning pill.	European morning pill effective female size.
85	warning morning pill work woman pound	Morning pill warns impound lady.	The morning pill warns the woman at the pound.	The morning pill warns the pound lady.
86	review homefront punch gut tugging heartstrings	Watch the fist of the inner forehead that titillates the sensitive strings.	Now, look again at the punch from the inside forehead that's titillating the sensitive strings.	Replay the inside forehead punch that titillates the sensitive strings.
86	homefront meth madness review	Home-cooked methamphetamine madness.	Examining the insanity of home methamphetamine.	Examination of home meth insanity.
86	homefront	Home front.	To the home front.	Uh, on the home front.
86	interview homefront author chuck logan	Interview the Homefront Author Chuck Logan.	Interview with homefront author Chuck Logan.	Interview homefront author Chuck Logan.
86	jason statham cruising bruising	Jason Statham crosses contusions.	Jason statham's running into bruises.	Well, Jason Statham's running into some bruises.
86	homefront bloody bore	Boredom on the inner front.	L' boredom on the inside forehead.	L&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos.
86	homefront tender tough	Soft on the hard internal front.	Tender on the hard inner front.	To tender on the hard home front.
86	exclusive interview frank grillo homefront captain america	Exclusive interview with Frank Grillo on the Home Front Captain America.	Exclusive interview with Frank Grillo on Captain America's home front.	Frank Grillo's exclusive interview on the home front, Captain America.
86	weekly pop forecast	Weekly pop-up forecast.	Forecast weekly pop.	This is a weekly pop forecast.
86	press conference interview cast director homefront	Director of Distribution's Inner Front Press Conference Interview.	Interview with press conference on the internal front of the distribution director.	Press conference interview on the Director of Distribution's home front.
86	movie review statham stomp bad guy gritty homefront	Cinema magazine statham stomping on bad, filthy, house front.	Film review statham trampling bad dirty front of house guy.	Film magazine statham stomp bad dirty guy's forehead.
86	dull homefront action action movie	It's a film on the home front, and it's a very boring action.	Boring action on the inside front.	D&apos film; dull action on the forehead.
86	homefront trailer jason statham edge human character	The Jason Statham front-of-house caravan borders on human character.	The front-of-house Jason Statham caravan at the edge of human character.	The Jason Statham front-of-house caravan at the human character limit.
86	homefront open road film	Movie on the way to the front of the house?	Film on the road to the front of the house.	Home front road movie.
86	review homefront starring jason statham james franco kate bosworth	Revisiting the home front with James Jason Statham Franco Kate Bosworth.	Revisiting the inner frontline with Jason Statham James franco Kate Bosworth.	Revisiting home front with Jason Statham James franco Kate Bosworth.
86	jason statham winning combatant homefront	Jason Statham wins home front fight.	Jason Statham winning on the fighting home front.	Jason statham winning on the home front fighting.
86	meth lab explode	Meth lab's blowing up.	This meth lab is exploding.	The meth lab explodes.
86	homefront giveaway	Revelation on the home front.	It's a revelation on the home front.	Well, a revelation on the home front.
86	review homefront break door includes hand account	I want to look at the door door door door door door door door door door door to door door to hand.	Review the door door door door door door door door door door to hand.	To review the door door door door door door door door door to door to hand.
86	written sylvester stallone	Sylvester writes Stallone.	Sylvester Stallone writes.	Sylvester stallone writes.
86	movie review homefront	Homefront film review.	Homefront cinema.	Homefront movie magazine.
86	stallone movie liberty homefront bother minnesota book author	Stallone film, Liberty Homefront, disturbing Minnesota, author of the Minnesota book.	Stallone film Liberty Homefront disturbs Minnesota, author of the book Minnesota.	Stallone film Liberty Homefront disturbing Minnesota book author Minnesota.
86	homefront movie review nola shot film solidly middle road action thriller	The film critic on the nola frontline shot a solid road action thriller action medium film.	The film critic on the front of the nola house shot film solidly medium road action thriller action.	The film critic on the front of the house nola shot film solidly medium of road action thriller action.
86	win ticket celebrity screening homefront	Celebrity winning ticket, projection on the home front.	Celebrity winning ticket projection on the home front.	Winning celebrity ticket for projection on the home front.
86	homefront mild bone crunching diversion	Bone drift on the inner forehead.	A slight derivation of the bones on the inside forehead.	Slight bone drift on the inside forehead.
86	review homefront standard issue statham check bosworth	Review the standard Statham number on the home front, check out the bosworth.	Review Statham's standard home front number, check out the bosworth.	Uh, review the standard Statham number on the home front, check bosworth.
86	statham franco mismatched homefront	It's just that Statham Franco didn't match very well on the forehead.	Statham franco was mismatched on the forehead of the house.	Statham franco was mismatched on the forehead.
86	movie review homefront	Homefront film review.	Homefront cinema.	Homefront movie magazine.
86	movie review homefront stupid forgettable action movie	It's a stupid film review, and it's a stupid movie; it's a stupid action, it's an action.	Stupid film review homefront film d'apos forgettable action stupid film d'apos; action.	Stupid film review homefront movie d'apos; stupid forgettable action movie d'apos; action.
86	review homefront feel action	It's a great way to make you feel good about yourself.	Revise on the inside front feel l' action.	Revisiting on the home front feel action.
86	falling short homefront	Inner front is missing.	You're missing the inside front.	Well, we're missing the inner front.
86	homefront mashup brutish action family	Family d' Mashup's brutal action... on the home front.	Family d' brutal Mashup action on home front.	Mashup's brutal action on the home front.
86	statham expendables biggest action movie	Statham is the world's biggest d&apos film; action you can do without it.	Statham is the biggest d&apos movie, action you don't need.	Statham is the biggest action you can do without.
86	homefront backwoods breaking bad bad	S&apos the woods of the house front; collapse.	The woods of the forehead are s' collapse.	The woods of the forehead of the house are collapsing.
86	movie review homefront standard issue statham	Revue du film sur le front de maison standard number statham.	Standard number statham home front movie review.	Movie review on home front standard issue statham.
86	homefront review	Home front exam.	Examining the home front.	Uh, home front review.
86	review homefront	Back to the home front.	Take another look at the home front.	Okay, go back to the home front.
86	homefront winona ryder james franco	"""Winona Ryder James"" franco."	Winona Ryder James franco.	Winona ryder james franco.
86	director gary fleder talk homefront	Director Gary Fleder speaking on the home front.	Warden Gary Fleder to speak on the home front.	Uh, Director Gary Fleder speaking on the home front.
86	homefront hero minn author chuck logan hollywood treatment	Hero of the Home Front, Minn Author Chuck Logan Hollywood.	The hero of the home front, minn author Chuck Logan Hollywood.	Home front hero minn author Chuck Logan hollywood.
86	homefront mediocre list cast interesting	A very poor list on the home front is interesting.	One mediocre list on the home front is interesting.	A mediocre list on the home front is interesting too.
86	homefront mix single dad bad guy foe	On the front of the house, mix the unmarried father, the bad, the enemy.	On the front of the house, mix the single father, the bad father, and the enemy.	On the front of the house, mix single father, bad father, l' enemy.
86	homefront usual gruff rough stuff jason statham	On the home front, Jason Statham has been known to have a habit of roughness.	On the home front, Jason Statham has a hard habit.	On the home front, Jason Statham has a rough habit.
86	movie review homefront	Homefront film review.	Homefront cinema.	Homefront movie magazine.
86	homefront pretty standard punch shoot jason statham james	On the front of the house, Jason Statham James throws a punch.	On the forehead of the house, Jason Statham James fires a standard punch.	Jason Statham James throws a standard punch at the front of the house.
86	jason statham drew rolling car	Jason Statham has drawn a car.	Well, Jason Statham drew a car.	Jason statham drew a wheeled car.
86	homefront review	Home front exam.	Examining the home front.	Uh, home front review.
86	homefront dozen time	Twelve on the home front.	Twelve times, home front.	Uh, 12 times on the home front.
86	homefront big dumb huge dose violence	A huge, stupid dose of inner-front violence.	It's a huge, stupid dose of violence on the home front.	Huge, stupid dose of violence on the home front.
86	video randy couture support pal jason homefront premiere	Video from Randy Sewing supports Pal Jason's first home front-of-the-way.	Video Randy sewing support Pal Jason first house front first.	Video Randy sewing support Pal Jason front-of-the-line first home.
86	homefront author chuck logan hollywood treatment	Authors on the home front, Chuck Logan Hollywood.	L' author on the Hollywood home front, Chuck Logan Hollywood.	"L' author on the home front, ""Chuck Logan"" hollywood."
86	rotten week predicting homefront black nativity review	Tough week to predict the review of the Interior Front Black Crib.	It's a rotten week to predict the daycare center review on the home front.	It's a rotten week to predict the review of the forehead black creche.
86	homefront review good straightforward action	I want you to revise a good, direct action on the home front.	Revisiting good, direct action on the home front.	Revisiting good direct action on the internal front.
86	homefront kate bosworth wanted character junkie	Kate Bosworth, at the front line, was looking for a character's junkie.	And Kate Bosworth, on the front line, was looking for a character junkie.	Kate Bosworth at the front was looking for a character junkie.
86	film review homefront	This is Homefront Film Review.	Homefront cinematic magazine.	Homefront feature film review.
86	iar exclusive interview director gary fleder talk homefront	Gary Fleder, Exclusive Director of l' Interview, speaks on the home front.	Gary Fleder, the exclusive director of l' interview, speaks on the home front.	Gary Fleder, exclusive director of l&apos, speaks on the home front.
86	review homefront bit punch	Fist the inside forehead again.	Play back the punch from the inside forehead.	Replay the punch from the inside forehead.
86	review homefront starring jason statham james franco	Back to the home front with Jason Statham James franco.	To revisit the home front with Jason Statham James franco.	I mean, to go back to the home front with Jason Statham James Franco.
86	homefront director gary fleder embrace louisiana setting action thriller	Filmmaker Gary Fleder hugs the state of Louisiana by directing a Louisiana action thriller.	Filmmaker Gary Fleder hugs Louisiana directing a d&apos action thriller.	The director Gary Fleder kisses Louisiana by directing a thriller d' action.
86	sadly homefront action flick	Unfortunately, it was a film about the film's interior front.	Sadly, a d&apos film; action on the home front.	Unfortunately, action on the home front.
86	homefront review	Home front exam.	Examining the home front.	Uh, home front review.
86	jason statham james franco homefront movie review	Jason Statham James James, French film critic on the home front.	Jason Statham James James, a critic of French films on the home front.	I'm Jason Statham James, a critic of films on the home front.
86	jason statham chat drama homefront	Jason Statham drama chat, homefront.	Jason Statham drama chat homefront.	Jason statham chat drama drama homefront.
86	homefront silly twist jason statham thriller	On the home front, Jason Statham shot a ridiculous thriller.	On the home front, Jason Statham shot a ridiculous thriller.	On the home front, Jason statham shot a ridiculous thriller.
86	exclusive video kate bosworth talk homefront	The exclusive video of Kate Bosworth talks about her inner forehead.	Kate Bosworth's exclusive video is about her inner front.	Kate Bosworth's exclusive video talks about his inner front.
86	homefront movie review	Critical film on the home front.	The film critic on the home front.	You know, film critics on the home front.
86	punch gut tug heartstrings	Testimony, intuition, intuition, intuition, intuition, intuition.	Witness of the apos; intuition of the apos; intuition of the apos; intuition of the apos; intuition.	It's a good way to get a sense of what's going on.
86	director point botched movie homefront	Director Point botched the entire internal front of the film.	Director Point botched the film's internal frontline.	Cinema director Point botched the internal front.
86	exclusive interview gary fleder homefront alex cross	Exclusive Gary Fleder homefront Alex Cross interview.	Exclusive interview by Gary Fleder homefront Alex Cross.	Exclusive interview Gary Fleder homefront Alex Cross.
86	stallone wrote	Stallone writes.	Well, Stallone wrote.	Stallone wrote that.
86	movie review jason statham homefront safe place	The Jason Statham movie critic a safe house front.	Film critic Jason Statham a safe place on the front of the house.	The Jason Statham movie review a safe place on the front of the house.
86	homefront preview feature jason aldean crazy town video premiere	The front-of-house preview features the first video of D' a Crazy City with Jason Aldean.	The front-of-house previews feature the first video of the house front; a crazy town with Jason Aldean.	Front-of-the-house preview features the first video of a crazy town with Jason Aldean.
86	movie review homefront star	Homefront movie-star magazine.	You know, movie-star homefront magazine.	The homefront movie star magazine.
86	jason statham find sweet sylvester stallone penned	Jason Statham find sylvester stallion sweetness written.	Jason Statham find sylvester stallone softly written.	Jason statham find sylvester stallone sweet written.
86	movie blog qa homefront author chuck logan	The film blogger who writes the Chuck Logan home front.	Film Blog qa l' author of Chuck Logan home front.	Film blog qa l' author of interior front Chuck Logan.
86	homefront movie review	Critical film on the home front.	The film critic on the home front.	You know, film critics on the home front.
86	homefront jason statham talk sylvester stallone putting fear god	Jason Statham on the inside forehead talking stallion sylvester scare God.	Jason Statham on the inside forehead talking sylvester stallone scare god.	Jason statham on the inside forehead talking sylvester stallone scare god.
86	trailer weekly homefront sabotage muppets wanted	A weekly caravan of sabotaging muppets on the home front they've been looking for.	A weekly caravan of the most wanted sabotage muppets on the home front.	A weekly caravan of wanted sabotage muppets on the home front.
86	statham impressive performance homefront	This is an impressive performance, homefront performance.	Statham performance impressive homefront performance.	Statham impressive performance homefront performance.
86	review homefront punch gut tug heartstrings video	Replay the punching on the forehead video.	I want you to replay the video of the punch on the inside forehead.	Review the video of the punch on the forehead.
86	video cast homefront	Inner front video.	Video on the internal front.	Okay, video on the home front.
86	jason statham homefront loving miami expendables testosterone	Jason Statham, a Miami magnet, consumes testosterone.	Jason Statham on the inside front, loving the Miami, consumes a lot of testosterone.	Jason statham on the home front, loving miami, is consuming testosterone.
86	movie review homefront statham roam dramatic china shop video	Homefront Film Review Dramatic vagabond, porcelain video store.	Homefront Film Review Statham is a dramatic vagabond porcelain video store.	Film review Homefront Statham is a dramatic vagabond porcelain video shop video store.
86	homefront movie review	Critical film on the home front.	The film critic on the home front.	You know, film critics on the home front.
86	homefront james franco versus jason statham	This is James Franco v. Jason Statham.	James Franco vs. Jason statham.	James franco vs. jason statham.
86	homefront review watching	Watching it on the inside front.	It's on the inside front looking at it.	Home front review while watching.
86	pop forecast nov homefront lady gaga muppets video	Gaga muppets video game.	Pop predictions nov homefront lady gaga muppets video.	Pop forecast nov homefront lady gaga muppets video.
86	homefront review place	Examination of the interior front.	Place d' examination of interior front.	This is the place where you can see and see the interior front.
86	homefront statham franco	Free statam on the home front.	Statham straight on the home front.	It's all right, it's a free statue on the home front.
86	homefront review jason statham disappoint latest action thriller	Jason Statham disappointed the last thriller of d' action.	The Jason Statham front review is disappointing the latest thriller of d' action.	The front review Jason Statham disappoints the latest action thriller.
86	expendable homefront stallone star statham	Stallone Stallone Star replaceable on the inside front.	Stallone Stallone Star Statham replaceable on the inside front.	Stallone Stallone Stallone Stallone Stallone St Statham on the front of the house.
86	road fame homefront film pop fiction author logan	Famous on the road, I&apos is a famous pop-fiction filmmaker.	Famous on the road, l' author of pop-fiction films Logan.	Famous on the road, l' pop fiction writer Logan.
86	jason statham reveals softer side movie	Jason Statham reveals a milder parallel film, but it's not the same.	Jason Statham reveals a milder parallel film.	Jason statham reveals a milder parallel film.
86	homefront aim meth drama break dull	The goal of the house is to end the methamphetamine addiction and methamphetamine addiction.	The goal of the house is to end the tragedy of the methamphetamine trade.	L' goal of the house is to end the meth drama.
86	homefront written sly stallone wobble punch drunk boxer	On the inside front, a sneaky stall, a punch-drunk boxer, shakes.	And on the inside front, a sneaky stall, a punch-drunk boxer shakes.	On the forehead, a sneaky stall, a punch-drunk boxer shakes.
86	james franco dish tweaked sylvester stallone homefront script	James Franco flat twist sylvester stallone script of the interior front.	James franco flat twisted sylvester stallone script from the inside front.	James franco flat twisted sylvester stallone interior front script.
86	opening weekend nov	Weekend start-end Nov.	Start of the Week-end Nov.	This is the beginning of the week-end Nov.
86	homefront director gary fleder	Home Front Director Gary Fleder.	This is the director of the home front, Gary Fleder.	The director of the home front, Gary Fleder.
86	film review homefront	This is Homefront Film Review.	Homefront cinematic magazine.	Homefront feature film review.
86	jason aldean crazy town action flick homefront exclusive preview	Jason Aldean Crazy Action City Exclusive Film before-premiere on the Interior Front.	Jason Aldean crazy action city exclusive movie before-premiere on the home front.	Jason Aldean crazy action city exclusive movie before-Interior Front premiere.
86	kyle smith	It's Kyle Smith.	Kylesmith.	Uh, kyle smith.
86	interview james franco love loathe playing villain	James Franco doesn't like to be the bad guy.	Interview James Franco doesn't like to play bad guy.	Interrogating james franco doesn't like to play the bad guy.
86	jason statham talk homefront	Jason Statham speaks on the home front.	Jason Statham speaks on the home front.	Jason statham speaks on the home front.
86	homefront extreme makeover	Extreme transformation of internal front.	Extreme interior front transformation.	And extreme transformation of the internal front.
86	jason statham homefront surprising complexity sylvester stallone	Jason Statham Surprising Interior Front Complexity Silvester Stallone Complexity Stallone.	Jason Statham Front surprising interior complexity sillvester stallone complexity.	Jason Statham Front interior surprising complexity sylvester stallone stallone complexity.
86	review jason statham barely punch excitement homefront	It's like watching Jason Statham just kick the bucket; it's like the excitement of the home front.	To see Jason Statham barely strike the apos; the excitement of the forehead inside.	Seeing Jason Statham barely hit the apos; excitement of the inner front.
86	coming time	In the not-too-distant future, the time will come.	Soon, the time will come.	Soon, the time will come.
86	acting storm homefront	Storm on the home front.	To play the storm on the home front.	Playing storm on home front.
86	review homefront extreme makeover	Revisiting the ultimate makeover of the home front.	To revisit the extreme makeover of the inner front.	Review the extreme makeover of the home front.
86	jason statham homefront facing james franco fast	Jason Statham vs. James Franco, and that's it.	And Jason Statham faces James Franco very quickly.	Jason statham vs. James franco quickly.
86	homefront review complex character battle goofy plot twist win	It's the first time I've had a chance to write a book on the subject.	House front review complex battle d&apos character; clumsy intrigue twist win.	House front review complex character battle d' clumsy twist intrigue win.
86	stallone girl find fitting statham formula homefront	The Stallion Girl finds the appropriate statham on the inside front.	The Stallion girl finds the appropriate statham formula on her inner forehead.	Stallone girl finds the appropriate statham formula on the inner forehead.
87	greece inflicted hiv half hiv case greece inflicted	Greece has inflicted HIV-HIV-Half-Half-Half-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV-HIV.	Greece inflicted the HIV half case of HIV half case of HIV Greece inflicted.	Greece inflicted HIV half case HIV half case HIV Greece inflicted.
87	greek citizen infecting hiv order receive government	Greek citizens infected with HIV are receiving the government.	Greek citizens infected with HIV/AIDS receive the government.	HIV-infected Greek citizens receive government support.
87	error lead misguided meme greek hiv	Misguided lead even Greek hiv.	Misguided lead error, even greek hiv.	Error of lead misguided even Greek hiv.
87	totally unbelievable thing absolutely untrue	I mean, what's totally amazing is totally wrong.	What is totally amazing is absolutely wrong.	What's totally unbelievable is totally untrue.
87	safe drug open greece	Safe Medication Open in Greece.	Safe drug in Greece.	Safe drug open in Greece.
87	sitel macedonia desperate greek infect hiv social aid	A desperate Greek infects HIV-positive people.	Sitel macedonia, a desperate Greek infects HIV-positive people.	Sitel macedonia, a desperate Greek infects the apos; social aid to HIV.
87	greek hiv infection claim error	HIV/AIDS is a major health problem in Greece.	HIV infection in Greece is mistakenly reported.	L' HIV infection in Greece.
87	claiming hiv case deliberate	Claims that HIV is deliberate.	To pretend that HIV is deliberate.	You know, pretending that HIV is deliberate.
87	correction greek hiv government benefit	Repayment of the Greek government's own HIV-related profits.	Repayment of the profits of the Greek government on HIV.	Greek government profit-sharing on HIV.
87	claim percent greek hiv case inflicted false	Just pretend that the percentage of HIV cases among the Greeks was wrongly inflicted.	Pretend the percentage of HIV cases among Greeks was wrongly inflicted.	And claim that the percentage of HIV cases among the Greeks was wrongly inflicted.
87	shocking half hiv case greece inflicted benefit	Half of the HIV cases in Greece have had a positive impact.	The shock of half of HIV cases in Greece has had a beneficial effect.	The shock of half of Greece's HIV cases has had beneficial effects.
87	report claim people deliberately injecting hiv order	According to the report, people who inject H.I.V.	According to this report, people who are injecting H.I.V.	According to the report people who are injecting H.I.V.
87	creditor conclude talk greece december	Creditor concludes discussion in Greece in December.	The creditor concluded the discussion in Greece in December.	The creditor concluded the Greek discussion in December.
87	greek economic crisis desperation greek infecting hiv	Desperate Greek HIV-infected economic crisis.	Desperate Greek economic crisis Greek HIV-infected.	A desperate Greek economic crisis infecting HIV.
87	apologizes claiming greek infect hiv	Apologies for declaring HIV infected by the Greeks.	S' apologies for declaring the HIV infected by the Greeks.	It is important to remember that there is no such thing as HIV/AIDS.
87	corrects error hiv case falling year	Corrections; Error in Declining HIV Cases; Year.	Correcting errors in declining HIV cases.	Error in declining HIV cases from year to year.
87	obscure report year ago ridiculous claim	A year ago, it was an obscure report, a ridiculous statement.	Obscure report a year ago, ridiculous statement.	Obscure report a year ago ridiculous statement.
87	european financial crisis greek infecting hiv	European Financial Crisis Greek HIV Infectious.	European financial crisis Greek HIV infecting.	European financial crisis Greece, infecting HIV.
87	claim inflicted hiv greece error	Claims that HIV caused a Greek error.	Pretend that the HIV caused a Greek error.	Well, pretend that the HIV made a Greek mistake.
87	hea group retracts report hiv greece	They retracted the report on HIV in Greece.	The group retracted their report on HIV in Greece.	The group retracted the HIV report in Greece.
87	greek hiv access benefit	Access to HIV in Greece.	Benefits related to HIV/AIDS; access to HIV/AIDS in Greece.	HIV benefits; access to HIV in Greece.
87	desperate unemployed greek inflict hiv receive benefit reuters file	Unemployed HIV-inflicted Greeks receive benefits.	Unemployed Greeks who inflict HIV receive benefits.	The Greeks who are unemployed and who inflict HIV/AIDS receive benefits.
87	greek inject hiv claim benefit	Greeks who are injecting HIV are demanding benefits.	Greeks who inject HIV are asking for the benefits.	Greeks who inject HIV claim benefits.
87	release official statement admitting error hiv report	In addition to the above, there are a number of other issues that should be addressed.	An official statement admitting an error in the HIV report.	Publication of official statement admitting error in HIV report.
87	admits error report claiming greek hiv benefit	It is a mistake to admit that the Greeks have benefited from HIV.	The report admits that the Greeks have benefited from the HIV virus.	The report admits that the Greeks have benefited from HIV.
87	report inflicted hiv greece bad editing error spokesperson	Report inflicted on Greece HIV bad door-word error d' edition error of assembly.	Report inflicted on Greece HIV bad door-word error d' edit editing error.	Report inflicted on Greece HIV bad door-word mistake d' editing error mount.
87	greek contracting hiv claim benefit	Benefits are available to Greeks who contract HIV.	The Greeks who contract HIV are entitled to benefits.	Greeks contracting HIV are entitled to benefits.
87	correction hiv case study greece featured europe report social	In addition, there is a growing body of research on the impact of HIV/AIDS on health and well-being.	A case study on HIV/AIDS in Greece was the subject of a report by l'apos; social Europe.	HIV/AIDS case study in Greece was the subject of a report by l'apos; social Europe.
87	hea group retracts claim inflicted hiv common greece	The Hea group's retractions claim that Greece has been infected with HIV.	Hea Group retractions claim that HIV has been inflicted on Greece.	The retractions of the Hea group claim that HIV was inflicted on Greece.
87	rectifies error hiv report	It is important to keep in mind that HIV/AIDS is a serious problem.	Correction of an error in the HIV/AIDS report.	Corrections; error in HIV/AIDS report.
87	greek inject hiv claim benefit	Greeks who are injecting HIV are demanding benefits.	Greeks who inject HIV are asking for the benefits.	Greeks who inject HIV claim benefits.
87	report greek inflict hiv benefit	Greek Report Imposing the Benefit of HIV.	Greek report inflicting HIV benefit.	Greek report inflicting the benefit of HIV.
87	limbaugh promotes myth greek hiv welfare	"Limbaugh promotes the Greek myth of ""lapos""; social assistance for HIV."	"Limbaugh promotes the myth of the ""Greek myth"" of HIV/AIDS."	Limbaugh promotes the Greek HIV social welfare myth.
87	greek infecting hiv	HIV-infected Greek.	Greek infecting the HIV virus.	Greek infecting HIV.
87	correction hiv case study greece featured europe report	In addition, there are a number of other countries that are not members of the European Union.	The case study on HIV/AIDS in Greece was the subject of a report by the European Commission.	HIV/AIDS case study in Greece was the subject of a report by the European Commission.
87	greek deliberately hiv typo prompt inquiry	Greece deliberately hiv typo query quickly about the request for information.	Greece deliberately hiv typo prompt request for information.	Greece deliberately hiv typo prompt request for information.
87	hea organization horrible editing error convinces people	It's a terrible mistake, it's a mistake, it's a mistake, it's a mistake.	A horrible mistake by an editor; an organization that convinces people.	An organization convinces people of a terrible editorial error.
87	hiv claim case greece inflicted error admits	HIV claims Greek cases inflicted admitted error error inflicted.	HIV claims Greek inflicted cases admits error error inflicted.	HIV claims Greek cases inflicted admits error made.
87	false claim greek aid viral	False Greek declaration of viral aid.	This is a false declaration of greek viral aid.	You know, false Greek viral aid declaration.
87	people greece hiv welfare money	AIDS money; social assistance of the Greeks.	AIDS money; social assistance of AIDS Greeks.	L' money from AIDS; social assistance from the Greeks.
87	greek hiv report error	Misreporting of Greek HIV.	Reportedly incorrect on Greek HIV status.	Greek HIV report misreport.
87	bee sniffing cancer inflicted hiv greece fat tax leg	It's been a long time since the outbreak of HIV/AIDS in Canada.	L'apos; inhalation d'apos; cancerous bees inflicted the HIV to the Greek fat of the fiscal leg.	Inhalation of cancerous bees inflicted HIV on the Greek fat of the fiscal leg.
87	oops wrong greek hiv en masse	Lots of bad Greek HIV oops.	Oops bad Greek HIV in bulk.	Oops bad greek HIV en masse.
87	people greece hiv social welfare	In Greece, people are living with HIV/AIDS, and they are living with HIV/AIDS.	People in Greece have HIV infection; social assistance.	The people in Greece have HIV from AIDS; social assistance.
87	report half hiv case greece inflicted	Report half of the HIV cases which Greece has inflicted.	Report half the HIV cases Greece has inflicted.	Please report half the cases of HIV that Greece has inflicted.
87	admits erroneous claim half hiv case greece inflicted	Admits the false claim that half the cases of HIV infection in Greece have been inflicted.	Admits the false claim half case of HIV Greece inflicted.	Admits false claim half case of HIV-inflicted Greece.
87	greek infecting hiv admits report error	The Greek HIV-infecting man admits to a misreporting.	The Greek HIV-infected admits a misreporting.	The Greek HIV infecting admits a misreporting.
87	disavows greek hiv report	Refuses the Greek HIV report.	And reject the Greek report on HIV.	Refuses the Greek report on HIV.
87	fumble apology greek hiv injection claim	A failed Greek apology, Hiv Injection, claims.	A failed Greek apology by Hiv Injection.	Missing Greek apology Hiv Injection claims.
87	greek injecting hiv claim benefit	Benefits are available to those Greeks who inject HIV.	Greeks who inject HIV are entitled to benefits.	Greeks who are injecting HIV are entitled to benefits.
87	price fiscal austerity greek inject hiv claim benefit	The price of oil and gas is high; the price of oil and gas is high.	Greece's fiscal austerity inject hiv are demanding the profit.	Price of l' fiscal austerity Greek inject hiv claim profit.
87	hea organization retracts report aid greece slate	The report was adopted by the Council of Europe and the European Parliament.	The organization retracts its report on l' aid provided to Greece.	L' organization retracts report on l' aid provided to Greece.
87	european drug expert sound warning austerity citing rise greek hiv	Lapos, a European drug expert, warns against AIDS by citing the rise of HIV in Greece.	The European Union's drug expert warns against the use of drugs; austerity, citing the rise of HIV/AIDS in Greece.	European drug expert Lapos warns against apo; austerity citing the rise of Greek HIV.
87	apologises claiming half greek hiv infection inflicted	He said that he was sorry to have reported a half-Greek HIV infection.	He apologized for reporting a half-Greek HIV infection.	Apologies for reporting a half-Greek infection with HIV.
87	alarming claim hiv greece wrong	Greek HIV scare fake.	Alarming claim that Greek HIV is false.	Alarmful claim hiv greek false.
87	impoverished greek infecting hiv benefit	Impoverished Greeks who are infected with HIV are taking advantage.	Impoverished Greeks who infect HIV take advantage of that.	The impoverished Greeks who are infecting the HIV are taking advantage.
87	crisis hit greece set drug consumption centre	The crisis in Greece has now created a drug-consumption centre.	The crisis in Greece has created a centre for the consumption of drugs.	The crisis that hit Greece created a drug consumption centre.
87	grapevine fighting frivolous lawsuit	Fighting a frivolous trial.	Grape fighting a frivolous trial?	Grape fighting frivolous trial.
87	greek infect hiv euro month	The European Union is the world's largest source of HIV infection.	The Greeks are infected with HIV during the month of April.	The Greeks infect HIV during the euro month.
87	hea organization editing error hiv report	An organization's HIV-edition report; an error.	A report d' mistake d' HIV edition d' an organization.	A report on the error of the HIV edition of an organization.
87	desperate measure greek inflict hiv benefit	Greece is inflicting benefits on HIV.	Desperate measure Greece is inflicting a profit on HIV.	And desperate measure Greece is inflicting benefits on HIV.
87	retracts hiv injection claim	Withdrawal; claim; HIV injection.	Withdrawal of HIV infection; claim of infection; HIV injection.	Withdrawal; HIV injection claim.
87	expert government exclude drug abuse treatment austerity	In addition, there are a number of issues related to the treatment of substance abuse.	Austerity treatment for drug addicts is ruled out by government experts.	Government experts exclude drug treatment from austerity.
87	shock report half hiv infection greece inflicted gov	The shock points to a half-HIV infection the government received from Greece.	The shock signals a half-HIV infection which Greece has inflicted on the government.	The shock marks a half-HIV infection that Greece inflicted on the government.
87	desperate greek citizen intentionally infecting hiv	Desperate Greek citizen deliberately infecting the HIV virus.	A desperate Greek citizen intentionally infecting HIV.	Desperate Greek citizen intentionally infecting HIV.
87	greek injecting hiv claim benefit	Benefits are available to those Greeks who inject HIV.	Greeks who inject HIV are entitled to benefits.	Greeks who are injecting HIV are entitled to benefits.
87	greek hiv benifits	Benifit Greek HIV.	The Greek HIV benifits.	You know, the Greek HIV benifits.
87	truth hiv greece depressing	Truth is, HIV in Greece is depressing.	The truth is that HIV in Greece is depressing.	The truth is, HIV in Greece is depressing.
87	correction greece drug declaration story	History of the Drug Report of Correctional Greece.	History of the Declaration of Drugs in Greece.	History of drug declaration of Greece correctional.
87	greek citizen infecting hiv medial benefit	Greek Citizen with HIV Median Benefit.	Greek citizen infected with HIV median benefit.	Greek citizen with HIV median benefit.
87	greek intentionally infecting hiv	It is the intention of the Greeks to infect HIV.	The Greeks are intentionally infecting the HIV virus.	The Greeks are intentionally infecting HIV!
87	embarrassing hiv apology	Embarrassing excuse for HIV.	I'm embarrassed about the HIV.	Embarrassing apology for HIV.
87	greek inject hiv claim benefit	Greeks who are injecting HIV are demanding benefits.	Greeks who inject HIV are asking for the benefits.	Greeks who inject HIV claim benefits.
87	apologizes mistakenly claiming greek hiv purpose	He also apologized that he had falsely claimed a Greek goal for HIV.	He s' excuse d' falsely claiming a Greek goal for HIV.	He apologized for falsely claiming a Greek HIV goal.
87	typo claim greek deliberately injecting hiv	The typo says that Greeks deliberately inject HIV.	Well, the typo says that the Greeks are deliberately injecting HIV.	The typo says the greeks are deliberately injecting HIV.
87	european drug expert sound warning austerity	The EU's role in the fight against terrorism is a key element in the fight against terrorism.	A European drug expert warns against apo; austerity.	A European drug expert warns against austerity.
87	large number greek people hiv collect	Many HIV-positive Greeks are HIV-positive.	HIV is collected by a large number of HIV-positive Greeks.	A large number of HIV-positive Greeks collect HIV.
87	greece hiv injection claim	Allegation of HIV infection in Greece.	Allegation d' injection of HIV in Greece.	HIV injection in Greece.
87	quick hit	Fast, fast, fast punch.	A quick, quick, fast punch.	Quick, quick and fast.
87	eu government warned cut drug abuse treatment	The government has warned that there should be no more treatment for drug addiction.	The government warned against withdrawing treatment for drug addiction.	The government has warned against drug abuse treatment being discontinued.
87	greece open drug consumption centre addict bring drug	In Greece, the drug addict at the Greek Open Drug Abuse Centre brings drugs.	In Greece, the drug addict at the open centre for the consumption of drugs brings drugs.	In Greece, the drug addict at the open drug abuse centre brings drugs.
87	epic editing error rush limbaugh outrageous welfare state	An epic mix-up error has precipitated limbaugh's scandalous welfare state.	An epic assembly error precipitated the scandalous limbaugh welfare state.	An epic assembly error precipitated a scandalous welfare state limbaugh.
87	retracts claim greek injecting hiv receive	The retractions allege that the Greek HIV-injecting drug users are receiving HIV.	The retractions claim that the HIV-injecting Greeks are HIV-infected.	Recantations claim Greek HIV injectors receive HIV.
87	greece open injection room drug addict	In Greece, the drug-injecting room is used as an injection room for people who are drug addicts.	In Greece the open injection room is a drug addict.	In Greece, the open injection room is an addict.
87	apologises claiming half hiv infection greece inflicted	He said that he did not know what to do, but that he did not want to do anything about it.	He apologized for saying that Greece had inflicted a half-HIV infection.	He apologized for saying that half-HIV infection had been inflicted by Greece.
87	greek people deliberately infecting hiv	Greeks deliberately infect HIV.	Well, the Greeks are deliberately infecting the HIV virus.	Greeks are deliberately infecting people with HIV.
88	obama tax exempt crackdown easy skirt	Obama exonerated from wearing a skirt; taxed the repression of the skirt easy skirt.	Obama exonerated from apos; tax the repression of the skirt easy skirt easy.	Obama exonerated from apos; tax easy skirt repression.
88	irs urged ti weakness system security	Irs stressed the security system's weakness.	Mr. Irs stressed the weakness of the security system.	Irs stressed the weakness of security system.
88	gov crackdown spending tax exempt group	The federal government is also responsible for the administration of the program.	The government represses expenses of the exempt group.	The government represses exempt group expenditures from tax.
88	obama administration proposes rule rein political activity nonprofit	The Obama administration is proposing the rule rein non-profit political activity.	The Obama administration has proposed the rule of rein political activity not for profit.	The Obama administration proposes the rule rein political activity not for profit.
88	irs proposes guideline politicking tax exempt group	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it is a matter of public policy.	Irs is proposing a guideline on politicization of the tax exempt group.	Irs proposes a guideline on politicization of tax exempt group.
88	irs treasury push clamp tax exempt political group	Treasury encourages tax-exempt political groups.	In addition, the public purse encourages political groups that are exempt from taxes.	The Treasury encourages tax exempt political groups.
88	federal investigator contacting conservative group targeted irs	Federal investigator, in contact with a conservative group.	He's a federal investigator in contact with a conservative group.	A federal investigator in contact with conservative group.
88	irs proposes rule	L' IRS provides a rule.	L' IRS proposes a rule.	L' IRS proposes rule.
88	restriction proposed tax exempt group political activity	Proposed Restriction Exempt Group Political Activities; Tax.	Proposed Restriction Exempt group political activities; tax.	Proposed restriction Exempt group political activities; tax.
88	library congress	Library convention.	Library conference!	Uh, library convention.
88	irs proposes rule tax exempt organization	For more information, see our Web site at www.cra.gc.ca.	L' IRS proposes a special rule for tax-exempt organizations.	L' IRS proposes a rule for exempt organizations.
88	conservative group worried latest campaign finance	The Conservative Group was concerned about the funding of recent election campaigns.	The conservative group was also concerned about the funding of recent election campaigns.	The conservative group was concerned about campaign financing in recent elections.
88	dark money nonprofit political spending restricted proposed irs rule	In the case of the latter, it is not clear whether this is the case, but rather whether it is the case.	The non-profit political spending of the black money limited the bill.	Non-profit political spending of the black money limited the proposed legislation.
88	report irs fixed security weakness	Security Vulnerabilities Report corrected.	Report on all security vulnerabilities corrected.	Report on fixed security vulnerabilities.
88	obama administration proposes curb campaigning tax exempt	Obama is proposing to put a stop to the tax-exempt campaign.	The Obama administration is proposing to put a stop to the Obama campaign; tax exemption.	The Obama administration proposes to slow down the campaign.
88	irs push rein tax exempt political group	Ireland encourages tax-exempt political groups.	L' Ireland encourages political groups that are exempt from taxes.	Ireland encourages exempt political groups from taxation.
88	irs issue proposed rule curtail political nonprofit	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case with respect to political activities.	It is a proposal for a regulation to restrict non-profit political activities.	It proposes regulations to restrict non-profit political activities.
88	congress introduces bill change irs review tax exempt organization	Congress introduces tax exemption bill.	Congress is introducing a bill on tax exemption.	The congress presents a bill on tax exemption.
88	obama secretive group	Obama secret group.	Obama secret group.	Classified group obama.
88	rulemaking campaigning tax exempt group month	For more information, see our Web site at www.cra.gc.ca.	Campaigning regulations for group month exempt from tax.	Campaigning regulations for tax exempt group month.
88	kpmg international proposed regulation tax exempt social welfare	Kpmg international settlement proposal d&apos exempt from taxes the good @-@social being.	Kpmg proposal for international regulation d' exempt from tax the good @-@social being.	Kpmg proposed international regulation d&apos exempt from taxes the social good.
88	irs move rein tax exempt group targeting scandal	The tax is intended to be used as a proxy for corporate income tax purposes.	L' IRA reintroduces the exempt group from a scandal-targeted tax.	L' IRA reintroduces exempt group d' tax that targets scandals.
88	obama administration proposes limit tax exempt political group	The Obama administration has proposed to limit the tax exemption for political groups.	The Obama administration proposes to limit the tax exemption for political groups.	The Obama administration proposes to limit political group tax exemption.
88	fewer robo call future election	Fewer robots will announce the upcoming elections.	Fewer robots announce upcoming elections.	Fewer robots announce future elections.
88	irs rein tax exempt political organization	It is a tax-exempt political organization.	It is a political organization that is exempt from taxation.	It's a political organization exempt from taxation.
88	news irs proposes curbing political activity social	The latest news is about the need to slow down social and political activity.	The news suggest to slow down the social political activity.	The news suggests that social political activity should be curbed.
88	irs proposes curb campaigning tax exempt group	Ireland is proposing to end the campaign of tax-exempt groups.	In addition, Ireland is proposing an end to the campaign of tax exempt groups.	Ireland proposes to end the tax exempt group campaign.
88	obama curb political activity shadowy social welfare nonprofit	Obama is slowing it down; social-good obscure nonprofit political activity.	Obama puts the brakes on l' obscure nonprofit political activity of good @-@social be.	Obama hamstrings; obscure nonprofit political activity of good-social be.
88	aclj proposed irs regulation free speech american	ALCJ has proposed a North American freedom of expression regulation.	ALCJ has proposed a regulation on freedom of expression in North America.	ALCJ proposed a regulation on freedom expression in North America.
88	jay sekulow chief counsel aclj proposed irs regulation	L&apos, Jay Sekulow's senior counsel, has been proposing a regulation of income tax.	Lapos, Jay Sekulow's Senior Counsel, has proposed a regulation of income tax.	L'apos, senior counsel for Jay Sekulow, has proposed a regulation of the income tax.
88	tax exempt political group face curb	It is also important to ensure that the rights of the individual are respected.	Tax-exempt political groups are on the move.	Exempt political groups from tax cuts are on the upswing.
88	obama pitch rule political nonprofit	Obama pitch is a not-for-profit political regime, right?	Obama pitch non-profit political reign.	Obama pitch political nonprofit rule.
88	irs proposes rule tax exempt political group	In addition, the tax exemption for political groups is set at the same level as for political groups.	L' Ireland proposes a tax exemption for political groups.	L' Ireland proposes a tax exemption rule for political groups.
88	tax agency proposes rule tax exempt political group	The GET was informed that there is a need for a tax exemption for political groups.	Tax administration proposes a tax exemption for political groups.	The tax administration proposes a rule of dapos; tax exemption for political groups.
88	irs treasury issue political spending guidance	In addition, the Treasury issues directives on political spending.	Treasury issues directives on political spending.	The Treasury issues political spending guidelines.
88	irs target dark money profit	It's all about money; it's about profits; it's money.	It's a profit; it's a profit from the money.	It's a dirty money business.
88	qa reining social welfare group	Social assistance.	Restricting the group of volunteers; Social Assistance.	What's wrong with social assistance?
88	rule aim nonprofit political role	L' Objective of the Non-profit Rule Non-profit Political Role.	The objective of the not-for-profit rule is non-profit political role.	L' objective of the rule non-profit political role non-profit.
88	crackdown coming political nonprofit	Repression is approaching, non-profit policy.	I mean, repression is coming, non-profit politics.	The crackdown is coming, not-for-profit politics.
88	treasury department crackdown dark money group	The U.S. Treasury Department has been cracking down on d*apos groups; black money.	The Treasury Department cracks down on black money.	The treasury department represses d&apos groups; black money.
88	tax return safe irs	Safe income statements.	Income reporting secured.	I'm sorry, but it's safe to report.
88	irs move limit dark money enforcement question	It is a matter of law enforcement; dirty money.	It's a question of how to enforce the law; it's a matter of how to make money.	It is a matter of law enforcement; money laundering.
88	treasury irs issue proposed guidance tax exempt social welfare	The Treasury is proposing to exempt the property tax; to guide the good-social being.	The public treasury proposes to exempt the tax from tax; to orient the good-be social.	The treasury proposes to exempt from the tax the good-social being.
88	update obama administration proposes limit tax exempt political	It's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal, but it's a big deal.	Update of apo; Obama administration proposes to limit apo; tax exemption; political.	Obama administration proposes to limit apo; tax exemption; political tax.
88	obama administration proposes rule curtailing political activity	The Obama administration has proposed a rule limiting political activity.	The Obama administration proposes a rule limiting political activity.	The Obama administration proposes a rule limiting political activity in the country.
88	sen whitehouse nonprofit campaigning	Non-profit campaigning.	The not-for-profit campaign.	The nonprofit campaign.
88	treasury irs propose nonprofit rule	The U.S. Treasury Department is proposing a no-profit rule.	You know, the U.S. Treasury has a non-profit rule.	The treasury proposes a non-profit rule.
88	irs paying maintain retired hardware case ig	Payment up to the decommissioning of the equipment.	The payments will extend to the decommissioning of the equipment.	They will also be able to pay for the cost of the equipment.
88	rule rein nonprofit political role	Rule over the Nonprofit Role of Politics.	Just rule over the non-profit political role.	Rule the nonprofit political role.
88	irs target political nonprofit group conservative shriek	He's targeting the non-profit political group, the conservative group Shriek.	It targets the conservative non-profit political group Shriek.	He targets the conservative nonprofit political group Shriek.
88	irs placing employee taxpayer risk attack	Information about employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees and employees.	There's information on employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees, employees and employees.	There are a lot of information about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees, about employees and employees.
88	treasury irs issue guidance tax exempt social welfare	In addition, the Ministry of Labour and Social Affairs is responsible for the administration of the social security system.	The State Treasury issues directives exempting taxes and social benefits.	The treasury issues directives exempting taxes and social benefits.
88	amendment american greater risk irs issue rule	Amend the U.S. Higher Risk Regulations.	Amend the U.S. higher risk regulations.	To amend the U.S. higher risk regulations.
88	ig report irs leaving taxpayer info vulnerable hacker	Reports do not leave any information on taxpayers.	The report does not leave any information about the taxpayers.	The report does not leave taxpayer information.
88	irs limit political activity post tea party flap rule	It's the only thing that makes it easy for people to get involved in politics.	It limits l' political activity after the rule of flap-joy.	It limits l' political activity after the-joy flap rule.
88	administration proposes rule spending group	L' l' l' l' l' l&apos.	L' administration proposes a group of expenses based on the rules.	L' administration proposes a rules-based group of expenses.
88	irs target secret campaign cash	He's got a lot of money in his pocket.	He is targeting the campaign's secret money.	He's targeting them, secret campaign money.
88	president obama pitch rule political nonprofit	President Obama pitch is a not-for-profit political leader in the United States.	President Obama pitch, nonprofit political rule.	President Obama pitch political nonprofit rule.
88	tea party flap irs define political activity	Political activity is defined by the tea breaks.	L' political activity is also defined by tea breaks.	L' political activity is defined by tea breaks.
88	irs front war administration critic	He also criticised the administration of the front-line war.	He criticizes the administration of the war from the front.	He criticizes the war administration from the front.
88	irs limit tax exempt group political activity	Taxes limit the amount of money that can be spent on political activities.	Taxes restrict business; group political activity exempt from tax.	Taxes limit group political activity exempt from tax.
88	campaign rule proposed tax exempt nonprofit	For more information, see our Web site at www.cra.gc.ca.	Tax exempt proposed non-profit campaign rules.	Proposed non-profit campaign rule exempt from tax.
88	expert irs guidance restrict free speech	The freedom of expression is restricted by the experts' guidelines.	The expert's guidelines restrict the freedom of expression.	Expert guidelines restrict freedom of expression.
88	irs move curb tax exempt group political activity	Income Taxes; Applies to charitable organizations; Exempt Collective Political Activities; Taxes.	Income tax applies to tax-exempt collective political activity; tax.	Income tax applies to the income tax; collective political activity exempt from tax.
88	irs rein tax exempt political group	The political group, which is exempt from paying taxes, is once again exempt from paying taxes.	The tax-exempt political group is now exempt again.	The tax exempt political group is exempt again.
88	dramatic	It's dramatic.	C&apos, it's dramatic.	C&apos, is a tragedy.
88	proposed irs rule political nonprofit divide party	The Non-Profit Political Parties Bill divides the party.	The party is divided by the bill on non-profit political parties.	The non-profit political party bill divided the party.
88	treasury department proposing rule tax exemption eligibility	The Ministry of the Treasury proposes a tax exemption.	The Department of the Treasury proposes an eligibility rule; tax exemption.	The Department of Finance is proposing a new tax exemption program.
88	obama admin proposes rule reign nonprofit group	Obama admin is proposing the rule group nonprofit rule.	Obama admin proposes the rule group nonprofit rule.	Obama admin proposes rule group rule nonprofit.
88	irs prevent tea party scandal	It prevents tea scandal.	He's preventing the tea scandal.	Keeps the tea scandal from happening.
88	obama clarify role tax exempt group politics	Obama clarifies the exempt roles of the group policy tax exemption.	Obama clarifies the exempt roles of exempt group policy tax.	Obama clarifies exempt roles of exempt group policy tax.
88	president obama proposes rule rein tax exempt group	President Obama is proposing a new rule for the group that is exempt from paying taxes.	President Obama proposed a new rule for the tax exempt group.	President Obama proposes a new rule for tax exempt group.
88	expert dark money stay	Expert remains silent; black money.	The expert is still black money.	L' expert remains l' money black.
89	colorado republican latest voice support immigration reform	The last Republican voice of the Colorado government supports the reform of immigration policy.	Colorado's newest Republican voice is one of support for immigration reform.	Colorado's last Republican voice supports the reform of immigration policy.
89	immigration reform pressure mount	In addition, there is a growing demand for immigration services.	The pressure to reform immigration laws is intensifying.	The pressure of immigration reform is intensifying.
89	congress stall immigration activist encourage join fast	It's a great opportunity to learn more about Canada's role in the world.	L' apo activist; convention kiosk immigration encourages apo; rapid membership.	L' activist of l' immigration of convention booths encourages rapid adhesion.
89	immigrant activist fast comprehensive immigration reform dc	Rapid Immigrant Activist, Global Change; Immigration DC.	Fast-growing immigrant activist, global migration reform; immigration DC.	Rapid immigrant activist, global immigration reform DC.
89	boehner hunger strike	This is the oxhner's hunger strike.	Oxhner hunger strike.	boehner hunger strike.
89	michelle obama tweet support immigration activist	Michelle Obama's tweet supports l'apos; Immigrant Activist.	Michelle Obama's tweet was written in support of l'apos, an immigration activist.	Michelle Obama's tweet supports immigration activist l'apos.
89	immigration reform stagger	Immigration stumbles.	The reform of l' immigration is a staggering process.	The reform of immigration stumbles.
89	afl cio immigration fasters	Increased immigration.	In addition, the number of migrants is increasing.	L' immigration f' intensifies.
89	soapbox hope gratitude fight immigration reform reflection	It is hoped that this gratitude will help combat the reflection on immigration reform.	It is hoped that gratitude will fight the reflection on the reform of immigration policy.	It is hoped that the reflection on immigration reform will be countered with gratitude.
89	immigration activist fasting thanksgiving washin	Immigration fasting Laundromat Thanksgiving.	Activist of l' fasting immigration Thanksgiving laundry.	Moose activist; fasting immigration Laundromat Thanksgiving.
89	immigration reform news impact homeland security november	The EU's foreign policy in the area of human rights and the rule of law is on the agenda of the European Council.	The news of the immigration reform has an internal security impact in November.	Immigration reform news has an impact on homeland security in November.
89	obama team praise immigration fast	Obama Team praises rapid immigration.	The Obama team praises rapid immigration.	The Obama team praises immigration and rapid immigration.
89	immigration reform hunger striker vow sip water thanksgiving	The hunger striker of the reform of the apos; immigration swears to sip of the apos; water for Thanksgiving.	Hunger striker from the immigration reform swears to sip water for Thanksgiving.	The immigration reform hunger striker swears to sip water for Thanksgiving.
89	boehner sincere wanting immigration reform	This is the first time that we have had the opportunity to do so.	He also expressed a sincere desire to reform immigration laws.	Be boehner sincere desire to reform immigration.
89	day immigration reform fasters join	The day when we will be joined by the advocates of immigration reform.	The day when the supporters of the immigration reform will join us.	The day advocates of immigration reform will join us.
89	immigration tear gop apart	Immigration is tearing it up.	The immigration thing is tearing it up.	L' immigration tears it up.
89	obama bending immigration	Obama mastered immigration.	Obama controls immigration.	Obama's mastering immigration now.
89	boehner talk immigration legislation house floor	This is the first time that we have had the opportunity to discuss the issue of migration.	The bullfighters talk about the legislation on l' immigration on the floor of the house.	The bullfighters talk about immigration legislation on the home floor.
89	activist fast immigration reform	Immigration reform, activism and rapid immigration.	A reform of immigration law; activist and rapid immigration.	A reform of l'apos; immigration activist and fast.
89	immigration activist fast third week thanksgiving nears	It's the first time I've had the pleasure to speak to you about this issue.	Immigrations quickly pass the third week of the year; Thanksgiving.	An immigration activist quickly passes the third week of waiting; Thanksgiving.
89	immigration reform supporter continue hunger strike capitol	Immigrant reformers continue the Capitol Capitol hunger strike.	Supporters of the Capitol Capitol hunger strike continue to support immigration reform.	Proponents of immigration reform continue hunger strike Capitol Capitol.
89	immigration reform hunger strike protester sip water	It's the only thing that's going on in the world that's going on.	Reform of the apo; immigration hunger strike manifesting hunger; water.	Apos reform; immigration hunger strike manifesting hunger; water.
89	immigration reform fasters invite american join dec	The reformers of the 1970s invited the Americans to join the forces of Dec.	Reformers of the apo; immigration invited Americans to join the Dec.	Reformers of l'apos; immigration invite Americans to join Dec.
89	obama heckler	Heckler.	Obama heckler.	Uh, Obama Heckler.
90	evacuated willard railway chemical spill	The project is expected to be completed by the end of 2008.	A chemical spill from the Willard Railway Company.	Waste disposal; chemical spill from Willard railway.
90	chemical spill force evacuation willard	Discharge the chemical-spill force, Willard.	Evacuating chemical discharge force, willard.	Discharge chemical spill force, Willard.
90	chemical leak willard ohio rail yard prompt evacuation	There's a chemical leak in the city's triage yard, and Ohio is causing an evacuation.	A chemical leak in the apos' triage yard; Ohio causes evacuation.	A chemical leak in the triage yard in Ohio causes evacuation.
90	evacuated ohio city railcar leak	Escape of a car from Apos, Ohio City.	Evacuation of an Ohio City car.	Evacuation of a leak from a car in Ohio City.
90	ohio evacuated train chemical leak	L' Ohio has evacuated the chemical leaking from the train.	L' Ohio has evacuated the chemical leak from the train.	Ohio evacuated the chemical leak from the train.
90	evacuated railcar leak ohio city	It's the only way to get out of the city.	Evacuation of car, flight ohio City.	One car, ohio City getaway.
90	willard resident evacuated dangerous chemical spill csx train track	Willard Resident, Evacuated, Spill of Hazardous Chemicals on the Csx Railway.	Resident of Willard, evacuated, spill of dangerous chemicals on the railway csx.	Resident of Willard, evacuated, chemical spill on csx railway.
90	chemical leak rail yard force evacuation	Chemical leak forcing evacuation.	A chemical leak is forcing the evacuation.	A chemical leak causes an evacuation.
90	chemical spill lead evacuation willard resident	Resident Willard's chemical spill.	Resident Willard chemical spill evacuation.	Well, chemical spill evacuation of Resident Willard.
90	leaking rail car force ohio resident	A resident of Los Angeles, Ohio, is being forced to flee.	A car leak is forcing a resident of the Apos, Ohio.	A car leak forces an Ohio resident to flee.
90	chemical spill ohio force evacuate	The ohio-force of the chemical spill is evacuating.	Sir, the ohio force of the chemical spill is evacuating.	The chemical spill ohio force is evacuating.
90	evacuated train chemical leak	Evacuate the chemical leaking from the train.	Evacuate the chemical leak from the train.	Evacuate train chemical leak.
90	csx chemical spill force evacuation willard	Willard's chemical force; evacuation.	Chemical force removed; evacuation of Willard.	Csx chemical force d'apos; evacuation of Willard.
90	evacuated railcar leak ohio	Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh.	Car leakage has been evacuated ohio ohio.	Car leak evacuated ohio ohio.
90	evacuated ohio train derailment	Removal of the derailment of the Apos, Ohio train.	Evacuation of the derailment of the train de l'apos; Ohio.	Evacuating train derailment from Los Angeles, Ohio.
91	rape case charge attack year girl	Rape, criminal charge; assault, daughter of l'apos; year.	Rape, felony assault, assault, girl of the crime scene; year.	Rape, charge of assault, girl of the year.
91	steubenville school worker leave rape case charge	L' Steubenville schoolgirl dismissed charges of rape.	L' Steubenville schoolgirl dropped rape charges.	The Steubenville schoolgirl dropped the rape charges.
91	arrest ohio rape case	I want to stop the case ohio rape.	Stop the case ohio rape.	Stop the ohio rape case.
91	steubenville indictment charge levied school official rape	In the case of a child, the court found that the child had been raped by an officer of the school.	L'apos; acte d'apos; charge by Steubenville alleges a rape committed by an official of the school.	Steubenville's indictment refers to a rape committed by a school official.
91	indictment issued steubenville special grand jury	The charges were laid by the Special Grand Jury of Steubenville.	The indictment was issued by the Steubenville Special Grand Jury.	The indictment was laid by a special grand jury in Steubenville.
91	ohio ag hold adu accountable steubenville rape case	Ohio ag holds the defendant responsible for the Steubenville rape.	Ohio ag blames it on the Steubenville rape case.	Ohio ag holds the Steubenville rape case responsible.
91	steubenville rape case indicted school official paid leave	The case of the rape of Steubenville brought charges against a civil servant of l'apos, a school that paid for paid leave.	The case of the Steubenville rape brought charges against a school official who paid for vacation.	The Steubenville rape case indicted a local school official who paid for paid vacation.
91	steubenville superintendent coach indicted rape probe	Steubenville superintendent's trainer laid charges against him for the rape.	L' coach of the superintendent of Steubenville charged l' investigation of rape.	L' Steubenville superintendent's trainer indicted the rape investigation.
91	adu charged helping cover steubenville rapist	Adu was charged with aiding and abetting the Steubenville rapist.	Adu's been charged with helping to cover up the Steubenville rapist.	Adu was charged with helping cover up Steubenville's rapist.
91	ohio district place superintendent employee leave rape	Ohio leaves the rape.	L' employee of Apos District; Ohio leaves the rape.	L' employee of the district of l' Ohio leaves rape.
91	indicted steubenville school employee paid leave	He was charged with the offence of being an employee of the school of Steubenville.	L' employee of the accused Steubenville school has paid holiday pay.	The accused Steubenville school employee paid for paid vacation.
91	steubenville superintendent coach indicted rape probe scandel rock ohio	L&apos, Steubenville superintendent's trainer, charged Scandel Rock ohio with rape.	L&apos, the trainer of the Steubenville superintendent, indicted the Scandel Rock ohio rape probe.	L&apos, Steubenville superintendent's trainer, indicted the rape probe Scandel Rock ohio.
91	steubenville school board place superintendent employee leave	It's time for the Steubenville School Board employees to leave.	The employees of the Steubenville School Board... are taking a leave of absence.	The Steubenville school board employees take a leave of absence.
91	ohio prep football rape grand jury charge	Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh.	Ohio is setting up the grand jury's football rape charge.	Ohio's planning a grand jury football rape.
91	ohio school employee leave steubenville rape case	Lapos; apo employee; Ohio School leaves the apo; Steubenville rape case.	L'apos; employee of the Ohio School; leaving the school; case of rape of Steubenville.	Lapos; employee of the Ohio School leaves the school; rape case of Steubenville.
91	ohio case alleges adu covered rape	In the case of the Ohio case, it was alleged that they were covering up the rape.	Ohio's case alleged that they were covering rape.	The Ohio case alleged that they covered rape.
91	steubenville rape case lesson adu	Rape adu, Steubenville.	Adu courses on rape in Steubenville.	Uh, rape adu course in Steubenville.
91	steubenville indictment shocking turn	The indictment of the city of Steubenville has taken a shocking turn.	L' Steubenville's indictment has taken a shocking turn.	Steubenville's indictment took a shocking turn.
91	ohio school worker leave rape case charge	A schoolboy from Apos, Ohio dropped the charges of rape.	A schoolboy from Ohio dropped the rape charges.	A high school kid from the state of Ohio dropped the rape charges.
91	judge convicted steubenville high school football player raping girl	The judge just sentenced the football player from Steubenville High School for raping a girl.	The judge convicted the Steubenville High School football player for raping a girl.	The judge convicted a high school football player in Steubenville for raping a girl.
91	attorney steubenville rape investigation speaks tv	Steubenville lawyer speaking on TV.	L' rape investigation conducted by l' lawyer Steubenville speaking on TV.	It's a rape investigation lawyer Steubenville speaking on TV.
91	rape scandal festering steubenville charge	The rape scandal's brewing in Steubenville.	There's a rape scandal brewing in Steubenville.	The rape scandal is brewing in Steubenville.
91	volunteer football coach indicted grand jury	L' coach of voluntary football has indicted the Grand Jury.	L' volunteer football coach has indicted the grand jury.	L' volunteer football coach indicted grand jury.
91	charge steubenville rape case	Charge Steubenville with rape.	Charge Steubenville with rape!	And charge Steubenville with rape.
91	steubenville school employee leave criminally charged	Steubenville School; absent for criminal reasons.	L' employee of Steubenville school; absent for criminal reasons.	L' employee of l' school Steubenville s' absent for criminal reasons.
91	talking second steubenville rape case	Second rape case, Steubenville.	Second rape case in Steubenville.	Uh, second rape case in Steubenville.
91	rape ugly crime steubenville scandal editorial	Gruesome Violent Crime Steubenville editorial scandal.	Gruesome crime rape Steubenville editorial scandal?	Gruesome crime rape editorial scandal Steubenville.
91	ohio school district leave charge	Ohio School District license fee.	The license fee for the Ohio School District.	The fee for the Permission to attend the Ohio School District.
91	school superintendent charged steubenville rape cover	The principal accused Steubenville of covering up a rape.	The headmaster of the school accused Steubenville of covering up the rape.	The school director accused Steubenville of covering up a rape.
91	steubenville rape case administrative leave	Rape case, Steubenville, administrative leave.	Rape case in Steubenville, administrative leave.	Uh, rape case in Steubenville, administrative leave.
92	sorority house lived fsu bomb threat jameis	The house of the sisterhood lived under the threat of a Jameis bomb.	The sorority house was threatened by a Jameis bomb.	The sorority house lived under the threat of a Jameis bomb.
92	america college football star jameis winston wrong	The American soccer star, Jamie Winston, is being cheated on.	Football star Jamie Winston, s&apos, is being cheated.	American football star Jamie Winston is cheated.
92	jameis winston overlapping football cu ure rape cu ure	Jameis Winston superimposing pure rape football.	Jameis Winston superimposed football on pure rape.	I mean, Jameis Winston superimposed football on pure rape.
92	daily dish grab	Daily accumulation of dishes.	Daily accumulation of dishes.	The daily accumulation of dishes.
92	jameis winston news fsu heisman candidate charged sexual	Jameis Winston News is a heisman contestant accused of sexuality.	Jameis Winston News fsu heisman sex accused candidate.	Jameis winston news fsu heisman candidate accused of sexual intercourse.
92	winston charge delayed	Winston's command post has been delayed.	Winston's charge has been delayed.	Winston's charge was delayed.
92	jameis winston decision delayed	Jameis Winston has been delayed.	Well, Jameis Winston's decision has been delayed.	Jameis Winston's decision has been delayed indefinitely.
92	jameis winston slapped insane lawsuit prison inmate alleged	Jameis Winston slapped a prisoner in the face of a charge of insanity in a prison.	Jameis Winston slapped an inmate accused of mental insanity in a prison.	Jameis Winston slapped an inmate in a prison cell who was accused of mental insanity.
92	decision charge fsu qb jameis winston	Jameis winston.com.	Decision-making positions fsu qb jameis winston.	Decision-making responsibilities fsu qb jameis Winston.
92	report winston decision coming acc champ game heisman vote	Report Winston decision to come Game Champion Heisman Vote.	Report Winston decision to come game champion heisman vote.	Winston report decision to come game champion heisman vote vote.
92	charge charge bcs fate hang balance winston	The fate of the Charges Bcs is now hanging in the balance.	The fate of the Charges Bcs hangs in the balance.	The fate of the Charges Bcs suspends it; the balance of Winston.
92	fsu quarterback jameis winston call charge	Jameis Winston Call Charges quarterback.	He's quarterback Jameis Winston Call Charges.	Quarterback jameis winston call charges.
92	jameis winston ruling acc championship game	Jameis Winston, reigning in the game.	Jameis Winston ruling the Championship game acc.	Jameis winston ruling the championship game acc.
92	florida state national championship heisman hope pay big	Florida National Championships, Heisman Hope pays handsomely.	Florida National Championship, heisman Hope pays big.	Florida National Championship, heisman Hope is a big payday.
92	jameis winston ruling heisman voting deadline	Jameis Winston rules on the Heisman deadline.	Jameis Winston rules on Heisman's voting deadline.	Jameis Winston rules on voting deadline for Heisman.
92	jameis winston decision heisman voting deadline	Jameis Winston heisman decision, voting deadline.	Jameis Winston decision heisman voting deadline.	Jameis Winston decision heisman voting deadline.
92	heisman voter wait winston	Heisman voting waiting for Winston.	Uh, Heisman voting to wait for Winston.	Heisman voting to wait for Winston.
92	heisman vote word morgantown anne white	Heisman votes for the word Morgantown and White Anne.	Heisman has voted for the word morgantown and white anne.	Heisman votes for the word morgantown and white anne.
92	travis muschamp return lane kiffin	Travis Muschamp back to Kiffin Kiffin track.	Travis Muschamp returns Kiffin Kiffin.	Travis muschamps back to kiffin kiffin track.
92	mccormick winston legal issue heisman hurdle	McCormick Winston's legal obstacle.	McCormick Winston Heisman legal issue standing in the way?	McCormick Winston legal issue heisman obstacle.
92	winston decision bcs heisman decision	Heisman case.	The Winston decision in the Heisman case.	Winston decision in Heisman case.
92	jameis winston charge acc final heisman deadline	Jameis Winston charges up to and including the final date of the heisman.	Jameis Winston will charge up to the end of the heisman term.	Jameis Winston charges up to the final heisman term.
92	jameis winston face charge acc final heisman deadline	Jameis Winston faces charge charge final access heisman deadline.	Jameis Winston face charge acc final heisman deadline.	Jameis Winston face charge acc final heisman deadline.
92	engel fan reserve judgment winston accuser	Read about Judge Winston's judgment-you.	Inform you-about Judge Winston's judgment.	Please inform yourself-of the judgment rendered by Judge Winston.
93	whitaker bassett black nativity soar	Whitaker Bassett Black Nativity skyrocketing.	Whitaker Bassett Black Nativity soar.	Whitaker Bassett's Nativity black skyrocketing.
93	black nativity gift family connection	It is a gift from the Black Nativity family.	C&apos is a gift from the Nativity family.	C&apos is a gift from the family of the Black Nativity.
93	black nativity good deed good song	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of people.	Nativity good action good song good song good song good song.	Black nativity good action good song good good action good song.
93	black nativity bold clumsy	Clumsy, bold, clumsy, black nativity.	Bold, clumsy, clumsy, clumsy black nativity.	Bold clumsy bold black nativity.
93	black nativity review preach	The Black Nativity preaches.	Black Nativity magazine preaches.	The review of the Black Nativity preaches.
93	langston hughes holiday black nativity	Langston Hughes Nativity party.	Langston Hughes, Black Nativity party.	Langston Hughes Black nativity party.
93	family forgiveness	Family forgiveness.	The family's forgiveness.	You know, family forgiveness.
93	black nativity retain heart langston hughes classic story	Black Nativity remember classic Langston Hughes heart.	Black Nativity hold the heart Langston Hughes classic story.	Black nativity remember Langston Hughes heart classic story.
93	movie review black nativity	Black Nativity film review.	Film noir nativity.	Black nativity film review.
93	harlem christmas tangle music	The music of the Christmas of Harlem s&apos is entangled.	Harlem Christmas music s&apos is entangled.	Harlem's Christmas music s' entanglement.
93	black nativity mea culpa	Black Nativity is my culpa.	Nativity black mea culpa.	Yeah, black nativity mea culpa.
93	movie review black nativity bold clumsy	Film Review Bold, clumsy, daring Black Nativity.	Theatrical magazine Bold, clumsy, daring black nativity.	Bold, clumsy, daring black nativity film review.
93	black nativity retells nativity story	The Black Nativity recounts the history of nativity.	The story of the nativity is told again.	The black nativity again tells the story of the nativity.
93	jacob latimore tyrese luke james talk black nativity	Jacob Latimore Tyrese Luke James talks about the day care center.	Jacob Latimore Tyrese Luke James speaks of the black nursery.	Jacob Latimore Tyrese Luke James talks about black kindergarten.
93	black nativity review	This is the Black Nativity Review.	A review of the dark nativity.	Black nativity review.
93	black nativity tug heart bridging generation gap	Black Nativity Heart Tug to bridge the generation gap.	Black Nativity Tug heart to bridge the generation gap.	Black nativity Tug heart to bridge the generation gap.
93	bright black screen	Black and glowing screen.	Uh, black and light screen.	It's a black screen and it's bright.
93	movie review black nativity update holy tale touching	Film review, Black Nativity update, Holy Touching Story.	Film review Black Nativity update, Holy Touching Story.	Film review Black Nativity update touching Holy History.
93	black nativity review gospel biz	Black Nativity magazine in gospel biz.	Black Nativity review gospel biz.	Nativity black review gospel biz.
93	whitaker hudson talk faith parenting	It's only a matter of time and money.	That time is only a matter of time and money.	It's just a matter of time, it's just a matter of money.
93	black nativity jennifer hudson hip hop christmas	"Black Nativity Jennifer Hudson, ""Hip-Hop"" Christmas."	Black Nativity Jennifer Hudson hip hop Christmas.	Black nativity Jennifer Hudson hip hop Christmas.
93	black nativity review yule regret buying ticket simple minded tale	Black daycare magazine in Yule regrets that it bought tickets for a simple and simple story.	The review of Yule's black daycare center regrets that it bought tickets for a simple and simple storytelling.	The review of Yule's black kindergarten regrets buying tickets for a simple and simple story.
93	hear hallelujah black nativity	I want to hear Hallelujah Black Nativity.	Hear hallelujah black nativity.	To hear hallelujah black nativity.
93	kasi lemmon directing black nativity shying religion	Kasi lemmon, running the black kindergarten, avoiding religion.	Kasi lemmon runs the black kindergarten avoiding religion.	Kasi lemmon running the black daycare, avoiding religion altogether.
93	movie review black nativity long time reach goal	It's a good way to get a good look at the film.	The film review Black Nativity reaches long-term objective.	The film criticism Black Nativity long duration reach l'apos; objective.
93	anatomy scene video black nativity	It's a great way to make a difference in the world.	D&apos scene; Black Nativity video anatomy.	It's called a black nativity video anatomy.
93	angela bassett forest whitaker singing skill black nativity	Angela Bassett Forest Whitaker Singing talent Black Nativity Nativity.	Angela Bassett Forest Whitaker singing talent, Black Nativity Nativity.	Angela Bassett Forest Whitaker singing talent Black Nativity Nativity.
93	black nativity noble notable	It's a beautiful, beautiful, noble, black nativity.	Noble, noble black nativity.	Noble black nativity notable.
93	black nativity bold clumsy	Clumsy, bold, clumsy, black nativity.	Bold, clumsy, clumsy, clumsy black nativity.	Bold clumsy bold black nativity.
93	review black nativity joyous celebration love life	Revisiting the Happy Black Nativity Celebration of Love Life.	Revisiting the joyful Black Nativity celebration of the love life.	Revisiting the joyful celebration of love life.
93	black nativity fresh prince bel harlem	Fresh Black Nativity Prince Bel Harlem.	Fresh black nativity, prince Bel Harlem.	Fresh black nativity prince Bel Harlem.
93	black nativity movie review	Black Nativity film review.	This is a review of the films of the Nativity.	Review of black nativity films.
93	whitaker bassett hudson black nativity	Whitaker Bassett Hudson Nativity Nativity.	Whitaker Bassett Hudson Black Nativity.	Whitaker Bassett Hudson, black nativity nativity.
93	black nativity channel biblical theme inner city context	Black Nativity biblical context channel-city context.	Black Nativity Bible Channel context biblical narrative-city context.	Black Nativity channel biblical theme context of the center-city context.
93	nativity story travel harlem black nativity	Nativity Harlem Nativity Nativity travel.	Nativity Harlem Travel Black Nativity Nativity.	Nativity Harlem Voyage Black nativity nativity.
93	exclusive cocoachat men black nativity tyrese jacob	Coco buy black men jacob black jacob crèche jacob.	Coco buy black men jacob black jacob crib.	Coco purchase men black cribs jacob black jacob.
93	review black nativity bold clumsy	Revisiting bold, clumsy, greasy Nativity of the manger.	Revisiting bold, clumsy, greasy Nativity kindergarten.	Revisiting bold, clumsy greasy nativity kindergarten.
93	black nativity overflowing holiday spirit	Black Nativity bursting from the Apos; Holiday Spirit.	Black nativity overflowing from the apos; spirit of the festivities.	Black nativity overflowing from the festive spirit.
93	review black nativity lovingly rendered poignant holiday pageant	Revisiting the Black Nativity with love and making the Christmas pageant poignant.	To relive the black nativity with love and make the Christmas pageant poignant.	Revisiting the black nativity lovingly and making the Christmas show poignant.
93	black nativity dark spiritual holiday drama	Dark Nativity Holiday spiritual drama.	Dark Nativity - Dark spiritual holiday drama.	Black Nativity Dark spiritual holiday drama.
93	exclusive tyrese talk forgiveness wife norma	Exclusive tireplay speak pardon Norma woman.	Exclusive tire talk about excuse Norma.	Exclusive tire talk sorry wife Norma.
93	black nativity review star studded film updated uplifting	Black Nativity magazine star studded movie star update coming up.	Black Nativity review movie star studded update rising.	Black Nativity review star studded film update uplifting.
93	exclusive interview kasi lemmon black nativity	Black kasi kasi kasi lemmon nativity exclusive interview.	Exclusive interview kasi black lemmon nativity kasi.	Exclusive interview kasi lemmon nativity black kasi.
93	black nativity love song langston hughes	Black Nativity is a song by Langston Hughes Hughes Hughes.	"""Black Nativity"", song d'apos; love Langston Hughes Hughes."	It's a black nativity, song d'apos; love Langston Hughes Hughes.
93	holiday meal black nativity predictable satisfying	Predictable Black Nativity Holiday Meals satisfying.	Vacation Meals Predictable Black Nativity satisfying.	Predictable Black Nativity satisfying holiday meals.
93	black nativity film hit theater actor levensky smith youngstown	A film about the black daycare was released in the U.S.A. and the U.S.	A film about the black nursery hit the stage actor Levensky Smith Youngstown.	A film about black kindergarten hit the apos; theater actor Levensky Smith Youngstown.
93	black nativity good christmas movie overthinking required	Good Black Nativity Christmas movie too much reflection necessary.	Nativity black good Christmas movie too much necessary reflection.	You know, black nativity good Christmas movie too much reflection needed.
93	black nativity update hughes play	Black Nativity update Hughes to play.	Black Nativity update Hughes play.	Nativity black update Hughes play.
93	raphael saadiq black nativity couple time project	Raphael Saadiq Black Nativity Coupling Project of the Nativity Time.	Raphael Saadiq Black Nativity couple project of the Nativity time.	Raphael Saadiq Black Nativity couple project from the time of the Nativity.
93	review black nativity	Revisiting the Nativity.	To revise the dark nativity.	Revisiting the black nativity.
93	forest whitaker tyrese angela bassett mary blige talk black nativity	The white-beak of the bassett mary pine forest speaks black Nativity.	The white-beak of the forest angela bassett mary blige speak black Nativity.	White-beak of the forest angela bassett mary blige speak black Nativity.
93	berklee student big break black nativity	Berklee Student Big Black Nativity Break.	Berklee student great black Nativity break.	Berklee student big break Nativity black.
93	cdl exclusive black nativity review musical event holiday season	The CDL Nativity is an exclusive Black Nativity that reviews the musical events of the festive season.	CDL Nativity exclusive black review the musical events of the festive season.	CDL Nativity exclusive black review musical events of the festive season.
93	melodrama miracle black nativity	Melodrama Miracle Black Nativity.	Black Nativity melodrama miracle.	Melodrama miracle black nativity.
93	music spirit langston hughes live black nativity	Langston Hughes Spirit of Music Live Black Nativity.	"Spirit of music Langston Hughes live ""Black Nativity."""	Spirit of music Langston Hughes live black nativity.
93	black nativity review jennifer hudson joyful noise uplift undercooked	Black Nativity revisits Jennifer Hudson's joyful, uncooked uplifting sound.	Black Nativity reviews Jennifer Hudson joyous sonic uplifting undercooked.	Black Nativity reviews merry Jennifer Hudson loud noise undercooked.
93	director kasi lemmon update black nativity modern film homage	Kasi lemmon director updated Black Nativity tribute film modern tribute film.	Filmmaker kasi lemmon update Black Nativity tribute film modern film tribute.	Filmmaker kasi lemmon update Black Nativity tribute film modern film tribute.
93	black nativity forest whitaker angela bassett jennifer hudson share	Angela Bassett Basilica jennifer Hudson is located in the Black Nativity Forest.	The basilica angela bassett jennifer hudson is located in the Black Nativity forest.	Basilica angela bassett jennifer hudson lives in the Black Nativity forest.
93	whitaker help black nativity preach faithful	Whitaker has been helping the Black Nativity preach loyalty.	And Whitaker helps the Black Nativity preach loyalty.	Whitaker helps Black Nativity preach fidelity.
93	tyrese aimed list actor black nativity listen	Tyres target d&apos list; actors black n nation listen.	Tyres targeted list d' black actors nativité listen.	Tyres targeted list d' black actors nativité listen listen.
93	black nativity color rainbow movie review	Black Nativity, arc color-in-sky, film critic.	Black nativity, arc color-in-sky, movie critic.	Nativity, color arc-in-sky, movie critic.
93	forest whitaker movie memory surprise	I'm surprised at the memory of the films of Forest Whitaker.	Surprise of the memory of Forest Whitaker movies.	This is a surprise for the memory of Forest Whitaker movies.
93	milwaukee jacob latimore hoping black nativity boost career	Milwaukee Jacob Latimore hopes that the dark nativity will stimulate his own career.	Milwaukee Jacob Latimore has been hoping that the dark nativity will stimulate his career.	Milwaukee Jacob Latimore is hoping that the dark nativity will boost his career.
93	exclusive director kasi lemmon talk working jennifer hudson	Exclusive director kasi lemmon talking about working for Jennifer Hudson.	Exclusive director kasi lemmon talk to work Jennifer Hudson.	Exclusive director kasi lemmon talk working Jennifer Hudson.
93	christmas musical black nativity hit note big screen	The black musical nativity of Christmas was a sensation on the big screen.	The musical black nativity of Christmas caused sensation on the big screen.	Christmas's musical black nativity made a big screen sensation.
93	week jennifer lawrence charo play peek boo	Jennifer Lawrence Charo plays-cache cache.	Jennifer Lawrence Charo plays at-cache.	Jennifer Lawrence Charo plays a game called-cache.
93	black nativity review	This is the Black Nativity Review.	A review of the dark nativity.	Black nativity review.
93	raphael saadiq angela bassett jennifer hudson talk black nativity	Raphael angela saadiq bassett jennifer hudson speak black crib.	Raphael saadiq angela bassett jennifer hudson speak black crib.	Raphael saadiq angela bassett jennifer hudson talk black crib.
93	black nativity adaptation starchy stirring	It's a black-nativity adaptation, starchy, shaking, shaking, shaking.	Black nativity starchy adaptation shaking starch.	Nativity black adaptation starchy shaking the apos; starch shaking.
93	eur film review black nativity	Black Nativity movie review.	It's our film review of Black Nativity.	Our film review of black nativity.
93	ebiri black nativity work drama musical soar	Ebiri Black Nativity is a dramatic work of music and music.	Ebiri Black Nativity dramatic musical work s' Musically Flying.	Ebiri Black Nativity musical drama s' musical flight.
93	jennifer hudson holiday fanatic	Jennifer Hudson fanatics of the end-of-the-year celebrations.	Jennifer Hudson is a holiday fan.	Jennifer Hudson holiday fanatic at the end of the year.
93	average christmas story movie review black nativity	Critical Mid-Christmas Critical Nativity Nativity review.	Critical Mid-Christmas Critical Nativity Nativity Review.	Critical Mid-Christmas movie reviewer, Nativity noire nativité.
93	week movie opening	This is the beginning of the week's movie.	Start of the week's movie.	Okay, this week's movie begins.
93	musical black nativity hit high note	The music has reached a high level of black nativity.	Music black nativity has reached a high level.	The musical black nativity is high.
93	review black nativity nourishes holiday spirit	It's a time of celebration, and it's a time of celebration.	Revising the Black Nativity nourishes the spirit of the holidays.	Revisiting the Black Nativity nourishes the holiday spirit.
93	black nativity explores faith despite trial	Despite the trial, Nativity explored the faith.	Nativity is exploring the faith despite the trial.	Black Nativity explores faith despite trial.
93	black nativity reminds holiday spirit	The Black Nativity is a symbol of the Christmas spirit.	The spirit of Christmas is reminiscent of the Black Nativity.	The Black Nativity reminds us of the apos; spirit of Christmas.
93	movie review black nativity	Black Nativity film review.	Film noir nativity.	Black nativity film review.
93	cleveland finest star black nativity	Cleveland, the most beautiful Dark Nativity star.	Cleveland, the most beautiful star of the dark nativity.	Cleveland, most beautiful star in the dark nativity.
93	updating black nativity homage hughes buffalo news ny	Updated apo; tribute to Black Nativity Hughes ny buffalo news.	Update of the apo; tribute to black nativity Hughes ny buffalo news.	Hughes ny buffalo news tribute to black nativity update.
93	black nativity music great script fall flat movie review	Music of the Black Nativity, great script to fall critical of flat film.	Music of the Black Nativity great script fall critical of flat film.	Black Nativity music great script fall critical flat film.
93	nativity live wrapping	Nativity packaging online.	L' Nativity wrapping on-line.	L' live nativity packaging.
93	black nativity angela bassett jennifer hudson	Angela Bassett Jennifer Hudson.	The Black Nativity Angela Bassett Jennifer Hudson.	Black nativity Angela Bassett Jennifer Hudson.
93	jennifer hudson jacob latimore talk black nativity fe church	Jacob Latimore, Jennifer Hudson, talks about the Black Nativity as a church.	Jennifer Hudson, Jacob Latimore, talks about the Black Nativity as a church.	Jennifer Hudson, Jacob Latimore, talks about the Black Nativity as a church, but she doesn't talk about it.
93	clip featurettes black nativity starring jacob latimore forest	Creativity films starring Jacob Latimore Forest.	Films about black nurseries starring and starring Jacob Latimore Forest.	Films about black nurseries starring Jacob Latimore Forest.
93	movie opening today	Today the film begins.	The film begins today.	It's the first time I've seen the film.
93	iar press conference coverage black nativity	The coverage of the Black Nativity Press Conference.	The coverage of the Black Nativity press conference, please.	The coverage of the black nativity press conference.
93	review whitaker solid cast elevate black nativity	Revisiting Whitaker's solid, cast-off rise Black Nativity Nativity.	Revisiting Whitaker cast solid rise Black Nativity Nativity rise.	Revisiting Whitaker solid cast Black Nativity rise Nativity.
93	black nativity	Nativity black.	Black nativity!	Uh, black nativity.
93	black nativity nourishes holiday spirit review	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of people.	Black nativity fuels the criticism of the festive spirit.	The black nativity nourishes the criticism of l'apos; spirit of the holidays.
93	exclusive interview black nativity executive music director raphael saadiq	Exclusive Interview Black Nativity Executive Music Director raphael saadiq.	Exclusive interview Black Nativity raphael saadiq executive music director.	Exclusive interview with Nativity noire, executive music director raphael saadiq.
93	review black nativity stage bound musically gifted	This is the stage in the evolution of the black nativity, linked to musical talent.	Revise the apos; stage of black nativity linked to talented musical talents.	Revise the apos; black nativity stage linked to musical talent.
93	jennifer hudson best black nativity	Jennifer Hudson is the best little black nursery.	Jennifer Hudson is the world's best black nursery.	Jennifer Hudson's the best black nursery.
93	black nativity jennifer hudson soulful musical lift spirit	Black Nativity Jennifer Hudson soulful soulful soul lift, musical spirit.	Jennifer Hudson soulful soulful soul lift musical spirit.	Black Nativity Jennifer Hudson soulful soul lift spirit music.
93	movie review black nativity uplifting entertainment	Film review, Nativity noir entertainment, elevates entertainment.	Film review Black Nativity entertaining brings up the fun.	Film review Entertaining Nativity takes entertainment to the next level.
93	family film guide black nativity frozen book thief	Family Film Guide Black Nativity Frozen Book Thief.	Family Film Guide Black Nativity Frozen book thief.	Family film guide Black nativity Frozen book thief.
93	film adaptation langston hughes black nativity big screen bust	Film adaptation Langston Hughes Nativity black-and-white big-screen bust.	Adaptation of the film Langston Hughes Nativity black screen large bust.	The film Langston Hughes Black Nativity big screen bust.
93	whitaker solid cast elevate black nativity	Whitaker sunk solidly to raise the crib.	Whitaker sunk raise solidly the black crib.	Whitaker sunk solidly raise black daycare.
93	black nativity pit musical grace clunky melodrama	The musical grace, the clumsy melodrama.	Black Nativity the musical grace the clumsy melodrama.	Black nativity the musical grace the clumsy melodrama.
93	raphael saadiq score black nativity interview	Raphael Saadiq notes the apogee; Black Nativity interview.	Raphael Saadiq notes the Black Nativity interview.	Raphael Saadiq notes l' interview of the Black Nativity.
93	director christmas miracle	Xmas Miracle Director Christmas Miracle Director.	Christmas Miracle Director Christmas Miracle Director!	Christmas miracle director Miraculous Christmas director.
93	whitaker hudson sing black nativity	"""Black Nativity"" by Whitaker Hudson."	Whitaker Hudson's singing Black Nativity.	Whitaker Hudson sings nativity noir.
94	bbm holding strong fight	Fighting hard BBM.	BBM's fighting hard.	BBM, BBM, BBM, BBM.
94	bbm iphone app outpacing android version	It's the only way you'll be able to keep up with the latest updates.	Bbm iphone append to get ahead of android version.	Bbm iphone app before android version.
94	blackberry find early success mobile messaging app	BlackBerry quickly find the success of mobile mail e-mail app.	BlackBerry will quickly find the successful mobile messaging e-mail app.	BlackBerry quickly find the success of mobile messaging app messaging.
94	bbm channel download exit beta blackberry owner	Download bbm bbm holder beta output Blackberry.	Downloads bbm channel bbm output beta owner Blackberry.	Download bbm channel bbm exit beta owner Blackberry.
94	bbm pre installed african android device	Bbm pre-installed android device.	Pre-installed android African device pre-installed.	Bbm pre-installed African android device is pre-installed.
94	blackberry roll bbm social network	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Blackberry roll bbm social networking.	Blackberry roll bbm social networking.
94	exclusive survey blackberry bbm beating whatsapp	Exclusive Blackberry bbm beat whatsapp.	Exclusive poll Blackberry bbm beat whatsapp.	Blackberry bbm exclusive survey beat whatsapp.
94	bbm android phone	Android phone.	Android phone, android phone.	BBm android phone android.
94	bbm coming pre installed android device leading oems	Bbm come pre-installed android pre-installed head oems.	Bbm come pre-installed aircraft android oems head pre-installed.	Bbm come pre-installed device android oems head pre-installed.
94	blackberry roll bbm channel social network	Blackberry roll bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm social channel bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm bbm	Blackberry roll bbm social network channel social channel.	Blackberry roll bbm channel social network social channel.
94	bbm channel launched	Channel launch bbm.	Launching channel bbm.	Launching bbm channel.
94	blackberry mu iple android oems preinstall bbm smartphones	Blackberry is a great place to stay for those who are looking for something to do.	Blackberry mu iple android oems pre-installed bbm smartphones.	Blackberry mu iple android oems preinstall bbm smartphones.
94	bbm evolve interest based mobile social network channel	BBm develop interest based on the social network.	Develop interest based on the mobile social network social network channel.	BBm develop interest based on mobile social network social network channel social.
94	bbm pre installed leading oems android smartphones starting	Pre-installed android head android smartphone oems.	Pre-installed bbm pre-installed oems of head android smartphones.	Pre-installed bbm head oems android smartphones to boot.
94	bbm preloaded celkon spice zen android smartphones	BBm pre-charged Celkon Spice Zen android-based smartphones.	BBm precharged Celkon Spice Zen android smartphones.	Precharged Celkon Spice Zen android smartphones are available.
94	blackberry bbm channel live today	I'm sorry, but I don't think we'll be able to help you.	Blackberry bbm live channel now.	Blackberry bbm channel live today' hui.
94	blackberry bbm social	Social blackberry bbm.	Blackberry social bbm.	Blackberry bbm social bbm.
94	bbm channel coming beta today blackberry legacy device	B.B.M. Channels come to beta today; BlackBerry's device from now on.	BBm channel come beta today; BlackBerry device from apos; inheritance today.	BBm channel come beta today; BlackBerry legacy device today.
94	bbm pre installed android smartphones blackberry	Bbm Pre-installed Smartphones and Cold Blackberry.	Bbm is pre-installed android Blackberry smartphones.	Bbm pre-installed smartphones android Blackberry.
94	bbm channel blackberry device officially confirmed	BBm Blackberry channel officially confirmed.	BBm Blackberry channel device officially confirmed.	BBm Blackberry channel device officially confirmed.
94	blackberry pre install bbm android phone	Blackberry pre-install android phone bbm android.	Blackberry pre-install bbm android phone android.	Blackberry pre-to install bbm android phone android.
94	blackberry bbm future social network	Blackberry bbm.	Blackberry bbm future social networking.	Blackberry bbm future social networking.
94	beta blackberry launch bbm channel	Beta Blackberry launch bbm-channel.	Beta Blackberry will launch bbm channel.	Beta Blackberry launch bbm channel bbm.
94	celkon spice zen preload bbm android app amazon extends io app	Evaluering is not possible if you do not want to pay for it.	I want you to be able to preload bbm and cold apps to extend your app.	This spice zen preload bbm android apps amazon extend io app.
94	blackberry open bbm channel beta adding social networking	Blackberry open bbm beta-channel add social network.	Blackberry open bbm beta channel add social network.	Blackberry open bbm channel beta add social network.
94	blackberry bbm channel officially coming beta today updated	Blackberry bbm channel to come to officially update beta beta today.	Blackberry bbm channel to come Beta officially updated today.	Blackberry bbm channel to come officially updated beta today.
94	bbm channel blackberry device user	BBm BlackBerry channel, BlackBerry user, BlackBerry.	BBm Blackberry channel, user of the Blackberry device.	BBm channel Blackberry, user of L' device Blackberry.
94	bbm channel rolling bb device iphone android version	Bbm mobile channel device bb iphone version android bb android device bb.	Bbm mobile device bb iphone android bb android version.	Bbm mobile device bb iphone android version bb android version.
94	blackberry messenger aim device deal	Blackberry Messenger targets the market of image processing devices.	Blackberry messenger is aimed at the e-mail market; image processing devices.	Blackberry messenger target the image processing device market.
94	oems pre install bbm android smartphones	Oems pre-installed bbm android.	Oems pre-installed bbm android smartphones.	Oems are pre-installed bbm android smartphones.
94	blackberry partner android oems preinstall bbm	The android partner of pre-installed bbmm Blackberry oems.	The android partner of Blackberry oems pre-installed bbmm.	Blackberry oems android partner preinstalled bbmm.
94	blackberry announces bbm partnership android oems	Blackberry announces bbm android oems partnership.	Blackberry announces bbm partnership android oems.	Blackberry announces bbm partnership android oems.
94	blackberry roll social network	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Blackberry roll social networking site.	Blackberry roll social networking.
94	blackberry roll social network	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Blackberry roll social networking site.	Blackberry roll social networking.
94	bbm channel blackberry device today	This is the first time you'll be able to use a BlackBerry camera.	BBm channel Blackberry device today' hui.	BBm Blackberry channel device today.
94	bbm android io amazing	Unbelievable android.	BBm android unbelievable.	BBm android io awesome.
94	bbm channel update blackberry blackberry legacy	Update bbm Blackberry Blackberry channel bbm inheritance channel channel update.	Updated bbm Blackberry channel Blackberry inheritance bbm channel.	Blackberry Blackberry channel update bbm inheritance bbm channel.
94	blackberry launch bbm channel answer twitter	Blackberry bbm launch channel respond twitter twitter twitter.	Blackberry launch bbm channel respond to twitter twitter twitter.	Blackberry launch bbm channel response twitter twitter.
94	bbm channel hit blackberry phone today	It's the first time I've heard of it, and it's the first time I've heard it.	The bbm channel passed on to the Blackberry phone today.	The bbm channel went through Blackberry phone today.
94	bbm channel finally roll today public	This is the first of its kind in the world.	The bbm channel has finally been released today.	The bbm channel was finally made public today.
94	bbm steal snapchat user base	BBm is stealing the Snapchat users database.	BBm steals the Snapchat users database.	BBm steals the user base of Snapchat.
94	bbm channel	Bbmbm channel.	Channel bbmbm.	Uh, bbmbm channel.
94	bbm channel	Bbmbm channel.	Channel bbmbm.	Uh, bbmbm channel.
94	bbm pre installed app select android device	Pre-installed bbm app, select the android device.	Pre-installed bbm app select the Android Device.	Pre-installed bbm app select android device.
94	blackberry team android oems pre install bbm phone	L' android and Blackberry team oems pré-install bbm phone.	L' team of Blackberry android oems pre-install bbm phone.	L' Blackberry team android oems pre-install bbm phone.
94	blackberry ink deal micromax spice bbm	Spice micromax ripe ink bbm bbm bbm.	Blackberry ink deal micromax spice bbm bbm.	Mulberry ink deal micromax spice bbm bbm.
94	blackberry partner india micromax spice zen android smartphones	Partner Blackberry India micromax spice, zen android smartphones.	Partner Blackberry India micromax spice zen android smartphones.	Partner Blackberry India micromax spice zen android smartphones.
94	blackberry rolling social network bbm channel	Blackberry roll bbm channel bbm social network bbm.	Blackberry roll the social network bbm channel bbm.	Blackberry roll social network bbm channel bbm.
94	android blackberry messenger smartphone service installed	Blackberry android smartphone has been installed.	A Blackberry android smartphone service has been installed.	Blackberry android smartphone service has been installed.
94	blackberry partner oems preinstall bbm android	Blackberry Partner oems pre-install bbm android bbm.	Blackberry Partner oems preinstall bbm android.	Blackberry Partner oems preinstall bbm android.
94	create subscribe bbm channel video	Create a video channel subscriber bbm.	Create bbm video channel video subscription video channel.	Create bbm video channel video channel subscription.
94	coming blackberry free bbm push android phone uae	Free bbm phone and bbm push android blackberry.	Free bbm push android phone blackberry uae.	Blackberry free bbm push android phone uae.
94	micromax celkon zen spice bbm pre installed	Micromax celkon bbm pre-installed zen spice.	Micromax celkon celkon zen spice bbm pre-installed.	Micromax celkon zen spice bbm pre-installed.
94	bbm channel officially coming bb device today android io	The BB device is now officially on its way to the BBC's new home.	The bbm channel is officially arriving BB device today; android oil io.	The bbm channel officially arrives BB device today android oil io.
94	bbm app io version better android	B-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b-b.	Bbm app io better android version.	Bbm app io version better android version.
94	blackberry bbry connect company bbm user latest	Blackberry bbry connect bbm company last user bbm.	Blackberry bbry to connect company bbm last user.	Blackberry bbry connect company bbm user last.
94	blackberry launch bbm channel hope rake money	Blackberry launch bbm channel bbm hope to earn money.	Blackberry launch bbm channel hope to earn some money.	Blackberry launch bbm channel hope to earn money.
94	blackberry partner indian handset maker micromax spice zen bbm	Indian Spice Micromax Zen bbm Zen bbm Partner Blackberry manufacturer.	Partner Blackberry makes spicy micromax handsets with zen bbm zen bbm.	Partner Blackberry makes zen bbm zen bbm spicy micromax handsets.
94	global mobile android io messaging app map dominated whatsapp	Android mobile messaging applications io has dominated whatsapp.	The android mobile messaging application map io has dominated whatsapp.	The android mobile messaging application map dominated whatsapp.
94	bbm channel launched blackberry device	The bbm-channel has launched the Blackberry device.	The bbm channel has launched the BlackBerry device.	The bbm channel launched the Blackberry device.
94	bbm channel social network launch blackberry	BBm Social Network Channel to launch Blackberry BlackBerry.	BBm social network channel run Blackberry BlackBerry.	BBm channel social network launch Blackberry BlackBerry.
94	blackberry sign key deal bbm surge going strong android	Blackberry Sign Key Deal bbm bbm strong android.	Blackberry Sign Key Deal bbm surge strong android.	Blackberry Sign key deal bbm strong android surge.
94	celkon spice zen pre load bbm android smartphones	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.	Spiced Celkon zen preload bbm android smartphones.	Spiced Celkon zen bbm android smartphones preload.
94	blackberry bbm push continues leadership	Blackberry bbm pushes and pushes continues the leadership.	Blackberry bbm push continues the leadership.	Blackberry bbm push continues leadership.
94	blackberry score oems preload bbm android device	Blackberry score oems preloaded bbm android device.	Blackberry score oems preload bbm android device.	Blackberry score oems preload bbm android device.
94	blackberry secures deal international oems preload bbm android	BlackBerry is an international security system for the security of preload bbm android.	BlackBerry secures international preload bbm android oems.	BlackBerry secures international oems preload bbm android.
94	celkon micromax spice zen smartphones pre install blackberry bbm	This is a micro-machine spice for your smartphone before installing Blackberry bbm.	This micro-max spice spice zen smartphones before you install Blackberry bbm.	Celkon micromax spice zen smartphones before you install Blackberry bbm.
94	blackberry messenger bbm android io target onboard	Blackberry messenger bbm android target io io is on board.	Blackberry messenger bbm android target io io on board.	Blackberry messenger bbm android io io io io.
94	blackberry roll bbm channel	Blackberry roll bbm-channel.	Blackberry roll bbm channel.	Blackberry roll bbm channel.
94	blackberry launch bbm channel monetize cross platform bbm	Blackberry launch bbm monetizing channel-cross form bbm bbm.	Blackberry launch bbm channel monetize plate-cross shape bbm bbm.	Blackberry launch bbm channel monetize plate-cross-form bbm bbm.
94	embattled blackberry launch bbm social network bbm channel iphone	Blackberry in trouble bbm social network launch bbm iphone channel bbm.	Blackberry in difficulty launching bbm social network bbm channel iphone channel bbm.	Blackberry in difficulty launching bbm social network bbm channel iphone channel bbm.
94	bbm channel blackberry device	BBm is a Blackberry channel device.	BBm channel Blackberry device channel.	BBm channel Blackberry device channel.
94	iphone fan love bbm coming	I'm so happy to have you here.	Iphone fan of l' love bbm come.	Iphone fan; love bbm come.
94	bbm social network gamble fail blackberry	BBM social networking game play fail Blackberry fail.	BBM game social networking fail Blackberry fail.	BBM social networking game fail blackberry fail.
94	leading oems preinstall bbm android based smartphones	Oems leaders will pre-install smartphones based on bbm android.	The oems leaders pre-installed smartphones based on bbm android.	Oems leaders pre-install bbm android based smartphones.
94	bbm channel officially launched	The bbm-channel has been officially launched.	The bbm channel has been officially launched!	The bbm channel officially launched.
94	bbm natively installed android handset emerging market	The market is growing with the advent of bbm android handsets.	The emerging market for bbm android handsets is natively installed.	The emerging market is bbm natively installed android handsets.
94	bbm io updated support wifi ipads	I've just upgraded my support for wifi ipads.	Updated wifi ipads support.	Bbm io support wifi ipads updated.
94	blackberry pivot social medium bbm channel	Blackberry psychic bbm psychic center channel.	Blackberry psychic social pivot bbm canal.	Blackberry social pivot medium bbm channel.
94	bbm channel launch today blackberry smartphones	We are proud to announce the launch of the new Blackberry Smartphones.	Launch of bbm channel today; oil Blackberry smartphones.	Launch of bbm channel today; blackberry smartphones hui.
94	blackberry push bbm android preloads	Blackberry bbm android preload.	Blackberry push bbm android pre-loading.	Blackberry push bbm android preload.
94	bbm channel blackberry user	BBm Blackberry User Channel.	BBm Blackberry channel user.	BBm user blackberry channel.
94	bbm channel blackberry user	BBm Blackberry User Channel.	BBm Blackberry channel user.	BBm user blackberry channel.
94	bbm pre installed android device	Bbm pre-installed, pre-installed, pre-installed.	Bbm Pre-installed android device pre-installed.	Bbm pre-installed android device pre-installed.
94	blackberry social network bbm channel rolling today	This is the first time you'll be able to use Blackberry.com.	Bbm social network bbm channel running today' hui.	Blackberry social network bbm channel running today.
94	bbm preinstalled android phone	BBm pre-installed android phone system pre-installed.	BBm pre-installed android phone pre-installed.	Pre-installed android phone BBm.
94	blackberry launch bbm channel	Blackberry will start bbm channel.	Blackberry's running bbm channel.	Blackberry's running bbm channel now.
94	bbm preinstalled android device starting month	BBm has been pre-installed since the beginning of the month.	Pre-installed android device BBm from the month.	BBm pre-installed android device from month onwards.
94	blackberry launching bbm channel answer twitter	Blackberry launches bbm twitter twitter twitter response channel.	Blackberry launches bbm channel respond to twitter twitter twitter.	Blackberry launches bbm channel respond twitter twitter twitter.
95	supermarket tragedy lead resignation latvian leader	Tragedy of a resigned Latvian supermarket leader, a resigned Latvian supermarket leader.	Tragedy of resigned Latvian supermarket leader.	Resigned Latvian supermarket leader tragedy resigned Latvian leader resigned.
95	latvian pm dombrovskis step	L' stage latino pm dombrovskis.	L' stage latino pm dombrovskis.	L' latino pm dombrovskis.
95	latvian government fall riga supermarket disaster	The Latvian government has fallen as a result of a disaster in a Latvian supermarket.	The Latvian government falls as a result of a disaster in a supermarket.	Latvian government falls as a result of a supermarket disaster.
95	latvia prime minister resigns	Prime Minister Latvia, resigns.	Latvia, Prime Minister, resigns.	Latvia, prime minister, resigned.
95	latvian pm resigns deadly supermarket roof collapse	Mr. Latvian is resigning from his post office; deadly collapse of the supermarket roof.	Mr. Latvian resigns from the supermarket roof.	Pm Latvian resigns from post; deadly collapse of supermarket roof.
95	latvian govt resigns deadly supermarket collapse	The Latvian government is resigning from the post; the collapse of the supermarket is murderous.	The Latvian government resigns from the deadly collapse of the supermarket.	The Latvian government is resigning from the deadly supermarket collapse.
95	latvia pm resigns riga supermarket collapse	Latvia P.M. is resigning after the fall of Riga's supermarket.	Latvia P.M. resigns after the collapse of Riga supermarket.	Latvia P.M. resigns after the collapse of the supermarket Riga.
95	latvian government fall supermarket collapse	The government of the Latvian Republic is collapsing, the supermarkets are collapsing.	The Latvian government is collapsing, supermarkets are collapsing.	Latvian government s' collapse, supermarkets s' collapse.
95	latvia pm dombrovskis quits mall tragedy	L' Admiral Dombrovskis has put an end to the city's shopping centre tragedy.	L' admiral Dombrovskis put an end to the tragedy of the mall.	L' Admiral Dombrovskis ended the mall tragedy.
95	latvia pm resigns fatal roof collapse	Latvia P.M. has resigned following a fatal collapse of the roof.	Latvia P.M. resigned due to the fatal roof collapse.	Latvia P.M. resigns after a fatal roof collapse.
95	latvia pm resigns supermarket roof collapse killed	Latvia P.M. resigns following the collapse of the city's roof; a supermarket.	Latvia P.M. resigns following the collapse of the roof of a nearby supermarket.	Latvia P.M. resigns following the collapse of a supermarket roof.
95	latvian pm resigns maximum supermarket collapse riga	Pm Latvian is resigning as much as he can, and the supermarket's collapsing.	Pm Latvian resigns at the most from the apos; collapse of the supermarket riga riga riga.	Pm Latvian resigns at the earliest moment; supermarket collapse riga riga riga.
95	latvia prime minister valdis dombrovskis resigns deadly riga supermarket	Latvia Prime Minister Valdis dombrovskis has resigned from the super-deadly Riga market.	Latvia Prime Minister Valdis dombrovskis resigns from super-deadly market Riga.	Latvia Prime Minister Valdis dombrovskis resigns from Riga's deadly super-market.
95	latvian prime minister resigns deadly supermarket collapse	The Latvian premier resigned from the apos; bloody supermarket collapse.	The first Latvian minister resigns from the apos; deadly collapse of the supermarkets.	Latvian prime minister resigns from apo, deadly supermarket collapse.
95	breaking news latvian prime minister dombrovskis step	Latest News Prime Minister of the Latvian state of dombrovskis not dombrovskis.	Latest Prime Minister stage dombrovskis not dombrovskis Latvian.	Latest news Prime Minister Latvian stage dombrovskis not dombrovskis.
95	latvia prime minister resigns supermarket collapse	The Latvia Prime Minister is resigning from his post; the Latvia supermarket collapses.	Latvia Prime Minister resigns from post; supermarket collapse.	The Latvia prime minister resigns from the supermarket collapse.
95	latvian premier dombrovskis quits deadly roof collapse	The first prime minister of Latin America, Dombrovskis, renounces the idea of the apo; deadly collapse of the roof.	The first minister Latin dombrovskis renounces the apos; deadly collapse of the roof.	Latin Prime Minister Dombrovskis renounces the apos; deadly roof collapse.
95	bank group bank review competitiveness latvian port	Examination by banks of the Latin port's competitiveness.	Examination of the competitiveness of the Latin port by the banks.	Banking group's review of Latin port competitiveness.
95	latvian prime minister resigns supermarket disaster	The Latvian premier resigned from the supermarket disaster.	Latvian Prime Minister resigns from the supermarket disaster.	The Latvian prime minister resigns from supermarket disaster.
95	shock subsides fallout resounds latvia	It's about the shock, the mitigation, the fallout, the latvia.	The shock s' attenuates and the fallout resonates latvia.	The shock attenuates and the fallout resounds latvia.
95	latvian pm resigns worst disaster decade	Pm Latvian has resigned from the most disastrous decade.	Pm Latvian resigns from the most disastrous decade.	Pm Latvian resigns from the worst decade.
95	latvia prime minister resigns riga supermarket roof collapse	The Latvia Prime Minister resigned from the apos; collapse of the roof of the Riga supermarket.	Latvia Prime Minister resigns from post; collapse of roof of Riga supermarket.	Latvian prime minister resigns from apos; Riga supermarket roof collapse.
95	latvia pm resigns collapse supermarket roof disaster medium	Latvia P.M. resigned following the collapse of the city's supermarket roof.	Latvia P.M. resigns following the apos; collapse of the roof of the supermarket.	Latvia P.M. resigned following apos; supermarket roof collapse.
95	latvia pm quits deadly building collapse	Latvia P.M. has put an end to the murderous collapse of a Latvian building.	Latvia P.M. put an end to the murderous collapse of a building.	Latvia P.M. put an end to the deadly collapse of a building.
95	latvian prime minister resigns wake tragedy	The Latvian Prime Minister has resigned following a tragedy.	Following a tragedy, the first Latvian minister resigned.	The Latvian prime minister resigned after a tragedy.
95	latvia pm resigns riga supermarket disaster pm spokesman	Latvia P.M. is resigning his position as a doorman-supermarket spokesperson.	Latvia P.M. resigns his door job-supermarket talk.	Latvia P.M. resigns from-door of supermarket word.
95	latvian pm resigns supermarket roof collapse	P.M. Latvian has resigned from the post office; the roof of the supermarket collapsed.	P.M. Latvian resigned from the post; roof collapse at the supermarket.	P.M. Latvian resigns from the supermarket roof collapse.
95	latvian prime minister resigns wake roof collapse tragedy	The Latvian Prime Minister resigned following a disaster.	The Latvian Prime Minister resigns following a tragedy of a roof collapse.	The first Latvian minister resigns following the collapse of a roof.
95	latvian pm resigns shopping mall disaster	Mr. Latvian is resigning from the mall.	Pm Latvian resigned from the mall disaster.	Mr. Latvian is resigning from the mall disaster today.
95	latvian pm government resign deadly tragedy	The Latin government-U.S.A. has resigned from the deadly tragedy.	The Latin government has resigned from the deadly tragedy.	Latin government-U.S. government has resigned from deadly tragedy.
95	latvian pm resigns death supermarket collapse	Pm Latvian is resigning from his post; the collapse of the supermarket of death.	Pm Latvian resigns from the supermarket of death.	Pm Latvian resigns from the supermarket collapse of death.
95	latvian prime minister resigns roof collapse	The Prime Minister of the Latvian Empire resigned from office, and the roof collapsed.	Latvian Prime Minister resigns from the apos; roof collapse.	The Latvian prime minister resigns from the apostle, and the roof collapses.
95	latvia pm resigns supermarket roof collapse	Latvia P.M. is resigning from the post office; collapse of the supermarket roof.	Latvia P.M. resigns from apos; collapse of the roof of the supermarket.	Latvia P.M. resigns from apos; supermarket roof collapse.
95	latvia prime minister resigns deadly roof collapse	The Latvia Prime Minister resigned following the death; bloody collapse of roof.	The Prime Minister Latvia resigns following the apos; deadly collapse of roof.	The Latvian prime minister resigned after the roof collapsed.
95	latvia pm resigns riga supermarket disaster	Latvia P.M. is resigning from the disaster at the Riga supermarket.	Latvia P.M. resigns from the disaster at Riga supermarket.	Latvia P.M. resigns from Riga supermarket disaster.
95	latvian pm resigns supermarket collapse	P.M. Latvian has resigned after the market collapse.	P.M. Latvian resigned after the collapse of the city's supermarket.	P.M. Latvian resigns after the collapse of the supermarket.
95	st ld writethru latvia pm resigns collapse supermarket roof disaster	St. ld writethru latvia resigns from the rooftop disaster of a supermarket.	St ld writethru latvia pm resigns from the roof disaster of a supermarket.	St ld writethru latvia pm resigns from the supermarket roof disaster.
95	latvia pm valdis dombrovskis resigns riga supermarket collapse	Latvia pm valdis dombrovskis is resigning from the post office; supermarket collapse Riga.	Latvia pm valdis dombrovskis resigns from apos; collapse of the supermarket riga.	Latvia pm valdis dombrovskis resigns from apos; supermarket collapse Riga.
95	latvia leader resigns supermarket roof collapse	Latvia Leader resigns following the collapse of the roof of a supermarket.	Latvia leader resigns following the collapse of the roof of a supermarket.	Latvia leader resigns after apos roof collapse; supermarket.
96	dundee team find link high sodium medicine heart disease	L' Dundee's team has found this link to high-sodium heart disease.	Dundee's team has found a link to high-sodium heart disease.	Dundee's team has found the link to heart disease with high sodium content.
96	common medicine alarming level sa increase risk heart	The alarmingly high level of community medicine increases cardiac risk.	And the alarmingly high level of common medicine increases the risk of heart disease.	The alarming level of common medicine increases heart risk.
96	sa painkiller increase stroke risk percent study	In addition, it can be used to reduce the risk of a stroke.	Its pain reliever increases the risk of stroke as a percentage of stroke.	Her pain reliever increases stroke risk as a percentage of the study.
96	stroke heart attack caused aspirin	The heart attack, it caused the apos; aspirin.	The heart attack caused the epos; aspirin.	The heart attack caused the aspirin.
96	sodium content medicine pose hea risk	Sodium-based drugs are at high risk.	Sodium-based drugs are considered to pose a high risk.	Sodium-based drugs pose a high risk to your health.
96	sa medicine threat hea	Medicine's on the line.	Well, his medicine is on the line.	His medicine is threatening.
96	sa bomb hiding medicine cabinet	Her bomb hidden in the medicine cabinet.	Her medicine cabinet concealer.	His secret medicine cabinet bomb.
96	sodium aspirin heart attack	Sodium aspirin.	Heart attack due to vomiting; sodium aspirin.	Acute heart attack due to vomiting; sodium aspirin.
96	sa level drug increase hea risk	He's taking more medication than he's taking.	Medication levels increase the risk.	His drug dose increases the risk.
96	sa everyday painkiller boost risk heart attack	Her daily pain medication will increase your risk of a heart attack.	Her daily painkiller increases your risk of a heart attack.	The risk of a heart attack is increased by her daily painkiller.
96	sodium packed medication raise stroke death risk	Sodium-coated drugs increase the risk of stroke-related death.	Sodium-coated drugs increase your risk of death from stroke.	Sodium-coated medications increase risk of death from stroke.
96	drug sa content damaging hea	It's a drug, its contents are harmful to Hea.	You know, drugs are bad for Hea.	Harmful drug content in Hea.
96	soluble painkiller linked major hea problem	Soluble pain relievers have linked the major underlying health problems to a major problem.	Soluble pain relievers have linked major health problems to one major problem.	Soluble pain relievers have linked major health problems to major ones.
96	high sa level common medicine patient increased risk	The risk to patients was increased by his high level of shared medicine.	The high level of his common medicine increased the risk to his patients.	The high level of his common medicine increased risk for patients.
96	high sa content med boost risk cardiovascular problem	It's a good way to get your heart rate back on track.	Risk cardio-vascular related to high content of his med boost.	Cardio-vascular risk due to high med boost content.
96	sa soluble drug increase risk heart attack stroke	Soluble medication increases your risk of strokes.	Her soluble medication increases the risk of stroke.	It's a soluble drug that increases your risk of strokes.
96	warning stroke risk soluble painkiller	In addition, it is recommended that patients be tested for hematologic effects.	Warning against the risk of soluble analgesic stroke.	Soluble analgesic stroke risk warning.
96	sodium effervescent painkiller vitamin cvd risk	Vitamin cvd, a sodium-based, effervescent pain reliever, poses a risk.	Vitamin cvd, a sodium effervescent pain reliever, is at risk.	There is a risk of vitamin cvd, a sodium effervescent pain reliever.
96	study find stroke heart attack risk soluble pain	The study concluded that there is a risk of pain that is soluble in the risk of a heart attack.	The risk of heart attack is greatest in those who have a stroke, but not in those who have a heart attack.	One study concluded that stroke is at risk for soluble pain in heart attack risk.
96	study link high sodium fizzy medicine raised heart risk	In addition, there was no significant association between the use of high-sodium medications and cardiac risk.	High sodium medication has been linked to cardiac risk.	The study found a link between high sodium medication and cardiac risk.
96	sodium medicine raise stroke hypertension risk	If you are not sure if you have a problem, contact your doctor.	Sodium-containing medication increases your risk of high blood pressure.	The sodium drug increases the risk of high blood pressure.
96	drug sa content damaging hea study	Drugs are not considered to be harmful substances.	Drug its harmful content at the site; study hea.	Harmful drug content in the study.
96	sa drug risk cardiovascular event	Her drug-risk cardio-vascular event.	Her drug risk cardio-vascular event.	His drug risk cardio-vascular event.
96	fizzy medicine tied increased risk heart event high sa level	A sparkling drug has elevated the risk of cardiac events.	A sparkling drug product has associated an increased risk of cardiac events at a high level of risk.	Sparkling drug associated an increased risk of cardiac events at a high level.
96	sodium soluble medicine linked raised risk stroke	Sodium-soluble drug associated with apo; high-risk LCA.	Sodium-soluble drug linked to apo; high risk LCA.	Dosage-related sodium soluble drug; high risk LCA.
96	sa everyday painkiller linked premature death	Her daily painkiller tied her untimely death to untimely death.	Her daily painkiller tied premature death to premature death.	His painkiller linked premature death to premature death.
96	soluble painkiller high sa pose hea risk	Soluble high-grade pain relievers are considered to be a high risk.	Soluble, high-grade pain relievers pose a high risk.	High-grade soluble pain relievers pose a high risk.
96	sa fizzy painkiller linked heart attack stroke	L'apos; pain reliever, sazy fizzy, has linked stroke to heart attack.	Szy fizzy pain reliever linked apos; stroke to heart attack.	Lapses; sazy fizzy painkiller linked apos; stroke to heart attack.
96	aspirin increase risk heart attack high sa level	Aspirin increases the risk of heart attacks.	Aspirin increases your risk of a heart attack.	L'apos; aspirin will increase your risk of heart attack.
96	high sa level common medicine patient risk	High Risk for Common Medicine Patients.	This is a high risk for patients in the field of public health.	High risk to common medicine patients.
96	sa medicine pose hea risk	There are risks to his medicine.	His medicine poses risks.	His medicine is fraught with risks.
96	effervescent medicine harmful amount sa	It's not a bad thing, it's a bad thing.	Effervescent medicine its harmful quantity.	Effervescent medicine harmful quantity its.
96	fizzy counter med dangerously high sodium level	Sodium is a high-sodium, high-sodium, sparkling counter.	Sparkling counter med dangerously high in sodium.	Sparkling counter med dangerously high sodium level.
96	soluble painkiller increase risk heart attack stroke	It's a good thing to have a heart attack, but not a heart attack.	Soluble painkillers increase the risk of stroke.	Soluble pain relievers increase the risk of heart attack and stroke.
97	sony lodge smartwig patent application	Sony applies for a patent for a smart wig.	Sony is filing a patent application for a smart wig.	Sony files a patent application for a smart wig.
97	sony share price company seek patent smart hairpiece	Sony D&apos Awards Company; shares search for smart wig patent.	Sony prize company d' smart wig patent search actions.	Sony prize company d' actions seek patent smart wig.
97	sony seek smartwig patent hairpiece camera sensor	Sony look for Smartwig patented sensor sensor sensor sensor sensor sensor sensor camera.	Sony look for Smartwig® patented sensor sensor sensor camera perch.	Sony look for Smartwig patented sensor camera sensor perch.
97	wear smartwig sony file patent bizarre hairpiece	Wear Smartwig sony folder with a weird patented wig.	Wear Smartwig sony weird wig patent folder.	Wear smartwig sony patent folder strange wig.
97	sony bet smartwig future wearable tech	Sony bets smartwig will be the next portable technology.	Sony bets smartwig future portable technology.	Sony bet smartwig future portable technology.
97	smartwig sony file patent computerised hair piece	Smartwig Sony Files patent computerized patent hairpiece.	File smartwig sony patent patent part of computerized patent hair.	Smartwig sony file patent part of computerized hair patent.
97	sony play elderly tech fan wearable smart wig	Sony Play Old Fan of Portable Intelligent Wig Technology.	Sony play old-time smart wig technology fan.	Sony play old-timey fan of smart wig portable technology.
97	call sony dumbwig	It's called supersonic jerk.	They're called apos; supersonic idiot.	"They call it ""lapos""; supersonic jerk."
97	sony wig device	Audio wig-device device.	Device with sony wig.	This is a sony wig device.
97	sony file patent smartwig	Patented Smartwig audio file.	Smartwig patented sound file.	Sound file for Smartwig.
97	sony file patent bizarre smartwig vibrating sideburn	Sony file weird Smartwig vibrating cobblers patent.	File sony patent weird Smartwig vibrating cobblers.	Smartwig weird patent sony file vibrating cobblers.
97	sony file patent smartwig smart hair technology	Sony patented Smartwig SmartHair Technology Smartwig technology file.	Sony patented Smartwig SmartHair technology file Smartwig technology.	Sony file patented Smartwig smart hair technology Smartwig technology.
97	sony seek smartwig patent hairpiece sensor	Sony is looking for a patented Smartwig wig sensor.	Sony is looking for a patent on the Smartwig wig sensor.	Sony look for patented smartwig sensor wig.
97	sony file patent smartwig sensor hairpiece	The Smartwig Smartwig Sound File is a patented wig-capable wig-wig-wig sensor sound wig.	Smartwig patented sound file sensor wig wig wig wig wig sony wig.	Smartwig patented sound file sensor wig wig wig wig sony wig.
97	sony seek patent high tech smartwig	Sony is looking for a state-of-the-art, intelligent wig patent.	Sony is looking for a patent for high-tech, intelligent wig.	Sony look for high tech smart wig patent.
97	sony seeking patent smartwig camera gps report	Sony is currently patenting the GPS report from the Smartwig camera.	Sony seeks to patent the GPS report of the Smartwig camera.	Sony is seeking to patent the Smartwig camera GPS report.
97	sony patent	Patented sound certificate.	Patented soundtrack, please.	A patent for soundtrack.
97	toupee sony answer question	Panty answers the question.	The toupee answers the question.	The answer to the question is the toupee.
97	smartwigs sony file patent connected headgear	The patent file sony smartwigs linked head d' plane connected.	The smartwigs sony file is a patent-linked d&apos head; connected plane.	The smartwigs sony file sony patent linked d&apos head; connected plane.
97	sony seek smartwig patent	Sony is patenting a smart wig.	Sony is looking for a patent on an intelligent wig.	Sony is seeking a patent on a smart wig.
97	sony filed patent smartwig buzz head	Sony applied for a patent for the head of Buzz Smartwig.	Sony has filed a patent application for the head of Buzz Smartwig.	Sony has filed a Buzz Smartwig head patent application.
97	sony file patent smartwig	Patented Smartwig audio file.	Smartwig patented sound file.	Sound file for Smartwig.
97	sony corporation adr sne design head	Sony Company and the Sony Headline Design.	Sony company and head design.	Sony company and design of the head.
97	sony file patent vibrating smartwig	This file contains a patent file with an intelligent vibrating wig.	Intelligent vibrating wig patent sony file.	Sony file patent with intelligent vibrating wig.
97	sony file patent hea sensing smartwig	It's a good way to get a feel for your computer.	Sony patent file can smell Smartwig.	Sony file patent hea feel Smartwig.
97	bad hair day hello sony smartwig	Bad hair day, good morning, sony Smartwig.	Bad hair day, hello sony Smartwig.	Bad hair day hello sony Smartwig.
97	patent smart wig sony apple photo focusing	It's a patented smart wig, and it's an apple-sound photo focusing.	Patented smart wig photo sound apple focusing.	Patented smart wig photo apple sony focusing.
97	sony mind smartwig	Spirit of the apo; spirit of the apo; straw man of the apo; episode.	L' spirit of the apos; spirit of the apos; straw man of the apos; episode.	L'apos; spirit de l'apos; spirit de l'apos; man de la paille de l'apos; episode.
97	sony file patent smartwig camera gps	Sony file is a proprietary file for Smartwig gps camera.	Sony patented file Smartwig gps camera.	Sony file patented Smartwig gps camera.
97	sony file patent smartwig tech toupee help navigate	Sony patent file technology wig Smartwig patent help to navigate.	Sony patent file Smartwig tech wig will help you navigate.	Sony file patent Smartwig tech wig helps to navigate.
97	sony file patent smartwig	Patented Smartwig audio file.	Smartwig patented sound file.	Sound file for Smartwig.
97	wig help navigate	The parakeet per persisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisis	The parakeet per persisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisis	The parakeet per persisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisisis
97	sony file patent high tech hair piece	High-tech patent portfolio of cutting-edge hair.	Sony patent portfolio of high-tech piece of cutting-edge hair.	Sony patent file high-tech piece of cutting-edge hair.
97	sony corporation adr nyse sne file patent smartwig	Sony company adr nyse files under the patent of Smartwig.	Sony company adr nyse file sneaky Smartwig patent.	Sony adr nyse smartwig sneaky file patent company.
97	sony smartwig help blind	Sony Smartwig helps at l' blind.	Sony smartwig helps the blind.	Sony smartwig helps blind people.
97	sony file patent smart wig high tech hairpiece	File sony patent, state-of-the-art, high-tech wig-wig wig.	File sony patent wig smart high tech wig wig wig.	File sony patent smart wig high tech wig wig wig.
98	barrier identified hpv vaccination teen	Identified varicella vaccine Vaccinated adolescent.	Barrier identified varicella vaccine Vaccinated adolescent.	Identified varicella barrier Vaccinated adolescent.
98	parent teen vaccinated hpv prevent cancer	Teenage parents immunized against varicella are preventing cancer.	Teenage parents who are vaccinated against chickenpox prevent cancer.	Teenage varicella vaccinated parents prevent cancer.
98	study associate medium coverage internet search activity increased	Apos research activity; Internet research activities; Internet cover of apo coverage; apo research activity; apo research activity; apo research activity; man.	L' research activity of l' Internet search of l' Internet of the coverage cover of the cover of l' research activity of l' activity increased of l' research activity of l' man.	L' search activity; Internet search activity; Internet cover cover coverage of the l' search activity; activity increased from l' search activity of l' man.
98	expert call calm france hit cancer vaccine scare	One expert said that France was afraid of the vaccine against cancer.	Well, an expert says calm France was afraid of the cancer vaccine.	An expert says calm France was afraid of cancer vaccines.
98	anti cancer vaccine revives controversy	The anti-cancer vaccine's stirring up controversy.	The cancer vaccine is stirring up a lot of controversy.	The cancer vaccine sparks controversy.
98	hpv jab half case precancerous lesion	Hpv jab-half case of pre-cancerous lesion.	Hpv jab half case of pre-cancerous lesion.	Hpv jab half case of precancerous lesion.
98	twitter tuesday meningitis scare low hpv vaccination rate young invincibles	On Twitter, Tuesday's meningitis scares the unstoppable young people with low levels of immunization against the hpv.	On Twitter, Tuesday's meningitis is scaring invincible young people with low levels of hpv vaccination.	Tuesday's meningitis scares unstoppable young people with low hpv vaccination rates on Twitter.
98	parental attitude sex cost stymie hpv vaccination	Sexual parenting costs money to vaccinate against hpv stymia.	L' sexual parenting costs vaccination against hpv stymie.	The cost of vaccination against hpv stymie is: sexual parenting.
98	france hit gardasil cancer vaccine scare	France was afraid of the new Gardasil cancer vaccine.	France was scared of the Gardasil cancer vaccine.	France was afraid of cancer vaccine Gardasil.
98	parental concern common barrier adolescent hpv vaccination	Concern of parents Common barrier Immunization of adolescents against HSV.	Parental Concern Common barrier HSV immunization of adolescents.	Common barrier adolescent HSV immunization.
98	physician recommendation key hpv vaccine coverage	Hpv vaccination coverage, doctor's recommendation.	Doctor's recommendation: hpv immunization.	Doctor's recommendation: vaccination coverage against hpv.
98	hpv immunization consent	Hpv vaccination consent.	Consent to HPV immunization.	The consent to vaccination against hpv.
98	review barrier hpv vaccination teen	Investigate the HpV Vaccine Barrier in Adolescents.	Examine the vaccine barrier against hpv in adolescents.	Examine hpv vaccine barrier in adolescents.
98	son hpv vaccine year	Hpv son-year-of-vaccine.	Hpv son year of vaccine.	Hpv son vaccine year.
98	cancer vaccine scare spark call calm	It's the fear of the cure for cancer that calls for calmness.	Fear of the cancer vaccine calls for caution; ignites calm.	Fear of the cancer vaccine will call for calm.
98	vaccine hpv deadly placebo developer	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may influence the outcome.	Development of a fatal placebo for HIV vaccine.	Develop fatal placebo for HIV vaccine.
98	study examines barrier human papillomavirus vaccination teen	The study is examining the barrier to immunization of adolescents with human papilloma virus.	The study examines the barrier to immunization of adolescents with human papilloma virus.	The study examines the barrier to adolescent human papilloma virus vaccination.
98	merck glaxo hpv vaccine held sex money	Merck Glaxo Hpv vaccine was found to contain silver for sex.	The Merck Glaxo Hpv vaccine contained lapos; money for sex.	Merck Glaxo Hpv vaccine contained money for sex.
98	appeal calm complaint hpv vaccine	Call, Calm-You, HBV Vaccine.	Just call, calm down-you, HBV vaccine.	Call, calm down-you, HBV vaccine.
98	teenager hpv vaccine	Adolescent HIV vaccine.	Vaccine against HIV among adolescents.	HIV vaccine in adolescents.
98	glaxosmithkline plc adr gsk glaxosmithkline growth	Glaxosmithkline plc ad gsk glaxosmithkline growing.	Glaxosmithkline plc adr gsk glaxosmithkline growth.	Glaxosmithkline plc adr gsk glaxosmithkline growing.
98	preteen hpv shot	Teen vPv pre @-@.	VPV pre-teens.	VPV pre @- @-@.
98	hpv jab finally linked reduced cervical cancer rate	The HIV vaccine was ultimately used to reduce cervical cancer.	Ultimately, the HIV vaccine reduced cervical cancer.	The HIV vaccine has ultimately reduced cervical cancer.
98	hpv vaccine effective black woman	Hpv, Hpv, Hpv, Hpv.	Hpv effective vaccine black woman.	Hpv effective black woman vaccine.
98	hpv vaccine market forecast hit billion gsk	According to forecasts, the market for the vaccine against hpv will reach billions of gsk.	The hpv vaccine market is expected to reach billions of gsk.	The hpv vaccine market is expected to reach billions.
98	parental attitude help stymie hpv shot	L' parenting helps Stymie to shoot.	L' parenting helps Stymie hpv shot.	L' parenting helps hpv shot Stymie.
98	french teenager claim anti cancer vaccine seriously	The French teenagers are demanding a vaccination against the disease.	French teenagers are clamouring for a cancer vaccine.	French teenagers are seriously demanding a cancer vaccine.
98	parent misconception hpv vaccine keeping vaccination	Mistake by Parents Hpv Vaccine to keep immunization.	Mistake by hpv immunization parents to keep immunization.	Mistake on the part of the parents of the hpv vaccine by keeping the hpv vaccine.
98	sanofi sued france gardasil vaccine	Sanofi has taken legal action against France Gardasil on the issue of the vaccine.	Sanofi sued France Gardasil for the cure.	Sanofi sued Gardasil for the vaccine.
99	report mother adam lanza feeling	Report Mother Adam lanza's feelings.	Report the feelings of the mother Adam lanza.	Please report the feelings of mother Adam lanza.
99	sandy hook report adam lanza acted slaying motive	Sandy Hook reports that Adam lanza has been acting as a murderous motive.	According to Sandy Hook, Adam lanza acted as a murderous motive.	Sandy Hook reports that Adam lanza acted as a motive for murder.
99	newtown police response investigated	I'm sorry, but the Newtown police have been investigating the incident.	Newtown police investigated the intervention of the police.	Newtown P.D. investigated the apo; police response to the incident.
99	increased police presence school monday	We'll be back on the scene on Monday with more police presence.	Increased police presence at school on Monday.	Increased police presence at school Monday.
99	selectwoman tough week ahead newtown	It's the first time in the world that a woman has been elected.	Elected woman gets one week apo, moves on to Newtown.	An elected woman has a week apos ahead of Newtown.
99	year sandy hook report find motive school shooting	The same year Sandy Croy found a gunfight in a mobile school.	The year Sandy Croy found a shooting at a mobile school.	The year Sandy Croy found a school shooting in a mobile school.
99	judge eliot prescott listen newtown tape determine	Judge Prescott is listening to the Newtown recordings.	Judge Eliot Prescott, listening to Newtown recordings.	And Judge Eliot Prescott is listening to the Newtown recordings.
99	sandy hook report answer question mystery video	Sandy hook answer to mystery mystery mystery mystery mystery mystery mystery mystery report.	Sandy hook answer report to mystery mystery video mystery mystery mystery mystery.	Sandy hook answer report to question mystery video mystery mystery mystery mystery.
99	motive newtown report detail lanza	News report-City details lanza.	The New-City report provides details on lanza.	The news report details lanza.
99	sandy hook report month	Sandy Hook monthly report.	Sandy Hook monthly report.	Monthly report from Sandy Hook.
99	sandy hook investigation report released	The report d' inquiry into Sandy Crochet has been released.	The report on Sandy Crochet's investigation was also released.	Sandy Crochet investigation report released.
99	sandy hook massacre report learned	Sandy Hook massacre report's learned.	Sandy Hook, massacre report learned.	Sandy hook massacre report learned.
99	sandy hook shooting gunman adam lanza motif	Sandy Hook shooting Adam lanza shooter pattern.	Sandy Hook shooting Adam lanza pattern shooter.	Sandy hook shooting shot Adam lanza pattern.
99	inside adam lanza lair investigator release photo full report sandy hook	To the inside of the apo lair; Adam lanza, the surveyor, published a complete photograph of Sandy Hook.	At the inside of the Dapos lair, Adam lanza, the investigator has posted a complete photo of Sandy Hook.	Inside the lair of d' Adam lanza, l' investigator published a full photo of Sandy Hook.
99	newtown report renews focus role lanza mom	Newtown reporting re-starred as Mom lanza.	Newtown reporting repeats the lead role of mother lanza.	Newtown report renews the lead role of mom lanza.
99	attack lanza cut relationship	Attack lanza severed his relationship.	The lanza attack has been severed.	Attack lanza cut off relationship.
99	judge order release newtown recording	Judge ordered Newtown released.	Judge's orders to release Newtown.	Order of the judge to release Newtown.
99	report released newtown shooting investigation	Report published on the Newtown survey.	A report was published on the Newtown survey.	A report was released on the Newtown survey.
99	motive sandy hook killing mystery	Motive Sandy Hook, kill mystery.	Motive Sandy hook kill mystery.	Sandy Hook killing mystery motive.
99	sandy hook report released	Report on Sandy Hook published.	A report on the sand hook.	Sand hook report published.
99	report sandy hook elementary school shooting investigation	Report it; shoot-and-run investigation; Sandy Hook Elementary School.	Report the scene; investigation of the shooting of l'apos; Sandy Hook Elementary School.	Report the incident; investigate the shooting; report the shooting; elementary school Sandy Hook.
99	report lanza shared plan online struck	The Action Plan has been updated online.	The Action Plan has been updated and is available online at http://www.dfait-maeci.gc.ca/dfait-maeci.	The action plan was updated online.
99	motive sandy hook massacre	Motive Sandy Hook, massacre.	And that's why Sandy Hook massacred.	Motive Sandy hook massacre.
99	prosecutor conn gunman motive unknown	D.A. Conn is a man with an unknown motive.	Prosecutor Conn man with unknown motive.	Prosecutor Conn unknown gunman mobile unknown.
99	sandy hook report released motive shooting	According to the Sandy Hook report, there was a shooting with motive.	Sandy Hook's report has revealed a shooting with motive.	Sandy Hook's report revealed a shooting with a motive in it.
99	sandy hook motive report	Sandy Hook report.	Sandy Hook report.	Sandy Hook's report on the case.
99	state finding newtown	L&apos, the state, finds Newtown.	L' State finds Newtown!	L' state finds Newtown.
99	people thought adam lanza posted newtown chan official	People believed that Adam lanza had posted a Newtown agent.	People thought that Adam lanza posted an agent from Newtown.	People thought Adam lanza posted a Newtown agent.
99	newtown shooter obsessed columbine rampage report	I mean, Newtown shot obsessed with Columbine's clutter report.	Newtown shot obsessed with Columbine's report of clutter.	Newtown shooter obsessed with Columbine report clutter.
99	sandy hook massacre killer adam lanza motive	Sandy Hook kills killer Adam lanza.	Sandy Hook slaughtered killer Adam lanza mobile.	Sandy hook massacre killer Adam lanza mobile.
99	sandy hook photo inside school gunman adam lanza bedroom	Photo of the hook of sand in the room d' Adam lanza, shooter of the school.	Photo of the sand hook in his bedroom; Adam lanza, a school shooter.	Photo of sand hook in apos room; Adam lanza, school shooter.
99	adam lanza obsession columbine takeaway	Adam lanza is obsessed with taking columbine to go.	Adam lanza columbine obsession to go.	Adam lanza obsession columbine to-go.
99	newtown shooting detail released	Well, the details of the Newtown shooting have been made public.	Details of the Newtown shooting have been made public.	Details of the Newtown shooting have been released to the public.
99	newtown massacre report	Newtown Massacre report.	Report on Newtown Massacre.	This is a report on the massacre in the Newtown area.
99	sandy hook shooter obsessed columbine motive massacre	The Sand-Hook Killer, he was obsessed with the Columbia massacre.	Sandman killer was obsessed with the Columbia massacre.	The sand hook killer was obsessed with the massacre at Columbia.
99	newtown school shooter obessed mass murder	He's got a gun on his head, he's got a gun on his head and a gun on his head.	Newtown School obeyed a mass murder.	The Newtown school shooter obeyed a mass murder.
99	detail released sandy hook elementary school shooting	The details allowed us to release Sandy Crochet, who had been shot in the middle of the school.	Details have made it possible to release Sandy Hook, shooting at the elementary school.	Details made it possible to release Sandy Hook, elementary school shooting.
99	report offer insight connecticut gunman behaviour motive	Now, the report provides a glimpse of the behavior of the Connecticut shooter.	The report provides insight into the behavior of the Connecticut shooter.	The report provides insight into the behavior of the gunman from Connecticut.
99	sandy hook report monday call remain seal	This is the first time I have heard of this kind of thing.	Monday's report of the sand hook call is still sealing.	The sand hook report of Monday call remain seals.
99	motive sandy hook shooting remains unknown ct report	Sand hooks are still unknown.	Sand hook hits are still unknown, sir.	The shots from the sand hook remain unknown.
99	sandy hook report fails determine shooting motive	Sandy Hook's investigation failed to determine the motive for the shooting.	Sandy Hook's report fails to determine the motive for the shooting.	Sandy Hook's report fails to determine motive for the shooting.
99	report sandy hook elementary school shooting investigation	Report it; shoot-and-run investigation; Sandy Hook Elementary School.	Report the scene; investigation of the shooting of l'apos; Sandy Hook Elementary School.	Report the incident; investigate the shooting; report the shooting; elementary school Sandy Hook.
99	sandy hook report newtown school shooter adam lanza obsessed	Sandy Hook reports that apos; Adam lanza, the Newtown shooter, is obsessed with the school.	Sandy Hook reports that Adam lanza, Newtown shooter, is obsessed with the school.	Sandy Hook reports that Newtown shooter Adam lanza is obsessed with school.
99	chilling newtown report detail shooter murderous obsession	A cold Newtown report detailing the gunman's deadly obsession.	A cold Newtown report details the apos; obsession killing the shooter.	A cold Newtown report details the murderous obsession of the shooter.
99	report sandy hook gunman adam lanza acted	Point out that Adam lanza, a sand hookman, played the role of the armed man.	He was the first man to be shot by a man with a gun.	Point out that the sand hook Adam lanza played the role of the armed man.
99	long awaited sandy hook shooting report today	Gunnery report from the long-awaited sand hook.	This is a long-awaited sand hook shooting report.	Sand hook shooting report long overdue today.
99	newtown gunman obsessed mass murder	He's a man with a gun; a new city is obsessed with killing people.	A man armed with apos; a new town obsessed with mass murder.	A new city is obsessed with mass murder.
99	sandy hook shooter obsessed mass murder gun school massacre	Sandy hook shot obsessed with slaughtering l' firearms school.	Sandy hook shooter obsessed with massacre of l' school of firearms.	Sandy hook shooter obsessed with gun slaughter, gun school.
99	investigator release report sandy hook elementary school shooting	D' after the police officer's report, Sandy Hook was killed in an elementary school.	D' after the report of l' investigator, Sandy Hook was killed in an elementary school.	He was killed in an elementary school after the report of the police officer.
99	sandy hook report adam lanza broke law acquire gun broke	Sandy Hook reports that Adam Lanza has broken the law and is reported to have been procured a weapon.	Sandy Hook reports that Adam Lanza has broken the law and is procured a weapon.	According to Sandy Hook, Adam Lanza broke the law and was procured a weapon.
99	ski santa fe open thanksgiving	Santa Claus opens Thanksgiving.	Santa skiing opens Thanksgiving.	Well, ski Santa's opening Thanksgiving.
99	sandy hook report find conclusive motive	Sandy Hook's report says that there's a compelling reason.	Sandy Hook's report found one compelling reason.	Sandy Hook's report finds a conclusive motive.
99	sandy hook crime report adam lanza obsessed mass murder	Sandy Hook Crime Report Adam lanza's obsession with mass murder.	Sandy Hook Crime Report Adam lanza obsessed with mass murderers.	Sandy Hook Crime Report Adam lanza mass murder obsessed.
99	report newtown school massacre motive remains mystery	The cause of the massacre at Newtown High School is reported to be mysterious.	The reason for the massacre in Newtown school is reported to remain mysterious.	It is reported that the cause of the Newtown school massacre remains mysterious.
99	report sandy hook rampage minute	Bring up the sand hook.	Report sand hook.	And report the sand hook.
99	conn judge listening newtown recording	Listen to Newtown.	J&apos, listen to Newtown.	Hey, J&apos, listen to Newtown.
99	sandy hook investigative report monday	Sandy Hook investigation on Monday.	Apos report; Sandy Hook investigation Monday.	A report on Sandy Hook's investigation on Monday.
99	investigator release report sandy hook shooting	The investigation revealed that there had been a firefight with a sand trap.	The release of the investigator reports a gunfight with a sand trap.	The investigator's release report indicates that a sand trap shooting was taking place.
99	authority released detailed report sandy hook elementary	L' l' L' L' L' L' L' L' L' published a detailed report on sand and the elementary hook.	The authority published a detailed report on sand and the elementary hook.	L' authority published a detailed report on sand and elementary hook.
99	secrecy shroud sandy hook massacre probe	Secret shroud sand hooks claw kill probe.	Secret sand shroud hook blood probe hook.	Secret sand shroud hook hook massacre probe.
99	sandy hook shooting report find gunman magazine manufactured	Sandy hook report shot to find out gunman magazine made.	Sandy hook gun report report find gunman magazine manufactured.	Sandy hook report shooting report find gunman magazine made.
99	timeline event sandy hook elementary school	Chronological Event - Sandy Elementary School Hook.	Chronological Event Sandy Hook, elementary school.	Chronological event Sandy hook elementary school.
99	report released sandy hook shooting investigation	A report has been published on the investigation of Sandy Hook on the shooting.	A report has been published on Sandy Hook's investigation of the shooting incident.	A report was released on Sandy Hook's shooting investigation.
99	today news motive sandy hook shooting	Today, the news also motivates Sandy Hook to shoot.	Today, news motivates Sandy Hook's shooting.	Today, the news motivates shooting Sandy Hook.
99	newtown call remain sealed judge review	Newtown's call goes unanswered.	L' Newtown's call goes unanswered at this time.	L' call from Newtown goes unheeded.
99	sandy hook report	Report on the Sand Hook.	A report on the sand hook.	Sand hook report.
99	sandy hook report profile shooter find link game motive	The shooter profile of the Sandy hook report finds the motive for the set of links.	The shooter profile of the Sandy hook report will find the motive for the link game.	The Sandy hook report shooter profile finds the link game's motive.
99	conn gunman motive mystery abc providence ri bedford	Conn Gunman mysterious mobile abs Providence Ri Bedford.	Conn Gunman mysterious mobile abc Providence Ri Bedford.	Conn Gunman mobile phone mystery abc Providence Ri Bedford.
99	sandy hook massacre adam lanza acted obsession	Sandy Hook slaughtered Adam lanza, and he was obsessed.	Sandy Hook slaughter Adam lanza acting obsessive.	Sandy hook massacre Adam lanza acted obsessive.
99	state attorney report undercut conspiracy theory	The Attorney General's report, it contradicts the conspiracy theory.	The Attorney General's report contradicts the conspiracy theory.	The conspiracy theory is contradicted by the Attorney General's report.
99	long awaited report newtown school shooting close case	Long-awaited Newtown School Report drawing close.	Long-awaited Newtown School report drawing close.	Report long awaited Newtown School drawing close.
99	conn judge listen newtown recording	The Justice listens to Newtown.	The justice of the peace listens to Newtown!	The justice of the peace, listen to Newtown.
99	update latest news sport business entertainment	Up-to-date news on d&apos sports entertainment.	Up-to-date news on sports entertainment from the business world.	Updating the latest news on d&apos sports entertainment.
99	police release timeline sandy hook school shooting	Police are releasing the timeline of the shooting at the Sandy hook School.	Police release the timeline of the shooting at the Sandy hook school.	Police released the timeline of the Sandy hook school shooting.
99	sandy hook killer video gaming obsession expect	It's time to get back to the gameplay, and it's time for the gameplay.	Sandy Hook's obsession with video games kills us, waits for us to get there.	Sandy Hook's video game obsession kills us, waits for us to get there.
99	long awaited report sandy hook school tragedy shooter acted	Long-awaited report, sandy hook school-shooter tragedy has acted.	Long-awaited report sandy hook school shooting tragedy has acted.	Long-awaited report sandy hook school tragedy of the shooter acted.
99	sandy hook report concludes shooter obsessed mass murder	According to Sandy Hook's report, the shooter was obsessed with mass murder.	Sandy Hook's report concludes the shooter was obsessed with the mass murderers.	Sandy Crochet's report concludes the shooter was obsessed with mass murder.
99	prosecutor conn gunman motive unknown	D.A. Conn is a man with an unknown motive.	Prosecutor Conn man with unknown motive.	Prosecutor Conn unknown gunman mobile unknown.
99	report sandy hook shooting investigation	Report on Initiation; Gunshot Investigation.	I'm sorry, sir, but I'm sorry, sir.	Report on the shooting investigation.
99	time sandy hook elementary school horror	Time Sandy Hook Elementary school horror.	Sandy Time Hook horror of l' elementary school.	Time Sandy Hook horror of l' elementary school.
99	newtown shooting report released today focus call	The Newtown Report was released today.	The Newtown report was released today.	Newtown report released today.
99	connecticut school shooting probe gunman motive unknown	Connecticut Gunnery Unknown mobile shooter unknown.	Connecticut Gunnery Unknown mobile sniper, unknown mobile sniper.	Connecticut Gunnery Unknown mobile shooter mobile probe unknown shooter.
99	sandy hook massacre report photo detail motive	Sandy Hook massacre photo detail detail report pattern.	Sandy Hook massacre report photo detail pattern.	Sandy hook massacre report photo detail pattern.
99	sandy hook elementary report fails determine motive shooting	The basic report, Sandy Hook, fails to determine the motive for the shooting.	The elementary Sandy Crochet report fails to determine the motive for the shooting.	Sandy Crochet's elementary report fails to determine the motive for the shooting.
100	bmw car sharing innovation	Carpooling innovation.	L' innovation in the field of carpooling.	L' innovation of car sharing.
100	bmw drive	Drive bmw.	BMW drive.	Uh, bmw drive.
100	bmw announced	It's just that BMW announced that it was going to do it.	BMW announced that it was going to do so.	BMW announced that' it will do so.
100	bmw rumor bmw plug brand family sized	Bmw bmw family plug-in rumor the size of the family brand.	Bmw rumor bmw family plug-in the size of the brand family.	Bmw rumor bmw plug family the size of the family brand.
100	bmw family car work report	Report on Family Car Work.	Family car work report.	Report on family car work.
100	bmw sold european lining	Bmw sells European lining.	Bmw has sold European lining.	Bmw has sold European lining products.
100	bmw electric fare crash test survey	Motor vehicle accident investigation; electrical.	It's a good idea to do this on your own, but not on your own.	Vehicle test survey; electric vehicle accident.
100	bmw video road test	Video from the road test.	Video bmw road test video.	Video road test bmw.
100	folk bmw sold	Sold by people bmw.	Sold by the bmw people.	And sold by the bmw people.
100	solar installer offer deal bmw electric buyer	L&apos, a solar installation company, offers a market place for the purchase of electricity.	L' Solar Installer offers a solar market; buyer of electrical power.	L' solar installer offers a market to buy bmw electricity.
100	bmw hybrid spec review release price	Bmw hybrid-spec price revision output.	Bmw hybrid spec price revision.	Bmw hybrid spec revision price output.
100	bmw super hybrid sell	Bmw, super-hybrid sell.	Bmw super hybrid selling.	Bmw super hybrid sell.
100	bmw good energy offer green power	It's a great place to live and work.	The right energy offers the green energy.	The right energy offers green energy.
100	breakin neck record bmw sell year	Breise-neck bmw bmw bmw year sales record.	Breise-neck record bmw sell year-round.	Breise-neck record bmw sell year-round bmw.
100	bmw rack early order bmw sell	Flat Advance Control Flat Sale.	B-flat B-flat Anticipatory Flat Sell command.	Flat Flat Flat Flat Flat Flat Flat Flat Flat.
100	bmw sold model allocated	Jjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjj	Bjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjj	Jjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjj
100	auto bmw longer fill er	Fill in the form below.	Auto bmw longer to fill it in.	Auto bmw longer fill it out.
100	bmw seal green electricity supply deal good	L'accès à l'accès à l'aéroport et à l'accès à l'aéroport.	L' green electricity supply of bmw seals good deal.	L' green electricity supply good deal seal.
100	bmw model coming family	Model bmw come model family.	Model bmw come model family.	Model bmw come bmw model family.
100	top low emission company car	Low-emission corporate car.	Corporate low-emission car.	Low emission corporate car.
100	bmw hybrid spec review	Hybrid.	Review of l' hybrid.	A review of l' hybrid.
100	bmw expand electric car lineup	We're expanding the range of electric cars.	Expand the range of electric cars.	Expand electric car range.
100	bmw ev sold	J&apos, they've been selling drugs.	J' sold the product.	J' sold drugs.
100	bmw sold	J&apos is the name of the company.	J&apos sold bimw.	J' sold bimw.
100	report bmw year production sold	Indicate the total quantity of the product sold.	Indicate the production of the year bmw sold.	Indicate production of year bmw sold.
100	luxury auto brand eco friendly spin	Luxury, eco-friendly car,-friendly.	Economy luxury car,-friendly.	The car is a luxury car.
100	bmw review	Bmw magazine.	Bmw.	Oh, bmw magazine.
100	report bmw stretched	Bmw ratio extended.	Bmw ratio stretched.	Report bmw stretched.
100	hear bmw joined	We said that BMW s&apos was joining us.	We said that BMW s&apos was joining us.	We said that BMW s' was joined to us.
100	bmw partner green energy organisation	The project is a partnership between the government, the private sector and the private sector.	Apos partner; organization of green energy.	Organizing green energy projects.
100	bmw sold year	Year after year.	Sold year after year.	Well, sold year after year.
100	booking bmw plug hybrid sold year	Reserve hybrid bmw year-old plug-in.	Reserve bmw hybrid plug sold year.	Reserve bmw plug hybrid sold year.
100	bmw sold model year	Bmw has now sold the model year.	Bmw sold the apos; model year.	The model year was sold by Bmw.
100	top production car auto	Top-of-the-line automobile production.	Top-of-the-range automobile production car, please.	Top-of-the-range automobile production car.
100	bmw sold year worth production	Bmw has sold a year of production that is worth the cost of production of the product.	Bmw sold a year of production worth producing.	Bmw sold one year worth of production worth producing.
100	bmw sold model year	Bmw has now sold the model year.	Bmw sold the apos; model year.	The model year was sold by Bmw.
101	vt emergency management warns looming storm	Emergency management will warn of an impending storm.	Emergency management warns of an impending storm.	The emergency management warns of an impending storm.
101	traveler cast wary eye storm move eastward	A thunderstorm in the eyes of the wary travelers moves towards the east.	The suspicious travellers' eye thunderstorm moves towards the east.	Eye-storms of wary travellers move to the east.
101	update winter storm lash eastern threatens thanksgiving travel	Update d&apos storm; whipping winter is threatened Thanksgiving travel.	Update storm d' winter fouet is threatened Thanksgiving travel.	Updating storm d' winter lash is Thanksgiving travel threat.
101	update deadly cross country storm threatens holiday travel	A deadly storm has been breaking out across the country that threatens the safety of vacation travel.	Updating deadly storm across the country threatens vacation travel.	Updating deadly storm across the country threatens holiday travel.
101	dallas area bracing sleet snow starting today	The area of the city of Dallas supports the melting of snow from the east to the west.	The Dallas area supports melted snow from now on.	Dallas area supports melted snow from now on.
101	trapped bad thanksgiving weather	Trapped by the bad Thanksgiving weather.	I was trapped by the bad weather at Thanksgiving.	Bad Thanksgiving weather trapped me.
101	winter storm lash eastern threatens thanksgiving travel	Winter storms in the east are threatening the journey of Apostles.	The winter storms of the east threaten the journeys of Apostles; Thanksgiving.	The winter storms of l'apos; est threatens the voyages of d'apos; Action de grace.
101	big storm threatens thanksgiving travel	Thanksgiving trip is threatened by a major thunderstorm.	A big storm is threatening our Thanksgiving trip.	A big storm threatens the Thanksgiving trip.
101	storm disrupt thanksgiving air travel	Thanksgiving flights are being disrupted by the storm.	The storm is disrupting Thanksgiving air travel.	The storm is disrupting air travel on Thanksgiving.
101	winter storm spread snow rain head east coast	The storm hit the eastern seaboard in the middle of the year.	The storm d' winter has spread snow to the east coast.	The storm d'apos; winter storm spread snow to the east coast.
101	tough travel forecast storm move vt	In addition, there is the possibility of an increase in the number of travellers.	The forecast is for a major travel storm.	The forecast of a strong storm of travel announces.
101	thanksgiving travel plan threat northeast deadly storm close	Thanksgiving Travel Plan Threatened Northern Death Storm-is now closed.	Thanksgiving trip threatening deadly north storm-is closed.	Thanksgiving travel plan threat deadly northern storm-is closed.
101	winter storm hit thanksgiving traveler	The Thanksgiving traveler was hit by the winter storm.	Well, the winter storm hit the Thanksgiving traveler.	The winter storm hit Thanksgiving traveler.
101	dangerous cross country storm threatens holiday travel	There's a very dangerous storm that's sweeping the country, threatening vacation travel.	A dangerous storm sweeping across the country is threatening our holiday travel.	A dangerous storm across the country threatens holiday travel.
101	winter weather blasting	Weather explosion; winter.	Explosion by weather; winter.	It's the first time you've ever seen a fire.
101	storm disrupt thanksgiving travel plan corridor	The storm is disrupting the Plan de Journey corridor.	The storm has been disrupting the travel plan's corridor.	The storm is disrupting the travel plan corridor.
101	winter storm boreas uninvited guest ruin thanksgiving	Spring storm ruined Thanksgiving.	The storm d' winter ruined Thanksgiving.	The winter storm ruined Thanksgiving.
101	update weather complicates thanksgiving travel	The update time makes it difficult for you to get around the world.	The time needed to update complicates the journey of thanksgiving.	Updating time complicates the travel process.
101	prepare depart holiday bad weather arrives	Preparing your vacation package for a rainy start is coming up.	It's time to prepare for a bad weather holiday.	Preparing the start holiday bad weather happens.
101	winter weather moving fw airport cancel departure sunday	It's a good time to get to the airport, but it's a good time.	Weather; winter moving to the airport; airport cancel departure on Sunday.	Weather; winter moving to airport; airport cancel departure Sunday.
101	thanksgiving travel weather forecast region	The Voyage Weather Forecast Region (TWMFZ) of Canada; Thanksgiving Day.	This is the first report on the state of the environment in Canada.	The weather forecast region of the voyages d'apos; Action de grâce.
101	time thanksgiving storm system head east	The Thanksgiving storm system's headed east.	The Thanksgiving storm system is heading east.	Thanksgiving storm system is heading east.
101	winter travel weather expected worse better	The time of winter's journeys was waiting for worse.	The weather of the voyages d'apos; winters were waiting for worse.	The winter travel times were soon looking up to worse.
101	storm poised disrupt holiday travel heavy rain	Rainstorm ready to disrupt the holiday.	Storm ready to disrupt the holiday rainy trip.	Storm poised to disrupt holiday travel through heavy rain.
101	surviving bad weather airport delay	The hotel is located in the heart of the city.	To survive the delay of the airport because of bad weather.	Surviving the delay of the airport due to bad weather conditions.
101	wintry blast hit west killed storm head east	This was the first time in the world that an explosion occurred in the winter.	L' winter explosion in the west killed the eastern storm.	L' winter explosion in l' west killed the storm in the east.
101	pre thanksgiving storm delay pa flight flood road	Dapos storm, before Thanksgiving delayed the road to Apos, flooded Dad's flight.	The storm d'apos; before Thanksgiving, Dad's flight to the airport was inundated.	The storm d'apos; before Thanksgiving delays the road to d'apos; flood of the flight of papa.
101	nasty storm expected hit east coast ahead thanksgiving	We're expecting a major storm on the East Coast on Thanksgiving.	A severe storm is expected on the East Coast at Thanksgiving.	A violent storm is expected on the east coast at Thanksgiving.
101	weather threatens snarl thanksgiving week travel	Time is now threatening the weekly journey of thanksgiving.	Time threatens the weekly trip of thanksgiving.	The weather threatens the weekly journey of thanksgiving.
101	thanksgiving storm timing worse threatens travel flight	Thanksgiving thunderstorm is an even bigger threat to air travel.	It's time for the Thanksgiving thunderstorm that threatens air travel even more.	Thanksgiving thunderstorm threatens air travel even more.
101	thanksgiving storm trudge eastward threatens holiday travel	The excitement of Thanksgiving holidays is a threat to vacation travel.	It's a great way to spend your holidays.	Thanksgiving agitation to the apostles is threatening holiday travel.
101	winter storm moving east bringing freezing rain sleet	Storm d' winter moving to the east, bringing ice pellets.	D&apos Storm; winter moving toward the apo; is, bringing freezing rain ice pellets.	Ice storm; winter moving towards the east, bringing freezing rain ice pellets.
101	storm boreas barrel east coast leaving wake cancelled flight	Storm boreas barrel from the east coast, leaving the wake to be canceled.	Storm boreas barrel of the east coast leaving wake canceled flight.	Storm boreas barrel east coast leaving wake canceled flight.
101	thanksgiving weather delay pile east coast traveler	The delay of Thanksgiving Day is piling up the East Coast traveler.	Thanksgiving's delay is piling up the East Coast traveler's time.	The Thanksgiving delay piles up the East Coast traveler.
101	black friday forecast cold temp hot sale	Black Friday foretells a hot, cold-temperature sale.	Black Friday predicts a hot sale at a cold temperature.	Black Friday predicts a hot sale at cold temperature.
101	bad weather arrives time thanksgiving travel	It's a pleasure to be here, and I'd like to thank you for your help.	The bad weather arrives at the time of the journey of apos; Thanksgiving.	The bad weather arrives at the time of the journey.
101	traveling thanksgiving dangerous winter weather	Travelling to Thanksgiving Day in bad weather; winter.	Travel to Thanksgiving in bad weather; winter.	Travelling to Thanksgiving in bad weather winter.
101	weather warmer temperature rain	Heaviest temperature, rainfall.	Higher temperature rainfall.	Higher temperature rain showers.
101	severe weather slow pre holiday traveler east	Slow Violent Weather Traveller pre-vacation from l' is.	Slow violent weather traveller pre-vacations from l&apos.	Slow violent weather traveler pre @--vacation from the airport; is.
101	storm threaten holiday travel moving east	It is located in the heart of the city, in the heart of the city.	Storms are a major threat to holiday travel to the east.	Storms threaten holiday travel to the east.
101	east coast winter storm snarl thanksgiving travel	D&apos trip; action of roar of storm d' winter of east coast.	D&apos travel; storm roaring action; east coast winter.	Voyage d' east coast winter storm roar action.
101	storm warning lifted wny cold snow shower persist	The storm warning has been lifted, and the cold snow is still raining.	Storm warning lifted wny rain cold snow persist.	Storm warning lifted wny cold snow rain persist.
101	wall storm threatens upend holiday travel	The ice storm's threatening Upstream vacation travel.	The ice storm is threatening vacation travel upriver.	The ice storm threatens vacation travel upriver.
101	winter storm head east threatens thanksgiving travel plan	The storm d'apos; winter is moving toward the Apostles, and is now threatening Thanksgiving's travel plan.	The storm d' winter is moving toward the apo; is and threatens Thanksgiving travel plan.	The storm d'apos; winter is moving toward apostasis; is and threatens the travel plan of Thanksgiving.
101	thanksgiving flier wait bad wednesday	The Thanksgiving pilot waits Wednesday for nothing.	The Thanksgiving pilot will wait until Wednesday for nothing.	The Thanksgiving pilot will wait Wednesday for nothing.
101	rain snow snarl holiday travel east coast	Rain, snow, holidays, trip to the east coast.	Rain, snow, snarl, vacation, east coast travel.	Rain, snow, snarl, vacation, east coast trip.
101	winter storm watch holiday travel	Winter watches over holidays.	D&apos Storm; winter will watch over holidays.	Tempest d' winter keeps watch on holiday trips.
101	slushy holiday travel east coast	East Coast icy vacation.	Well, it's an ice-cold vacation on the East Coast.	Ice-cold east coast vacation.
101	storm poised bring heavy rain east amid holiday rush	The storm is set to bring heavy rains to the city; it is in the middle of the rush of the holidays.	Storm ready to bring heavy rains to the apos; is in the middle of the holiday rush.	Storm poised to bring heavy rains to the Apos; is in the midst of the holiday rush.
101	update freezing weather spread storm head east coast	Storm freeze-time update extending east coast.	Freeze-time update from storm spreading east coast.	Update the east coast frozen time of the storm.
101	nasty winter storm snarl holiday traffic	The weather is bad; the weather is bad; the winter is grumbling of holiday traffic.	Bad storm d' winter grunting of holiday traffic.	Bad storm d' winter holiday grunting.
101	thanksgiving travel soggy weather snarling northeast airport	Voyage d' Action de graces mal temps à l' Airport du Nord (Northern Airport)-est.	Voyage d' Action de graces mal temps à l'apos; airport du Nord.	Action de graces bad weather at the airport of the north-est.
101	wintry storm delaying air travel move northeast	A winter storm, delaying air travel, moves north-east.	A winter storm delaying air travel is moving north-east.	Winter storm delaying air travel moves north-east.
101	arkansas blast wintry storm	Arkansas winter storm.	Canadian Wildlife Service, Victoria, British Columbia.	Winter storm in Arkansas.
101	storm disrupt travel	There is no risk of loss of confidence in the state of the environment.	There is no risk of any loss of confidence in the environment.	There is no risk of any loss of confidence in the quality of life of the environment.
101	storm collision course east coast travel hairy	D&apos collision course; hairy coastal storm.	Collision course d' storm on the east coast hairy travel.	D&apos collision course; storm on east coast hairy travel.
101	storm churn slowly east	Slow thunderstorm rolling towards the east.	The thunderstorm slowly rumbles toward the east.	The thunderstorm is slowly roaring towards the east side.
101	southwest storm lead flight cancellation ahead thanksgiving	L' cancellation of the South stormhead flight-west in preparation for Thanksgiving.	L' cancellation of south storm head flight-west in preparation for Thanksgiving.	L' cancellation of flight storm head south-west in preparation for Thanksgiving.
101	north texas winter weather advisory downgraded storm	The weather forecast for northern Texas has lowered the level of the storms.	The weather forecast for northern Texas has lowered storm levels.	Weather advisory from northern Texas winter lowered storm levels.
101	pumped east coast storm worst wednesday	Coast-pumped storm is Wednesday's worst.	Coast-pumped storm is the worst on Wednesday.	The worst storm on the coast is Wednesday.
101	winter storm warning greenbrier mercer summer tazewell county	Weather Storm Warning; Winter Greenbrier mercer county of tazewell d' Summer.	Warning of storm d' winter Greenbrier mercer county of tazewell d' summer.	Storm warning d' winter Greenbrier summer tazewell county d&apos.
101	nasty weather wallop thanksgiving	Thanksgiving was ruined by bad weather.	Well, bad weather ruined Thanksgiving.	Bad weather ruined thanksgiving.
101	winter storm kill threatens holiday travel	Winter storms are a major threat to vacation travel.	It's like a winter storm, it's a threat to your vacation.	The winter storms are threatening holiday travel.
101	deadly storm disrupts flight snarl holiday travel	Holiday flights are being disrupted by a deadly storm.	A deadly storm is disrupting air travel.	A deadly storm disrupts air travel.
101	killer winter storm sweep east	The east coast is sweeping with a deadly winter storm.	A deadly winter storm sweeps across the coast.	A deadly winter storm sweeps east.
101	thanksgiving travel threat east storm expected worsen	Thanksgiving's tourist threat, eastern storm, was waiting for the situation to worsen.	Thanksgiving's tourist threat, the storm of the East Coast, was expected to worsen.	The tourist threat of the eastern storm of Thanksgiving was expected to worsen the situation.
101	causing epic thanksgiving storm	Causing an unforgettable, epic Thanksgiving storm.	Causing one epic Thanksgiving storm.	Causing an epic thanksgiving storm.
101	large storm blamed death threatens thanksgiving travel	The huge storm blaming death is threatening the journeys of Apostles.	The huge storm that blames death and death threatens the journeys of Apostles.	Gigantic storm blaming death threatens the journey of people.
101	storm spell messy travel ahead thanksgiving	Disorderly trip to the mountains; approach of Thanksgiving.	I'm sorry, sir, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Disorderly travel to the Apostles; approaching Thanksgiving.
101	rain snow threaten snarl holiday travel	Rain and snow are a threat to snarl vacation travelers.	Rain and snow alike threaten snarl vacation travel.	Rain and snow threaten snarl holiday travel.
101	storm upending holiday travel	We've got a storm brewing on vacation travel.	Storm's breaking out on holiday travel.	There's a storm brewing on holiday travel.
101	snowstorm complicate pre thanksgiving travel	Snowstorms make it difficult for you to get around the world.	The snowstorms complicate the trip pre-Thanksgiving.	Snowstorms complicate the pre @-@Please action trip.
101	thanksgiving travel navigating storm delay video	Voyage d' Thanksgiving Action Navigating Video Delay Video Storm.	D&apos trip; Thanksgiving action navigating the storm video delay video.	Voyage d' Action of grace navigating storm video delay video.
101	thanksgiving travel storm slam southwest head east	South Thanksgiving storm-west, towards the apos; east.	Thanksgiving Storm south-west, east.	Thanksgiving storm south-west, towards the Apos; east.
101	web forecast snow today	I'm glad you're here to help me.	Plan the snow on the web now.	Plan snow on the web today.
101	thanksgiving weather appetizing year video	Appetizing Thanksgiving Video Weather from the Year.	Appetizing Thanksgiving video weather from the year.	Thanksgiving weather appetizing video from the year.
101	wall storm threatens holiday travel	Holiday travel is threatened by the wall storm.	The wall storm is a threat to vacation travel.	Wall storm threatens holiday travel.
101	man winter knocking hard thanksgiving	It's a good day for Thanksgiving.	Winter hits hard at Thanksgiving.	L' winter hits hard on Thanksgiving.
101	traveler eye storm	Traveller's eye.	Temperature of the body; eye of the traveler.	Apos temperature; eye of the traveler.
101	traveler city storm move area	Emergency response; emergency response; emergency response.	It's an emergency plan; an emergency response; an emergency response; an emergency response.	It is also important to note that there is a need for more information on this issue.
101	round east coast storm battering england snow backside	A storm on the eastern seaboard hits the bottom of the icebergs.	An east coast storm hits the apos; the rear end of the English snow.	An east coast storm hits England's snowfall.
101	thanksgiving travel snarled storm lash eastern	The Thanksgiving trip caused storms in the east.	The Thanksgiving trip had caused storms in the east.	It's just that the Thanksgiving trip brought a lot of stormy weather to the city.
101	thanksgiving storm move east snarl holiday travel	The storm of Thanksgiving is moving towards the Apos; it is during the holidays snarl.	The Thanksgiving storm is moving toward the apos; is during the snarl vacation.	The Thanksgiving storm moves to the apos during the holiday snarl.
101	winter storm threatens snarl thanksgiving travel	It is the first time in the world that the world has seen such a dramatic change.	The storm d'apos; winter threatens journeys of roaring.	The winter storm threatens the journeys of whirlwinds.
101	busy day travel ahead thanksgiving	It's a great place to spend your holidays.	It's a very busy day at the airport, and Thanksgiving is coming up.	D&apos trip; busy day at the airport; approaching Thanksgiving.
101	deadly winter storm head east affect thanksgiving	A winter deadly storm heading towards the Apos; is affecting Thanksgiving.	A deadly winter storm en route to the Apos, is affecting Thanksgiving.	A deadly winter storm is affecting Thanksgiving.
101	winter storm expected wallop york thanksgiving	The storm d' winters were waiting for the storm to hit York on Thanksgiving.	The storm d' winter s' waited for the storm to hit York at Thanksgiving.	The winter storm was waiting for the storm to hit York at Thanksgiving.
101	thanksgiving travel storm causing flight delay cancellation	The cancelling of the flight was caused by the Thanksgiving storm.	The Thanksgiving storm caused the flight to be cancelled.	Thanksgiving storm caused the flight to be canceled.
101	thanksgiving travel winter storm photo	Photo of Thanksgiving Winter Storm.	Photo taken from the winter storm at Thanksgiving.	Photo from winter storm Thanksgiving.
101	nasty winter storm snarl holiday traffic east	Nasty d&apos storm; traffic holiday snarl winter of the east.	It's a bad storm; winter snarl of holiday traffic from l'apos.	Nasty storm d'apos; snarl holiday winter traffic of l'apos; east.
101	winter storm threatens holiday travel plan	The winter storm's threatening the vacation plan.	This winter storm threatens our vacation plan.	Winter storm threatens holiday travel plan.
101	rain sleet forecast winter warning canceled	It's the first time I've had a chance to do this.	Freezing rain forecast for cancelled winter.	Freezing rain forecast for apo; winter cancelled.
101	thanksgiving travel parade plan fall victim storm	It's been a long time since we've had any success.	Thanksgiving Parade Plan, victim of a storm.	Thanksgiving parade plan, victim of a storm.
101	texas hit freezing rain sleet	Texas experienced freezing rain.	Texas had a freezing freezing rain.	There was freezing freezing rain in Texas.
101	busiest travel day year pretty bad pre thanksgiving storm	It was the busiest day of the year before the hurricane at Thanksgiving.	The busiest travel day of the year before the Thanksgiving holiday was pretty bad.	The year's busiest travel day was pretty bad before the Thanksgiving hurricane.
101	nw update winter storm warning snow continues fall steady pace	Ice Updating; Winter Storm Warning Snow is still falling at a steady rate.	Updating the Weather; Winter Storm Warning The rate of snow continues to be steady.	It's a winter storm warning The snow continues to fall at a steady rate.
101	soggy day prior philly thanksgiving icy mess poconos north	On the eve of Thanksgiving Day in Philadelphia, the poconos were frozen in the north.	The night before Thanksgiving in Philadelphia, the poconos were frozen to the north.	The day before Thanksgiving in Philadelphia, the poconos were frozen up north.
101	storm drop rain snow region	A stormy rainy region, snowy.	Wind becoming southwest 20 km/h late in the day.	Stormy rainy region snowy.
101	storm hit east coast threatening holiday travel plan	There's been a storm hitting the eastern seaboard threatening the vacation plan.	A storm has hit the east coast threatening the vacation plan.	A storm hit the east coast threatening vacation plans.
101	thanksgiving travel	Thanksgiving trip.	Voyage d' Thanksgiving.	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
101	update winter storm threatens snarl thanksgiving travel	This is the first time in the history of Canada that there have been a series of hurricanes in recent years.	Latest News Winter storm threatens travel and thanksgiving.	Latest News The winter storm threatens Thanksgiving travel.
101	wintry mess forecast east big travel day	Winter Mess Forecast for the Great Day of Travel to the East.	Winter Mess Forecast for the great day of travel to the east.	Winter mess forecast for the big day of travel to the east.
101	weather advisory posted storm roll pa	The weather forecast was prepared by the Meteorological Service of Canada.	Weather advisory posted a report of a storm.	The weather advisory posted a thunderstorm report.
101	deadly storm trudge east threatens holiday travel	Holiday travel is threatened by a deadly storm.	A deadly storm in the mountains threatens vacation travel.	A deadly storm in Apos threatens holiday travelers.
101	man winter knocking thanksgiving	Man of the ages; winter striking at Thanksgiving.	L' man of l' winter striking at Thanksgiving.	L' man of l' winter striking at Thanksgiving.
101	deadly storm system move east threatens holiday travel	A deadly storm system, moving towards the coast, is a threat to the safety of vacation travelers.	Holiday travel is threatened by a deadly storm system moving towards the Apos.	A deadly storm system is threatening vacation travel.
101	update weather complicates thanksgiving travel	The update time makes it difficult for you to get around the world.	The time needed to update complicates the journey of thanksgiving.	Updating time complicates the travel process.
101	freezing weather spread storm head east coast	Frigid weather blew the storm eastward.	The storm spread to the east coast from the frigid weather.	The freezing weather spread the storm to the east coast.
101	storm poised disrupt holiday travel rain east	It is the capital of the province of Quebec and is the capital of the province.	An impending storm disrupts the rain from the holidays to the east.	An impending storm disrupts the holiday rain in the east.
101	wintry storm threatens thanksgiving travel	Thanksgiving is threatened by a winter storm.	A winter storm threatens the journey of many people.	Winter storm threatens traveller's journey.
101	thanksgiving travel delay winter storm barrel nj	It's the only way we're going to be able to get there in time.	The journey of Thanksgiving is delaying the winter storm barrel nj.	Thanksgiving trip delays winter storm barrel nd.
101	tornado north carolina caused winter storm boreas people injured	The North Carolina Tornado caused a storm that caused the loss of the lives of many people.	The North Carolina tornado caused a storm that caused the winter injured people.	The North Carolina tornado caused the storm; winter boreas people injured.
101	thanksgiving tempest east coast brace wet week	Well, the Thanksgiving storm on the east coast is preparing for a wet week.	Thanksgiving storm on the east coast prepares for a wet week.	Thanksgiving storm on the east coast prepares wet week.
101	storm roll east threatening thanksgiving travel	Tour d' thunderstorm to the apos; is, thunderstorm to Thanksgiving.	Tour d' thunderstorm to apos; is, threatening Thanksgiving.	Tour d'apos; storm heading east, threatening Thanksgiving.
101	weather cold overnight sunny temp	Sunny, cold temperature overnight.	Cold and sunny temperature overnight.	Cold and sunny overnight temperature.
101	wintry mess flight canceled	The winter mess has been canceled.	Well, the winter mess flight has been canceled.	The winter mess flight was cancelled.
101	winter storm lash east coast threatens holiday travel	It is also a popular tourist destination in the United States.	Winter storms are threatening holiday travel on the East Coast.	Winter storms threaten holiday travel to the East Coast.
101	winter storm east slam holiday traveler	D&apos Storm; Winter of L' Holiday Slum Traveller.	Tempest d' winter of the mountains; Holiday slam d&apos.	D&apos storm; winter weather; holiday slam.
101	texan spared worst travel mess	The biggest waste of a trip was saved in Texas.	Texas has saved the worst waste of travel.	Texas spared the worst travel waste.
101	wintry storm delaying air travel move northeast	A winter storm, delaying air travel, moves north-east.	A winter storm delaying air travel is moving north-east.	Winter storm delaying air travel moves north-east.
101	charleston official tepid brewing storm threatens	Official Charleston is threatening a lukewarm blizzard of brewing.	Official Charleston's threatening a lukewarm brewing storm.	Official Charleston is threatening apos, a tepid brewing storm.
101	bolaris storm bring thanksgiving travel nightmare	The thunderstorm of Bolaris brings Thanksgiving into a travel nightmare.	L'apos; storm of Bolaris brings Thanksgiving into a nightmare of travel.	The Bolaris thunderstorm brings Thanksgiving into a travel nightmare of its own.
101	winter weather create thanksgiving travel problem	It's a pleasure to be here, but it's a pleasure to be here.	Winter weather creates problems for Thanksgiving travel.	The winter weather creates problems for travel thanksgiving.
101	worst east coast storm expected nh	Forecast is the worst storm on the coast.	Worst storm on the coast is predicted nh.	The worst storm on the coast is predicted.
101	thanksgiving storm news update nasty weather hit east coast	The Thanksgiving weather report hit the East Coast.	The Thanksgiving bad weather newsletter hit the east coast.	The news of Thanksgiving bad weather hit the east coast.
101	winter storm tough holiday traveler	D&apos Storm; harsh winter vacation traveler.	Storm d' hard winter holiday traveler.	D&apos storm; hard holiday traveler winter.
101	storm blamed fatality	The inevitable was a thunderstorm.	A thunderstorm blamed it.	A storm blamed fate.
101	storm southern affect iowa travel	Trips to Iowa are affected by the South Storm.	The storm in the south is affecting travel to Iowa.	The southern storm affected travel to Iowa.
101	lax gear thanksgiving traveler	Voyageur d' Action de grâces à l' equipment laxis.	It's a great place to spend time with friends and family.	Traveller; Thanksgiving action; lax equipment.
101	killer winter storm snarl holiday travel	It's a great place to relax and enjoy your holidays.	Storm murderous d' winter snarl travel vacation.	Killer storm of the Apostles; winter snarl holiday travel.
101	storm threatens travel wind endangers macy parade	A thunderstorm threatens the journey, and the wind is now threatening the Macy parade.	The storm threatens travel, and the wind threatens the Macy parade.	The storm threatens travel, the wind threatens the parade Macy.
101	thanksgiving weather delay pile traveler cross finger	Thanksgiving time keeps the traveler's fingers crossed.	The traveler is keeping his fingers crossed because of Thanksgiving weather.	The traveler keeps his fingers crossed because of Thanksgiving.
101	storm big trouble thanksgiving traveler	Big storm problem Thanksgiving Traveller Thanksgiving.	Big storm problem Thanksgiving traveler Thanksgiving.	Big storm trouble Thanksgiving traveler Thanksgiving.
101	deadly western storm extends texas east coast sight week	A deadly storm in the west prolongs the East Texas Coast Visibility Week.	A deadly storm in the West Texas coast extends the east coast visibility week.	A deadly west coast storm extends the visibility week of the east coast of Texas.
101	freezing rain sleet hit texas storm move east ahead	Freezing rain has hit Texas, the storm s' is being moved to the east.	The freezing rain has hit Texas, the storm has s' it is now moving east.	The freezing rain hit Texas, the storm s' moved east.
101	storm threatens holiday travel east	Holiday travel to the east is threatened by the storm.	The storm threatens the holidays to the east.	The storm threatens holiday travel to the east.
101	man winter knocking	Winter knocks at the door.	L' man d' winter knocks at the door.	L' man d' winter knocks.
101	storm threatens thanksgiving travel	The storm's threatening Thanksgiving travel, folks.	Storm threatens Thanksgiving travel.	The storm threatens Thanksgiving travel.
101	high wind rain causing pre thanksgiving travel delay	It's the first time I've had a chance to see you, and it's the first time I've ever seen you.	A strong rain of wind delays the journey before l' Action of grace.	Heavy wind rain delays the journey before it takes place; Thanksgiving.
101	storm upending holiday travel east coast	Holidays on the East Coast are stormy.	We've got a storm brewing on the east coast vacation.	A storm rages on the east coast holidays.
101	storm upset travel macy wait parade call	Disturbed Storm Macy Travel calling to the D'apos Parade; waiting.	Troubled storm Macy's journey calling to the parade d'apos; waiting.	Stunned storm macy trip calling to parade d'apos; wait.
101	die weekend weather texas accident	And last weekend, Texas had a meteorological accident.	Last weekend, Texas had a weather accident.	Last weekend Texas had a weather accident.
101	weather ering thanksgiving travel plan question day	Weathering Thanksgiving, Trip Plan Question Day.	Thanksgiving weather, day of travel questions.	Weathering Thanksgiving, day of travel plan questions.
101	wintry storm delaying air travel moving northeast hard rain	Winter storm delaying northbound flights-heavy rain.	Rainy winter storm delaying air travel north-is heavy rain.	Winter storm delaying air travel north-is heavy rain.
101	storm poised disrupt holiday travel eastern	Travel during holidays in the east is being disrupted by an impending storm.	An impending storm disrupts travel during holidays in the east.	An impending storm disrupts holiday travel to the east.
101	gobblegeddon boreas thanksgiving winter storm divide social medium	The storm's gobleeddon boreas Thanksgiving storm d'apos; winter divides the social medium.	The gobleleddon boreas Thanksgiving storm d'apos; winter divide the social medium.	Gobbleddon boreas Thanksgiving storm d'apos winter divide social medium.
101	storm warning airline safe fly bad weather	Storm Warning airline flight safely bad weather.	Storm warning airline flying weather safe.	Airline storm warning safe flight bad weather.
102	participant list syria talk undecided brahimi	List of participants Syria speak indecis brahimi brahimi brahimi undecis.	List of participants Syria talk indecis brahimi brahimi undecis.	Participant List Syria talk undecided brahimi brahimi.
102	plan syria peace summit january ban urge concession	Plan Syria Peace Summit January de l'apos; prohibition pending concession.	Plan Syria Peace Summit January de l'apos; prohibition pending concession.	Plan Syria Peace Summit January de l'apos; pending concession ban.
102	geneva talk set question remain	The whole Geneva speech remains open to question.	The whole question of the Geneva speech was also raised.	The question remains of the Geneva speech as a whole.
102	news analysis iran nuclear deal positive impact syrian crisis	Analysis of the facts; current nuclear Iran agreement positive impact Syrian crisis positive impact.	Analysis of the current nuclear Iran agreement positive impact Syrian crisis positive impact.	Analysis of Iran's nuclear news deal positive impact Syrian crisis positive impact.
102	update syria peace talk set jan geneva	Update of the Syria Peace Conference on Jan Geneva.	Update of the Syria peace conference on Jan Geneva.	Syria peace conference update on Jan Geneva.
102	syrian regime opposition group start peace talk january	In January, the group began peace talks with the government of the Syrian regime.	The anti-Syrian regime group begins the peace talks in January.	The anti-Syrian regime group begins January peace talks.
102	syrian war ended analysis	Analysis by the Syrian War.	The war in Syria ended the apogee; analysis.	Syria's war ended the apogee; analysis.
102	syria peace conference set january	The Syria Peace Conference was held in January.	In January, the Syria peace conference took place.	Syria's peace conference took place in January.
102	talk doubt rebel pull	Talk about doubting the attractiveness of the rebels.	Talk about doubting the rebels' attractiveness.	To speak of doubt of the apos; attraction of the rebels.
102	syria talk aim build momentum iran deal	China's views on the future of Iran.	The views of China on the future of the world; Iran.	It's about the future of the world; it's about the future.
102	syria vow resist power transfer geneva peace talk	Syria vows to resist the transfer of power to the city of Geneva to speak of peace.	Syria swear to resist the transfer of Geneva's power to talk peace.	Syria swear to resist the transfer of power Geneva talk peace.
102	syrian government opposition hold peace talk	The Syrian government's opposition doesn't want them to be alone; it's about peace.	The opposition of the Syrian government does not want that to happen; we talk about peace.	The Syrian government's opposition government does not want to talk about peace.
102	syrian rebel group skeptical talk	Skeptical speech by the Syrian Rebel Group.	Skeptical speech from Syrian rebel group.	This is a skeptical speech by the rebel group from Syria.
102	syria peace talk start january	Peace talks are starting in January.	The peace talks will begin in January.	The peace talks start in January.
102	syria opposition full possession arab league seat	Syria full opposition seat of the Arab League.	Syria opposition full possession of Arab League headquarters.	Syria opposition full possession seat Arab League.
102	lavrov kerry week syria meeting geneva	Lavrov Kerry Week Syria Meeting Geneva.	Lavrov Kerry week Syria meeting Geneva.	Lavrov Kerry week Syria meeting Geneva.
102	syria government confirms geneva peace talk attendance	Syria government confirmed Geneva's presence.	The government of Syria has confirmed Geneva's presence.	Syria's government confirms Geneva's presence.
102	syria opposition final decision peace talk	This was the first time in the history of the United States that the United States had taken such a step.	Final decision of the Syrian opposition Talk about peace.	It's the final decision of the Syrian opposition Talk about peace.
102	syria hail historic iran nuclear accord	Syria welcomes the historic agreement on the use of nuclear power in Iran.	Syria welcomes the historic agreement on Iran's nuclear power.	Syria welcomes Iran's historic nuclear agreement.
102	iran ready join syria peace talk	Iran is prepared to join the peace talks in the Syrian Arab Republic.	Iran is ready to join the peace talks in Syria.	L' Iran is ready to join Syrian peace talks.
102	syria peace talk face major obstacle analyst	Peace Syria talk in the face of a major gap analysis analyst.	The peace Syria talk in the face of a major obstacle analyst analyst of l'apos; obstacle.	Syria talk peace in the face of a major obstacle analyst of l'apos; obstacle.
102	syria peace envoy hold talk iran	L' sent for peace from Syria speak of Iran.	L' sent for peace in Syria.. ..to talk about Iran.	L' Syrian peace envoy speak of Iran.
102	analyst pessimistic syria peace conference	He is also a member of the International Committee of the Red Cross.	Syrian peace conference pessimistic about the apostles; analyst.	Syrian peace conference analyst pessimistic.
102	syrian leader rival plan talk	The Syrians' plan is a rival plan, and it's a rival plan.	The rival plan of the Syrian leader speaks of dapos; a rival plan.	Syrian leader's rival plan speaks of a rival plan.
102	syria peace talk jan	Peace in Syria Jan talks about peace.	Peace in Syria Jan talks about peace.	The peace in Syria Jan speaks of the peace.
102	update syria peace talk set jan geneva	Update of the Syria Peace Conference on Jan Geneva.	Update of the Syria peace conference on Jan Geneva.	Syria peace conference update on Jan Geneva.
102	syrian peace talk set start january	The Syrian peace talks will begin in January of this year.	Syrian peace talks will commence in January.	Syrian peace talks will start in January.
102	syria conflict geneva peace talk best chance	Syria conflict Geneva-Peace talk better luck.	Syria conflict Geneva peace talk better chance.	Syria conflict Geneva peace talk best chance.
102	geneva ii syria peace talk set january	The Geneva II Syria Peace Talk took place in January.	Geneva II Syria Peace Talk took place in January.	The Geneva II Syria Peace Talk took place in January.
102	syria peace talk place jan	Syria's peace talks are being held in January.	The Syrian peace talks take place in January.	Syria's peace talks take place in January.
102	syria opposition conditional peace talk	This was the first time that the Syrian government had made a peace offering.	Conditional peace speech from Syrian opposition.	Syrian opposition conditional peace speech.
102	iranian fm tehran join syrian peace talk asked	L' Iranian Fm Tehran has joined the Syrian peace conference.	L' Iranien fm Tehran joins the requested Syrian peace conference.	L' Iranian fm Tehran joins the Syrian peace conference.
102	syria gov attend peace talk assad cede power	The government of Syria is committed.	The government of Syria s' is committed.	The government of the Syrian Arab Republic is committed to the project.
102	syria peace conference set january	The Syria Peace Conference was held in January.	In January, the Syria peace conference took place.	Syria's peace conference took place in January.
102	iran fm tehran ready join syria peace talk geneva invited	Iran fm Tehran will join Syria Peace Talk Geneva guest.	Iran fm Tehran ready to join Syria Peace Talk Geneva guest.	Iran fm Tehran ready to join invited Syria Peace Talk Geneva.
102	kerry syria conference best opportunity resolve conflict	The best opportunity to resolve conflicts is the Kerry Syria conference.	The Kerry Syria conference is the best opportunity to resolve the conflicts.	Kerry Syria conference is the best opportunity to resolve conflicts.
102	russia agreement invite iran syria talk ifax	L' Agreement with Russia invites Iran to speak Syria ifax.	An agreement with Russia invites Iran to speak Syria ifax.	L' agreement with Russia invites Iran to speak ifax syria.
102	syria power peace talk	Syria Peace Talk Power.	Syria Power Peace talk.	Syria power peace talk.
102	syrian opposition government meet peace talk january	The Syrian government is meeting with the peace talks in January.	The government of the Syrian opposition meets the peace talks in January.	Syrian opposition government meets peace talks in January.
102	syrian govt hand power geneva	Geneva is the city of the Syrian government's power.	Geneva from the power of the Syrian government.	Geneva power of the Syrian government.
102	set january syria peace talk	January Concertation on Peace in Syria.	January discussion on peace in Syria.	January talk about peace in Syria.
102	syria peace talk fsa rebel	Syria Peace Talk Fsa is a rebel.	Syria Peace Talk fsa Rebel.	Syria Peace Talk fsa rebel.
102	syrian government attend peace talk	The Syrian government is in attendance at the peace talks.	The Syrian government is attending the peace talks.	Syrian government attends peace talks.
102	russia throw weight syria talk	The burden of Syria is being weighed down by Russia.	Russia's shifting Syria's weight.	Russia throws the weight of Syria.
102	syria exudes confidence ahead geneva peace talk	Syria inspires a great deal of confidence in the face of the Geneva Peace Talk.	Syria inspires great confidence in Geneva Peace Talk.	Syria inspires confidence in Geneva Peace Talk.
102	syria peace talk harder sell iran negotiation video	Peace in Syria speak louder sell video of negotiations on l' Iran.	Syria's peace talks speak louder sell video of negotiations on Iran.	Syrian peace speak louder sell video of negotiations on Iran.
102	syria conflict assad government rebel meet geneva talk january	Syria Assad conflict rebel government meet with Geneva to talk to them.	Syria Assad government rebel government clash with Geneva speak January.	Syria conflict assad government rebel meet Geneva talk January.
102	free syrian army ha fighting geneva talk	The Free Syrian Army fought against Geneva.	The Free Syrian Army fought against Geneva.	It was the first time that a free Syrian army fought against Geneva.
102	syrian government opposition meet geneva	The government of the Syrian Arab Republic meets with the government of Geneva.	L' opposition of the Syrian government meets Geneva.	L' Syrian government opposition meets Geneva.
102	syria peace talk set january	The Syria Peace Conference was held in January.	In January, the Syria peace conference took place.	Syria's peace conference took place in January.
102	syria peace deal hope rising warring side schedule geneva talk january	L' Syria Peace Accord, l' Emerging Hope, Side Conflicts, Geneva Speech, January.	L' Syria peace agreement, the hope is born, the conflicts side-by-side, Geneva speech, January.	L' Syrian peace agreement, hope born, side conflicts, speech of Geneva, January.
102	syria attend geneva talk hand power	Syria is in Geneva today to witness the power of the hand.	Syria is witnessing in Geneva talk of power of the hand.	Syria attends Geneva talk power of the hand.
102	syria transition unclear invite iran peace talk	It is not clear what the future holds for Canada.	The transition to Syria is not yet clear.	The transition to Syria is not clear.
102	ban announces round syria peace talk set jan geneva	L' banning announced a peace conference in Syria with Jan Geneva.	L' banned announces a peace conference in Syria with Jan Geneva.	L' ban announces peace conference in Syria with Jan Geneva.
102	syrian opposition role assad future syria call aid convoy	In the meantime, the Syrian government had decided to send a group of soldiers to Syria to help them escape.	The role of the Syrian opposition and future Syria called the convoy of Apos; helped the convoy of Apos; help.	Syrian opposition role and future Syria call convoy from Apos; help convoy from Apos; help.
102	syria mediator brahimi holding talk iran russia	Mediator Brahimi of Syria is holding a conference on Iranian Russia.	Syria's brahimi Mediator is holding a conference on Iranian Russia.	The mediator from Syria brahimi is holding a conference on Iranian Russia.
102	syrian rebel skeptical geneva talk	Syrienne rebellious, skeptical, Geneva speak.	Syrian rebel skeptical Geneva speak out.	Syrian rebel skeptical Geneva speak.
102	syria participate geneva ii conference fm	Syria participate in the conference.	Syria to participate geneva ii conference fm fm fm.	Syria participate geneva ii conference fm fm.
102	syria fsa commander group attend peace talk	The Syrian Fsa Commanders Group is attending the peace talks.	The Syrian Fsa commanders' group attends peace talks.	The Syria fsa commanders' group attends the peace talks.
102	syrian government opposition agree sit january	The Syrian government's opposition is delayed; agreement for s' seated in January.	The opposition of the Syrian government was postponed; agreement for s' seated in January.	Syrian government's opposition is delayed; agreement to sit down in January.
102	syrian coalition undecided peace meeting	Syrian Coalition, peace meeting, undecided.	Syrian Coalition, meeting of undecided peace.	Syrian Coalition, peace meeting undecided.
102	syria peace talk place jan	Syria's peace talks are being held in January.	The Syrian peace talks take place in January.	Syria's peace talks take place in January.
102	syrian government opposition hold peace talk jan	The Syrian government's opposition talks about the need for peace.	L' Syrian government opposition speaks of peace Jan.	L' Syrian government opposition talks peace Jan.
102	syria peace talk place january	The Dialogue for Peace in Syria takes place in January.	Dialogue for peace in Syria takes place in January.	Syrian peace dialogue takes place in January.
102	iran pact help syria	Iran's pact with Iran is helping Syria.	The Iranian pact helps Syria.	Iran's pact helps Syria!
102	iran ready attend conference syria precondition	L' Iran is now ready to attend the Syria conference.	L' Iran is ready to attend the Syria conference precondition Syria.	Iran is ready to attend Syria conference precondition Syria.
102	chief syria peace conference set january	In January, the Chief Syrian Peace Conference took place.	The peace conference for Syria-in-chief took place in January.	Syria's chief peace conference was held in January.
102	syrian rebel shun geneva peace talk	The Geneva peace talks are being avoided by the Syrian rebels.	Syrian rebels are avoiding the Geneva peace talks.	Syrian rebels avoid Geneva peace talks.
102	free syrian army ceasefire geneva peace talk	Cease-@-@-@-@ @fire de l' Free Syrian Army, Geneva Peace Talk.	Cease-@-@-l&apos fire; Free Syrian army, Geneva Peace Talk.	Cease-@-@fire de l' Free Syrian army Geneva Peace Talk.
102	chief convene geneva ii syria jan	Jan Jan summons Geneva II Syria.	The Chief summons Geneva II Syria Jan.	The chief summons Geneva II Syria Jan.
102	syria peace talk set january geneva	In January 2009, the Syria Peace Conference took place.	The peace conference in Syria took place in January 2009.	Syria's peace conference took place in January 2009.
102	syria conflict geneva peace talk set january	The Geneva Peace Conference on the Syrian Conflict was held in January.	The Geneva peace conference on the conflict in Syria took place in January.	The Geneva peace conference on Syria conflict took place in January.
102	convenes syria peace conference	Convene a Peace Conference in Syria.	I want you to call a peace conference in Syria.	Convene a peace conference in Syria.
102	top syria envoy meet russian diplomat explore syria	An emissary from the Syrian Arab Republic meets with a Russian diplomat to explore the country.	An envoy from Syria meets with a Russian diplomat to explore Syria.	Syrian envoy meets Russian diplomat to explore Syria.
102	syria regime opponent dig ahead talk	L'apos, an adversary of Syria's regime, is fast-tracking.	L'apos, the opponent of the Syrian regime, is making great strides.	L'apos; opponent of Syria's regime makes great strides.
102	syrian peace talk announced doubt remain	The Syrian word of peace that has been announced, and the doubts that remain, remain.	The Syrian word of peace announced, and the doubt remains.	Syrian word of peace announced, doubt remains.
102	geneva peace conference syria january	Geneva Syria Peace Conference January.	Geneva peace conference Syria January.	Geneva peace conference Syria January.
102	assad regime vow surrender power	The Assad takes a vow of surrender.	The Assad regime has taken a vow of surrender.	Assad regime takes vow of surrender.
102	syria participate geneva ii conference	The Syria participates in the conference on the geneva ii.	The Syria language participates in the geneva ii conference.	Syria participates in the geneva ii conference.
102	russia vow ensure success geneva ii	Russia Wishes to Ensure Genetic Success ii.	Russia wants success geneva ii.	Russia wishes to ensure success geneva ii.
102	syria regime attend geneva talk discus power	The regime of the Syria is witnessing the discussion about the power of discus in Geneva.	Syria's regime is witnessing the discussion about the discus power of Geneva.	The syria regime is discussing the discus power of Geneva.
102	assad regime commits sending delegation syrian peace talk geneva	The Assad regime s' pledges to send the Syrian delegation to discuss peace in Geneva.	Assad regime s' urges Syrian delegation to talk about Geneva peace.	The regime Assad s' commits to sending the Syrian delegation to talk about Geneva peace.
102	convene syria peace talk jan	Bringing Syria together to discuss peace talks Jan Jan.	Summon Syria to talk about peace Jan Jan.	Summon Syria to talk about peace Jan.
102	update free syrian army ceasefire geneva peace talk	Updating of the map; Syrian Free Army of the ceasefire-the @-@fire Geneva peace talks.	Apos update; Syrian Free Army ceasefire-@-@fire Geneva peace talks.	Update of the Syrian Army's free ceasefire-the @-@fire Geneva peace talks.
102	syrian people leadership military solution violence	Syrian leaders violent military solution.	Syrian leaders military solution violence.	Syrians leaders military solution to the problem.
102	syria government iran nuclear deal	The Syrian government has concluded a nuclear-weapons agreement with Iran.	The Syrian government has a nuclear deal with the Apos; Iran.	The Syrian government has a nuclear deal with Iran.
102	syria announced set geneva conference	Syria has announced the Set Geneva conference.	Syria announced the Set Geneva conference.	Syria announced the conference Set Geneva.
102	syrian president assad skip geneva conference	Assad Skip Geneva Conference, President of Syria.	The Syrian President Assad Skip Geneva Conference.	Syrian president Assad Skip Geneva Conference.
102	peace conference quell combat syria	Peace Conference quell fighting Syria syria.	This is a peace conference where you fight against the Syria Syria.	Peace conference quell fights syria syria.
102	announces january syria conference geneva	"Announces the ""Syria conference"" in January, Geneva."	Announces the Syria conference in January Geneva.	Announces Syria conference in January Geneva.
102	update iran ready join syria peace talk invited zarif	Latest news Iran about to join the peace conference in Syria invited Zarif Zarif guest.	Latest News Iran is ready to join Syria's invited Zarif Zarif guest peace conference.	Latest news Iran ready to join Syria peace conference invited zarif guest zarif invited.
102	syria peace conference january envoy	January Syrian Peace Conference Special Envoy in January.	Syrian Peace Conference January, Special Envoy in January.	Syrian peace conference January Special envoy in January.
102	syria peace talk place jan	Syria's peace talks are being held in January.	The Syrian peace talks take place in January.	Syria's peace talks take place in January.
102	assad build trust snc attend syria peace talk	Assad build confidence to assist Syria peace talks snc.	Assad build confidence snc attend Syria peace talks.	Assad build confidence snc attend Syria peace talks.
102	iran nuclear accord set positive influence syrian peace talk	The Iranian nuclear deal has also had a positive influence on the Syrian peace talks.	L' Iranian nuclear agreement had a positive influence on the Syrian peace talks.	Iran's nuclear deal had a positive influence on Syria's peace talks.
102	iran nuclear deal pave syria compromise fast video	Iran Nuclear Agreement pav Syria compromise video fast.	Iran Nuclear deal pav Syria compromise video fast video.	Iran nuclear deal pav Syria compromise video fast.
102	syria peace conference set january	The Syria Peace Conference was held in January.	In January, the Syria peace conference took place.	Syria's peace conference took place in January.
102	syria peace talk set january	The Syria Peace Conference was held in January.	In January, the Syria peace conference took place.	Syria's peace conference took place in January.
102	long delayed syrian peace talk set january	Peace talks with Syria were held in January.	The peace talks with the Syrian Arab Republic took place in January.	The Syrian-Syrian peace talks were held in January.
102	syrian government surrender power geneva talk	The government of the Syrian Arab Republic is abandoning the government of Geneva.	The Syrian government gives up power Geneva speaks.	Syrian government surrenders power Geneva speaks.
102	syria peace talk step war	L' Syrian Peace Agreement has been signed.	The Syrian peace agreement has been signed.	L' Syrian peace agreement signed.
102	fsa ha fighting planned peace talk	FSA fought peace talks.	FSA fought for the peace talks.	FSA's been fighting for peace talks.
102	geneva conference syria held january	Geneva Syria Conference, January.	Geneva Syria Conference held in January.	Geneva Syria conference held in January.
102	iran deal good bad	Iran treat badly.	Iran treats you badly.	You know, Iran treats you bad.
102	update convene syria peace talk jan	Update on the Syrian Peace Talks Jan.	Update on the Syrian peace talks Jan.	Syria peace talks update Jan.
102	power meet syria peace talk preparation	To be able to meet with the Syrian authorities in order to prepare for the peace talks.	Being able to meet Syria in preparation for the peace talks.	Being able to meet Syria in preparation for peace talks.
102	talk syria civil war january	Civil war in Syria January.	Talk about the civil war in Syria January.	Talk about Syria's civil war January.
102	syria coalition seek aid route prisoner release	Syria Coalition calls for the release of prisoners on the road to the Apostles.	The coalition Syria calls for the release of prisoners on the road to the Apos; help.	The coalition Syria calls for the release of prisoners on the Apos road.
102	syrian rebel group balk peace talk uncertain	There is a reluctance among the Syrian rebel group to talk about peace in uncertain terms.	The Syrian rebel group is reluctant to talk peace in any uncertain way.	Syria's rebel group is reluctant to talk about peace in uncertain terms.
102	syria peace talk place assad france	Syria Peace Talk Place Assad France.	Syria Peace Talk Place Assad France.	Syria Peace talk Place Assad France.
102	syria government opposition agree peace talk	The government of the Syrian Arab Republic agrees to the peace talks.	L' opposition to the Syrian government accepts the peace talks.	L' opposition to the Syrian government accepts peace talks.
102	syria peace talk january	Peace talks in Syria January.	Talk peace in Syria January.	We'll talk about peace in Syria.
102	announces january syria peace talk	Announces January Syria Peace Talk for peace.	"Announce the ""January Syria Peace Talk"" for peace."	Write a letter to the President of the United States.
102	syrian government opposition agree meet peace talk	The Syrian government's opposition has agreed to meet with the leaders of the peace talks.	L' opposition of the Syrian government agrees to meet with the peace talks.	L' Syrian government opposition agrees to peace talks.
102	syria western foe dreaming assad	Enemy Western Syria dreams of assaults.	Syria West enemy dreams assaults assaults.	Syria West Enemy dreams of Assassination.
103	russian police detained extremist bomb	Russian police have just stopped an extremist bomb.	The Russian police stopped an extremist bomb.	Russian police have an extremist bomb in custody.
103	russian police detain islamist moscow	Islamist Moscow is detained by Russian police.	Russian police are holding Islamist Moscow hostage.	Russian police detained Islamist Moscow.
103	russian police seize explosive raid islamist takfir wal hijra group	The Russian police seized the group at the time of an explosion in the city.	Russian police seize the wal hijra takfir Islamist group during an explosive attack.	Russian police seized the Islamist takfir wal hijra group during a bomb attack in the city.
103	radical islamist detained moscow	Radical Islamists have stopped Moscow.	A radical Islamist has taken down Moscow.	A radical Islamist stopped Moscow.
103	russia arrest armed radical islamist	Russia is arresting a radical Islamist armed man.	And Russia is arresting an armed radical Islamist.	Russia arrests an armed radical Islamist.
103	group takfir wal hijra extremist detained moscow	The takfir waljra extremist group has been detained in Moscow.	Takfir wal hijra extremist group detained Moscow.	The group takfir wal hijra extremist detained Moscow.
103	moscow police arrest armed islamist	Moscow police are arresting an Islamist with a deadly weapon.	Moscow police have an armed Islamist under arrest.	Moscow police arrest an armed Islamist.
103	russia detains member banned islamic group moscow	Russia is holding a banned member of the Moscow Islamist group.	Russia has a banned member of Moscow Islamist group.	Russia has a banned member of the Islamist group Moscow.
103	takfir wal hijra member detained moscow interior ministry	Takfir waljra's member held the Ministry of the Interior in Moscow.	The member of takfir waljra detained the Ministry of the Interior of Moscow.	The member of takfir wal hijra detained the Moscow Interior Ministry.
103	fifteenth islamist radical nabbed moscow	This is the 15th time that a radical Islamist has been detained in Moscow.	Fifteenth radical Islamist pinned down Moscow.	Fifteenth radical Islamist cornered Moscow.
103	islamist militant detained explosive moscow	An Islamist activist arrested the Mosque explosive.	An Islamic activist arrested the explosive moscow.	An Islamist militant has arrested the suspect; an explosive device.
103	police detain member extremist group moscow	Police have been detaining members of the Moscow extremist group.	The police are holding members of the Moscow extremist group.	Police are holding members of the extremist group Moscow.
103	islamist militant detained explosive moscow	An Islamist activist arrested the Mosque explosive.	An Islamic activist arrested the explosive moscow.	An Islamist militant has arrested the suspect; an explosive device.
103	presumed islamist explosive detained moscow	Allegedly an Islamist explosive device being held in Moscow.	Alleged Islamic explosive held in Moscow.	Alleged Islamic explosive detained in Moscow.
103	extremist detained moscow interior ministry	He's an extremist, he's held by the Moscow Interior Ministry.	An extremist held by the Moscow Interior Ministry.	An extremist detained by the Moscow Interior Ministry.
103	group religious extremist arrested moscow explosive weapon seized	A group of religious extremists has arrested the Muscovite suicide bomber.	A group of religious extremists arrested the seized Muscovite explosive weapon.	A group of religious extremists arrested the Apostle, an explosive weapon seized in Moscow.
103	russian security force detain suspected radical islamist	Alleged radical Islamists are being held by Russian security forces.	Russian security forces are holding suspected radical Islamists hostage.	Russian security forces are holding suspected radical Islamists.
103	authority arrest alleged militant moscow	The authorities are arresting suspected Moscow militant.	L' authority arrests the suspected militant Moscow.	The authority arrests alleged militant Moscow.
103	extremist explosive detained moscow	Extremist explosion, held in Moscow.	Detained extremist explosion in Moscow.	Explosive extremist device detained in Moscow.
103	moscow police arrest armed islamist raid	The police in Moscow have stopped an armed Islamist raid.	Moscow police have stopped an Islamist armed raid.	Moscow police stop an armed Islamist raid.
103	moscow police detain islamist suicide	An Islamist suicide is being held by Moscow police.	Moscow police have Islamist suicide.	Moscow police have Islamic suicide in custody.
103	group suspected islamist detained russia	This was the first time that a group of Muslims had taken control of Russia.	A suspected group of Islamists held Russia hostage.	A group suspected of Islamism held Russia captive.
103	russia police moscow detain suspected member islamic extremist	The Russian police in Moscow have detained a suspected member of the group; Islamist extremist.	Moscow Russian police are detaining a suspected member of the Islamist extremist group.	Moscow Russian police detain suspected member of the Islamist extremist group.
103	russian police detain alleged funders banned islamic party	Russian police are detaining suspected donors who have banned the Islamist party.	The Russian police are holding the alleged donors who banned the Islamist party.	Russian police are detaining the alleged financiers who banned Islamist party.
104	report nsa spied porn habit discredit muslim radical	D' after the NSA, Muslim radicals are discredited by the habit of spy porn.	D' after the NSA, l' habit of spy porn discredits radical Muslims.	D' after the NSA, the spy porn habit discredits radical Muslims.
104	edward snowden latest leak nsa monitored online porn habit radicalizers	Edward Snowden, the NSA's latest leak, has been monitoring radical online porn.	The latest NSA leak, Edward Snowden, has been monitoring online porn radicals.	Edward Snowden, the latest leak of the NSA, has been monitoring online porn radicals.
104	surveillance cover porn leak nsa considered undermining	Surveillance coverage has covered the NSA's suspected porno leakage as a security threat.	Surveillance covers the leak of NSA porn considered a security threat.	Surveillance covers the NSA's porn leak considered a security threat.
104	report nsa spied target porn habit discredit radicalizer devotion	NSA just spotted a pornographic target that discredits the radicals' devotion.	NSA has spotted a porn target that discredits radical devotion.	The NSA has spotted a target porn that discredits radical devotion.
104	nsa spying porn watching habit islamic radicalizers	The NSA spies on porn while they watch the usual radical Islamists.	The NSA spies on porn by watching the usual radical Islamists.	The N.S.A. spies on porn watching the usual radical Islamists.
104	nsa plan shame web porn user	Nsa Plan of Shame web porn porn porn user.	Nsa plan of shame web porn porn porn user.	Nsa plan of shame web porn user of porn.
104	nsa watching radical watching porn	NSA watches as Radical watches porn.	The NSA is watching Radical watch porn.	NSA's watching Radical watch porn right now.
104	nsa logged online porn habit muslim radicalizers report	NSA has been recording reports of porn-crazed Muslim radicals online.	NSA's been recording reports online from Muslim radicals accustomed to porn.	NSA just logged reports online from Muslim radicals accustomed to porn.
104	top secret document reveals nsa spy porn habit suspected terrorist	A top-secret document reveals a pornographic habit of the National Security Agency (NSA) being suspected of terrorism.	A top-secret document reveals a pornographic habit of suspected terrorism-related NSA espionage.	A top secret document reveals a porn habit of d'apos; NSA espionage suspected of terrorism.
104	nsa spy porn habit undermine muslim radicalizers	N.S.A. spying undermines Muslim radicals.	Porno d' NSA spying undermines Muslim radicals.	N.A.S. Spy porn undermines Muslim radicals.
104	nsa spied porn habit discredit muslim radical	It's a way of saying it's a bad thing.	The habit of porn spying discredits radical Muslims.	L' spy porn habit discredits radical Muslims.
104	nsa spied porn habit target radicalisers	The NSA has targeted porn that targets radicals.	NSA has picked up porn that targets radicals.	NSA flagged porn that targets radicals.
104	nsa spied porn habit muslim radical undermine influence	The NSA has been spying on radical, Muslim pornographic habits, undermining influence.	The NSA has been spying on radical Muslim pornographic habits, undermining their influence.	The NSA has spied on radical Muslim pornographic habits undermining their influence.
104	top secret document reveals nsa spied porn habit plan	A classified document revealed that the NSA had been spying on a porn plan.	A top-secret document reveals that the NSA has been spying on a porn plan.	A top secret document reveals the NSA spied on a porn plan.
104	nsa collected detail online sexual activity islamist radical	NSA has been gathering details of radical Islamists' online sexual activity.	NSA has gathered details of the online sexual activity of radical Islamists.	NSA gathered details about the online sexual activity of radical Islamists.
104	snowden nsa collect data porn radicalizers	Snowden NSA collects data on radical porn.	Now, Snowden NSA is collecting data on porn radicals.	Snowden NSA collects data on porn radicals.
104	report nsa spied porn habit discredit radicalizers	D' after the NSA, radicals are discredited by spy porn.	D' after the NSA, spy porn discredits radicals.	D' after NSA, spy porn discredits radicals.
104	nsa collected porn visit data discredit radicalizers	The NSA has been collecting data on pornographic visits to discredit radicals.	NSA collected data on the pornographic visits to discredit the radicals.	NSA collected data on pornographic visits to discredit radicals.
104	nsa spied porn habit huffpo report	NSA has been spying on porn's Huffpo report.	The NSA spied on the Huffpo report of porn.	NSA spied on the porn Huffpo report.
104	nsa spied online porn habit discredit radicalizers	NSA has been spying on pornos online to discredit the radicals.	NSA has been spying on online porn to discredit the radicals.	The NSA spied on online porn to discredit the radicals.
104	surprise nsa tracking porn search	NSA Surprise, research porn.	NSA Surprise, porn research, you know.	Uh, NSA Surprise, porn research.
104	nsa spy porn habit muslim radical	It's a very important thing for us to be able to do.	Porno d' NSA spying is a radical Muslim habit.	NSA spying porn is a radical Muslim habit.
104	modern honey trap	That's how you get it.	That's how you get it.	C&apos, c&apos, c&apos, c&apos, c&apos.
104	nsa planned shame radicalizers revealing porn habit	The NSA is planning to radicalize the shame by exposing porn.	The NSA is planning to radicalize shame by revealing pornographic habits.	The NSA plans to radicalize shame by revealing pornographic habits.
104	switchboard nsa discussed porn habit discredit muslim radical	The N.S.A. discussed the use of porn to discredit Muslim radicals.	The NSA has been discussing the porn habit to discredit radical Muslims.	NSA discussed the porn habit to discredit radical Muslims.
104	revealed nsa planned disgrace radical revealing internet	The NSA uncovered a radical disgrace project that exposed the Internet.	Well, the NSA has revealed a radical disgrace project revealing the Internet.	The NSA revealed a radical disgrace project revealing the Internet.
104	nsa reportedly sought discredit radical disclosing online sexual	NSA would seek to discredit radicalism by revealing sexual information online.	NSA would have sought to discredit radicalism by revealing sexual information online.	NSA would have sought to discredit radicalism by leaking online sexual information.
104	nsa spying porn habit radicalizers	The NSA spies on extremists in porn.	NSA spies on porn extremists.	The NSA's spying on porn extremists.
104	nsa gather porn entry compromise muslim radicalizers	The NSA collects compromising pornographic material from Muslim radicals.	The NSA's collecting pornographic material compromising Muslim radicals.	And the NSA collects pornographic material that compromises Muslim radicals.
104	nsa spied porn habit radicalizers planned detail	NSA has been spying on pornos, radicals have been planning details.	NSA has been spying on porn, radicals have been planning details.	The NSA spied on porn, radicals planned details.
104	snowden continued	Snowden snowed on.	Snowden kept snowing.	Snowden continued snowing.
104	muslim radicalisers porn habit monitored nsa	N.A.S.A. Pornography-watching radical Muslims.	Muslim radicals have a habit of watching porn.	Radical Muslims used to watch porn NSA.
104	nsa target porn poor fact checking	They're targeting poor, truth-checking pornos.	The NSA is targeting poor pornos who check the facts.	NSA targets poor pornos who check the facts.
104	nsa spied target porn habit	NSA's got eyes on a porn target.	NSA just spotted a porn target.	NSA's got eyes on a porn target right now.
104	nsa spied porn habit hurt credibility radicalizers report	NSA spy porn damages radical credibility.	The NSA's use of spying porn damages the credibility of the radicals.	NSA-spy porn damages the radicals' credibility as well.
104	nsa planned discredit radical web porn	The NSA has plans to discredit this radical web porn.	The NSA is planning to discredit radical web porn!	NSA's planning to discredit radical web porn.
104	nsa spied radicalisers porn surfing discredit reveals snowden	Spied radicals from the NSA are discrediting Snowden.	N.S.A. Spied radicals surfing on porn discredits the life of Snowden.	The NSA's spied radicals surfing porn discredits Snowden.
104	top secret doc reveal nsa spied porn habit	The top-secret doc revealed that the NSA is spying on porn.	Top secret doc says the NSA is a porno spy.	The top secret doc says the NSA spies on porn.
104	report nsa track online porn habit discredit muslim radicalizers	D' after the NSA, Muslim radicals are discredited by online porn.	D' after the NSA, l' habit of online porn discredits Muslim radicals.	D' after the NSA, l' online porn habit discredits Muslim radicals.
104	nsa spied porn habit muslim radicalizers effort	The N.S.A. has been spying on radicalizing Muslims accustomed to porn.	The NSA has been spying on the radicalization of porn-accustomed Muslims.	The NSA spied on the apos; effort to radicalize Muslims accustomed to porn.
104	nsa tracking people porn habit	Nsa stalk people, pornos.	Nsa hunts people, pornos.	Nsa's tracking people, pornos.
104	muslim online porn habit monitored	It's a good way to keep track of what's happening.	L' habit of Muslim porn online is watched.	Muslim online porn habit is monitored.
104	nsa planned discredit radicalizers data internet porn	NSA is planning to discredit data from radical pornographers on the Internet.	The NSA plans to discredit data from porn radicals on the Internet.	NSA plans to discredit data from Internet porn radicals.
104	nsa attempted shame radical online porn record	NSA tried to disgrace a hardcore online porn record.	So the NSA tried to shame a radical online porn record.	NSA tried to shame a radical online porn record.
104	nsa spied racy online sexploits suspected muslim radical	The N.S.A. has been tracking reports online of suspected sexploits of Muslim radicals.	NSA has observed suspected sexploits of radical Muslims online.	The NSA has observed online sexploits suspected of being Muslim radicals.
104	nsa spied porn habit muslim discredit radicalizers	Nsa spy's habit of discrediting radicals.	Nsa spy habit of porn muslim discrediting radicals.	Nsa spy porn habit muslim discredit radicals.
104	nsa director recommended data radical muslim porn viewing	The director of the NSA recommended radical, porn-viewing Muslim data.	NSA Director has recommended radical Muslim data viewing porn.	The NSA director recommended radical Muslim data viewing porn.
104	security service spied pornography online promiscuity	Security has been spying on the promiscuous online pornography.	Security has been spying on online pornography that is promiscuous.	The security service spied on promiscuous online pornography.
104	report nsa radical islamist porn habit	It's a radical form of Islamic porn, and it's a radical form of porn.	After the NSA, he acts as a radical Islamic pornographer.	D' after the NSA, he's a radical Islamic pornographer.
104	report nsa monitored porn habit suspected radicalizers	It was reported that the NSA has been monitoring individuals suspected of being involved in the development of radicals.	It has been reported that the NSA has been monitoring suspected radicals.	It was reported that the NSA monitored suspected radicals.
104	nsa online porn habit discredit radicalizers	L' habit of online NSA porn discredits radicals.	L&apos, the NSA's online porn habit, discredits radicals.	The NSA's online porn habit discredits radicals.
104	nsa record radicalizers porn habit st internet speed bitcoin	N.A.N.S. is the world's most popular online service provider.	Internet speed bitcoin is the most popular porn radicalizer in the world.	Nsa record porn radicalizers habitue st internet speed bitcoin.
104	nsa monitored porn habit discredit radicalizers	The NSA has been monitoring the pornographic habit to discredit radicals.	NSA has been monitoring the porn habit to discredit radicals.	NSA monitored the porn habit to discredit radicals.
104	nsa monitored porn site	NSA's been monitoring porn.	NSA's been monitoring the porn site.	NSA's been monitoring the porn site for a while.
104	nsa reportedly monitored pornography viewed suspected islamist	It is alleged that the NSA has been monitoring scenes of pornography where people are suspected of being involved in Islamist activities.	The NSA would have been monitoring pornography scenes where suspected Islamists were seen.	The NSA allegedly monitored pornography scenes where suspected Islamists were seen.
104	nsa monitored online sexual habit muslim radicalizers bid	NSA has been monitoring Muslim radicals' offers online.	The NSA has been monitoring online the offers of the Muslim radicals of the sexual habit.	NSA monitored online offers from Muslim radicals of the sexual habit.
104	nsa spying reach dirtiest level	The NSA spies get dirtiest.	And the NSA spies reach the dirtiest level.	NSA espionage reaches the dirtiest level in the world.
104	nsa monitored radical porn habit	The NSA has been monitoring pornographic radicals.	NSA has been monitoring pornographic radical practices.	The NSA monitored radical pornographic practices.
104	nsa spied terrorist radicalizers porn order discredit	So the NSA has been spying on radicalizing, pornographic terrorists ordering that porn be discredited.	NSA has been spying on radicalizing, pornographic terrorists ordering that porn be discredited.	The NSA has been spying on radicalized porn order terrorists to discredit porn.
104	report nsa collected data muslim target online sexual activity	The N.S.A. has been collecting data on the Muslim target of the online sexual activity.	The NSA has collected data on the Muslim target of online sexual activity.	NSA collected data on the Muslim target of online sexual activity.
105	dna testing	DNA test.	It's a DNA test.	I'm running a DNA test.
105	update fda warns google backed andme ha sale genetic test	Fda Update warns Google has implemented a genetic test.	Update fda warns that Google has set up a genetic test.	Update fda warns that Google has set up a genetic test in place.
105	fda ruined plan buy andme dna test christmas	Fda ruined the whole deal and I had to do a Christmas DNA test.	Fda ruined plans to buy and I'm gonna test for Christmas DNA.	Fda ruined buy and I test DNA Christmas.
105	google backed andme ordered fda selling genetic test	Google and I have ordered fda to sell genetic tests to people.	Google and I ordered fda to sell the genetic tests.	Google and I ordered fda to sell genetic tests.
105	warning letter fda order andme selling saliva kit	I'd like to sell my saliva kit.	Letter d' warning fda order and I sell saliva kit.	Let's go; warning fda order and I sell saliva kit.
105	fda warns genetic test consumer unapproved	FDAF warns consumers about genetic tests that are not approved.	FDAF alerts consumers to unapproved genetic testing.	FDAF warns consumers of unapproved genetic tests.
105	fda battle andme long	Fda battle and me long, long fight and me long fight.	Fda battle and I long fight and I long fight.	Fda battle and me long fight and me long fight.
105	fda andme ha gene test	Me and Fda tested the gene.	Fda and I tested the gene.	Fda and I tested the gene for it.
105	thing missed andme dna kit	Something Missed and I'll go to the DNA kit.	Missed and me kit d'apos; DNA.	One thing missed and I kit d'apos; DNA.
105	fda ban andme personal genetic test	Personal genetic testing is not permitted by the FDA.	FDA prohibits personal genetic testing.	The FDA prohibits personal genetic testing.
105	fda google andme ha dna analysis	Fda Google and I have DNA analysis.	Fda Google and I got it; DNA analysis.	So Fda Google and I have DNA analysis.
105	fda google backed andme selling genetic testing kit	Fda google m' has been supporting me by selling me some genetic test kits.	Fda google m' supported by selling me kits of genetic tests.	Fda google m&apos, backed me by selling genetic test kits.
105	fda order google founder wife startup selling dna analysis kit	Fda commissioned founding woman Google Start @-@up Sell D&apos kit; Analysis DNA.	Fda commanding founding woman Google start-up selling d&apos kit; analysis DNA analysis.	Fda orders woman founder Google start-up sell kit d' analysis DNA analysis analysis.
105	aim andme regulator missed mark	Aim and I'm a failed regulator.	Aim and I regulator missed mark.	Aim and I missed mark regulator.
105	selling dna test fda andme	I'm here to sell fda and me DNA tests.	Fda DNA test sale and me.	Me and fda DNA test sale.
105	fda order andme discontinue marketing genetic testing service	Fda prescription and I are both interrupting the commercialization of the genetic testing service.	Fda prescription and I interrupt commercialization of the genetic testing service.	Fda prescription and I interrupt genetic testing service commercialization.
105	fda andme selling dna test kit	The FDA and I sell a lot of DNA tests.	The F.D.A. and I are both selling DNA tests.	The F.D.A. and I are selling DNA tests.
105	fda slam dna testing company safety	Fda-slam DNA test security company.	Fda slam test DNA security company.	Fda slam security company DNA test.
105	fda rein genetic testing firm andme	Fda re enterprise of genetic tests and even I @-@.	Fda re-engineering and genetic testing and even me @-@.	Fda re-engineering genetic testing and I-even.
105	andme ha sale genetic test	And I, for one, did a genetic test.	And I did a genetic test.	And I did a genetic test myself.
105	fda order google backed andme selling dna test	Fda has ordered Google and I have ordered to sell the DNA test.	Fda is ordering Google and I'm selling DNA test.	Fda's ordering Google and I'm selling DNA test results.
105	fda andme marketing dna sequencing service	Sequencing service; DNA from Fda and Marketing.	Sequencing Service; Fda andme Marketing DNA.	D&apos sequencing service; DNA from fda andme marketing.
105	fda targeting google backed andme unnecessary mri	I mean, Fda targeting Google and me needlessly MRI.	Fda's targeting Google and me unnecessarily MRI.	Fda is targeting Google and me with an unnecessary MRI.
105	fda order personal genetics company andme selling test	Fda commissions the personal genetics company, and I sell sales tests.	Fda is in charge of the personal genetics company and I'm in charge of selling tests.	Fda's running the personal genetics company and I'm selling test sales.
105	fda gun google bos missus	Fda google gun bos bos bos bos, ma'am.	Fda gun google bos bos bos gun madam.	Fda gun google bos bos bos, ma'am.
105	fda andme ha sale genetic test	Fda and I have been selling genetic tests.	Fda and I sold some genetic tests.	Fda and I sold genetic tests.
105	fda andme founder anne wojcicki marketing dna test	I'm the founder of the FDA and I'm the founder of the wojcicki marketing DNA test.	Founder of the FDA and I wojcicki marketing DNA test.	Founder of the fda and myself wojcicki marketing DNA test.
105	fda andme selling dna test	Well, Fda and I are selling a DNA test.	Fda and I selling DNA testing.	Fda and I, selling test DNA.
105	andme defies fda order ha dna testing	And so I defy the FDA's order to test the DNA.	And I'm defying the FDA's order to test the DNA.	And I defy the FDA's order to test DNA.
105	fda andme marketing genetic testing kit	The FDA and I are releasing a genetic test kit.	The FDA and I are marketing a genetic screening kit.	The F.D.A. and I are marketing a genetic test kit right now.
105	fda poised kill personal genetics testing industry	The FDA is ready to kill the industry of personal genetic testing.	FDA is ready to kill the personal genetic testing industry.	FDA is poised to kill the personal genetic testing industry.
105	andme terrifies hea insurance company	And I, for one, am terrifying the company of insurance.	And I terrify the company of insurance.	But I'm terrifying the company of insurance companies.
105	fda andme selling dna test	Well, Fda and I are selling a DNA test.	Fda and I selling DNA testing.	Fda and I, selling test DNA.
105	fda google backed andme ha dna test service	Google Fda supported by andme test service d' DNA test service.	Fda google supported by andme ha test service d' DNA test service.	Fda google supported by andme ha test service d' service d&apos.
105	fda banned sale innovative genetic test	Fda has banned the sale of genetic tests that are innovative.	Fda has banned the sale of innovative genetic tests.	Fda banned the sale of innovative genetic tests.
105	bad gene watchdog ha andme handy dna test kit	Bad Genetic Monitoring Dog a and I Practical DNA Test Kit.	Bad dog genetic surveillance a and me practical DNA test kit.	Bad genetic watchdog a and me practical dna test kit.
105	fda order google dna test startup andme sale	Fda orders google DNA test start and I will sell.	Fda orders google DNA test start and I sell.	Fda order google test start and I sell.
105	andme problem fda work	I'm working on it.	And I'm still working on the fda problem.	And I'm working on fda problem.
105	fda andme marketing dna kit andme	Fda andme, DNA marketing kit, and me and me.	Fda andme DNA marketing kit and me.	Fda andme marketing dna kit and me.
105	fda leave andme	The FDA goes and so do I.	The F.D.A.'s on the move, and so am I.	And the FDA is going, and so am I.
105	fda shuts andme outrageously banning consumer access	Fda firm and I disgracefully ban the access of consumers to the internet.	Fda firm and I disgracefully ban consumer access.	Fda firm and I are both scandalously banning consumer access.
105	dna test company told selling kit	We heard from the DNA testing company that they sold the kit.	The DNA test company said they sold the kit.	The DNA test company told us they sold the kit.
105	fda order genetics company andme cease marketing screening service	Fda genetics and I-are even ceasing to commercialize the testing service.	Even the genetics company Fda and I-stop commercializing the screening service.	The genetics company fda and I-stop commercializing the screening service.
105	andme controversial genetic test kit background future risk	I'm controversial genetic testing together background risk future risk.	I'm controversial genetic testing together background future risk.	I'm controversial genetic test together background future risk.
105	fda google backed dna test startup andme ha sale	Fda google has been supporting the DNA test and I ha dirty.	Fda google supported DNA boot test and me ha dirty.	Fda google supported DNA test startup and I ha dirty.
105	fda slam andme genetic testing device	Fda-slam-andme genetic tester.	Fda slam andme genetic tester.	The fda slam andme genetic tester.
105	fda andme selling popular genetic test	Fda and I are selling genetic tests that are very popular.	Fda and I are selling popular genetic tests.	Fda and I selling popular genetic tests.
105	google backed company selling dna analysis kit ordered ha sale	A company funded by Google that sells a d&apos package; d&apos analysis; DNA has ordered a ha ha ha ha sale.	A company financed by Google that sells a kit of d' analysis of d' DNA has ordered a sale of ha ha.	Google-funded company selling a d&apos kit; DNA analysis ordered ha ha sale.
105	fda suspicious andme genome testing kit demand evaluation	Suspected FDA genomics testing requires an assessment of the application for a genomics test kit.	Suspected FDA genomic testing requires an evaluation of the application for a genomics test kit.	FDA's suspect genomic testing requires an evaluation of the kit application; genomics testing.
105	genetic testing company andme ordered ha sale flimsy science	The company of genetic tests and I-even ordered the sale of apos; a fragile science.	The genetic testing company and I-even have ordered the sale of apos; a fragile science.	The genetic testing company and I-even ordered the sale of apos; a fragile science.
105	stopping andme delay revolution medicine	Stopping and delaying revolutionary medicine.	To stop and delay revolutionary medicine.	Stop and delay revolutionary medicine.
105	fda order andme backed google ha sale dna test service	Fda orders and I supported google's test service and test d&apos.	Fda orders and I supported test service google ha sale test d' test DNA.	Fda orders and I supported google ha sale test service d' DNA test.
105	andme shutdown protects science tainted data	Andme shutdown will protect the contaminated scientific data.	Andme shutdown protects scientific data that is contaminated.	Andme shutdown protects compromised scientific data.
105	fda dna analysis company selling kit	Company d' FDA DNA analysis and sales kits.	Company d' FDA DNA analysis selling the kits.	Company d' FDA kit selling DNA analysis.
105	time fda decision ha direct consumer genetic testing	The FDA's decision of the time made it possible to carry out genetic testing directly on the user's behalf.	The decision of the FDA of the time allowed for direct genetic testing of consumers.	The FDA's timing decision allowed for direct consumer genetic testing.
105	updated fda order andme genetic test	An update of the status report; order fda and genetic test.	Update of the apo; fda order and genetic test.	Updated apo; fda order and genetic test.
105	andme ordered selling genetic test	And I, for one, have ordered the sale of genetic tests.	And I, Japos, ordered the sale of genetic tests.	I ordered the sale of genetic tests.
105	fda order genetic testing firm selling dna analysis service	The FDA is ordering a company to sell a service of DNA analysis.	The FDA ordered a genetic testing company to sell a DNA testing service.	FDA orders a genetic testing company to sell a DNA analysis service.
105	fda shuts sale andme dna test kit	The FDA is cancelling the sale of this kit.	The FDA canceled the sale of the DNA test kit.	The DNA test kit is cancelled by the FDA.
105	thing day tuesday november	This is the day of the most important events in the world.	Tuesday, November is the day of things.	Tuesday, November is the day of things.
105	fda warns maker genetic testing kit	FDA notifies the manufacturer of the test kit.	The FDA notifies the manufacturer of the genetic test kit.	FDA notifies the genetic test kit manufacturer.
105	fda thee	Go-t' in.	Go on-t&apos.	Go on, go on.
105	fda seizing dna testing kit	The FDA will seize the DNA test kit.	FDA seizes the DNA kit.	The DNA test kit is seized by the FDA.
105	fda google backed andme ha sale genetic test	Well, Fda Google and I sold genetic tests.	Fda google and I have been selling genetic tests.	Fda google and I sold some genetic tests.
105	andme fda worried false diagnosis	And I, the FDA, are afraid of making false diagnoses.	But I, the FDA, are afraid of false diagnoses.	And I, the FDA, fear false diagnoses.
105	fda slap personal genomics startup andme stiff warning	Fda slapler startup and me genome firm warning.	Fda slapler start personal genomics and I firm warning.	Fda slap slap personal genomics startup and me strong warning.
105	letter fda order andme ha sale	J&apos, J&apos, J&apos, J&apos, J&apos, J&apos, J&apos.	J' ordered a letter from the FDA and I've sold it.	J' ordered a letter from FDA and sold it.
105	fda warns google backed andme ha sale genetic test	Fda warns Google that there is a Google sales genetic test.	Fda warns Google that&apos there is a genetic test for sale.	Fda warns Google that there is a genetic test sale.
105	dna testing startup andme hit snag fda shuts sale	The Startup DNA test and I hooked up and shut down the sale.	The DNA test of me and the startup caught fda shut down the sale.	The startup DNA test and I hooked up fda shut down the sale.
106	indian bird specie continue critically endangered	Indian birds are still in critical danger of extinction.	Indian bird species are still at critical risk of extinction.	Indian bird species continue to be at risk of extinction.
106	congo forest giraffe okapi endangered specie iucn	The Okapi giraffe of the congo forest is a threatened species of d'apos; extinction.	The Okapi giraffe of the congo forest is threatened by extinction.	The congo forest okapi giraffe is an endangered species.
106	bird specie india list critically endangered	List of species of birds; Endangered.	List of endangered birds.	This is a list of endangered bird species in Canada.
106	congo forest giraffe brink extinction	The giraffe is the most common type of giraffe in the world.	Forêt congo, the giraffe is in the process of extinction.	Congo forest, the giraffe is extinct.
106	forest giraffe endangered okapi population drop percent year	It is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that this population is at risk.	The population of giraffes in forests threatened by extinction has seen their population decline from one year to the next.	The endangered forest giraffe population has seen its population decline from year to year.
106	indian bird specie critically endangered	Indian birds at serious risk of extinction.	Canadian Wildlife Service Occasional Paper Series.	Apos species; critically endangered Indian birds; extinction.
106	red list bird number critically endangered bird hit high	Red-listed number of birds; birds in serious danger of extinction; birds in serious danger of extinction.	Red list number of birds; birds critically endangered; high bird extinction.	Red list number of birds; critically endangered birds; high bird extinction.
106	fifteen bird specie india critically endangered three specie face	In addition, the species was found to be extirpated from its original range.	Fifteen species of L' birds; India has gravely threatened three species face-to-face.	Fifteen species of birds; birds L' India gravely threatened three species face to face.
106	endangered specie okapi list	Threatened species list; ex okapi.	List of threatened species of elk; ex okapi.	The following is a list of endangered species in the United States.
106	iucn red list update okapi white winged flufftail facing extinction	Updating of the red-listed bird; the red-listed bird's-eye; extinction.	Red-listed update; iucn okapi White winged tail facing white winged tail; extinction.	Update of the red list of white winged tails facing extinction.
106	dr congo forest giraffe danger	Dr. congo forest congo giraffe danger.	Dr congo forest giraffe danger.	Dr. congo forest giraffe danger.
106	highest number bird listed endangered birdlife	The Canadian Wildlife Service, Environment Canada, Environment Canada, and the Canadian Wildlife Service.	The highest number of birds listed as endangered in Canada.	The highest number of listed endangered birds.
106	forest giraffe join growing number threatened specie	Forest giraffe joins an increasing number of species at risk.	Forest giraffe joins a growing number of threatened species.	The forest giraffe joins a growing number of threatened species.
106	forest girraffe list growing number threatened specie	List of ever-increasing numbers of forests.	This is a list of the forest girraffions that are constantly increasing in number.	List of ever-increasing number of forest girraff.
106	endangered specie red list update	Red List of Threatened Species updated.	Updating the Red List of Threatened Species.	Updated the red list of threatened species.
106	congo national symbol okapi endangered specie list	National symbol of Okapi congo is a list of species at risk of extinction.	National symbol of Okapi congo is a list of endangered species.	National Symbol of Congo Okapi is a national symbol of congo, a national symbol of congo.
106	red list endangered specie updated	Red-listed Peregrine Falcon Designated Special Concern in April 1986.	Small-flowered sand darter Designated Endangered in April 1986.	Red List An updated endangered species.
106	red list okapi white winged flufftail threatened specie	Red List, White-winged Tail, Okapi, Threatened.	COSEWIC Executive Summary Red-listed Okapi White winged tail, Threatened.	Red list Okapi White winged tail, threatened species.
106	civil war okapi brink extinction	The Okapi Civil War is almost extinction.	Okapi Civil War almost extinction.	Okapi civil war borders on the apos; extinction.
106	bangalore habitat destruction rare bird rarer	B.C. Ministry of Environment, Lands and Parks.	Bangalore habitat destruction; rare bird habitat rarer.	Bangalore destruction of l'apos; rare bird habitat rarer.
106	winner loser red list rarest specie	Winning prizes are red-listed for the rarest species.	The rarest species are the red list of the winners.	The winner's red list is the rarest species.
106	african unicorn endangered war	An African unicorn has just threatened to go to war.	An African unicorn threatened to go to war.	An African unicorn has threatened to go to war with us.
106	okapi flufftail face extinction iucn red list	This is a list of the most famous and most famous places in the world.	Red list of species; red list of species; Okapi opposite; extinction.	Red list d'apos; red list d'apos; Okapi facing extinction.
106	red list animal brink extinction	Red-listed species: an imminent extirpation of an animal.	This is the first report on the state of the environment in Canada.	Red list: imminent extinction of animals.
106	bird specie india critically endangered list	List of bird species; birds at serious risk of becoming extinct.	The following is a list of some of the most endangered bird species in the world.	List of species; critically endangered birds; extinction.
106	fifteen bird specie critically endangered	Endangered by 15 species of birds seriously threatened by extinction.	In addition, there are a number of species of birds that are threatened with extinction.	Fifteen species of birds; critically endangered birds; extinction.
106	giraffe okapi bird face extinction	Okapi giraffe birds facing the apos; extinction.	The okapi bird giraffe faces the bird's extinction.	The giraffe okapi bird facing the apos; extinction.
106	okapi congo forest giraffe brink extinction	Giraffe forest in the process of disappearing.	Okapi congo dying giraffe forest; extinction.	Okapi congo forest of giraffe trees in the process of extinction.
106	gain loss threatened specie red list	Red List of Threatened Species.	Lost Gain Red List of Threatened.	Loss of income Red list of threatened species.
106	conservation work	Conservation work.	Conservation.	Uh, conservation work.
106	red list threatened specie region	Red List of Threatened Species.	Canadian Wildlife Service Occasional Paper Series.	This is a red list of endangered species.
106	specie iucn red list threatened category	Red List of Threatened Iucn species.	Red List of Iucn Threatened.	Red list of the apos; threatened Iucn species.
107	computer learning common sense trawling picture internet	L' l' l' l' l' l' l' l' l' Internet, etc.	L' learning by l' computer, common sense, trawling, l' image, l' Internet, l' Internet, etc.	L' learning by e-learning; computer; common sense; trawling; image; Internet; Internet; Internet; etc.
107	computer smarter online pic	E-mail address: http://www.wipo.int/wipo.	Online image from a smarter computer.	Image online d' a smarter computer.
107	teaching computer common sense	J' Teaches the common sense in the use of computers.	J' teaches common sense to the computer.	J' teaches computer common sense.
107	scientist image learning	Learning from L' Image by Scientists.	L'apprentissage de l' image par les scientifiques.	L&apos learning image by scientists.
107	aim teach computer common sense	The goal is to learn to read and write.	The goal is to learn to read and write.	It's about learning to read and write, and it's about learning to write.
107	computer teach common sense	L' computer; c' c' is common sense.	L&apos, computer, c&apos, is common sense.	L' computer; c' common sense.
107	pc common sense	Common sense.	I'm not making any sense at all.	PC common sense.
107	computer common sense	L' computer; c' c' is common sense.	L&apos, computer, c&apos, is common sense.	L' computer; c' common sense.
107	google funded project aim teach computer common sense	It's all about making sure that your computer understands what's going on and what's happening.	The goal of the Google-funded project is to help the computer understand what's going on.	The goal of the project funded by Google is to help the computer understand what's going on.
107	computer common sense program teach zebra live	Zebra is taught live by the computer program of common sense.	The common sense computer program teaches you zebra live.	The common sense computer program teaches zebra live.
108	apple buy company microsoft original kinect motion sensor	Apple Buy Company Motion Detector D&apos Motion Detector; origin microsoft.	Apple Buy Company motion detector kinect d' origin microsoft.	Apple Buy Company D&apos kinect motion detector; microsoft origin.
108	apple buy kinect company	Purchase of apples.	We are a family-owned company; we buy a lot of apples.	Family business; apple buying.
108	apple buy kinect sensor company primesense	Apple Buy Kinect Sensor Company Primeense.	Apple buy kinect sensor company Primeense.	Apple buy kinect sensor company Primeense.
108	apple confirms acquisition sensor company update	Apple confirms the upgrade of the D&apos Sensor Company.	Apple confirms the update of the company d' acquisition sensor.	Apple confirms update of d&apos sensor company acquisition.
108	biz break apple acquisition primesense help tv effort	Breaking Apple Acquisitions business is first helping at the apos; TV effort.	The first thing you need to help with is to break apple acquisition.	The business break apple acquisition first helps to TV effort.
108	morning musical chair blackberry microsoft possibility qualcomm	Morning musical Blackberry microsoft possible qualcomm.	Blackberry Music Chair in the Morning, Blackberry microsoft possibility qualcomm.	Morning musical chair Blackberry microsoft possibility qualcomm.
108	microsoft corporation apple acquires israeli chip developer primesense	The Apple microsoftware company is the acquisition company of the microsoftware developer, israeli Primeense.	The Apple microsoft company does the apos; acquisition of the israeli Primeense chip developer.	Apple's microsoft company israeli Primeense chip developer acquisition.
108	apple confirms acquisition sensor startup primesense	Apple confirms the list; Acquisition Startup Sensor Incentive.	Apple confirms the apos; premium startup sensor acquisition.	Apple confirms the apos; acquisition sensor startup premiums.
108	apple completes buyout kinect sensor company primesense	Apple is now finalizing the purchase of the new kinect sensor company Primeense.	Apple completes the purchase of kinect sensor company Primeense.	Apple completes buyout of kinect sensor company Primeense.
108	apple buy primesense sensor company	Buying first sensory sensor company.	Apple buy first sensory sensor company.	Apple buy sensory sensor company first.
108	apple acquires israel primesense	It's the only way you'll get it.	Apple's buying israel primeense.	Apple acquires israel primeense.
108	apple acquires primesense news	Apples are the object of a new sense.	The object of the apple is a new sense.	The apple makes a new sense.
108	apple bought primesense	Apple came up with common sense.	Apple has bought common sense.	Apple bought common sense.
108	apple agrees mn acquisition israeli chipmaker primesense	It is not possible to do this in the same way as Apple.	Apple is off; chipmaker first israeli acquisition agreement.	Apple is disappointed; agreement israeli chipmaker first.
108	apple buy kinect sensor creator primesense	Apple Buy Kinect Sensor Creator Primens.	Primense Apple Buy kinect sensor creator.	Apple Buy kinect sensor creator primeense.
108	apple buy kinect company	Purchase of apples.	We are a family-owned company; we buy a lot of apples.	Family business; apple buying.
109	afghan security pact jeopardy karzai demand	Karzai's demand is jeopardized by the Afghan security pact.	The Afghan security pact is jeopardizing Karzai's demand.	Afghanistan's security pact undermines Karzai's claim.
109	hamid karzai refuse budge delay security pact	Hamid Karzai rejects the budget, saying that he is delaying the development of the security pact.	Hamid Karzai refuses the budget delays the security pact.	Hamid Karzai rejects budget delaying security pact.
109	karzai butt head afghan security deal	Afghan shithead Karzai security agreement.	Karzai dickhead Afghan security agreement.	You know, Karzai dickhead Afghan security agreement.
109	condition appear push afghanistan farther striking security deal	The conditions seem to be pushing on; Afghanistan even further by reaching a security agreement.	Conditions seem to be pushing Afghanistan even further, with a security agreement.	The conditions seem to push Afghanistan even further by concluding a security agreement.
109	wrapup pull troop afghan leader hold deal	History, the end of the world; Afghanistan, the end of the world; history.	The end of the ages; history, the end of the ages; Afghanistan, the end of the ages; history.	It's about the end of the world; it's about history, the end of the world; it's about Afghanistan.
109	afghan security agreement falling apart president karzai issue	The Afghan Security Agreement is fast approaching President Karzai's question.	The Afghan security agreement is falling apart; the question of President Karzai.	The Afghan security agreement falls to President Karzai's question.
109	karzai outline condition security deal	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Karzai outlines the terms of the security agreement.	Karzai outlines the condition of the security agreement.
109	obama team ponders troop afghanistan	The Obama team has been thinking about Afghan troops.	L' team Obama thinks about the Afghan troops.	Obama team thinks about Afghan troops.
109	afghan puzzled karzai action	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Afghan intrigued action Karzai action.	Curious afghan action Karzai action.
109	afghanistan karzai sign security deal pull troop year	Afghanistan Karzai signed a security agreement to withdraw the country's military year.	Afghanistan Karzai sign security agreement withdraw the year military.	Afghanistan Karzai sign security agreement withdraw the year military.
109	wrapup pull troop afghan leader hold deal	History, the end of the world; Afghanistan, the end of the world; history.	The end of the ages; history, the end of the ages; Afghanistan, the end of the ages; history.	It's about the end of the world; it's about history, the end of the world; it's about Afghanistan.
109	afghan tension rise security agreement	Tension in Afghanistan has been escalating; security agreement.	Tension increases in Afghanistan; security agreement.	In Afghanistan, the tension increases; security agreement.
109	afghan assembly troop pact	The Troop Pact of L' Afghan Assembly.	The Apos troop pact; Afghan assembly.	The pact of the troop of l' assembly afghan.
109	taliban condemn endosement afghan security deal	The Taleban have a long history of fighting insurgent insurgents.	Taliban condemns the security agreement with the Afghan insurgency.	The Taliban condemn the security agreement with Afghanistan.
109	white house threatens pull troop afghanistan	The White House is threatening to withdraw troops to Afghanistan.	And the White House is threatening to pull the troops out of Afghanistan.	The White House threatens to withdraw the troops to Afghanistan.
109	op karzai demand signing security agreement	In addition, it is not possible to use any of the above.	Op karzai requires signature of a security agreement.	A security agreement is required.
109	afghan security deal hang balance	L' Security Agreement; Afghanistan is based on balance.	L' agreement on the security of Afghanistan rests on the balance.	Afghanistan is built on balance and security.
109	rice afghanistan resolve bilateral security agreement	In addition, there are a number of projects in the region.	D&apos rice; Afghanistan resolve bilateral security agreement.	Rice d' Afghanistan resolve bilateral security agreement.
109	news wrap susan rice urge afghan president karzai sign security deal	News (s) Susan Rice urges Afghan President Karzai to sign an Afghan security agreement.	News Susan Rice urges Afghan President Karzai to sign a security agreement.	News Susan Rice urges Afghan president Karzai to sign a security agreement.
109	karzai susan rice demand accord extending troop presence	It is also important to keep in mind that there is a need for an extension of the presence of the troops.	The rice karzai susan requires an agreement d'apos; extension of the presence of the troops.	Karzai susan rice requires an agreement to extend the presence of troops.
109	karzai refuse extend troop mandate	Karzai is refusing to extend the troops' mandate.	Karzai has refused to extend the mandate of the troops.	Karzai refuses to extend the mandate of the troops.
109	thorny issue remain troop pullout afghanistan	The withdrawal of Afghan troops from Afghanistan remains a difficult issue.	The withdrawal of the Afghan troops remains a thorny issue.	The issue of Afghan troop withdrawal remains a thorny one.
109	hamid karzai refuse sign afghan security pact	Hamid Karzai refuses to sign the pact.	Hamid Karzai refuses to sign an Afghan security pact.	Hamid Karzai refuses to sign a security pact with Afghanistan.
109	threatens afghanistan troop pull	They're threatening the withdrawal of Afghan troops.	He's threatening the withdrawal of the Afghan troops.	He's threatening Afghan troop withdrawal.
109	rice karzai disagree meeting security pact	Ríz Karzai n&apos, is not a member of the Security Council, is not a member of the Council.	Riz Karzai n' is not withdrawn; agreement with the security pact.	Riz Karzai n' is not d' agreement with security pact.
109	warns karzai sign leave afghanistan	A warning Karzai signing is leaving Laos; Afghanistan.	A warning Karzai signs leave the apos; Afghanistan.	A warning Karzai signs to leave Afghanistan.
109	obama national security adviser afghanistan	National Security Advisor in Afghanistan.	Obama, Afghanistan National Security Advisor.	Obama, national security adviser in Afghanistan.
109	afghanistan drifting apart security pact	L' Afghanistan S' Far from the Security Pact.	Los; Afghanistan s' far from the security pact.	L' Afghanistan s' away from security pact.
109	karzai detail condition signing security pact	Karzai is the only country in the world to have a security agreement.	Karzai details are a condition of signing the security pact.	Karzai detail security pact signature condition.
109	pull troop karzai hold deal	Shoot the hold karzai troop deal.	You know, pulling the karzai hold group deal.	Shoot karzai hold group deal.
109	afghan tribal elder agree afghan security deal	An Afghan Tribe accepts the Apos Security Agreement; an Afghan Tribe.	It is also important to note that there is no such thing as an Afghan tribal council.	An eldest member of an Afghan tribe accepts an Afghan tribal security agreement.
109	afghan president delay signing deal	The President of the Republic of Afghanistan is delaying the signing of the agreement.	The Afghan president has been delaying the signing of the agreement.	The Afghan president delays signing the agreement.
109	pull troop afghan leader hold deal	You're gonna have to take a shot at that leader in Afghanistan.	Shoot at the leader of l' Afghanistan.	Shoot the leader of l' Afghanistan.
109	white house hamid karzai deal troop leaving afghanistan	This is the first time I've heard of a group of people leaving Afghanistan.	White House Hamid Karzai deal troop leaving' Afghanistan.	White House Hamid Karzai deal troop leaving Afghanistan.
109	taliban peace stay	Peace with the Taliban is still there.	Peace with the Taliban stays in place.	And peace with the Taliban remains.
109	concern karzai delay security agreement	Concerns about the delay karzai safety and security agreement.	Concerns about delay karzai security agreement security agreement.	Concerns about karzai delay security agreement security agreement.
109	national security advisor susan rice karzai sign agreement	Susan Rice Karzai, National Security Advisor, signs a deal.	National Security Advisor Susan Rice Karzai signs an agreement.	National security advisor susan rice karzai signs a deal.
109	future security pact afghanistan	Future Security Pact for Afghanistan.	Future security pact in Afghanistan.	The future security pact in Afghanistan.
109	afghan president handed imatum demand security agreement	The Afghan President has handed over his request for a security agreement.	The Afghan President has handed over his request for a new security agreement to Afghanistan.	The Afghan president handed over imatum request for a security agreement.
109	rice karzai face face meeting disagreement afghan security	Karzai rice faces a dilemma over Afghan security.	Karzai rice faces a rift over security in Afghanistan.	There is a disagreement over Afghan security over karzai rice.
109	nato post afghan mission uncertain	This is the first time I've been in the United States.	Uncertain post-Afghan mission from NATO.	Mission post-Afghan uncertain from NATO.
109	susan rice meet hamid karzai tension rise troop agreement	Ríz susan meet Hamid Karzai and raise the level of tension; accord the troops.	Rice susan meet Hamid Karzai tension rise the apos; agreement of the troops.	Riz susan meet Hamid Karzai tension rise the apos; agreement of troops.
109	ignore karzai press	Ignore the Karzai Newspaper.	Ignore Karzai press.	And ignore the Karzai press.
109	afghan president karzai stand refusal sign deal	Karzai, the Afghan president, will refuse the deal.	The Afghan President Karzai will refuse the apos; agreement.	Afghanistan's President Karzai will refuse to accept the terms of the deal.
109	warns karzai leave troop afghanistan	Warns Karzai that he is leaving the troops in Afghanistan.	Warns Karzai that he's leaving Afghanistan.	Karzai warns that he is leaving the troops in Afghanistan.
109	afghanistan karzai seek security deal condition	Afghanistan Karzai is trying to get the terms of the agreement.	Afghanistan Karzai seeks to obtain the condition of d' a security agreement.	Afghanistan Karzai seeking condition d' security agreement.
109	afghan elder endorse troop presence president karzai refuse	President Karzai's rejection of the presence of troops is supported by an Afghan elder.	An Afghan elder supports the presence of troops that President Karzai is refusing.	An Afghan elder supports the presence of troops President Karzai denies.
109	afghan president proposes term withdrawal	The Afghan President is proposing the removal of the mandate.	The Afghan President proposes to withdraw the mandate.	The Afghan president proposes the withdrawal of the mandate.
109	afghan leader rice odds security deal	Afghanistan's security agreement with Afghanistan's leader, Rice, is likely to be concluded soon.	The Afghan leader Rice's security agreement has a chance of being concluded.	L' Afghan leader Rice's security agreement stands a chance.
109	karzai defies loya jirga security pact	Karzai is defying the Loya Jirga security pact.	Karzai defies the Loya Jirga security pact.	Karzai defies the security pact Loya Jirga.
109	karzai add demand meeting susan rice	Karzai add the request meet Susan Rice.	Karzai add the request meet susan rice.	Karzai add the request to meet your susan rice needs.
109	obama visiting security adviser karzai sign agreement	Obama visits security advisor Karzai signing a deal.	Obama is visiting security advisor Karzai, signing a deal.	Obama's visiting security advisor Karzai to sign an agreement.
109	karzai refusal sign frustrates afghan	It's a good thing that you're doing.	The sign of rejection karzai frustrates the apos; Afghanistan.	The karzai rejection sign frustrates Afghanistan.
109	meeting rice karzai balk quick signing bsa add condition	To meet Riz Karzai and quickly sign the BSA adds a condition.	Meeting Riz Karzai and quickly signing the BSA agreement add a condition.	Meeting Riz Karzai and signing the BSA add a condition.
109	taliban militant slam afghan elder approving security pact	Taliban activist Slam, senior Afghani, endorsing the security pact.	Afghan elder Taliban activist Slam endorsing the security pact.	Taliban militant elder Afghan Slam endorsing the security pact.
109	afghan president defies security pact add demand	The Afghan President is defying the security pact.	The Afghan president defies the security pact.	Afghanistan's president defies security pact.
109	troop afghanistan	Army soldiers.	Soldiers of Afghanistan.	Hey, Afghan soldiers.
110	curiosity return normal vo age level resume regular duty	It is also important to remember that this is not the only way to get the job done.	For reasons of curiosity, return to normal y level of d' age return to regular service.	Out of curiosity, return to normal y level d' age resume regular service.
110	zapped mar rover curiosity short circuit	The short-circuit of rover's curiosity s&apos has been stopped.	The short-circuit of curiosity rover s&apos is stopped.	Short-circuit of rover curiosity s&apos is stopped.
110	curiosity update sol electrical problem delay rover	Curiosity updated sol problem electrical delay rover.	Curiosity updated ground electrical problem delays rover.	Curiosity updated sol electrical problem delayed rover.
110	mar curiosity rover suffers electrical problem	The robot of curiosity, it has an electrical problem.	Well, the curiosity robot has an electrical problem.	There's an electrical problem with the curiosity robot.
110	mar rover work diagnosis electrical glitch	Diagnosis of the electrical problem of working marver rover.	Diagnosis of the electrical problem at marver rover work.	Electrical problem diagnosis of marver rover work.
110	curiosity resume science operation mar	This was the first time that the project had been carried out.	Curiosity returns to scientific operation mar.	The curiosity resumed the scientific operation Mar.
110	engineer test check vo age change mar rover curiosity	This is the first time you'll be able to find out what you're looking for.	Test d' engineer changes your age rover curiosity.	Tests d' engineer sa age changes marver curiosity rover.
110	electrical problem nasa mar rover curiosity operation hold	Electrical problem Nasa Mar rover is a curiosity maintenance operation.	Electric problem Nasa Mar rover curiosity backup operation; order.	Electrical problem Nasa Mar rover curiosity operation to maintain order.
110	mar rover curiosity resume roving	The curiosity of rover marvellous people returns to its normal course by wandering.	Once again, the curiosity of rover marvellers wanders.	Marver rover curiosity goes on and on.
110	follow mar rover curiosity nova december pm	Follow the rover nova's curiosity of December pm.	Follow the curiosity of rover nova of December, pm.	Follow rover nova curiosity in December pm.
110	curiosity mar rover	Rover curiosity.	Curiosity rover.	Uh, curiosity rover.
110	curiosity resume science ops analysis vo age issue	Take a look at the scientific operations.	For reasons of curiosity, go back to the map; analysis of the scientific operations.	Out of curiosity, repeat the apos; analysis of scientific operations.
110	budget cut leave curiosity cassini limbo	The budget cuts have left the curiosity cassini limbo.	But budget cuts leave curiosity cassini limbo.	Budget cuts leave curiosity cassini limbo.
110	nasa curiosity rover experience glitch work	Nasa rover curiosity do l' experience working bugs.	Nasa curiosity rover l' experience working with bugs.	Nasa curiosity rover l' experience working bugs.
110	mar rover curiosity bounce electrical glitch	It's not a problem, it's not a problem.	A robot marmer bounces off an electrical bug.	The curiosity of apos; a robot bounces off an electrical bug.
110	curiosity operation hold suffering glitch	Operation of curiosity, hold up pain bugs.	Curiosity operation hold suffering bugs.	Curiosity operation hold suffering bugs.
110	curiosity resume science analysis vo age issue	It's just a matter of time before we get to know each other.	Curiosity returns to scientific analysis of the problem of age.	Curiosity resumes the scientific analysis of the age problem.
110	nasa diagnosing problem mar rover curiosity	Nasa Diagnosing Problem Marver Curiosity rover.	NASA diagnosing marver problem curiosity rover.	Nasa diagnosing problem marver curiosity rover.
110	mar rover curiosity collecting data electrical glitch	Curiosity d&apos, a robot that collects electrical problem data.	D&apos is a robot that collects data on an electrical problem.	Curiosity d' a robot collecting data on an electrical problem.
110	nasa mar rover resume work electrical glitch	Nasa Mar Rover resume electrical bug work.	Nasa Mar Rover go back to work electrical bug.	Nasa Mar Rover resume work electrical bug.
110	patchett essay collection fall short	The collection of essays and essays is incomplete.	The collection d' patchett tests is incomplete.	The patchett test collection is incomplete.
110	water future mar astronaut	Water down the future Mar astronaut.	Make sure you water the future Mar Astronaut.	Water future astronaut Mar.
110	obama honor clinton oprah freedom medal	Obama honours oprah clinton medal of freedom.	Obama honored clinton oprah medal of freedom.	Obama honor clinton oprah freedom medal.
110	nasa mar rover curiosity running	Nasa Marver is the name of Nasa Marver.	Nasa Marver curiosity from rover running.	Nasa Marver curiosity running rover.
110	curiosity resume week second glitch month	I'm very excited to get back to the second week of the bug month.	Curiosity resuming the week second month bug month.	Curiosity resume the week second month of bug-month.
110	curiosity electrical issue resolved	The problem of electricity has been solved out of curiosity.	Out of curiosity, the electricity problem was solved.	Out of curiosity the problem of electricity has been solved.
110	nasa curiosity bounce electrical glitch	The curiosity of NASA bursts an electrical glitch.	NASA's curiosity bursts into an electrical glitch.	An electrical glitch is triggered by NASA's curiosity.
111	study fire ant raft lead development healing	Studying the healing of life rafts of fire ants.	Studying the healing of fire ant rafts?	Study fire ant raft healing.
111	watch fire ant body form living architecture	Watch as the body of the fire ant forms into a living architecture.	Watch the body of the fire ant form a living architecture.	Watch the fire ant's body form living architecture.
111	scientist studying nature fire ant	Science student nature's ants.	I'm a scientist, studying the history of nature's ants.	I'm a scientist studying nature's ants.
111	mob fire ant kind material	Ants are being shot at by crowds.	The mob's firing at the ants.	And the crowds are shooting at the ants.
111	mystery fire ant survive flood solved insect hook leg	Fire ant survived the flood.	The fire ant survived the flood.	The fire ant is a survivor of the flood.
111	fire ant form body raft stave watery doom	Fire ants are a raft.	The fire ants form a raft.	Fire ants form a raft, and fire ants form a raft.
111	flexible stretchable fire ant raft	Flexible life raft of fire ants.	Fire ant flexible extension rafts.	Flexible fire ant life raft.
111	bizarre fire ant raft survive constant flood	The life raft survives a constant flood.	This fire ant raft survives a constant flood.	The fire ant raft survives constant flooding.
111	amazing viscoelasticity observed structure comprised fire ant	The observed structure, d' an astonishing viscoelasticity, was found to include fire ants.	The observed d&apos, an astonishing viscoelasticity, included fire ants.	An astonishing viscoelasticity of the observed structure included fire ants.
111	fire ant writhe unsinkable raft	Fire ant replenishment.	It's time to replenish the fire ant.	Putting the fire ant back.
111	fire ant raft inspire material science	The life raft of the fire ants inspires the science of materials.	The fire ant raft inspires material science in the field.	The fire ant raft inspires material science.
111	wildlife fire ant raft inspiring mater	Ant rafts are a source of inspiration for wild animals.	Wild animals make ant rafts a source of inspiration for ants.	Wild animals make ant rafts a source of inspiration.
111	fire ant ability form stretchable floating raft	Ability of fire ants to form expandable floating life rafts.	The ability of the fire ant to form a flexible, expandable fire ant life raft.	The ability of the fire ant to form an expandable floating raft.
111	video fire ant superpower inspire healing bridge	Super-powers of video fire ants are inspiring bridges of healing.	The super-powers of video fire ants inspire bridges of healing.	The super-powers of video fire ants inspire healing bridges.
111	bizarre fire ant lock form big raft survive flood	It was the first time that a large raft of fire ants survived the flood.	A large raft of fire ants survived the flood.	A large fire ant raft survived the flood.
111	fire ant superpower inspire healing material video	The super-powers of fire ants are the inspiration for the video of the healing materials.	The super-powers of fire ants inspire the video of the healing materials.	Super-fire ant powers inspire healing material video.
111	fire ant epitome unity heal	Fire ant, symbol of unity, heals.	The ant of fire, symbol of the apos; unity, heals.	The fire ant symbol of unity heals.
112	chandler jones tom brady earn league recognition	Tom Brady won the league's recognition.	Chandler Jones Tom Brady won the league's recognition at the end of the season.	Chandler Jones Tom Brady wins league recognition.
112	chandler jones named afc defensive player month	Chandler Jones named it Afc Defensive Player Month.	Chandler Jones has named this month the Fasc Defensive Player Month.	The month of the afc defensive player was named by Chandler Jones.
112	chandler jones firmly running defensive player year award	Chandler Jones runs firmly defensive year's year-award player.	Chandler Jones is a strong defensive player year award-winning player.	Chandler Jones runs firmly defensive player year award year&apos.
112	chandler jones win afc defensive player month honor	Chandler Jones wins the Month of Apos; Defensive Player Honour.	Chandler Jones wins the month of apos; honor of the defensive player afc.	Chandler Jones wins the month of apos; defensive player honor afc.
112	chandler jones awarded afc defensive player month sack	Chandler Jones awarded the Rucksack-to-Retail Defensive Player.	Chandler Jones awarded the Afc Rucksack-to-Range Defensive Player.	Chandler Jones honored defensive player afc Backpacking Months.
112	tom brady chandler jones earn honor	I think Tom Brady Chandler Jones deserves the honor.	Tom Brady Chandler Jones deserved the honour.	I'd like to say that Tom Brady Chandler Jones deserves an honor.
112	tom brady named afc offensive player week	Tom Brady is the newest member of the AFC.	Tom Brady named offensive player week.	AFC offensive player week named Tom Brady.
112	jones named afc defensive player month	Jones named it Afc Defensive Player Month.	Jones named defensive defensive month afc.	Jones named the month of the afc defensive player.
112	brady jones capture afc honor	Brady Jones s' l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos.	Brady Jones se' grab l' honor af.	Brady Jones s' seizing honor afc.
112	chandler jones win patriot defensive player month award	The Patriot Defensive Player Month Award goes to Chandler Jones.	Chandler Jones won the Patriot Defensive Player Month Award.	The team won the Patriot Defensive Player Month Award from Chandler Jones.
112	brady named afc offensive player week	Brady named offensive player Afc player week.	Brady's named Afc offensive player week.	Brady named afc offensive player week.
112	chandler jones tom brady pick afc honor	Tom Brady Pick Afc Honor.	Chandler Jones, Tom Brady, Afc Honor pick.	Chandler Jones Tom Brady pick apple honor.
113	breast cancer screening lead unnecessary treatment	Breast screening leads to unnecessary treatment.	Breast cancer screening leads to unnecessary treatment.	Well, breast cancer screening leads to unnecessary treatment.
113	woman test negative brca mutation face higher	Female negative mutation brca face negative higher.	Female test negative for mutation.	Female negative brca mutation face higher.
113	negative brca test imply lower cancer risk	A negative Brca implies a lower risk of cancer.	A negative Brca test implies a lower risk of cancer.	A negative Brca test implies a lower cancer risk than a negative Brca test.
113	breast cancer screening extended younger woman study	Breast Cancer Screening: Prolonged Study in Younger Women.	Screening for breast cancer: an extended breast screening study in younger women.	Breast cancer screening in younger women: extended study.
113	breast cancer gene test negative risk persist	There is a continuing risk of negative test results for the breast cancer gene.	The risk of negative results in the breast cancer gene test remains.	The risk of a negative breast cancer gene test remains.
113	cancer charity share marathon bahamas assist organization	Bahamuses-Cancer Charity Marathon are helping the organization.	The organization is assisted by the-Cancer Charity Marathon.	The-cancer charity marathon bahamas help the organization.
113	men face smaller risk breast cancer	Men are less likely to develop breast cancer.	The risks of breast cancer are lower in men.	The risk of breast cancer is lower in men.
113	negative brca test lower breast cancer risk	Brca Negative Tests Reducing the Risk of Breast Cancer.	Brca negative tests that decrease the risk of breast cancer.	Negative Brca tests decreasing breast cancer risk.
113	genetic testing breast cancer	Genetic Screening Breast Cancer.	Genetic screening breast cancer.	Breast cancer genetic screening.
113	nyt israel push screen cancer gene leaf conflicted	The leaf of the cancer gene nyt israel push screen was in conflict with the leaf of the cancer gene.	The cancer gene leaf nyt israel push screen conflicted with the cancer gene leaf.	The nyt israel push screen cancer gene leaf conflicted with the cancer gene leaf.
113	brca negative reduce cancer risk	You know, Brca-negative reduces the risk of cancer.	Brca negative reduces your risk of cancer.	Brca negative reduces cancer risk.
113	breast cancer gene test negative risk persist study	A Persistent Study of the Risk of Negatively Tested Breast Cancer.	Persistent breast cancer risk negative study.	Persistent breast cancer risk study tested negative.
113	acr sbi cancer study breast cancer screening needed younger	The Canadian Breast Cancer Screening Strategy (CBCRS) was developed in collaboration with the Canadian Breast Cancer Network.	There was a need for younger breast cancer screening.	There was a need for breast cancer screening at a younger age.
113	negative brca gene test lower breast cancer risk	Brca Negative Genetic Test to Reduce the Risk of Breast Cancer.	Brca negative gene test to reduce the risk of breast cancer.	Brca negative gene test to reduce breast cancer risk.
114	indonesia australia spying row eas agree work code	Indonesia, Australia, Australia, Australia, Australia, and the United States.	Indonesia australia espionage rang is d' accord labor code.	Indonesia australia spying row is a labor code agreement.
114	sby disappointed abbott letter	Sby let down Abbott letter abbott.	Well, Sby disappointed Abbott letter abbott.	Sby disappointed Abbott letter Abbott.
114	indonesian president susilo bambang yudhoyono precise measure	The Indonesian president bambang susilo yudhoyono measures precisely.	Indonesia's president susilo bambang yudhoyono is precise measurement.	The Indonesian president susilo bambang yudhoyono precise measure.
114	navy stay jakarta zone	The Jakarta area remains the Navy.	The navy is still Jakarta's area of responsibility.	The navy remains Jakarta.
114	sight australia indonesia spy crisis	View of the maple leaf; Australia crisis; Indonesia espionage.	View of the Apos; Australia crisis; espionage indonesia.	View of the apo; Australia crisis; indonesia espionage.
114	abbott call indonesia security talk spy claim	As a spy, Abbott called the Apos; Indonesia Security Talk.	Abbott calls the apos; indonesia Security Talk as their spy.	"Abbott uses the word ""Spy"" to refer to it as an indonesia security talk."
114	sby conduct agreement australia indonesia	This is Australia Indonesia Driving Agreement.	Australia indonesia agreement.	Agreement to drive australia indonesia.
114	indonesian protest australia war memorial spying	Indonesian protest, Australian National War Memorial, espionage.	Indonesian protest, Australian war memorial, espionage, etc.	Indonesian protest, Australian war memorial, espionage.
114	code conduct ease diplomatic tension	Diplomatic tensions are eased by the Code of Conduct.	The code of conduct eases some diplomatic tensions.	The code of conduct will ease diplomatic tensions.
114	shorten pleased indonesia sign	It's a good sign, but it's a good sign.	Shorten the happy signs of apos; indonesia happy sign.	The happy signs of apos shorten; indonesia sign happy.
114	trade minister andrew robb denies breaking protocol spying	Minister of Trade and Commerce Andrew Robb denies any breach of the protocol.	Trade Minister Andrew Robb denies any breach of protocol.	Trade Minister Andrew Robb denies violating the protocol of espionage.
114	australia pm conciliatory indonesia	Australian Institute for Health Information.	Australia pm conciliation indonesia indonesia.	Australia pm conciliation indonesia indonesia.
114	indonesian au envoy meet resolve snooping	Indonesian to Envoy meet resolution snooping.	Indonesian to the envoy meet resolution snoop.	Indonesian to the envoy meet snooping resolution.
114	thinker strategic interest	Strategic thinking.	Strategic interest in thinkers.	It's a strategic interest for thinkers.
114	abbott proposes roundtable jakarta mend tie spy row	Abbott is proposing to organize a round table in Jakarta for the storage of spies.	Abbott proposes to organize a round table in Jakarta for the storage of the spies.	Abbott proposes to organize a roundtable in Jakarta for spy storage.
114	govt minister andrew robb backtracks tapping confirmation	Minister Robb goes back on his confirmation.	Minister Andrew Robb retraced the confirmation.	And Minister Andrew Robb goes back on his confirmation.
114	indonesian protest memorial	Indonesian Memorial of Protest.	Indonesian memorial of protest.	A memorial of protest in Indonesia.
114	australia pm abbott aim indonesia spying row	Pm Abbott is targeting Indonesia Spying Row.	Australia Pm Abbott targets Indonesia Spying Row.	Australia Pm Abbott's aim is Indonesia Spying Row.
114	tension ease indonesia australia spying row	Tension loosened Indonesia Australia's rank of espionage.	Tension is loosening Indonesia australia the row of apos; espionage.	The tension relaxed Indonesia australia the row of apos; espionage.
114	pm indonesia proposed meeting trusted envoy	L' Indonesia has offered to meet with a trusted envoy.	L' Indonesia offers to meet a trusted envoy.	L' Indonesia suggests meeting a trusted envoy.
114	sby satisfied abbott response	This was the first time in the history of the industry.	Sby satisfied the Abbott response.	Sby satisfied the response from Abbott.
114	indonesian president send envoy mend tie australia	The president of Indonesia is sending an emissary to fix the tie australia.	The Indonesian president is sending an emissary to fix tie australia.	The Indonesian president is sending a tie australia emissary.
114	shorten pleased indon aust sign	To make the sign shorter and easier to use.	To shorten the sign width satisfies indon aust.	Satisfy indon aust sign shorten.
114	indonesian president angry apology abbott spy scandal	The president of Indonesia apologizes for the outrage of Abbott; spying.	Angry Indonesian president excuses Abbott scandal; spying.	Angry Indonesian president excuses Abbott scandal d'apos; spying.
114	australian intervention	Australian intervention.	That's an Australian intervention.	Uh, Australian intervention.
114	indonesia maintains suspended relation australia spying allegation	Indonesia continues to maintain the suspended relationship of the allegations of Australian espionage.	Indonesia maintains the suspended australia relationship of the allegations of Australia espionage.	Indonesia maintains suspended australia relationship with allegations of Australian espionage.
114	echo chamber fresh air	The room was very clean and the room was very clean.	L' fresh air from the hotel room; echo from the air.	L' fresh air from the room; air.
114	snooping row indonesian australian envoy meet	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Australian snooping rogue sent to Indonesia to meet him.	Australian snooping rod sent to meet Indonesian meet.
114	australia seek security dialogue indonesia	L' Australia is looking for an Indo-American security dialogue.	L' Australia seeks Indonesia security dialogue.	L' Australia seeks a security dialogue indonesia.
114	australia seek talk indonesia spy row	Lapos; Australia seeks to speak of apos; lupus corridor; spying.	Australia seeks to speak of Apos; indonesia the corridor of Apos; espionage.	Australia seeks to talk about apos; indonesia the corridor of apos; espionage.
114	australia time reflect indonesia response spying	This is the first time in the history of the United States.	The Australian weather reflects the indonesia response to spying.	Australian time reflects the indonesia response to espionage.
114	diplomatic thaw point indonesian president yudhoyono angry spying	Diplomacy thaw point President of Indonesia yudhoyono anger angry spying.	Diplomacy thaw point Indonesian president yudhoyono anger angry espionage.	Diplomacy thaw point Indonesian President yudhoyono angry spying anger.
114	spying target stren hen phone security	Spying on the target makes it safer for the chickens to talk on the phone.	Spying on the target will increase the security of the hens.	Hens' phone security is enhanced by spying on the target.
114	australia pm seek security dialogue indonesia spy row	Australia will be looking for the Indonesia spy row security dialogue.	Australia pm search for the security dialogue Indonesia spy row.	Australia pm seek security dialogue Indonesia spy row.
114	envoy meet mend spying rift	They're getting together to fix the gap in intelligence.	Sent to meet to repair the fault of the spying.	Sent to meet to repair loophole; spying.
114	rush hour story today	Rush time today.	History of the apos; rush hour today; hui.	Rocket history, rush hour today.
114	indonesia summons singapore ambassador spying report	In the meantime, Indonesia calls on the Singaporean ambassador for a report on espionage.	L' Indonesia summons the ambassador of Singapore for a report on espionage.	Indonesia summons the Singaporean ambassador for a spying report.
114	abbott ship state choppy water lie ahead	The turbulent waters of Abbott are now right in front of us.	The turbulent waters of Abbott are ahead of us.	We've got a lot of turbulent water ahead of us, and we've got it.
114	bishop ready visit jakarta soothe spy row	L' bishop is ready to visit the city of Jakarta to appease the spies.	L' bishop is ready to visit Jakarta to appease the spies.	L' bishop is ready to visit Jakarta to appease spies.
114	australia pm security roundtable indonesia	Australian Security Roundtable, Indonesia.	Roundtable on Australian Security, Indonesia.	Roundtable on security in Australia, Indonesia.
114	indonesia spying dispute julie bishop called play envoy role	Indonesia spies Julie Bishop called the part of the apos; special envoy.	L' indonesia spies dispute Julie Bishop has called the role of l' special envoy.	L' indonesia spies dispute Julie Bishop called the role of special envoy.
114	aust indon envoy heal rift	India heals the fracture.	An emissary from the apos; India heals the fracture.	It's the only way to heal the rift.
114	julie bishop fill jakarta peacemaking role	Julie Bishop plays peacemaker in Jakarta.	Julie Bishop plays the role of Peacemaker in Jakarta, Indonesia.	Julie Bishop plays the peacemaker role in Jakarta.
114	sby code conduct set	Code of Conduct Series sby.	Sby code of conduct.	Code of conduct sby set.
114	indonesia send representative australia heated spat spying	L&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos.	L' indonesia sent representing the apos; warm Australia spat spat spat.	L' indonesia sends representatives Australia hot spat spat spat.
114	indonesia parliament hearing spying	There is talk of espionage in the Indonesian parliament.	The Indonesian parliament heard about the espionage.	Indonesian parliament hears about espionage.
114	singapore ambassador indonesia summoned report spying	He said that he would like to see a report on the situation in the region.	Indonesia, the ambassador of Singapore, asked for a report on espionage.	The ambassador of Singapore, Indonesia, called for a spying report.
114	party game prime minister tony abbott calm approach smoothed	Prime Minister Tony Abbott quiet party coming up flat.	Prime Minister Tony Abbott quiet party game is approaching flattening.	Prime Minister Tony Abbott quiet party game approaching flatten.
114	abbott call indonesia security talk spy claim	As a spy, Abbott called the Apos; Indonesia Security Talk.	Abbott calls the apos; indonesia Security Talk as their spy.	"Abbott uses the word ""Spy"" to refer to it as an indonesia security talk."
114	abbott sends letter indonesia australia cut	Abbott sends a letter, indonesia australia coupé.	Abbott sent a letter indonesia australia coupé.	Abbott sends letter indonesia australia cut.
114	susilo bambang yudhoyono angry lack apology tony abbott	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Susilo bambang yudhoyono anger lack of apos; apology Tony Abbott Tony Abbott.	Susilo bambang yudhoyono anger lack apology Tony Abbott Tony Abbott.
114	tyranny parochialism	Tyrannie is a narrow-mindedness.	Narrow tyranny of the mind.	Narrow tyranny of mind.
114	andrew robb departs script confirming indonesian phone tapping	And then Andrew Robb left the script confirming Indonesian phone tapping.	Andrew Robb left the script confirming Indonesian phone tapping.	Robb left the script confirming Indonesian phone tapping.
115	hot mom kicked facebook obesity comment	Comment on L'apos; Obesity from Facebook d' Sexy Mother.	The comment on l' obesity from facebook d' a sexy mother.	The facebook obesity comment from d' a sexy mother.
115	fat shaming mum banned facebook attacking curvy woman selfies	The mother, ashamed of doing this, decided to use Facebook to make selfies.	The mother, who was ashamed of having done this, decided to use Facebook to do selfies.	It's just that the mother, who's ashamed of doing this, decided to use Facebook to do her own selfies.
115	facebook hot mom stir controversy	There's this sexy mom on Facebook that's really stirring up controversy.	Sexy mom on Facebook raises controversy.	There's controversy about a sexy mom on Facebook.
115	hot mom maria kang temporarily barred facebook	Sexy mom, Maria Kang, has temporarily blocked Facebook.	Sexy mom Maria Kang has temporarily blocked facebook.	The hot mom Maria Kang has temporarily blocked facebook.
115	hot mum cop facebook ban fat hate speech	Sexy facebook cop mom greasy hate speech.	Hey, sexy cop mom facebook greasy hate speech.	Sexy cop facebook mom greasy hate speech banner.
115	fit mom explains banned facebook	Healthy Mummy explains that facebook is not allowed.	Mother healthy explains that facebook is forbidden.	Healthy mom explains that facebook is forbidden.
115	fit mom maria kang banned facebook obesity comment	Mother Maria Kang banished the comment on l' obesity on Facebook.	Mom Maria Kang banned the comment on l' obesity blog on Facebook.	Maria Kang's mom banned the comment on l' obesity on Facebook.
115	fitness obsessed mom banned facebook	A fitness-obsessed mother banished facebook.	A fitness-obsessed mother banned facebook from the school.	A fitness-obsessed mom banned facebook.
115	overweight woman body mom blocked	Woman overweight, woman's body, mother's blocked.	A woman overweight, a woman's body, a mother trapped.	Overweight woman, body of woman, blocked mother.
115	hot mom maria kang suspended facebook hate speech	Sexy mom Maria Kang suspended Facebook hate speech.	Sexy Mom Maria Kang suspended hate speech on Facebook.	Sexy mom Maria Kang suspended hate speech on Facebook.
115	fit mom lash regular woman selfies	The mother of the victim is a woman.	The mother of the victim is a woman.	Well, the victim's mother is a woman.
115	maria kang locked facebook condemning selfies size	Maria Kang has locked her facebook, condemning the size of selfies.	Maria Kang locked facebook condemning the size of the selfies.	Maria Kang locked facebook condemning selfies size.
116	coming weekly jobless claim durable good	L&apos, a weekly arrival without a job, demands a long-term supply of goods and services.	L' a weekly arrival without a job claims a durable good.	L' weekly jobless claim long-term property.
116	good news bad news jobless claim dip key order drop	Good news bad news unemployed claim drop command key dip dip.	Good news bad news without a job claim dip key drop command.	Good news bad news jobless claim dip key drop command.
116	durable good soft middle	It's long-lasting, it's good, it's sweet, it's medium, it's sweet, it's durable.	Sustainable, good, sweet, medium, sweet and durable.	Sustainable, good, soft, medium, soft and durable.
116	ahead bell durable good	Long-lasting bell, good, good.	Forward, durable bell, good, good, good, good.	Forward, durable bell, good, good.
116	durable good order drop october	Good Sustainable Order falls in October.	Good order falls in October.	Sustainable good order falls in October.
116	jobless claim outweigh weak durable good order	Absence of unemployment prevails; absence of jobs; lasting order.	The absence of unemployment prevails over the absence of sustainable order.	The absence of unemployment prevails; the absence of jobs; the order is long-lasting.
116	durable good order drop october	Good Sustainable Order falls in October.	Good order falls in October.	Sustainable good order falls in October.
116	order long lasting good drop october	Long-Term Order Good Fall October.	Long-term order good fall October.	Long-distance long-distance order good October fall.
116	durable good order data week ahead	Data on durable purchase orders will be available next week.	Next week, durable order data will be available to you.	Next week durable order data will be available.
116	dollar steady ahead durable good order jobless claim data	In addition to the above, there are a number of other issues that may be of interest to the Panel.	In constant dollars, advance, the data on claims out of service of durable good order.	In constant dollars advance, data on non-employment durable good order claims.
116	table oct durable good order fall pct	Table oct good autumn order pct.	Table oct durable good autumn order pct.	Table oct durable good order autumn pct.
116	durable good order fall october	Good Sustainable Order at l'apos; Autumn October.	Good order in autumn of October.	Good lasting order at l'apos; fall October.
116	durable good order report terrible	Terrible, good, lasting relationship.	The good and lasting relationship terrible.	Good order lasting terrible report.
116	stock future higher open durable good order jobless claim	In addition to the above, there are a number of other companies that have been involved in the construction of the building.	Future stock, higher, claims, unemployment compensation for certificates, open and sustainable order.	Future stock, higher stock, claim for unemployment insurance; unemployment benefit for unemployment insurance; open and sustainable order.
116	durable good order fall october core order	Good Sustainable Order at L'apos; Autumn, Central Order of October.	Good order lasting at home; autumn, central order of October.	Good order in the fall, central order in October.
116	economic data thanksgiving week	Economic Data Thanksgiving week.	Economic data Thanksgiving week?	Hey, economic data Thanksgiving week.
116	durable good contract dollar correction tap	A good long-term contract, a taps correction dollar contract.	Good long-term contract, dollar correction faucet, contract.	A good long-term contract dollar correction valve contract.
116	durable good order slipped october	Good Sustainable Order slipped in October.	The good and lasting order slipped in October.	Sustainable good order slipped in October.
116	durable good order drop shutdown hurt confidence	It's a good thing, but it's a good thing and it's a good thing.	L' definitive cessation of apos; cessation d' a good order system damaged self-confidence.	A good order system has damaged self-confidence.
116	spotlight economy big pre thanksgiving plate data	It's a good place to start, but it's a good place to start.	Spotlight on the apo; economy, plate data before Thanksgiving.	Spotlight on savings, plate data before Thanksgiving.
116	durable good order drop october	Good Sustainable Order falls in October.	Good order falls in October.	Sustainable good order falls in October.
116	mixed news economy manufacturing jobless	Mixed information makes unemployed unemployed people unemployed.	L' l&apos economy; mixed information makes unemployed unemployed.	L' economy of l' mixed information produces unemployed jobless.
116	job picture improving manufacturing slowing	The image of manufacturing-enhancing employment slows down production.	L' image de l' employment improving manufacturing processes slows down production.	The image of jobs improving manufacturing is slowing down production.
116	dollar steady durable good order jobless claim data	Dollars of stable and enduring unemployment insurance claims data.	Data on stable and enduring dollar-denominated unemployment insurance claims.	UI claim data are stable and long-term in terms of dollar value.
116	jobless claim durable good order lower	An unemployed person declares that he or she is in a good and sustainable order that is inferior to the unemployed person.	Unemployed people report a good sustainable order that is lower than the unemployed.	An unemployed person declares a good lasting order lower than an unemployed person.
116	durable good weakens expected october	The long-lasting good is now in ruins in October.	Sustainable good s' weakens in October.	The durable good s&apos weakens in October.
116	labor data durable good tap	D' after the data of sustainable work good taps and valves.	D' after sustainable working data good valves durable.	D' after the data of durable work good sustainable valves.
116	durable good order fall estimate october	Appraisal of apo, apo fall, October for sustainable order.	It's a good place to live, but it's a good place to live.	Estimation of time; autumn; October for sustainable good order.
117	epa underestimated methane emission percent	L' U.S. EPA has under-estimated the percentage of emissions of methane.	EPA has estimated the percentage of methane emissions under @-@.	L' EPA under-estimated the percentage of methane emissions.
117	study spewing methane epa	Study how to spit out methane.	Study how to spit out methane.	To study how to spit out methane.
117	bridge bombshell study find methane emission natural gas	L' Bridge Bomb Study finds that methane emits natural gas.	L' study of the bridge bomb finds that methane emits natural gas.	L' bridge bomb study finds that natural gas is emitted by methane.
117	project rise methane emission mu iple time	Climate Change Project; Increased Methane Emissions Time.	Project description; increase in methane emissions over time.	Project description; time-related methane emission increase.
117	methane emission vastly surpass previous estimate	Methane far exceeds previous estimates.	Methane emissions far exceed previous estimates.	Emissions of methane far exceed previous estimates.
117	study find greatly underestimated methane emission	Study shows that methane emissions are largely under-estimated.	L' study reveals that the methane emissions are largely under-estimated.	L' study shows methane emissions are largely under-estimated.
117	high methane emission blamed leak	High methane emissions were attributed to leaks.	Elevated methane emissions blamed leaks on leaks.	The high methane emissions blamed the leaks on the leaks.
117	emission methane exceed estimate study find	Methane emissions are higher than estimated in the Finding and Finding study.	Methane emissions exceed the estimates of the research finding the causes; study finding.	Methane emissions exceed appendix estimates; study find appendix; study find.
117	pumping methane atmosphere government	Government pumps in the methane atmosphere.	The government pumps it out; methane atmosphere.	The government pumps methane atmosphere.
117	study reveals methane emission higher government suggests	The study shows that methane emissions are higher than that suggested by the government.	The study concludes that methane emissions are higher than the government suggests.	The study shows that methane emissions are higher than government suggests.
117	filibuster reform matter	Reforming the filibuster system is an important issue.	Filibuster reform is an important issue.	The filibuster reform is an important issue.
117	methane emission exceed government estimate study report	Emissions from the combustion of fossil fuels are estimated to be about 10 per cent below 1990 levels.	Methane emissions exceed government estimates as reported in the report.	Methane emissions exceed government estimates in report d&apos.
117	big methane burp cow fart greater problem epa thought	The methane-burning fat cow blows up the big problem that we had; she thought she was the problem.	The big cow belching the methane blows up the big problem that we had; she thought that she was the problem.	The big cow burping the methane blows up the big problem that we thought was the problem.
117	methane emission epa measure	Measurement of Methane Emissions epa.	Methane emission measurement epa.	Methane emission measurement epa.
117	harvard study challenge epa greenhouse gas figure	It's just a matter of time before we get to know each other.	Harvard questioned the greenhouse gas numbers.	The Harvard study questions greenhouse gas numbers.
117	methane emission exceed estimate percent	Methane exceeds the estimated percentage.	Methane emissions exceed the estimated percent.	The methane emissions exceed the estimated percentage.
117	study spewing methane reported kansa blamed	L&apos, a methane-drenching study, has revealed that the kansa is to blame.	L' study on methane dripping revealed that the kansa was to blame.	L' methane drainage study revealed kansa to blame.
117	emitting methane epa calculation study	Methane emission and design study.	Methane emission epa design study.	Emission of methane epa design study.
117	greenhouse emission natural gas production agricu ure higher	Higher Greenhouse Gas Emissions Production of Agricultural Natural Gas.	Emissions of greenhouse gases from the production of agricultural natural gas are higher.	Higher greenhouse gas emissions Agricultural natural gas production.
117	methane emission greatly underestimated gas oil production yield	Methane emissions largely under-estimated the yield from diesel production.	Methane emissions have greatly under-estimated the yield from diesel production.	Methane emissions were found to be much lower than-estimated gas oil production efficiency.
117	cow fart larger greenhouse gas impact thought	Cow farts greater impact of greenhouse gases thought.	The cow farts greater impact of greenhouse gases thought.	The cow farts greater greenhouse gas impact thought.
117	study methane emission exceed estimate	Emissions of methane from the combustion of fossil fuels are estimated to be up to 10 Mt.	Methane emissions from the study exceed the estimated estimate.	Climate change study methane emissions exceed estimated estimate.
117	study emits methane thought	L' D&apos study; D&apos derivation; Methane thought; D&apos study; Study.	It's a study of the Earth's atmosphere; a thought of the Earth's methane; a study of the Earth's atmosphere.	L' study d' emanation d' methane thought d&apos study.
117	methane emission top estimate study	Climate Change Study; Maximum Methane Emission Estimates.	Study on timing; maximum methane emission estimates.	Abstract; maximum methane emission estimates.
117	cow flatulence gas emission worse thought boffin	Emission of gas-flatulence cow worst think boffin.	Emission of cows flatulence gas worst boffin thinking.	Emission of cow flatulence gas worst think boffin thought.
117	global warming study confirms methane level higher epa	It is not possible to predict the exact amount of methane in the atmosphere.	L' study on global warming confirms that the methane level is higher.	The global warming study confirms that the methane level is much higher.
117	producing percent methane epa	Emissions of methane from the atmosphere are estimated to be about 10 Mt.	Percentage methane production Epa.	Production of percent methane Epa.
118	cat underwater robot turtle video	Video of the robot turtle; a cat under it; water on the robot turtle.	Video of a cat under the pod; water on robot turtle.	Video of a cat under the robot tortoise.
118	robot turtle help researcher inside shipwreck	A turtle-robot helps a researcher at the interior of the wreck.	A robot-like turtle helps a researcher on the inside of a shipwreck.	A robot turtle helps a researcher in a derelict interior.
118	underwater robot turtle inspect shipwreck	A turtle-robotic under the skin of the turtle; water inspects the wreck.	A turtle-robot under the car washes the wreck.	Turtle-robot under the map; water inspect the wreck.
118	turtle bot explore ancient shipwreck	Bottle Turtle Explores the apos; wreckage.	The Bottle Turtle explore the apos; wreck of the wrecks.	Bottle turtle explore the wreck of the wreck.
118	turtle robot dive wreck	The robot is a diving robot, a diving robot and a diving robot.	L' derelict diving robot turtle.	L' wreckage; a robot turtle dive diving robot.
118	robotic sea turtle bui find hidden treasure shipwreck	The robotic sea turtle finds hidden treasure shipwreck.	The robotic sea turtle bui find a hidden treasure shipwreck.	Robotic sea turtle bui find hidden treasure wrecked ship.
118	adorable turtle bot help underwater archeologist	L' lovely Bottle helps the apos; archaeologist at @-@marine.	L' adorable tortoise bot helps the apos; archaeologist under @-@marine.	L' adorable turtle helps the apos; marine archaeologist-marin.
118	robot turtle help underwater archaeologist inspect shipwreck	Turtle-robot assists archaeologist-sailor to inspect shipwrecks.	The tortoise-robot helps l'apos; archaeologist under @-@marin to inspect the wrecks.	The tortoise-robot helps the archaeologist under-sailor inspect shipwrecks.
118	turtle robot set explore shipwreck	The robot tortoise together explores the apos; the shipwrecked wreck.	The robot tortoise together explores the shipwrecked wreck.	The robot turtle together is exploring the shipwreck.
118	robot turtle help underwater archaeologist inspect shipwreck	Turtle-robot assists archaeologist-sailor to inspect shipwrecks.	The tortoise-robot helps l'apos; archaeologist under @-@marin to inspect the wrecks.	The tortoise-robot helps the archaeologist under-sailor inspect shipwrecks.
119	voice search desktop google google	Googling your e-mail address.	Google-based voice search.	Google voice search.
119	google launch hand free search app chrome browser	Google launches l' Free Chrome Browser Search Application.	Google launches the free search application chrome browser.	Google launches the free chrome browser search application.
119	google launch chrome extension search voice	Google launches l&apos, a chrome extension, a chrome extension, and a chrome extension.	Google launches l' chrome extension voice search voice.	Google launches l' chrome extension search voice of l' vocal extension.
119	familiar google hotword arrives desktop official chrome extension	The familiar word hot Google is coming up the desktop of l' official chrome-chrome extension.	The familiar hot word Google comes desktop from l' official chrome extension.	The familiar word hot Google arrives desktop of l' official chrome extension.
119	google chrome receives google voice search extension	Google Chrome will receive the 'Google Voice Search extension.	Google Chrome receives the Google Voice Search extension.	Google Chrome receives the' Google voice search extension.
119	google add google hotword extension chrome store	Google add Google Hotword extension chrome-chrome store.	Google add Google Hotword extension chrome store.	Google add Google Hotword extension chrome store.
119	google launch voice control search option chrome user	Google launches l' User Chrome Voice Search option.	Google launches l' optional user chrome chrome voice search option.	Google launches l' voice search option user chrome search.
119	google chrome add search button omnibox	Google Chrome will add the omnibox search button to the search button.	Google chrome add omnibox search button search button.	Google chrome add the search button omnibox search button.
119	list google voice command google voice	Google Voice List will command Google Voice Google Voice.	Google List, voice commands google voice google voice.	Google voice command google voice google voice list.
119	bothered literally lift finger google voice search chrome	Disturbed literally raise google finger for chrome vocal research.	Disturbed literally lift your finger google chrome vocal search.	Disturbed literally lift finger google search chrome vocal.
119	google chrome voice search update	Google Chrome Voice Search.	Google Chrome-based voice search.	Google chrome voice search.
119	google voice activated search chrome	Google Voice Search - Activated chrome.	Google Chrome vocal search activated.	All right, google voice search activated chrome.
119	google release chrome extension enables voice search	L' Chrome extension of release Google allows voice search.	L' chrome release extension Google allows voice search.	L' chrome extension of release Google allows the voice search.
119	google release google extension chrome ready bark search	It's a good idea if you're looking for something to do.	Google release l' chrome google extension pre-search for d' bark.	Chrome google extension ready search for icons; bark.
119	google voice command pc	Pc Google Voice Control.	Google pc vocal command.	Voice command pc google.
119	google hand free searching desktop browser	Google manual search in the office browser.	Manually searching Google in the desktop browser.	Search the desktop browser by Google manually.
119	extension add voice search chrome	L' extension also adds chrome vocal search.	L' extension adds the search for chrome vocals.	L' extension adds chrome voice search.
119	google voice search desktop pc laptop running chrome browser	Google Chrome Browser Pocket PC Voice Search.	Google Voice Search portable PC pc while chrome browser is running.	Google portable computer pc voice search currently chrome browser.
119	google chrome voice extension search hand free video	Chrome Google Voice Extension is a searchable video free hand search.	Chrome google vocal extension search free hand video.	Google chrome voice extension search free video hand search.
119	chrome google extension add hand free search	L' extension google chrome adds a manual search.	L' google chrome extension will add a manual search.	L' extension chrome google adds a manual search.
119	google brings automatic voice search computer running chrome	Google provides an automatic voice-search machine running under the name Chrome.	Google provides an automatic Chrome-based voice search computer.	Google has an automatic voice search computer running under Chrome.
119	google enables google hand free voice search pc	Google allows you to do manual voice searches on Google pc.	Google allows you to perform a manual voice search on Google pc.	Google allows d' perform a manual voice search on Google pc.
119	chrome finally hand free google search	Chrome Finally Hands Free Google searches.	Chrome finally gets free hands Google search.	Chrome finally hands free Google searches.
119	google release voice search chrome	Google frees chrome searching.	Google frees the chrome voice search.	Google releases chrome voice search.
119	listening google feature land desktop chrome extension	Google Listens with l' Terrestrial Desktop Chrome Extension.	Google is listening with l' extension of the desktop desktop.	Google listen with the chrome extension of the land office.
119	search google computer lifting finger	Look for the apos; Google Computer Raising Finger.	Look for the apos; computer Google lifting finger.	Google computer lifting finger.
119	google chrome extension	Google Chrome expansion.	Google Chrome expansion.	This is an extension of Google Chrome.
119	google add search button omnibox latest chrome build	Google adds the latest Omnibox Chrome Build Omnibox search button.	Google adds the latest omnibox search button, chrome build omnibox.	Google adds the latest chrome build omnibox search button omnibox.
119	google voice search land chrome	Land Chrome Google Voice Search.	Google Voice Search Land Chrome.	Google Voice - Land Search Chrome.
119	voice based google hotword search desktop chrome	Chrome Google Hotword Desktop search.	Voice search on Google Hotword Desktop chromium.	Chrome hotword desktop search on Google.
119	voice search google chrome user enables google feature pc	Google Chrome User Chrome Voice Search allows you to use the pc Google pc function.	Google Chrome User Chrome Voice Search enables the Google pc function feature.	Chrome user google voice search allows the pc Google function function.
119	google launch handsfree conversational search voice search hotword	Google launches a hot word-search hands-free conversation search.	Google launches a hands-free search for hot words from the voice search.	Google launches a hands-free conversation search using hot voice search words.
119	save click google roll hand voice search feature	Save the Google Roll Hand Manual Voice Search feature.	Save the Google Roll Hand manual voice search function.	Save manual Google Roll Hand voice search function.
119	google talking computer crazy speech	On Google, talk about a computer, talk about a madman.	On Google, we are talking about apos; a computer; we are talking about apos; a madman.	On Google, we're talking about a computer, and we're talking about a crazy person.
119	google chrome voice search pc	Google Chrome-pc voice-search.	Google Chrome pc Voice Search.	Google chrome pc voice search.
119	talk laptop desktop running chrome google command	Talk portable by running the google chrome command.	Talk portable desktop software by running the chrome google command.	Talk portable desktop by running chrome google command.
119	google launch voice search hotword extension chrome	Google launches the Chrome Chrome Extension Chronic Words Search.	Google launches the chrome extension hot word search.	Google launches a voice search for hot chrome extension words.
119	touchless chrome prepare search shouting	Chrome without contact Screaming to prepare search.	Chrome without contact prepare the search by shouting.	Contactless chromium prepare search by shouting.
119	google decade separation emotion campaign	The emotions of the split from Google decade.	The apo campaign; emotions of the separation of Google decade.	The campaign of apos; emotions of the separation of the decade Google.
119	google chrome extension google command	L' google extension chrome, google command.	L' google extension chrome google command.	L' extension google chrome command google.
119	tale browser chrome chromium	This is a chrome-chrome-chrome storyboat.	Chrome chrome-chrome storyteller.	Chrome chromium chromium storyboatner.
119	google launch desktop voice search chrome	Google launches a chrome-based voice desktop search.	Google launches the chrome desktop voice search.	Google launches chrome desktop voice search.
119	google desktop google	Google Google Desktop Google.	Google Google Google google.	Google google desktop google.
119	google roll extension hand free search chrome	Google Roll Extension searches for free chrome hand.	Extension google roll search free chrome hand.	Extension google roll search chrome free hand.
119	google release google chrome extension hand free voice search	Google releases google chrome extension main free search speech.	Google releases google chrome extension main free voice search.	Google free google chrome extension hand chrome free voice search.
119	google voice search hotword voice command search	Google Voice Search, Hot Words, Voice Control, Voice Search.	Google voice search, hot words, voice command, voice search.	Google voice search, hot words, voice command, voice search.
119	google voice search extension chrome video	Extension of the Google Chrome Video Chrome Chrome Voice Search.	Extension of google video chrome google voice search.	Extension of google chrome video google voice search.
119	speak pc google command desktop chrome browser	Talk google desktop command chrome browser.	Talk pc google command chrome desktop browser.	Talk pc google command desktop chrome browser.
119	google voice search chrome	Google Chrome Speech Search.	Google Chrome voice search, please.	Google chrome voice search.
119	voice activated google search chrome	Google Chrome Voice Search.	Google Chrome-based voice search.	Google Chrome voice search, please.
119	google add voice control chrome search	Google adds the chrome-chromo-chromo-chromo-chromo-chromo-chromo-chromo-chromo.	Google adds chrome chrome search voice control.	Google adds the voice control chrome search chrome.
119	chrome finally hand free google search	Chrome Finally Hands Free Google searches.	Chrome finally gets free hands Google search.	Chrome finally hands free Google searches.
120	seahorse ability hide prey magical researcher	Capability of the hippocampus to hide magic search prey.	The ability of the hippocampus to hide the prey of a magical search.	Capacities of the apos; seahorse hide prey of magic search.
120	mystery odd head seahorse solved finally	L&apos, the mysterious seahorse, has finally been solved.	L' mysterious seahorse is finally resolved.	L' mysterious seahorse solved at last.
120	video seahorse ferocious killer	Killer seahorse video, brutal.	Video seahorse killer ferocious.	Video seahorse killer ferocious killer.
120	seahorse head perfectly shaped kill	It's the only way you'll be able to make it work.	Head d' perfectly shaped hippocampus to kill.	D&apos head; perfectly shaped seahorse kill.
120	unusual seahorse snout pipe predatory success video	Unusual video on the success of the predators of the snout of l' seahorse.	Unusual video about the success of the hippocampus snout predators.	Unusual video of the success of snout predators.
120	find twist tail	Finding the crooked tail.	Find the crooked dick.	Finding tail twisted.
120	beware mighty seahorse predator extraordinaire	Beware-of the world's most powerful predator, the seahorse.	Beware-of the powerful predator of the seahorse.	Beware-of the powerful predator of the hippocampus.
120	seahorse endowed wake zone stea hily catch prey	It's a good way to get a feel for the sea.	L' a seahorse with apos; a wake zone will catch its prey.	L' seahorse with apoes; wake zone catches prey.
120	seahorse horse head	Horseshoe head.	Horse-eating seahorse.	Horse head hippocampus.
120	seahorse stalk prey stea	The hippocampus is the hippocampus' prey.	L' seahorse of l' seahorse is its prey.	L' seahorse; seahorse his prey.
120	scientist explain shape seahorse head	He explains the shape of the head of the head of the hippocampus.	This scientist explains the shape of the head of the hippocampus.	The scientist explains the shape of the head of l' seahorse.
120	wonder seahorse shaped horse	Wonderful horse-shaped sea horse.	Oh, marvelous sea horse in the shape of a horse.	Marvellous sea horse in the shape of a horse.
120	dwarf seahorse stea hunter ocean	Nain ocean-stea-hunting seahorse.	Nain seahorse hunter of stea ocean.	Nain seahorse hunter ocean stea.
120	seahorse catch prey sneaking creature	Sea horse catches the creature.	L' seahorse catches the creature.	L' seahorse will catch the creature.
120	seahorse head perfectly shaped catching prey	Apos head; seahorse is perfectly fit to catch prey.	The head of the hippocampus is also perfectly shaped to catch prey.	The head of the apos; seahorse is perfectly shaped for prey.
120	stea hy seahorse weird shaped head awesome predator	Weird hy-seahorse-shaped, killer-head steak.	Weird hippocampal stea shaped like a killer predator head.	Stea hy hippocampus weird form of awesome predator head.
120	seahorse bui stea mode capture speeding prey	L' stea seahorse captures fast prey.	L' a seahorse in stea mode captures fast prey.	L' stea mode seahorse captures fast prey.
120	seahorse head wake zone catching prey	The area of wake of the pod; seahorse catches the prey.	The wake zone of the pod catches the prey.	The wake zone of the pod; seahorse catches prey.
120	small mighty ut researcher discover seahorse secret weapon	A small, powerful researcher discovers the apos, the hippocampus's secret weapon.	A powerful little researcher discovers the apos, the secret weapon of the hippocampus.	A small powerful researcher discovers the apos; secret weapon of the seahorse.
120	seahorse odd head mystery solved	L&apos, the seahorse, has solved the mystery of the weird head.	And the seahorse solved the mystery of the weird head.	L' seahorse solved the weird head mystery.
120	head shape seahorse enables hunt sensitive highly evasive copepod	L&apos, a head-shaped seahorse, makes it possible for copepods that are very sensitive to hunting seals to escape.	L' head-shaped seahorse allows copepods that are very sensitive to hunting to escape.	L' head-shaped seahorse allows copepods that are highly sensitive to hunting to escape.
120	seahorse head perfectly shaped catch prey	The head of the hippocampus is a perfect shape for its prey.	The head of the apos; seahorse forms its prey perfectly.	The head of the apos; seahorse perfectly shapes its prey.
120	seahorse ninja style hunting technique caught video	The ninja-style hunting technique, hippocampus, was filmed on video.	The ninja-style seahorse hunting technique was also filmed on video.	The Ninja style hunting technique has been filmed on video.
120	lethal secret seahorse revealed	L' secret deadly seahorse has been revealed.	The secret seahorse mortal has been revealed.	L' deadly secret seahorse revealed.
120	seahorse head stalk prey video	It's the first time you've seen it.	Tête d'apos; seahorse tracks video.	Headd'apos; seahorse tracks video prey.
120	slow awkward seahorse ferociously catching prey	L' a slow, clumsy seahorse... ferociously grabs its prey.	L' a slow, clumsy seahorse ferociously catches its prey.	L' clumsy slow seahorse ferociously catches its prey.
120	forget shark seahorse sea stea hiest hunter creature sneak	Screw the seahorses.	Forget the seahorses.	Well, forget about the seahorses.
120	seahorse shaped horse	Horse in the shape of a hippocampus.	Horse d'apos; hippocampus.	Horse shaped d' seahorse.
120	seahorse odd shape weapon stea	L&apos, L&apos, L' seahorse, is a weapon of strange shape.	L' seahorse is a strange-shaped weapon.	L' seahorse is a weapon of strange shape.
120	seahorse better predator copepod	L' seahorse is the world's best predatory copepod.	L' seahorse is the best copepod predator.	L' seahorse is the best copepod predator.
120	stea hy seahorse win head	Stea hy seahorse, win head.	And Stea hy seahorse win head.	Stea hy seahorse win head.
120	seahorse shaped horse	Horse in the shape of a hippocampus.	Horse d'apos; hippocampus.	Horse shaped d' seahorse.
120	beware mighty seahorse	Beware-of seahorses.	Beware-of the seahorses.	Keep your eyes open for the seahorses.
121	spacex satellite launch delayed thursday	The launch of the satellite, Spacex, has been postponed until Thursday.	The launch of the Spacex satellite was postponed until Thursday.	The Spacex satellite launch has been rescheduled for Thursday.
121	citing technical problem spacex scrub falcon launch	It's a good idea to get rid of it, but it's a good idea.	Technical problem: apo launches; falcon de l'apos; spacex.	The technical problem is: launching dapos; falcon de l'apos; spacex.
121	money ring musk spacex attempt boldest mission	Spacex Musk Ring Silver attempt the most audacious mission.	L' silver ring musk Spacex attempt the most audacious mission.	Spacex silver ring musk attempt the most audacious mission.
121	spacex milestone falcon rocket launch rescheduled thursday	And the launch of the Faucon Spacex rocket has been postponed until Thursday.	The Faucon Spacex launch has been rescheduled for Thursday.	Faucon Spacex rocket launch has been rescheduled for Thursday.
121	spacex delay satellite launch technical glitch	Spacex has been delaying the technical problem of launching the satellite.	Spacex is delaying the launch of the new satellite.	Spacex delays the satellite launch technical problem.
121	spacex rocket launch florida delayed thanksgiving	The launch of the Spacex rocket in Florida caused a delay in Thanksgiving.	The launch of the Spacex rocket in Florida... delayed Thanksgiving.	The Spacex rocket launch in Florida delayed Thanksgiving.
121	cut rate spacex poised commercial satellite launch	Spacex for commercial launch of satellites.	Reduced speed; spacex for commercial launch of satellites.	Reduced rates of d' spacex for commercial satellite launch.
121	update low cost spacex delay commercial satellite launch	Low-cost Spacex Update Delay commercial launch of the satellites.	Update low cost Spacex delay commercial launch of satellites.	Spacex to delay commercial satellite launch at low cost.
121	spacex falcon flight delayed thanksgiving day	Thanksgiving got delayed by the Spacex Falcon flight.	Spacex Falcon flight delayed Thanksgiving.	Well, the spacex falcon flight delayed Thanksgiving.
121	spacex falcon scrub launch attempt	This is the first time you've tried to launch a new program.	Attempting to launch a falcon of l'apos; spacex.	Attempting to launch a falcon de l'apos; spacex.
121	private launch satellite delayed	Launching the private satellite, delayed.	Delayed private satellite launch.	Computer, launch the delayed private satellite.
121	spacex payload delivery set launch	Launch of Spacex Payload Delivery Package.	Launch of the L' Spacex payload delivery package.	Spacex launch and payload delivery package.
121	spacex launch delayed thanksgiving	Thanksgiving was delayed by the launch of Spacex.	Well, the Spacex launch delayed Thanksgiving.	Spacex's launch delayed Thanksgiving!
121	watch spacex falcon launch monday night	See the launch of the Spacex Hawk game on Monday night.	Watch the launch of the Spacex falcon Monday night.	See the launch of the spacex falcon Monday night.
121	scrubbed technical oopsies ha spacex bid money ring	In addition, Spacex offers a wide range of products and services.	Recovered Technical Oopssies have Spacex offer ring money from l' offer d' money.	Recovered Spacex technical oopssies offer ring money from l' offer d' money.
121	satellite launch board spacex falcon set november	Faucon Spacex of the launch console of the satellite fixed in November.	Spacex Falcon from the satellite launch console fixed in November.	Spacex satellite launch console falcon fixed in November.
121	spacex scrub falcon launch thanksgiving	"Spacex's ""Spacex Scrub & Whip"" is launching the hawk at Thanksgiving."	Spacex scrubes in and launches the falcon at Thanksgiving.	Launching the falcon at Thanksgiving.
121	watch spacex landmark commercial satellite launch	Look at the commercial launch of a Spacex-like satellite.	Watch the commercial launch of a satellite of the Spacex type.	Watch the Spacex satellite commercial launch.
121	satellite launch scrubbed spacex rocket malfunction	With the launch of the satellite, the Spacex spacecraft's malfunction has been removed.	The satellite launch removed the malfunction in the Spacex spacecraft.	The satellite launch erased the Spacex rocket malfunction.
121	space postpones falcon launch technical snag	Space delays technical launching of falcon.	L' space delays technical launch of the falcon.	L' space delays falcon technical launch.
121	low cost spacex delay commercial satellite launch	It is not possible for a satellite to be launched at the same time as a satellite.	The low-cost spacex delays the commercial launch of a satellite.	L' low cost spacex delays the commercial launch of a satellite.
121	spacex satellite launch game changer	Spacex, satellite launcher, game-changer.	Spacex, satellite launcher, game changer.	Spacex, satellite launcher, game changer.
121	elon musk universe today medium ahead revolutionary falcon	Elon Musk is now the world's most revolutionary hawk; Elon Musk is one of the world's most successful hawks.	Elon Musk is now a revolutionary mid-term falcon.	L'apos; univers d'apos; Elon Musk is now a revolutionary falcon in the medium term.
121	spacex launch falcon rocket postponed thursday	The launch of the Spacex spacecraft has been rescheduled for Thursday.	Spacex rocket launch has been rescheduled for Thursday.	Spacex rocket launch has been postponed until Thursday.
121	spacex launch st commercial satellite today	In addition, Spacex is launching a commercial satellite.	Spacex launches today a commercial satellite.	Spacex launches a commercial satellite at the same time.
121	weather spacex thanksgiving day launch	Spacex Weather Launch Thanksgiving Day.	Thanksgiving Day Spacex weather launch.	Spacex weather launch thanksgiving day.
121	spacex falcon rocket launch live video stream	Spacex launches a hawk flare on a video feed.	Spacex launches a live video feed of a live hawk rocket.	Spacex launches a falcon rocket live on a video feed.
121	spacex scrub satellite launch	Launch of satellite; Spacex scouting.	Launch of the satellite; Spacex scrub &quot.	"Satellite launch ""Spacex scrub &quot."
121	spacex satellite launch potential game changer	Spacex launches a game-changing satellite.	Spacex launches a satellite that could be a game-changer.	Spacex will launch a satellite that could change the game.
121	spacex postpones launch tv satellite	Spacex is delaying the launch of the new satellite TV satellite.	Spacex reports launch of satellite TV satellite.	Spacex postpones launch of satellite TV satellite.
121	thanksgiving launch planned falcon	This is the Thanksgiving kickoff for the falcon.	The Thanksgiving launch for the falcon.	Thanksgiving launch planned for the falcon.
121	spacex challenge arianespace rethinking pricing policy	Spacex has challenged Arianespace to rethink its pricing policy.	Spacex challenged Arianespace to rethink its pricing policy.	Spacex challenges Arianespace to rethink pricing policy.
121	spacex poised commercial satellite launch	Commercial launch of the Spacex satellites is imminent.	The commercial launch of Spacex satellites is imminent.	Spacex satellite commercial launch is imminent.
121	spacex launch improved falcon rocket postponed	Enhanced Hawk Rocket Spacex Launch Report.	Enhanced Spacex launch of falcon rocket reported.	Improved falcon rocket Spacex launch delayed.
121	satellite launch today	The satellite will be launched today.	Launching of satellite today.	Satellite launch today.
121	spacex launch falcon rocket evening	Spacex is launching a flare falcon tonight.	Spacex launches a falcon rocket tonight.	Spacex launches falcon rocket tonight.
121	spacex poised historic commercial milestone	Spacex has set a historic trade mark.	And Spacex has set a historic commercial milestone.	Spacex has set a historic commercial milestone for us.
121	gamechanger spacex attempt commercial flight	Gamechanger Spacex is trying to make a commercial flight.	Gamechanger Spacex attempts a commercial flight.	Gamechanger Spacex is attempting a commercial flight now.
121	spacex satellite launch live stream elon musk falcon rocket	Spacex launches musk-hawk rockets live.	Spacex is launching a live musk-hawk rocket.	Spacex launches a musk falcon rocket live.
122	outrage online georgia juror form offer slave occupation choice	Online jury form on the apostle; indignation offers selection of the apostles; occupation of slaves.	The online form of jurors on the apos; indignation offers the choice of apos; occupation of apos; slaves.	The online jury form on the indignation offers the choice of apos; occupation of apos; slaves.
122	juror form list slave occupation	The jurors are drawing up a list of enslaved men and women.	The jurors draw up the list of enslavement.	Jurors make a list of enslavement.
122	resident shocked dekalb county georgia juror form list slave	The list of the shocked residents of dekalb county georgia juror lists slave.	Shocked residents dekalb county georgia juror slave list.	Residents shocked dekalb county georgia juror list slave.
122	georgia juror form reportedly list slave occupation	It is said that the jury of Georgia enumerates the occupation of the slaves.	The jurors of Georgia would then list the apos; occupation of slaves.	Georgia's jurors would list their occupation of slaves.
122	georgia jury form list slave occupation	A list of slaves was drawn up by the Georgian jurors.	The Georgian jurors are compiling a list of slaves.	The jury of the court of Georgia draws up a list of the slaves.
122	georgia juror form list slave occupation	Jury of Georgia lists the names of the slaves.	Juror of Georgia, list l' occupation of slaves.	Georgia juror lists l' slave occupation.
122	online juror form list slave occupation	J' has a list of jurors online.	J&apos has an online list of jurors from enslavement.	J&apos has a list of online jurors enslavement.
122	happened georgia juror form list slave occupation detail	It is located in the heart of the city, in the heart of the city, in the heart of the city.	It s' is product georgia jury list details of the apos; occupation d' slaves.	It is produced georgia sworn list details of the apos; occupation d' slaves.
122	atlanta juror form list slave occupation	At the same time, the jury in Atlanta compiled a list of the occupations of slaves.	The Atlanta and Apos jurors draw up a list of slave occupations.	Atlanta jurors compile a list of slave occupations.
122	georgia court list slave occupation	The Court of Georgia lists enslaved persons as being under occupation.	The court of Georgia lists the apos; occupation of the slaves.	Georgie court lists the apos; occupation of slaves.
122	online juror form listed slave occupation	The online form of the jurors lists the occupations of the slaves.	Jury online form lists occupations of slaves.	The online juror form lists occupations of slaves.
122	georgia juror selects slave occupation online form	The juror georgia selects the form d' occupancy of online slaves.	The georgia juror selects the form d' occupation d' slaves online.	The georgia juror selects the online slave occupation form.
122	georgia online juror form list slave	Online juror Georgia lists the names of the slaves.	Juror online georgia list of slaves.	Juror online georgia list of slaves.
122	georgia court reportedly list slave occupation questionnaire	The Court of Georgia is said to have drawn up a list of questionnaires on the occupation of slaves.	The court of Georgia reportedly drew up a list of questionnaires on the andapos; occupation of slaves.	The Georgian court reportedly listed the questionnaires on slave occupation.
122	dekalb county offer slave occupation juror questionnaire	The County of Dekalb offers a questionnaire to jurors on the occupation of slaves.	The county of Dekalb offers a questionnaire to jurors on the subject of the occupation of slaves.	The county of Dekalb offers a jury questionnaire on the occupation of slaves.
122	georgia state form list slave occupation	It is the capital of the state of Georgia and the capital of the state of Georgia.	L' State of Georgia lists l' occupation of slaves.	L' State of Georgia list l' occupation of slaves.
122	online georgia jury survey list slave occupation	Online survey jury georgia list of l' occupation of slaves.	Online georgia jury survey list of the apos; occupation of slaves.	Online georgia jury survey list of slaves; occupation d&apos.
122	report dekalb juror questionnaire listed slave occupation option	In the jury's questionnaire, the option of the apos was mentioned; occupation of slaves.	The jury's questionnaire mentioned the option of enslaved persons.	The dekalb jury questionnaire mentioned the apos option; occupation of apos; slaves.
122	dekalb county slave occupation questionnaire	Questionnaire on the history of slavery in the county of Dekalb.	Questionnaire on apo; slave occupation in the county of Dekalb.	Apos questionnaire; slave occupation in Dekalb County.
122	dekalb county juror form list slave occupation	The County ofkalb jurors compile a list of the slaves' occupations.	The jurors of the county of kalb draw up a list of the occupations of slaves.	Jurors in County dekalb are compiling a list of slave occupations.
122	dekalb county georgia slave occupation	Enslaved by Dekalb Georgia County.	Occupation of the land; slaves by Dekalb Georgia County.	Slaves by the county of Dekalb Georgia.
122	court form spark outrage listing slave job choice	The court s&apos is outraged by the selection of slaves.	The court s' is declared indignant by the choice of apos; a slave work.	The court is outraged by the choice of slave labor.
122	report dekalb juror survey listed slave occupation choice	The report of kalb juror is a slave-choice survey.	The report of juror dekalb surveys listed enslaved occupation choice.	The report dekalb juror survey listed slave occupation choice.
123	nurse killed protecting patient knifeman	Killed nurse protecting male patient knife.	Nurse killed protecting patient man knife.	Uh, nurse killed protecting patient male stabbing.
123	fatal stabbing good shepherd ambulatory surgical center	Deadliest knife, good shepherd, ambulatory-surgical center.	Deadliest knife, good shepherd, ambulatory surgical center.	Deadliest dagger good shepherd ambulatory surgical center.
123	nurse dy protecting patient texas surgical center stabbing	Nurse to protect patients stabbed center texas surgical center.	Nurse to protect patients texas surgical center stabbed center.	Nurse to protect texas surgical center stabbing patients center.
123	family recount stabbing inside longview hospital nurse dy injured	Family reports that a nurse from the Longview Hospital was stabbed and was injured.	The family says that a nurse from the hospital in Longview was stabbed and injured.	The family reports that a Longview hospital nurse was stabbed and injured.
123	victim suspect identified stabbing spree good shepherd medical center	The unsub victim I.D.'d a series of stab wounds in the good shepherd's medical center.	The suspicious victim identified a series of stab wounds in the good shepherd's medical center.	The suspect victim has identified a series of stab wounds in the medical center of the good shepherd.
123	texas man charged deadly hospital knife attack	He was killed in a car accident in a car accident in the area.	L'apos; man of Texas accused l'apos; hospital d'apos; a deadly attack with knife.	Texas man accused the hospital of a deadly knife attack.
123	nurse dy protecting patient knife attack	There's a nurse there protecting the patient, who's attacking with a knife.	Nurse there protecting patient with a knife attack.	Nurse there protecting patient knife attack.
123	nurse stabbed died protecting patient police	A stabbed nurse died trying to protect a police patient.	A stabbed nurse died protecting a police patient.	A nurse who was stabbed died protecting a police patient.
123	update good shepherd employee dead critical condition	Updating Good Shepherd employed critical condition death critical condition.	Good shepherd update employed critical condition death critical state.	Update good shepherd critical condition critical condition.
123	nurse stabbed death texas hospital	Death was stabbed by a nurse in the Texas hospital.	Nurse stabbed death in the Texas hospital.	A nurse stabbed death in Texas hospital.
123	hospital stabbing witness jumped front wife kid	He was a witness to the murder of his first wife.	Witness of a hospital stabbing his first wife.	Witness d'apos; a hospital stabbing his first wife.
123	hospitalized deadly texas stabbings	Hospitalized fatal stab wounds in Texas.	There were fatal stab wounds in Texas that were hospitalized.	Well, fatal stab wounds in Texas have been hospitalized.
123	nurse stabbed killed protecting patient horror attack texas medical	A nurse who was stabbed to death while protecting the patient from a horrific Texas medical attack.	Stabbed nurse killed protecting the patient horror Texas medical attack.	Stabbed nurse killed protecting patient horror Texas medical attack.
123	nurse stabbed killed texas area hospital	A stabbed nurse murdered the Texas Region Hospital.	A stabbed nurse killed the Texas Region Hospital.	A nurse stabbed to death at the Texas Region Hospital.
123	nurse dy fatal stabbing east texas hospital	Stabbed to death in East Texas Hospital.	Deadly nurse stabbed at the East Texas Hospital.	Deadly nurse stabbed in East Texas hospital.
123	person custody stabbing longview good shepherd medical	The person in custody who is stabbing Longview Good Shepherd Medical.	Uh, the person in custody stabbing Longview Good Shepherd Medical.	The person in custody stabbing Longview Good Shepherd Medical.
123	update good shepherd employee dead critical condition	Updating Good Shepherd employed critical condition death critical condition.	Good shepherd update employed critical condition death critical state.	Update good shepherd critical condition critical condition.
123	gail sandidge texas nurse stabbed killed protecting	Gail Sandidge, a Texas nurse, was stabbed while protecting the victim from being stabbed.	Gail Sandidge, a Texas nurse, was stabbed protecting the victim.	Texas nurse Gail Sandidge was stabbed while protecting the victim.
123	texas hospital experience fatal stabbing attack	The Texas hospital was also the victim of a deadly knife attack.	Texas hospital was a victim of a deadly knife attack.	The Texas hospital was a victim of a fatal knife attack.
123	nurse dy protecting patient texas surgical center stabbing	Nurse to protect patients stabbed center texas surgical center.	Nurse to protect patients texas surgical center stabbed center.	Nurse to protect texas surgical center stabbing patients center.
123	dead hurt texas hospital attack	A man was killed and wounded in a Texas hospital.	One fatality wounded Texas hospital.	One dead man wounded the apos; hospital in Texas.
123	dead injured stabbing good shepherd medical center	He was stabbed to death by the good sheepman, medical center.	He was shot and killed by stabbing the good shepherd medical center.	Stabbing the good shepherd medical center wound to death.
123	stabbing texas hospital leaf dead injured	He was killed in a car crash in a hospital in Texas.	Stab a Texas hospital wounded to death.	Stabbing a death-injured Texas hospital slip.
123	nurse stabbed killed attack good shepherd medical center texas	Well, stabbed-killed Nurse attacks good Texas Shepherd Medical Center.	Stabbed-killed nurse attacks good Texas shepherd medical center.	Nurse stabbed killed attacks good Texas shepherd medical center.
123	deadly stabbing nurse longview	She stabbed him to death, Nurse Longview.	Stabbed him to death; nurse Longview.	Deadly stabbing, nurse Longview.
123	nurse killed stabbing rampage texas medical center	Knife-killed Nurse ransacked Texas Medical Center.	Nurse killed by stabbing ransacked Texas Medical Center?	Nurse killed by stabbing trashed texas medical center.
123	nurse texas asc stabbed death	L&apos, a Texas nurse, has stabbed death.	The Texas nurse stabbed death.	L'apos; nurse texas stabbed death.
123	identity victim hospital stabbing released	Stabbing at the apo; victim's hospital; released identity.	Stabbing at the apo; hospital of the victim of the apo; released identity.	Stabbed at the hospital of the victim of the apos; identity released.
123	stabbing reported tuesday good shepherd medical center	The stab wounds reported Tuesday the Good Shepherd Medical Center.	Stab wounds brought home the good shepherd's medical center on Tuesday.	Stab wounds reported good shepherd's medical center Tuesday.
123	family witnessed stabbing longview nurse	Family witnessed the stabbing of d&apos, a Longview nurse.	The family witnessed the stabbing of a nurse from Longview, California.	The family witnessed the stabbing of a nurse from Longview.
123	killed injured texas surgical center stabbing	He just stabbed the Texas Surgical Center to death.	He killed the Texas surgical center when he stabbed it.	He killed the Texas surgical center wounded by stabbing.
123	family witnessed stabbings longview hospital	Family witnessed stab wounds at Longview Hospital.	The family witnessed stab wounds at Longview Hospital.	The family witnessed Longview Hospital stabbing.
123	police texas nurse fatally stabbed protecting patient	He was stabbed to death by a Texas nurse from the police department to protect the patient.	Texas police nurse stabbed to death to protect the patient.	L' Texas police nurse fatally stabbed to protect the patient.
123	police scene stabbing good shepherd medical center	Police Scene Stabbing the Good Shepherd Medical Center.	Scene of police stabbing the good shepherd medical center.	This is a police scene stabbing the good shepherd medical center.
123	good shepherd employee dead critical condition stabbing	Good stabbing-dead employee shepherd.	Good shepherd employee, dead critical state stabbing.	Good shepherd employee dead critical stabbing.
123	employee dead critical condition three visitor injured	There's an employee who died in critical condition. - Three of the visitors are injured.	One employee died in critical condition, three visitors are injured.	Employee died in critical condition three visitors are injured.
123	texas hospital stabbing good shepherd medical center employee dead	L&apos, a Texas hospital, stabs a good shepherd, a worker of the medical center, dead.	Texas hospital stabs a good shepherd, a medical center employee, dead.	Texas hospital stabs a good shepherd, a dead medical center employee.
123	nurse stabbed dy texas hospital stabbing	Stabbed nurse at Texas hospital.	Nurse stabbed at the Texas Hospital.	She was stabbed by a nurse in a hospital in Texas.
123	nurse gail sandidge worked hospital killed	Lapses; Nurse Gail Sandidge was working at the hospital and was killed.	Nurses Gail Sandidge worked at the hospital and was killed.	L' nurse Gail Sandidge worked at the hospital and was killed.
123	nurse stabbed nurse gail dy protecting patient brutal stabbing attack	Nurse stabbed Nurse Gail to protect the patient there from a brutal stabbing attack.	Nurse stabbed nurse gail to protect the patient from a stabbing attack.	Nurse stabbed nurse gail to protect brutal patient stabbing attacker.
123	nurse killed wounded texas hospital stabbing spree	A nurse killed some of the wounded at the hospital in Texas by stabbing people in a series.	A nurse killed wounded in a Texas hospital by stabbing people to death.	A nurse killed wounded in Texas hospital by serial stabbing people.
123	houston nurse fatally stabbed hospital attack hailed hero saving patient	A nurse in Houston, stabbed to death in a hospital ward, waved to the hero to save a patient's life.	A Houston nurse stabbed to death in a hospital saluted the hero saving a patient.	A fatally stabbed nurse in a hospital in Houston waved to the hero saving a patient.
123	nurse stabbed update police identify nurse brutally stabbed death	Stabbed nurse updated police to identify a nurse who was brutally stabbed to death.	Stabbed nurse updated police I.D. nurse brutally stabbed dead.	Stabbed Nurse updated police identify nurse brutally stabbed dead.
123	dead attack texas hospital suspect caught	He's been attacked to death in Texas, the suspect of the hospital was caught.	Attack to death in Texas, the suspect from the hospital was caught.	Attack to death in Texas, hospital suspect has been caught.
123	dead injured stabbing texas hospital	Cause of death in Texas hospital.	Injured in Texas hospital.	He's in a hospital in Texas.
123	man charged texas hospital stabbing attack	A man accused the hospital in Texas of stabbing a man in the back of the car.	A man accused the hospital in Texas of stabbing someone.	A man accused Texas hospital of stabbing someone.
123	nurse stabbed suspect kyron rayshawn templeton caught fatal	A nurse stabbed the suspect, Kyron Rayhawn Templeton, and he was caught dead.	A nurse stabbed suspect Kyron Rayhawn Templeton and kidnapped him and caught him dead.	A nurse stabbed suspect Kyron Rayhawn Templeton and Apos; caught mortally.
123	nurse fatally stabbed protecting patient	Stabbed to death to protect a patient.	Nurse stabbed to death to protect a patient.	Deadly stabbed nurse to protect a patient.
123	talkin tiger texas wrap arkansas preview	Tiger texas speaking in front-premiere of l' Arkansas.	Tiger texas speaking-premiere of l' Arkansas.	Tiger texas talking forward-apos; Arkansas premiere.
123	nurse dead stabbing longview hospital	She died in a hospital in Longview, California.	Dead nurse stabbing the apos; Longview hospital.	Dead nurse stabbing the apos; hospital Longview.
123	nurse stabbed update gail sandidge called hero	Nurse Stabbing update named Gail Sandidge.	"Stabbed nurse update Gail Sandidge called ""hero."""	Stabbed nurse update Gail Sandidge called hero.
123	longview hospital security procedure reviewed	The safety procedures at Longview Hospital were also reviewed.	The security procedures for the Longview Hospital have been reviewed.	The Longview Hospital security procedure has been reviewed.
123	longview hospital ceo god bless gail family wistv	Longview Hospital, God bless Gail's family.	L' Longview hospital, God bless Gail's family.	L' hospital of Longview, God bless the family of Gail.
123	nurse killed injured stabbing attack texas hospital	Nurses killed a wounded man when they stabbed a wounded man at the Texas hospital.	A nurse killed a wounded man when she stabbed a man in the Texas hospital.	A nurse killed a wounded man by stabbing a wounded man in the Texas hospital.
123	beloved nurse died protecting patient praised family friend	One well-liked nurse-died protecting her patient.	A well-liked-nurse died protecting her patient.	A well-liked nurse, @-@, died protecting her own patient.
123	killed injured texas hospital stabbing spree	Killed wounded in Texas hospital during a series of stab wounds.	He has killed wounded in Texas hospital during a series of stab wounds.	He killed Texas hospital wounded during a series of stab wounds.
123	police nurse fatally stabbed protecting patient	Stabbed to death to protect the patient.	She was a police nurse who was stabbed to death to protect the patient.	Police nurse fatally stabbed to protect the patient.
123	devoted nurse gail sandidge killed protecting patient crazed	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	L*apos; dedicated nurse Gail Sandidge killed while protecting a crazy patient.	Dedicated nurse Gail Sandidge killed protecting a crazy patient.
123	dead wounded stabbing spree inside texas hospital	Deadly wounded, stabbed at l'apos; interior of l'apos; Texas Hospital.	He was stabbed in the back of the car, in the back of the car, in the hospital of Texas.	Deadly wounded, stabbed in the Apos; inside of the apos; hospital in Texas.
123	year charged fatal longview hospital stabbing	Year of Fatal Charge for Stabbing at Longview Hospital.	This is the year of the fatal charge for the stabbing at Longview Hospital.	Year of fatal stabbing at Longview Hospital.
123	killed injured texas hospital stabbing spree	Killed wounded in Texas hospital during a series of stab wounds.	He has killed wounded in Texas hospital during a series of stab wounds.	He killed Texas hospital wounded during a series of stab wounds.
123	nurse killed wounded stabbing longview texas hospital	Nurse killed a wounded man when she stabbed a hospital in Longview, Texas.	A nurse killed one of the wounded when she stabbed a hospital in Longview, Texas.	A nurse killed a wounded man by stabbing a hospital in Longview, Texas.
123	suspect custody fatal stabbing texas hospital injured	Suspect is in police custody, fatally wounded in Texas City Hospital.	Suspect in custody, fatally wounded in the Texas hospital.	Suspect in custody fatally wounded in Texas hospital.
123	good shepherd stabbing suspect quiet nice person	Good shepherd stabbing a quiet, kind suspect.	A good shepherd stabbing a quiet, friendly suspect?	A good shepherd stabbing a nice, quiet suspect.
123	update nurse killed wounded texas hospital stabbing spree	A nurse just killed some of the wounded at the Texas hospital.	A nurse killed some of the wounded at the hospital in Texas.	A nurse killed wounded in hospital in Texas.
123	nurse dy saving patient east texas hospital stabbing spree	Nurse to save a patient in East Texas.	She was a nurse to save a patient in the Texas City Hospital in East Texas.	A nurse to save a patient in Texas hospital in East Texas.
123	gail sandidge nurse dy protecting patient texas surgical center stabbing	Gail Sandidge nurse nurse to protect texas surgical center stabbed center patient.	Gail Sandidge, nurse, to protect patient texas surgical center stabbed center.	Gail Sandidge nurse to protect patient texas surgical center stabbing center.
123	nurse slain texas hospital suspect caught	A suspect from the Texas hospital, killed by a nurse, was caught.	A Texas hospital suspect killed by a nurse has been caught.	A Texas hospital suspect killed by a nurse was caught.
123	posted november pm	Online in November after-midi.	Posted in November, after-midi.	Online at http://www.un.org/index.html.
124	holiday traveler trump spacex launch plan	The vacation traveler's overtaking the Spacex launch plan.	The holiday traveller surpasses Spacex's launch plan.	The Spacex launch plan is surpassed by the holiday traveller.
124	space launch delayed thanksgiving private space flight company	Launch of l' space delayed Thanksgiving.	The launch of l' space delayed Thanksgiving.	The launch of l' space has delayed thanksgiving.
124	relied intermediary probe spacex sept upper stage	Reliable intermediate spacex seven-story upper-level probe.	Reliable intermediate spacex probe, seven upper levels.	Reliable intermediate spacex probe seven upper level.
124	spacex thanksgiving launch start private manned space flight florida	Spacex Thanksgiving launch in Florida, Florida.	Spacex Thanksgiving launch in Florida manned space flight private.	Spacex Thanksgiving launch private manned space flight in Florida.
124	largest satellite fleet operator agreed spacex st	Spacex St. has been accepted by the largest operator in the satellite fleet.	The largest satellite operator in the fleet has accepted Spacex St.	The largest satellite fleet operator has accepted Spacex St.
124	private launch satellite delayedpublish nov	The Nov release was delayed due to the private launch of the satellite.	The private launch of the satellite delayed publication in November.	The private launch of the satellite delayed Nov.
124	falcon aiming thanksgiving launch	This is the hawk's big Thanksgiving kickoff.	Well, the falcon is targeting the Thanksgiving kickoff.	The falcon is targeting the Thanksgiving launch sequence.
124	spacex cleared thanksgiving black friday attempt faa	Spacex wiped out Black Friday Tentative Fae Thanksgiving.	Spacex wiped out Black Friday Tentative faa Thanksgiving.	Spacex cleaned Black Friday Tentative faa Thanksgiving.
124	spacex satellite launch aborted	Spacex failed to launch.	Captain, the Spacex satellite launch failed.	Spacex satellite launch failed.
124	spacex launch scrubbed technical issue rescheduled launch set	Launching Spacex n&apos was not a technical problem.	"The launch of ""Spacex n&apos"" did not cause any technical problems."	The launch of Spacex n&apos had no technical problems.
124	spacex launch grounded technical issue	There was a technical problem on the ground when Spacex was launched.	The launch of Spacex posed a technical problem on the ground.	The Spacex launch posed a ground-based technical problem.
124	spacex explosion rock central texas	Rock Rock Rock Central Texas explosion.	Spacex Rock Central Texas explosion.	Spacex explosion rock central texas.
124	spacex satellite launching scrubbed	The Spacex satellite launch sequence is canceled.	Spacex satellite launch aborted.	Spacex satellite launch canceled.
124	delayed rocket launch provide unexpected spectacle thanksgiving	The rocket's delayed launch provides an unexpected display at Thanksgiving.	The delayed launch of the rocket brings an unexpected Thanksgiving pageant.	The rocket's delayed launch brings an unexpected spectacle to Thanksgiving.
125	clue alzheimer risk detected infancy study suggests	The risk of Alzheimer's found in early childhood suggests a risk of Alzheimer's.	The risk of developing Alzheimer's in early childhood suggests that the study suggests a risk of Alzheimer's.	The risk of early childhood Alzheimer's suggests that the study suggests a risk of Alzheimer's.
125	researcher find brain change baby risk alzheimer	The researchers found that the risk of brain-related changes in infants is greater than the risk of Alzheimer's.	Researchers are finding that cerebral change is at risk for Alzheimer's in babies.	Researchers find that brain change is at risk of Alzheimer's in babies.
125	brain grow differently baby alzheimer gene	The brain develops differently as a result of the development of the Alzheimer gene.	The brain develops differently as an Alzheimer's baby gene.	The brain develops differently baby gene d' Alzheimer.
125	infant alzheimer gene brain development difference	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support this decision.	Cerebral development of the d' alzheimer in the infant.	Difference in infant Alzheimer's gene brain development.
125	alzheimer detected irregular brain growth infant	In the case of the infant, alzheimer's detected erratic brain growth.	Alzheimer's found the infant to have irregular brain growth.	Alzheimer's detected irregular brain growth in the infant.
125	study baby genetic risk alzheimer	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.	Investigate genetic risk of developing Alzheimer's in infants.	Investigate the genetic risk of baby Alzheimer's.
125	baby brain offer clue alzheimer risk	An indication of the risk of Alzheimer's is found in the baby's brain.	The baby's brain provides an indication of the risk of developing Alzheimer's.	Baby's brain provides a risk index for Alzheimer's.
125	brain difference infant genetic risk alzheimer	Alzheimer's in infants with cerebral abnormalities.	Genetic risk of apo; alzheimer's in infants with cerebral differences.	The genetic risk of apo; alzheimer's in infants with cerebral differences.
125	toddler brain indicate alzheimer age child	A whole-small indicates a child's age; Alzheimer's.	The child's brain; a whole-small indicates a child of his or her age; alzheimer's.	The brain of d' a whole-small indicates a child d' age alzheimer's.
125	clue alzheimer risk baby brain	Cause of death: alzheimer's is at risk, baby brain.	Cause of death: alzheimer's risk baby brain.	Alzheimer's index risk baby brain.
125	brain imaging difference infant genetic risk alzheimer	Cerebral imaging differentiates the Alzheimer infant's genetic risk.	Brain imaging differentiates the genetic risk of infants with Alzheimer's.	L'apos; brain imaging differentiates the genetic risk of the AD infant.
125	alzheimer gene infancy	Childhood of the Alzheimer gene.	L'apos; childhood of the d&apos gene; Alzheimer's.	Hepatitis C is the leading cause of death in Canada.
125	infant alzheimer gene apoe difference brain development	In the infant, the Alzheimer's apoe; d' Alzheimer's apo gene differs from cerebral development.	In infants the d' Alzheimer's apoe gene differs from the brain.	The Alzheimer's apoe gene differs from cerebral development in the infant.
125	statin reduce cholesterol linked alzheimer disease	Statin also reduces cholesterol-related Alzheimer's disease.	Statin reduces cholesterol-related Alzheimer's disease.	Cholesterol-related Alzheimer's disease is reduced by statin.
125	hea check brain difference child alzheimer gene	Check the difference between the brain and the Alzheimer's (AD) genes in children.	To check the difference between the brain and the Alzheimer's; childhood gene.	Check brain and Alzheimer's gene difference in children.
125	alzheimer gene linked ered infant brain development	Alzheimer's is linked to the development of the infant's brain.	The d' Alzheimer gene is related to brain development in infants.	The d' Alzheimer gene is linked to brain development in infants.
125	infant genetic risk alzheimer brain development	Genetic Risk in Infant Alzheimer Brain Development.	Infants develop Alzheimer's brain at a genetic risk.	Genetic risk in Alzheimer brain development infant.
125	alzheimer risk detected infancy	Risk of Alzheimer's has been found in infants.	Risk of Alzheimer's has been detected in infants.	The risk of Alzheimer's has been detected in infants.
125	genetic risk alzheimer disease infant brain	It is not possible to determine the cause of death.	Genetic risk Apes disease; Alzheimer's infant brain.	Genetic risk Infant brain Alzheimer's disease.
125	brain imaging difference infant genetic risk alzheimer	Cerebral imaging differentiates the Alzheimer infant's genetic risk.	Brain imaging differentiates the genetic risk of infants with Alzheimer's.	L'apos; brain imaging differentiates the genetic risk of the AD infant.
125	infant risk alzheimer brain image	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.	Cerebral imaging of the risk of infant Alzheimer's.	Cerebral image of infant risk of Alzheimer's.
126	stock future point flat open hp rally	To store the future flat point open rally hp rally.	Store the future flat point rally open hp rally.	Store the future rally open hp rally flat point.
126	future flat record level	This is the first time I've had the opportunity to work with you.	Flat record level in the world; future.	This is a flat record level for the future.
126	future flat record level	This is the first time I've had the opportunity to work with you.	Flat record level in the world; future.	This is a flat record level for the future.
126	stock rise amid unexpected drop jobless claim	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the shareholder's decision to invest.	L' increase in share value in the middle; unexpected drop in demand for jobs; joblessness.	The stock values increase in the middle of the year; unexpected drop in demand for jobs.
126	stock future changed hp gain amid data	It's a good thing that we've got a lot of information about the future.	L' share futures changed the gain in hp in the middle of the data.	L' future of the shares changed the gain in the data in hp.
126	stock future flat record level	It's a great place to stay, and it's a great place to stay.	To store at l' future a record level flat.	Store at l' future a flat record level.
126	stock future flat high data awaited	The future stock future stock future future stock stock of the plate plate plate plate of high data l' before before before before before before l' before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before	The future stock stock future future stock stock future future stock plate plate plate high plateaux of high data l' avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant de l' avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant avant.	The future future stock stock future future stock stock future stock of the high plate plateaux high data l' forebeforeforebefore l' forebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebeforebefore
126	morning news hewlett packard infoblox analog device golar tivo	Morning News Hewlett Packard infoblox camera analog golar tivo device tivo device.	Morning News Hewlett Packard infoblox device analog device golar tivo device tivo.	Morning news Hewlett Packard infoblox analog device golar tivo device tivo.
126	stock future ahead economic data	Economic data are stored in forecasted economic data.	The economic data on the future are stored in the economic data.	Forecast economic data on the future stores economic data.
126	stock future edge lower ahead economic data	Stock the assets; future advantage of shorter-term economic data.	Stock the asset; the future benefit of economic data in the shorter term.	Store l' future advantage of economic data in the shorter term.
126	stock future high hewlett packard report	Storing the upcoming Hewlett Packard report.	Store the future Hewlett Packard report.	Store the future report Hewlett Packard.
126	future flat record level	This is the first time I've had the opportunity to work with you.	Flat record level in the world; future.	This is a flat record level for the future.
126	morning news hewlett packard company barnes noble tivo	Morning News Hewlett Packard, Barnes Company, noble tivo tivo.	Morning news Hewlett Packard company Barnes noble tivo tivo.	Morning news Hewlett Packard company Barnes noble tivo tivo.
126	stock future ahead housing confidence data	Storing the Future of Housing Confidence Data.	Store inventory; future of confidence data on dwellings.	Storing inventory; future housing confidence data.
126	future flat high data awaited	The future flat flat flat platter of the high data of the apos; before before the apos; before the data of the apos; before before the apos; before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before before of the apos; before of the apos; before of the apos; before of the apos; before of the apos; before of the apos; before of the apos.	The future flat flat flat flat flat plate of high data of the before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before, before.	The future flat flat flat flat platter of high data from l' before before l' before data from l' before before l' before foreforeforeforeforeforeforeforeforeforeforeforeofl' before l' before l' before l' before l' before l' before l&apos.
126	stock future ahead preholiday data deluge	Storing it in the future, it's going to be in the future, it's going to be before Christmas.	Storing the apos; future at the apos; advance before the Christmas celebrations deluge of data.	Storing the apos; future at the apos, advance before the data deluge Christmas.
126	future flat remain record high	The average household size was 2.7 and the average family size was 3.07.	The level of future apartments remains at a record high.	The future apartments remain at a record level.
126	stock future edge higher	Future inventory increases.	Increase in future inventory levels.	Increase in future inventories.
126	stock future point flat open record high	I would like to thank you for your time and for your help.	Store it; future open point open record high.	Store it all; future point open record high.
126	stock future flat record level hp extends gain	Saving the next level of record flat hp extends the gain.	Storing the future flat level record hp extends the gain.	Storing the future flat level hp extends the gain.
127	toe jam cheese scientist collect bacteria human body artsy project	Scientist of jelly d'apos; toes harvesting human body human body art project bacteria.	Scientist of the jam d'apos; toes harvesting bacteria human body artistic project human body.	Toes harvesting bacteria human body artistic project human body.
127	selfmade cheese produced human bacteria	Auto-cheese making has been known to produce human bacteria.	Auto-cheese made has produced human bacteria.	Auto-cheese made produced human bacteria.
127	cheese created skin microbe human	Human skin microbes were created by the cheese.	Well, cheese has created human skin microbes.	The cheese created microbes of human skin.
127	scientist cheese human toe jam	A scientist, a cheese, a human toe, a jam.	Scientist, cheese, human toe, jelly.	Scientist, cheese, human toe, jam.
127	omnivore dilemma eat michael pollan microbe cheese	The omnivorous dilemma here is eating Michael Pollan microbe cheese.	The omnivorous dilemma is eating Michael Pollan microbe cheese.	The pervasive dilemma is to eat Michael Pollan microbe cheese.
127	cheese human bacteria thinking eating	Human Bacteria and Cheese Thinking of Eating.	Thinking of eating human bacteria.	Human cheese bacteria thinking about eating.
127	cheese bug body	Body of l' insect cheese.	The body of l' insect cheese.	The body of cheese insect.
127	scientist creates delightful human cheese	The scientist's making a delicious human cheese.	Well, the scientist makes a delicious human cheese.	The scientist creates delicious cheese human.
127	cheese belly button foot	Cheese, bellybutton, foot, bellybutton, bellybutton.	Cheese belly belly belly belly belly belly.	Cheese, belly button, foot belly belly belly belly.
127	scientist ruin cheese making skin	They destroy the cheeses that make the skin.	Scientists destroy skin-making cheeses.	Scientists destroy cheese that makes skin.
127	wanna sniff cheese human microbe	I want to smell the human cheese microbe.	I want to smell the human microbe from the cheese.	I wanna smell the human microbe of cheese.
127	cheese toe jam navel bacteria point	Toe cheese pointing belly-belly bacteria.	Jelly toe cheese pointing to navel bacteria.	Birth-brain bacteria point to jelly toe cheese.
127	bacteria human nose toe armpit cheese	Bacteria: d&apos cheese; human-nose-toed armpit.	Bacteria: d&apos cheese; armpit with human nose toe.	Bacteria: cheese d' armpit cheese with human nose toe.
127	scientist cheese microbe human skin	Microbe cheese scientist human microbe skin.	Microbe cheese scientist human skin microbe.	Scientific microbe microbe microbe human skin cheese.
127	scientist human bacteria cheese video	Scientific Video on Human Bacteria in Cheese.	This is a scientific video about the human bacteria in the cheese.	Scientific video on human bacteria in cheese.
127	gag alert cheese human toe jam	Gag, cheese, human toe, jam.	Gag alert, cheese, human toe, jam.	Gag alert, cheese, human toe alert, jam.
127	cheese skin microbe cheese turn	Microbe-cheese skin turn cheese.	Microbe cheese skin cheese turn cheese.	Cheese skin microbe cheese turn cheese.
128	buy icahn group stake update	Get the updated version of the icahn group.	Just buy the icahn group update.	Buy the icahn group update.
128	grand theft auto maker pay icahn stock buyback	The big car thief buys back shares in the company.	The big car thief's paying to buy back shares in the company.	It's a good thing that the big car thief is paying to buy back the shares of the company.
128	icahn flogs share	It's a great pleasure to be here today.	Japanese herring share the same fate.	Herring d' icahn share the same fate.
128	buying icahn stock	Shares icahn.	Buy shares icahn.	Buy icahn shares.
128	share buyback full icahn exit	Redemption of shares, complete release.	Redemption of' shares, complete release.	Redemption of' actions, exit icahn complete.
128	tech stock hp report earnings	The @-@shares techno hp capital reports profits.	Capital-shares techno hp declares the profits.	The capital-shares techno hp will report the profits.
128	buy share icahn group	To buy shares in the group icahn.	Buy action icahn group icahn.	Buy share icahn group icahn action.
128	interactive ttwo acquires icahn group share icahn	Interactive ttwo acquire icahn share group icahn icahn.	Interactive ttwo acquire icahn group share icahn icahn.	Interactive ttwo acquires icahn group share icahn icahn.
128	publisher corporate raider carl icahn truckloads cash	L&apos, editor Raider Carl icahn, carries a lot of money.	L' editor Raider Carl icahn carries cash.	L' publisher Raider Carl icahn is carrying cash.
128	interactive repurchase share held icahn group quick fact	Quick icahn Group's interactive buyout action does.	Interactive buyout action held by fast icahn group.	Interactive buyout action held by fast icahn group does.
128	outlook interactive buy icahn group share	We are proud to announce that we are proud to be the newest member of the group.	Perspectives d' purchase interactive icahn part of the group icahn group.	Perspectives d' interactive purchase icahn part of the group icahn.
128	buy icahn share director resign	Buy icahn icahn icahn icahn icahn icahn icahn icahn icahn.	Buy icahn director of stocks resign.	To buy icahn stock director resign.
128	buy icahn stake firm role board	Buy icahn's role-playing game!	Buy the role-playing game from the icahn company.	Just buy the icahn role-playing game.
128	buy stake icahn group	Buying shares in the band icahn.	Buy shares of group icahn.	To buy shares in the icahn group.
128	fall icahn role board sale	Sale of role-playing games at L'apos.com; next fall.	This is the first time I've heard of this game.	Role-playing sale at next fall.
128	repurchase share icahn group	We are proud to announce the purchase of shares in the icahn Group.	Purchase of' shares of icahn Group.	Buyout of' group icahn shares.
128	interactive big win brett icahn	Brett icahn, a great interactive win.	Brett icahn, great interactive win.	Brett icahn, one big interactive win.
128	carl icahn share bought company	Carl icahn's bought the company.	Carl icahn bought the company.	Carl icahn bought the company.
128	buy share worth	Buy stock worth.	Buy stock worth stock.	To buy stock worth a share.
128	buy icahn share director leaving	Buying icahn, our stock manager, who's leaving.	Buy icahn, stock director, who's leaving.	I want to buy icahn, the director of stock, who's leaving.
128	interactive software announces repurchase	The buyout is announced by interactive software.	Interactive software announces the buyout.	The interactive software announces the buyout.
128	buy icahn share director leave	Purchase the Administrator's leave.	Purchase the time off from work.	Buy the leave of absence from the administrator.
128	bid adieu icahn three board seat	Three seats on the board.	Farewell icahn three seats on the board of directors.	Bye-bye icahn three seats on the board.
128	heist needed buy carl icahn	Heist wanted to buy a new car.	Heist needed money; buy Carl icahn.	Heist needed apos; buy Carl icahn.
128	icahn sell share	He's selling shares.	Eric sells stock.	icahn sells shares.
128	share slip pay carl icahn stock	The shares of Carl icahn are paid at the rate of the shares.	Carl icahn shares are paid to the share.	Carl icahn shares are paid at the stock exchange.
128	buy icahn	Get icahn.	You can buy icahn.	Well, buy icahn.
128	parent publisher buy billionaire stake	L&apos, the leading publisher, buys a stake in the company.	L&apos, the main publisher buys a billionaire equity stake in the company.	L' lead publisher buys billionaire equity.
128	interactive buy icahn stake	Buying your pawns online.	Buy the interactive icahn pawn.	Interactive buy icahn pawn.
128	grand theft auto maker buy carl icahn	The big-time car thief buys Carl icahn.	Big car thief buys Carl icahn.	Carl icahn is being bought by the big car thief.
128	insider selling carl icahn sell share interactive	Initia selling carl icahn shares to sell interactive action shares.	Initia selling carl icahn to sell interactive share action.	Initia selling carl icahn sell interactive action stock.
128	publisher buy carl icahn	Publisher buys Carl icahn.	L&apos icahn is the name of Carl icahn.	L' publisher buys Carl icahn.
128	icahn sell stake grand theft auto developer	I don't know if I'm gonna be able to do that, but I do.	Iicahn is selling shares grand theft auto auto developer.	Iicahn sells shares grand theft auto developer car.
128	icahn sell grand theft auto maker	He's selling stolen cars.	Oliviahn sells stolen cars!	I've heard that icahn sells stolen cars.
128	maker buy stock	Shares are purchased by the manufacturer.	Manufacturer buys shares.	The manufacturer will buy shares.
128	major investor exit company sale	Selling d' business start-up company; a major investor.	Selling d' company outside; major investor.	In addition, the company is a major investor in the region.
128	buy icahn stake firm role board	Buy icahn's role-playing game!	Buy the role-playing game from the icahn company.	Just buy the icahn role-playing game.
128	buy icahn share	Shares icahn.	Buy shares icahn.	Buy icahn shares.
128	fall icahn cash baird game position	It's the first time you'll be able to play the game.	At l' autumn icahn position of game Baird cash.	Autumn icahn game position Baird cash.
128	buy icahn stock	Shares icahn.	Buy shares icahn.	Buy icahn shares.
128	buy icahn stake	Buy your share from them.	Buy the part from them.	Just buy your share.
128	buy carl icahn stake role game maker board	Get Carl icahn's role-play.	And buy Carl icahn's role-play.	You can buy Carl icahn's role-playing game.
128	update buy icahn share director leave	Updated to purchase icahn shares in the stock company.	Update buy icahn shares in shares.	Update buy icahn share manager of' shares.
128	buy icahn share	Shares icahn.	Buy shares icahn.	Buy icahn shares.
128	buy carl icahn share	Buying Carl icahn's share.	Buy Carl icahn's cut.	To buy Carl icahn's share.
129	initial jobless claim fall week	Initial claims from Fall jobless.	For more information, please contact the nearest DIAND regional office.	Initial claims d' fall unemployed.
129	jobless claim fall	The demand for compensation for the unemployed falls.	The demand for compensation for the unemployed is dropping.	The demand for jobless workers' compensation is dropping.
129	application jobless benefit fall	Unemployed allowance.	Applying for benefits; unemployment benefit.	The Committee asks for up-to-date information.
129	weekly unemployment benefit application drop signaling fewer	Weekly claims for EI benefits are down, indicating a decline.	The number of weeks of UI claims declined, indicating a decline.	UI weekly claims are down, indicating a decline.
129	today jobless claim report	Report on unemployment insurance claims, today.	Report on claims; unemployment benefit, today.	Report on jobless claims, today.
129	big drop unemployment claim	Great fall in demand for unemployment.	Big drop in unemployment demand.	It's a big drop in unemployment demand.
129	jobless claim improve unexpectedly	An unexpected improvement is the application for unemployment benefits.	Claiming unemployment benefits improves unexpectedly.	Claiming jobless benefits unexpectedly improves.
129	jobless claim fall week	Autumn of applications for unemployment benefits.	The following week; fall unemployment claims; compensation jobless.	The week before; fall of claims; compensation without employment.
129	jobless claim fall month low	Unemployed benefit claims are down to their lowest month.	The UI claim rate drops to its lowest month.	The jobless claim drops to its lowest month.
129	jobless claim unexpectedly fall week	Unexpected weeks of unemployment benefits in the fall.	Claim for benefits without unexpected job in week d' fall.	Unanticipated jobless claim in week d' fall.
129	jobless claim fall	The demand for compensation for the unemployed falls.	The demand for compensation for the unemployed is dropping.	The demand for jobless workers' compensation is dropping.
129	jobless claim drop	Unemployed benefit application reduced.	Reduced unemployment benefit claims.	Reduction in claim for UI benefits.
129	shutdown stall state job growth jobless rate drop	The closure will delay the decline in the unemployment rate without any growth in employment in the state.	The closure delays the decline of the unemployment rate without growth in the state.	The closure delays the jobless rate decline without growth in unemployment in the state.
129	jobless claim unexpectedly fall month low	Unemployment Insurance (UI) benefits are paid at the beginning of the year.	Unanticipated UI claim, month dropping to its lowest level.	Unanticipated jobless claim, lowest month ever.
129	jobless claim drop layoff slow	The decline in demand for unemployment benefits is slowly leading to layoff.	Slowly, as the demand for unemployment insurance falls, unemployment benefits become redundant.	This is particularly true in the case of workers who have been laid off from work.
129	weekly jobless claim unexpected decrease	Weekly claims for unemployment insurance benefits declined unexpectedly.	Weekly claim for unemployment benefits dropped unexpectedly.	There was an unexpected decrease in the weekly claim for unemployment benefits.
129	jobless claim drop layoff slow	The decline in demand for unemployment benefits is slowly leading to layoff.	Slowly, as the demand for unemployment insurance falls, unemployment benefits become redundant.	This is particularly true in the case of workers who have been laid off from work.
129	unemployment benefit application dip	Decreased number of UI claims.	Decrease in number of applications for unemployment benefits.	Decrease in unemployment benefit claims.
129	weekly jobless claim unexpectedly dip	The UI system is based on the UI system and the UI system.	The claim for weekly unemployment insurance benefits drops unexpectedly.	The weekly jobless benefit claim declines unexpectedly.
129	ahead bell unemployment benefit	All right, let's go, let's go.	Forward sound the apos; unemployment benefits.	Forward, sound unemployment benefits.
130	google war youtube comment spam	Google war youtube-swam comment spam.	Google war youtube spam comment spam.	Google war youtube comment spam spam.
130	youtube fighting spam impersonation update google comment	Youtube fight spam imitation update comments google update.	Youtube fight spam imitation update google comment update update.	Youtube fight spam imitation update google comment update.
130	youtube comment user	Youtube user comment logger user comment.	Youtube comment user comment user comment.	Youtube comment user comment.
130	google update youtube commenting system combat spam	Google update youtube comment system fight spam system.	Google update youtube comment system combat spam systems.	Google update youtube comment system combat spam system.
130	youtube bug comment system	Bug Comment System Youtube.	Comments system on the youtube bug.	This is the bug comment system for youtube.
130	youtube comment system stay improving	Continue and improve the YouTube Feedback System.	Continue to improve the YouTube comment system.	Continue to improve youtube comment system.
130	youtube confirms commenting woe promise interaction better	Youtube confirms that there is a lot more to it than meets the eye.	Youtube confirms commenting on the sad promise of apos; better interaction.	Youtube confirms commenting sad promise d' interaction better.
130	youtube update comment system deal spam	Youtube update your spam system negotiation comment spam system.	Youtube update comment comment spam system negotiation spam system.	Youtube update comment spam trading system spam.
130	google awful change youtube laid bare nightmarish tale	Google horrifying change youtube has been exposed as a nightmare tale.	Google horrific change youtube stripped bare nightmare tale.	Google horrible change youtube laid bare nightmare tale.
130	youtube responds comment backlash improving bob fi er	Youtube will respond to feedback by improving its brand image.	Youtube responds to feedback by improving the company's image.	Youtube responds to feedback by improving brand image.
130	google update youtube comment address spam issue stay silent	Google update youtube comment spam address problem remaining silent.	Google update youtube comment spam address problem stay silent.	Google update youtube comment address spam problem stay silent.
130	youtube commenting platform updated anti spam measure	The anti-spam has been updated by the youtube comment platform.	The comments platform youtube has updated the anti-spam measure.	The youtube comment platform updated the-spam anti measure.
130	youtube address massive spam problem rollout	It's the only thing that makes you feel good about the game, and it's the only thing that makes you feel good.	Youtube of the apos; intube of the whole spam problem of the apos; huge deployment of the apos; ephemeral.	Youtube of l' intube of l' spam problem of l' huge deployment; ephemeral.
130	youtube break silence google spam fiasco	Youtube break the google silence spam fiasco.	Youtube break the silence google spam fiasco.	YouTube break google spam fiasco silence.
130	youtube acknowledges issue comment rolling	Youtube admits that the comments roll.	Youtube recognizes that the comments of the question roll.	Youtube acknowledges that comments on the question are rolling.
130	youtube fighting comment spam	Spam fight YouTube comment.	Youtube comment fight spam.	YouTube spam fight comment comment.
130	youtube comment comment update minimize spam	Spam is minimized by updating your YouTube comments.	Updating youtube comments minimizes the possibility of spam.	The update of the comments youtube minimizes spam.
130	youtube working google comment spam issue	Youtube work how to Google problem of spam comments.	Youtube work how Google is spam comment problem.	Youtube work how Google spam comment problem.
130	youtube acknowledges spam issue google comment	Youtube recognizes comments from Google on spam.	Youtube recognizes comments from Google on spam.	Youtube recognizes spam comments from Google.
130	oops youtube commenting system increased spam	Oops youtube comment system has increased the amount of spam.	Oops youtube comment system spam increased.	Oops youtube comment system increased spam.
130	youtube comment spam rise google fight	Youtube comment spam-leave google fight.	Youtube comment spam raise google fight.	Youtube comment spam raise google fight.
130	youtube admits google comment riddled spam	Youtube admits that the comments from Google are a real spam.	Youtube admits that Google's comments are a real spam.	Youtube admits that Google's comments are spam.
130	youtube commenting system increasing spam	Youtube comment on the spam-increasing system.	Youtube comment on system increasing spam.	Youtube comment system increasing spam.
130	youtube strives crack comment spam	Youtubebe de l' l&apos hug; l&apos short comment; ephemeral commentator.	Youtubebe de l'apos; hug of the apos; short comment of the apos; short-lived commentator.	Youtubebe de l'apos; apo hug; short comment of the apos; short commentator.
130	youtube pledge fight spam comment google integration	Youtube spam-fighting promise Google integration comments.	Youtube promise to fight spam comments Google integration.	Youtube promise to fight spam Google integration comments.
130	google tackle youtube spam comment problem	Google s' attack spam youtube how to comment problem.	Google s' attack to youtube spam how comment problem.	Google s' attack youtube spam how comment problem.
130	youtube hilariously impotent ascii comment pornographer	Youtube hilarious impotent ascii commentary pornographer.	Youtube hilarity impotent ascii comment pornographer comment.	Youtube hilarious impotent ascii comment pornographer comment.
130	google crack youtube comment spam	Google Youtube Spam Comment Youtube.	Google youtube spam comment youtube comment.	Google youtube comment spam youtube.
130	youtube respond spam debacle	Youtube answer spam debacle spam debacle debacle.	Youtube respond to spam debacle debacle.	Youtube respond spam debacle spam debacle.
130	youtube fight spam comment stick google	Youtube fights spam, comments, google stick.	Youtube fights google stick comments spam.	Youtube fight spam comments stick google.
131	flying jellyfish machine	Flying-Jelly Machine.	Jellyfish flying machine.	Uh, flying jellyfish machine.
131	flying jellyfish robot generation surveillance drone	Generation of jellyfish flying surveillance drones.	Generation flying jellyfish surveillance drone.	The generation of surveillance drone flying jellyfish robots.
131	researcher create robot fly jellyfish video	A researcher is creating a video of the robot fly's jellyfish.	One researcher creates the video of the robot fly jellyfish.	The robot fly jellyfish video is created by a researcher.
131	researcher create aerial robot fly jellyfish	Robot fly jellyfish are created by a researcher.	A researcher is creating robot fly jellyfish.	A researcher creates robot fly jellyfish.
131	flying jellyfish robot gen surveillance drone	Jellyfish flying robot is a surveillance drone.	This flying jellyfish robot is a surveillance drone.	The flying jellyfish robot is surveillance drone.
131	flying machine inspired simple swimmer	The simple swimmer-swimmer was inspired by the use of the machine.	The flying machine inspired the simple swimmer,-swimmer.	The flying machine inspired simple swimmer-swimmer.
131	meet flying machine inspired jellyfish	Meet flying machine-inspired jellyfish.	Meet jellyfish inspired by flying machines.	Meet flying machine inspired jellyfish.
131	winged robot fly jellyfish	Jellyfish-fly-fly-wing robot.	Medusa-fly-fly-winged robot.	Jellyfish-flies-flies-robot wing.
131	winged robot fly air jellyfish blueprint future	It's like a jellyfish, it's like a jellyfish, it's like a jellyfish.	Winged robot, fly, rockfish; air sketches; future of the jellyfish.	Robot wing, fly, jellyfish of l' air sketches; future of jellyfish.
131	video flying robotic jellyfish prototype prof	Prototype of Flying Robotic Jellyfish on video.	Prototype of a flying robotic jellyfish robot on video.	Flying robotic jellyfish prototype on video.
131	robot fly air jellyfish	Robotic flying jellyfish.	Flying robotic jellyfish.	And robotic flying jellyfish.
131	robotic flying jellyfish prototype prof	Prototype of a robotic, flying jellyfish.	Prototype robotic flying jellyfish.	Prototype of robotic flying jellyfish.
131	flying robot designed jellyfish inspiration	It's the first time I've ever seen a jellyfish.	The flying robot designed the jellyfish's inspiration to fly.	The flying robot designed the jellyfish inspiration.
131	flying robot move jellyfish	Jellyfish are being moved by a flying robot.	And a flying robot moves jellyfish.	A flying robot moves jellyfish.
131	scientist prototype flying robotic jellyfish	Scientific prototype of Flying Robotic Jellyfish.	Flying robotic jellyfish scientific prototype.	Scientific prototype flying robotic jellyfish.
131	jellyfish drone stay airborne furiously flapping time second	The drone remains in the air, beating furiously in the second.	The jellyfish drone remains in the air, beating furiously in the tenth grade.	The jellyfish drone will stay in the air, beating furiously in the second.
131	jellyfish inspire flying robot design	Jellyfish are inspiring the design of flying robots.	Jellyfish inspire the design of flying robots.	Jellyfish inspire flying robot design.
131	researcher create robot fly jellyfish	Jellyfish robot flies are created by a researcher.	One researcher creates robot jellyfish flies.	A researcher creates robot fly jellyfish.
131	watch tiny robot fly jellyfish video	Watching the video of the robot's tiny, fly jellyfish.	Watch video of the robot's tiny fly jellyfish.	Watch the robot's tiny fly jellyfish video.
131	drone deign mimic movement jellyfish	It's like a jellyfish, it's like a drone.	A drone mimics the movement of a jellyfish.	A drone will mimic the movement of a jellyfish.
131	miniature flying robot flap wing jellyfish making flight turbulent	Flying miniature flying-flap jellyfish make flight turbulent.	Jellyfish are miniature flying jellyfish with flaps that make the flight turbulent.	Flying miniature flying jellyfish make the flight turbulent.
131	jellyfish bot swim air	Jellyfish Bot swims in the air; air; air.	Jellyfish botus swim the apos; air from the apos; air.	Jellyfish bot swim apos; air apos; air.
131	winged flying robot move jellyfish	Jellyfish are being moved by a flying winged robot.	And a flying robot moves jellyfish.	A winged flying robot moves jellyfish.
131	tiniest bizarre flying robot developed move jellyfish video	The mobile jellyfish video was developed by a very small, weird flying robot.	Weird little flying robot developed the video of the mobile jellyfish.	A tiny, weird flying robot developed the mobile jellyfish video.
131	prototype flying jellyfish air	It's the same as the one you're using.	Prototype of flying jellyfish.	Prototype d' flying jellyfish air.
131	flying robo jellyfish created nyu	Flying robotic jellyfishes have created Nyu.	Flying robotic jellyfish have created Nyu.	Robotic flying jellyfish created Nyu.
131	winged flying robot resembles motion swimming jelly sh	The flying winged robot looks like a jelly sh swimming in motion.	The winged flying robot looks like a moving jelly sh.	The winged flying robot looks like a jelly sh swimming in motion.
131	researcher design small robot shape jellyfish	Researchers are also designing small, robot-shaped jellyfish.	The researchers are designing little robot jellyfish.	Researchers design little robot jellyfish.
131	flying jellyfish robot big thing future surveillance search	Jellyfish robot flying big-ticket future surveillance research.	Jellyfish robot flying big future surveillance research thing.	Jellyfish robot flying big thing future surveillance research.
131	flying jellyfish machine conceptualizes tiny future surveillance	The Flying Jellyfish Machine (FJM) conceptualizes miniature future surveillance.	The flying jellyfish machine conceptualizes a very small future surveillance.	The flying jellyfish machine conceptualizes tiny future surveillance.
131	tiny flying robot soar jellyfish	It's a little robot that flies like a jellyfish, and it flies like a jellyfish.	A little robot flying away, flying like a jellyfish in the air.	A small flying robot flies like a jellyfish.
131	tiny flying robot move air jellyfish	A little flying robot, it moves flying jellyfish.	One little flying robot moves flying jellyfish.	A flying robot moves flying jellyfish.
131	scientist flying robot design	Flying robots designed by scientists.	The design of robot wings by scientists.	Flying robot design by scientists.
131	mini flying robot hovers jellyfish	Jellyfish are hoisted by mini-flying robots.	Mini-flying robots hoist jellyfish.	There are mini-robots flying from the jellyfish.
131	newly developed tiny robot fly jellyfish	Jellyfish-flies-robotics.	Small jellyfish-fly-robot newly developed.	Small jellyfish-fly-robot newly developed.
131	flying jellyfish robot fill sky	A flying robot jelly fills the sky.	A flying robot jellyfish fills the skies.	A flying jellyfish robot fills the sky.
131	flying robot inspired jellyfish	The flying robot, it inspired the jellyfish.	Flying robot inspired the jellyfish.	The flying robot inspired the jellyfish.
131	winged flying robot drift breeze airborne jellyfish	The flying wing robot drifts breaks airborne jellyfish-airborne ice.	The winged flying robot is drifting and breaking-airborne jellyfish ice.	The winged flying robot shatters-airborne jellyfish.
131	flying robot inspired jellyfish	The flying robot, it inspired the jellyfish.	Flying robot inspired the jellyfish.	The flying robot inspired the jellyfish.
131	tiny drone fly jellyfish	Jellyfish-flying little jellyfish.	Small jellyfish jellyfish.	You little jellyfish jellyfish.
131	flying robot mimic jellyfish	The flying robot, it imitates the jellyfish.	The flying robot is mimicking the jellyfish.	The flying robot mimics the jellyfish.
131	scientist build flying jellyfish machine	A scientist is building a machine with flying jellyfish.	One scientist is building a flying jellyfish machine.	A flying jellyfish machine is being built by a scientist.
131	watch jellyfish robot fly	Watch the robot jelly fly.	I mean, watching the jellyfish robot fly.	Watch the jellyfish robot fly.
131	video tiny mechanical jellyfish fly	Video Mechanical jellyfish.	Little mechanical jellyfish video.	Video Small mechanical jellyfish fly video.
131	researcher study aerodynamics jellyfish flying robot	Researchers are studying the aerodynamics of robot flying jellyfish.	Researchers are studying the aerodynamics of flying robot jellyfish.	The researchers study the aerodynamics of flying robot jellyfish.
131	tiny flying robot move jellyfish nyu boffin	The little flying robot is moving the boffin nyu jellyfish.	This little flying robot moves the nyu boffin jellyfish.	Little flying robot moves the jellyfish nyu boffin.
131	search blog	Blog search.	Search blog!	Blog search engine.
131	extremely tiny robot float air jellyfish	Extremely small robots are floating on flying jellyfish.	Extremely small robots float on flying jellyfishes.	And extremely small robots float on the flying jellyfish.
131	flying robot jellyfish exists	There are some robot flying jellyfish.	There are robot jellyfish flying around.	Flying robot jellyfish exist.
131	jellyfish inspired drone flight	The jellyfish was the inspiration for the drone flight.	And the jellyfish inspired the drone flight.	The jellyfish inspired drone flight.
132	jolla sailfish powered smartphone launched rollout country	Jolla sails in the country of deployment.	Jolla sailboat just powered her smartphone into the country of deployment.	Jolla powered her smartphone in the country of deployment.
132	nokia engineer launch smartphone	Engineer Nokia launches smartphone.	Nokia Engineer starts smartphone.	Nokia engineer launches smartphone.
132	jolla nokia employee launch smartphone	L&apos, an employee of Jolla Nokia, is now launching a smartphone.	L' employee of Jolla Nokia launches a smartphone.	Jolla Nokia employee launches smartphone.
132	myriad power android apps jolla smartphone	Powerful android applications Jolla smartphone.	Myriad of powerful android Jolla smartphone applications.	A myriad of powerful Jolla smartphone android applications.
132	jolla smartphone sailfish sale today video	Jolla Smartphone is proud to announce the release of a new version of Jolla.	Jolla smartphone sale of sails of fish today; video oil.	Jolla smartphone sale of fish sails video oil.
132	jolla sailfish phone sale tonight	Jolla sailphone sale tonight.	Jolla's sail phone sale tonight.	Hey, Jolla's phone sale tonight.
132	jolla smartphone set launch finland quiet future plan	Jolla smartphone launches plan d&apos, plan d&apos.	Jolla smartphone launch finland plan d' silent future.	Jolla smartphone launch finland plan d' future silent.
133	crisis greece gurria oecd hail athens effort	Greek Crisis Greece salutes the efforts of Athens.	Greek Crisis Greece oecd salutes the Apos effort; Athens.	Greek Crisis Greece oecd salutes the apostles; effort by Athens.
133	greece stifled overregulation oecd	Greece has been stifling the urge to over-regulate.	Greece has stifled the urge to over-regulate.	Greece has stifled over-regulation.
133	oecd aim greek bureaucracy boost growth	This is the first time that the Greek government has taken steps to promote growth.	L' ocde targets the Greek bureaucracy to stimulate growth.	It targets Greek bureaucracy to stimulate growth.
133	falling price pose risk greece bailout oecd	Lower prices could lead to a Greek bailout.	The fall in prices could lead to a bailout of Greece.	However, there is a risk that the price reduction will lead to a bailout of Greece.
133	tank oecd predicts greek economy shrink year	The Greek economy is expected to shrink in the coming years, according to the tank oecd.	The tank oecd predicts that the Greek economy will shrink from year to year.	The tank oecd predicts that the Greek economy will shrink year by year.
133	investment japonica partner greece score	It's a good thing that you've got a lot of money.	Japan's investment partner, Greece, has a point.	Japan's investment partner, Greece, scores.
133	japonica kick greece campaign	The Japanese Kick Campaign in Greece.	The Japanese kick campaign in greece.	Japanese kick campaign in Greece.
133	oecd urge massive deregulation greek economy	The Greek economy is one of the most important economies in the world.	L' ocdi called for massive deregulation of the Greek economy.	It calls for massive deregulation of the Greek economy.
133	oecd chief urge bank lend	The head of l' Oecd requests a loan from the bank.	The head of l' Oecd requests a bank loan.	Oecd requests a bank loan.
133	greece stay recession rescue oecd	Greece remain recession, bail-out oecd.	Greece remain recessive oecd rescue.	Greece remain recession rescue oecd.
133	japonica discus greece campaign annual greek	Japan discus in Greece, Japan discus in Greece, Japan discus in Greece.	Japan discus in Greece, annual campaign in Greece.	japonica discus in Greece, annual campaign in Greece.
133	oecd greece recession continuing year	The recession of the Greek economy continued throughout the course of the year.	The recession of the Greek Ocde continues into the year.	Greece's recession continued throughout the year.
133	greek economy shrinking year	The Greek economy is growing faster than the rest of the world.	The Greek economy declines from year to year.	Greece's economy is shrinking year by year.
134	breakthrough discovery lead development future therapeutic	A revolutionary breakthrough led to the development of new therapies.	One revolutionary breakthrough led to the development of future therapies.	Revolutionary discovery leads to the development of future therapies.
134	researcher identify progenitor cell vital successful growth	Researchers are now identifying the progenitor cells that are essential for successful growth.	Researchers identify the progenitor cells that are essential for successful growth.	Researchers identify progenitor cells essential for successful growth.
134	coffman tout stem cell lab tour despite opposing stem cell	The visit to the entire coffin-stem cell laboratory despite the opposite stem cells.	The visit to the entire coffin stem cell laboratory, despite the presence of opposing stem cells.	The entire coffin-stem cell lab visit despite the presence of opposing stem cells.
134	blue horizon international creates stem cell education broadcast public tv	It's a great way to create new products and to create new ones.	International Blue Horizon create stem cells d&apos education on public TV.	Blue Horizon international create stem cells d' education on public television.
134	researcher penn uncover mechanism blood stem cell longevity	Researcher Penn has discovered the mechanism of the longevity of the blood stem cells.	Dr. Penn has discovered the mechanism of blood stem cell longevity.	Penn researcher discovered the mechanism of blood stem cell longevity.
134	dr brian mehling talk stem cell china taishan academic forum	Dr. Brian Mehling speak Chinese stem cells taishan academic forum.	Dr. Brian mehling talk Chinese stem cells taishan academic forum.	Dr. Brian mehling talk about stem cell research in China taishan academic forum.
134	researcher identify cell involved placenta development	Identifies the cells involved in the development of the placenta.	The researcher identifies which cells are involved in the development of the placenta.	The researcher identifies the cells involved in the development of the placenta.
134	ucla stem cell lead improved prostate cancer treatment	The use of lead in stem cells has improved the treatment of prostate cancer.	The lead from ucla stem cells has improved the treatment of prostate cancer.	Lead from ucla stem cells has improved prostate cancer treatment.
134	stem cell transplant repair damaged gut mouse model inflammatory bowel	Repair of stem cell transplantation damaged the model of the intestinal mouse inflammatory bowel.	Repair of the stem cell transplant process damaged the inflammatory bowel of intestinal mice.	Stem cell transplant repair damaged the intestinal mouse inflammatory bowel model.
134	ann arbor stem cell thrives university michigan	Ann Arbor is thriving in university-based Michigan.	Dapos; Ann Arbor stem cells are thriving in university-based Michigan.	Apos; Ann Arbor stem cells thrive in university Michigan.
134	welsh crucible developing software help scientist lab	Walsh Creuset software developer to assist in the development of the science laboratory.	Software development Welsh crucible help scientific laboratory.	Welsh software development crucible help science laboratory.
134	ku stem cell center work touted	A ku ku center of stem cells has been created.	A ku ku stem cell center has been established in the country.	A ku ku stem cell center was set up.
134	ann arbor um stem cell thing people	There are some people who are interested in the use of stem cells.	There are people who are interested in stem cells.	There are people who are interested in stem cell research.
134	congressman tout stem cell lab tour despite opposing stem cell	The honourable Member did everything possible to visit the stem cell laboratory, despite the fact that there was opposition to stem cells.	The MP did everything possible to visit the stem cell laboratory despite the opposition to stem cells.	The honourable Member has made every effort to visit the human stem cell laboratory despite the opposition to stem cell research.
134	prostate cancer stem cell evolve cell	Stem cells in prostate cancer are still evolving.	Prostate cancer stem cells are evolving rapidly.	Well, prostate cancer stem cells evolve.
134	bioheart announces clinical site mexico	Bioheart is announcing the mexico clinical site.	Bioheart announces the clinical site mexico.	Bioheart announces clinical site mexico.
135	majority support blasio prekindergarten tax plan poll	The majority supported the survey on Blasio Junior Kindergarten taxation.	The majority support the Blasio Pre-Kindergarten Tax Survey.	The majority support the Blasio Pre-Kindergarten tax survey.
135	democrat biggest city resident cluster party	The largest Democratic party of the city's residents.	It's the biggest Democratic party in the city.	Biggest Democratic resident party in the city.
135	poll blasio pre plan popular statewide	Poll blasio pre-popular map on the scale of l' state.	Poll blasio pre-popular map map scale; state.	Poll blasio pre @- @ plan popular at the scale of l' state.
135	poll solid support bill blasio tax rich plan	Strongly support Bill Blasio.	Study strongly to support the Blasio bill.	Make sure you strongly support the Blasio bill.
135	poll third nyc voter support blasio plan tax	In addition, there are a number of polling stations and polling stations.	Voter Survey #3 on voter support for the blasio plan.	Survey #3 on voter support for the blasio plan.
135	nyc pre tax plan finding favor voter	Nyc tax pr plans to locate the list of favourite electors.	Nyc pre fiscal plan to find the list; favorite voter.	Nyc tax plan find the list; favorite voter.
135	poll yorkers blasio pre plan tax cut	Yorkshires blasio survey pre-tax reduction plan.	Yorkshires blasio poll pre-tax reduction plan.	The poll of york shires blasio pre-tax reduction plan.
135	ny voter support tax hike wea hy school	No elector has ever supported increased taxes on education.	In addition, the federal government will continue to work with provinces and territories to improve the quality of health care.	No voters support increasing taxes on property; and education.
135	poll find fracking divide york support deblasio tax plan	A survey shows that the split York supports the fiscal plan deblasio.	A poll reveals that fracking divides York is supportive of the deblasio tax plan.	One poll shows that the fracking divide York supports the deblasio tax plan.
135	blasio pre plan find favor state voter	I'd like to thank you for your time and for your support.	Blasio pre-plan find in favor of the voters of the state.	Blasio pre plan find in favor of the electorate of the state.
135	poll support nyc tax hike richest	Public opinion polls have supported the rise in NYT's richest tax.	Polls are supporting the rise of the richest tax in the NYT.	Polls support NYT's richest tax hike.
135	asked ny voter split gas drilling	J' asked an electorate to share the gas drilling.	J' asked one voter to share the gas drill.	J' asked a voter to share gas drilling.
135	biggest city democrat	Biggest Democratic-Democratic city.	The largest Democratic Democrat city in the world.	The biggest Democratic town.
135	york city pre plan find favor state voter	Pre-city map of York City to find the list of electors; favorite state.	Pre-city map of York find the apos; voter d' favorite state.	Pre-map of the city of York find the map; voter d' favorite state.
135	poll voter statewide bill blasio tax hike rich	Surveys in the region; set of statistics on the rise in the country's wealthy taxes.	It's a survey in the apos; set of the apos; state on the rise of taxes blasio rich.	Public opinion poll on the rise of taxes blasio riche.
136	screening inmate hiv reveal undetected case	Testing inmates for HIV indicates that one case was undetected.	HIV testing of inmates reveals an undetected case.	One undetected case was found in the inmate HIV test.
136	hiv screening inmate low yield	Low-yielding inmates are screened for HIV.	HIV testing of low-performing inmates.	HIV testing of low performance inmates.
136	prevalence undiagnosed hiv infection low state prison entrant	Prevalence of undiagnosed HIV infection in the general population in the United States.	Prevalence of undiagnosed HIV infection entering low-risk prison.	Prevalence of undiagnosed HIV infection entering prison in low risk state.
137	mach shockwave supernova	Supernova shock waves.	Mach waves shock supernova supernova.	Mach supernova shock waves.
137	cosmic shock wave astronomer study century supernova	Cosmic shock-wave astronomer L&apos studies the supernova of the century.	L&apos, the astronomer of cosmic shock waves, studies the supernova of the century.	L&apos, cosmic shock wave astronomer, studies the supernova of the century.
137	mach shock wave power tycho supernova remnant	It's a supernova, supernova, supernova shockwave.	Power of apos; supernova Tycho shock wave vestiges.	Power d' shock wave Tycho supernova vestige.
137	kilo mach sonic boom probed fireball ember ad supernova	Ember fireball is a fireball designed to be used as a fireball.	Sonic boom kilo mach sounded fireball ember ad supernova.	Sonic boom kilo mach probed fireball ember ad supernova.
137	supernova light entire galaxy	The whole galaxy is lit by the supernova.	This supernova is lighting up the entire galaxy.	The supernova illuminates the entire galaxy.
137	reverse shockwaves spectacular glow tycho supernova remnant	L' reversal of shock waves shines a dramatic remnant of supernova tycho.	L' reversing the shock waves brings out a spectacular remnant of the supernova tycho.	A spectacular remnant of a supernova tycho shines through the reversal of shock waves.
137	astronomer find mach shock wave heating tycho supernova	Astronomer finds shock waves supernova tycho supernova.	L' astronomer finds my shock wave supernova tycho heating supernova.	L' astronomer finds my shock wave heating tycho supernova supernova.
137	supernova mach reverse shockwave	Supernova reverse-shock wave.	Supernova reverse shock wave mach.	Supernova mach wave reverse shock.
137	mach shock wave light supernova remnant	Mach on shocked, supernova, residual, supernova, supernova.	Mach sur choc lumière supernova résiduel supernova.	Mach on supernova residual light shock supernova.
137	insane reverse shock wave mach power tycho supernova remnant	Unconscionable reverse shock wave, supernova superpower, superpower supernova.	Senseless, reverse shock wave, mach power tycho supernova vestige.	Senseless reverse shock wave mach tycho supernova remnant power.
137	reverse shock waving moving mach light tycho supernova	Shock reversely undulating Tycho motion supernova light bulb supernova.	Machine motion reversing shock Tycho supernova light supernova.	Shock undulating reverse mach motion Tycho supernova light supernova.
137	dying star wind puffball	The wind of the star is blowing out of the sky.	The wind of the dying star is blowing wind balls.	The dying star wind blows wind balls.
137	tycho supernova remnant light mach shock wave	Tycho supernova vestige of light, mach shockwave.	Tycho supernova vestige of the light mach shockwave.	Tycho supernova vestige of light mach shockwave.
137	astronomer light tycho supernova remnant	It's like a supernova, it's a supernova, it's a supernova, it's a supernova.	Remaining of shining supernova tycho of the apos; astronomer.	Remaining supernova shining tycho of the astronomer.
137	breathtaking supernova remnant illuminated mach reverse shock wave	A remnant of a supernova that takes your breath away from the illumination of Mach wave.	A remnant of supernova to breathtaking illumination Mach reverse shock wave mach.	A breathtaking supernova remnant illumination mach reverse shock wave mach.
137	space shockwave traveling time faster sound	Space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l&apos.	L' shock waves... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l&apos.	L' shock waves... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l' space... l&apos.
137	mach shock wave light tycho supernova remnant	It's a residue from a supernova, shock-wave tycho.	A shockwave supernova tycho residue.	A tycho supernova residue with shock waves.
137	beautiful mach reverse shock wave emanates tycho supernova	A supernova tycho is emitted by a beautiful Mach Mach inverse shock wave.	A beautiful reverse mach mach shock wave emits a supernova tycho.	A beautiful mach mach reverse shock wave emits a tycho supernova.
138	daily talker boston park smoking ban	You are not allowed to smoke in Boston Park.	No smoking in Boston park.	There's no smoking in Boston Park.
138	boston ban smoking public park	Boston No Smoking in the Public Park.	Boston doesn't allow smoking in public park.	Boston doesn't allow smoking in public park buildings.
138	boston expected ban smoking park	Boston was waiting for a smoke-free zone in the park.	Boston was waiting for a smoking ban in the park.	Boston s' expected a smoking ban in the park.
138	smoking ban boston park week	Boston Park Week Smoking ban.	There's no smoking in Boston Park Week.	No smoking in Boston Park Week.
139	barneys monitor nyc store camera room curb racial profiling	Lawyers are staking out Nyc's video room.	The lawyers are staking out the camera room at Nyc's store.	The camera room at the Nyc store is being watched by lawyers.
139	barneys facing allegation profiling monitor nypd store	Well, bars confronted with profiling allegations are staking out the NYPD store.	Bars facing allegations of profiling are staking out the NYPD store.	Bars facing profiling allegations have the NYPD store under surveillance.
139	barneys monitor store police amid profiling claim	It is important to note that this is not a legal issue, but rather a legal issue.	Lawyers monitor the store's police during the preparation of the profile.	Lawyers monitor store police at the time of filing; profiling.
139	barneys announces security measure staff eye police	Barneys has announced security measures.	Barneys is announcing some security measures.	Barneys announces security measures.
140	vonn credit brace saving knee hope race week	The Week of the Race of the Apostles; hope.	The week of the race of hope.	The week of the race of l' hope.
140	ski team coach describes lindsey vonn training crash	It's a great place to go, and it's a great place to go, and a great place to go.	L' coach of l' ski team describes the apos; accident of lindsey Vonn training.	L' ski coach; ski team describes avalanche; accident; training Lindsey Vonn.
140	vonn cast doubt olympic hope	We're casting doubt on Olympic hope.	We'll just cast doubt on the Olympic hope.	We'll cast doubt on the Olympic hope.
140	web extra olympic ski physician talk lindsay vonn acl injury	On the web, there is a doctor who's a specialist in the field of skiing.	A ski doctor talks about his injuries on the web.	On the web a ski doctor talks about his injuries.
140	vonn crash prepping return racing	We're just gonna s' crush while we prepare the races back.	We're just going to crash and burn while we're getting ready for the next races.	We're going to crash while we're racing back.
140	lindsey vonn test knee snow week today video	Lindsey will be testing the Week of Knee Snow.	Lindsey will be testing the snow week of the knee today.	Lindsey will test the knee snow week today; video hui.
140	ski champion lindsey vonn confident injury heal time compete	Ski champion Lindsey will be confident in the healing time of the injuries.	Ski champion Lindsey is confident in the time it takes to heal his wounds.	The ski champion Lindsey confident in the time of healing wounds compete.
140	exclusive lindsey vonn injury time sochi	L' Lindsey exclusivity has a time of injury Sochi time of injury.	L' exclusivity Lindsey long injury time Sochi injury time.	Lindsey exclusive injury time Sochi injury time.
140	vonn cautious sochi olympics participation	This was the first time that the team had participated in the Olympics in Sochi.	A careful participation in the Sochi Olympics.	A cautious participation in Sochi Olympics.
140	lindsey vonn sochi chance injury honest video	Lindsey vonn Sochi honest shot wound video.	Lindsey vonn Sochi honest video injury.	Well, Lindsey vonn Sochi's honest video wound.
140	lindsey vonn hopeful ski week long	Lindsey is looking forward to a week-long skiing experience.	Lindsey's looking forward to a week of skiing filled with hope.	Lindsey hopes for a week of hopeful skiing.
140	vonn unsure sochi chance	Not sure Sochi has a chance.	I'm not sure Sochi has a chance.	I'm not sure Sochi has a chance yet.
140	lindsey vonn crash high speed tricky visibility coach	It's a good way to get a good look at the gameplay and the gameplay.	Lindsey's going for it; crashing at high speed, the tough, fast visibility coach.	Lindsey will get away with high speed crushing, the fast and difficult visibility coach.
140	lindsey vonn recovering partial acl tear injured knee	She's going to be fine, but she's going to be fine.	Lindsey will recover from a partial tear in her knee.	Lindsey will recover from a partial knee tear.
140	lindsey vonn fluke accident caused setback	Lindsey's accident was a fluke, causing a setback.	The accident of Lindsey vonn fluke caused a setback.	Lindsey vonn fluke accident caused a setback.
140	vonn latest crash sochi olympic hope	L' Olympic Hope of the Last Sochi Crash.	L' Olympic hope of last Sochi crash.	L' Olympic hope of the last crash of Sochi.
140	vonn partially tear repaired knee ligament	Looks like a partial tear to the knee ligament's been repaired.	A partial tear in the knee ligament has been repaired.	Partial knee ligament tear repaired.
140	lindsey vonn injury time sochi	Lindsey's time of injury... sochi time of injury.	Lindsey vonn time of injury sochi time of injury.	Lindsey's injury time sochi injury time.
140	lindsey vonn plan compete olympics injury	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Lindsey vonn Olympic competitive plan Olympic injury.	Lindsey vonn Olympic injury competition plan Olympic injury.
140	lindsey vonn speak exclusively today time crash	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Lindsey speaks exclusively today; time crashes.	Lindsey will talk exclusively today; time crash hui.
140	lindsey vonn unsure sochi olympic chance	Lindsey doubts the Olympic luck of Sochi.	Lindsey had doubts about Sochi's Olympic luck.	Lindsey doubts Sochi's olympic luck.
140	lindsey vonn knee injury confident going	Lindsey has a bad knee injury, trusting to go.	Lindsey had a knee injury trusting to go.	Lindsey got knee injury trusting to go.
140	lindsey vonn unsure sochi olympic chance	Lindsey doubts the Olympic luck of Sochi.	Lindsey had doubts about Sochi's Olympic luck.	Lindsey doubts Sochi's olympic luck.
140	tiger wood girlfriend lindsey vonn victim fau condition ski crash	Tiger Wood girlfriend Lindsey died a ski crash victim.	Tiger Wood girlfriend Lindsey girlfriend died fau ski crash condition.	Tiger Wood girlfriend Lindsey's a victim fau ski crash condition.
140	lindsay vonn return great news nbc	Lindsay will be back with NBC's good news.	Lindsay will be back with good news from NBC.	Lindsay'll be back with good news from NBC.
140	vonn latest knee injury time sochi	Sochi's last knee injury.	Sochi's last knee injury, sir.	This is the last injury to the knee of Sochi.
140	lindsey vonn test injured knee snow week	Lindsey has a test for knee injury, week-long snow.	Lindsey vonn knee injury test week of snow.	Lindsey vonn test knee injury week of snow.
141	doc thankful	He's grateful.	The doctor's thankful.	Well, the doctor's grateful.
141	hea benefit gratitude	Gratitude heap.	Hea profit gratitude.	Hea gratitude profit.
141	gena bigler thanksgiving chance learn gratitude hea hy	It's a great way to get to know each other and to get to know each other.	Gena greatest Thanksgiving chance to learn gratitude hea hy.	Gena greater Thanksgiving chance to learn gratitude hea hy.
141	winifred lender surprising power gratitude thanksgiving lesson	Lender to wine surprisingly powerful Thanksgiving gratitude lesson.	Wine lender surprisingly powerful Thanksgiving gratitude lesson.	Lender to wine surprising power gratitude lesson Thanksgiving.
141	good time year learn cu ivate attitude gratitude	Good year to learn, because I have to learn; attitude of gratitude ivate attitude.	Happy year learn because l&apos attitude of gratitude ivate attitude.	Good year learn because l' attitude of gratitude ivate attitude.
141	gratitude column thanksgiving	Thanksgiving thank-you column.	Oh, thanksgiving thank-you column.	Uh, thanksgiving gratitude column.
141	letter commentary	Letter comment.	Comment to the letter.	Commentary on the letter itself.
141	gary benefit gratitude	Gratitude to the beneficiaries guaranteed.	Guarantee of gratitude to the beneficiaries.	Guarantee of gratitude to beneficiaries.
141	filling gratitude bucket year long	It's a good idea to fill the bucket with gratitude.	Fill the bucket with gratitude throughout the year.	Fill bucket with gratitude all year.
141	attitude gratitude better life	L' thankful attitude better life.	L&apos attitude gratitude better life.	L' attitude gratitude better life.
141	thankful improve life	Thank God life's better than life.	Thank God, life s' improves.	Thank God, life improves.
141	lifestyling thanksgiving beloved holiday	Enjoying Lifeestyling Thanksgiving-vacation.	Lifeestyling Thanksgiving well-loved vacation.	LIFEESTYLING Thanksgiving well-loved holidays.
141	grateful	Appreciate it.	I'm grateful.	I'm grateful to you, sir.
141	gratitude good hea	Good hea hea hea hea recognition.	This is a good hea hea hea.	Reconnaissance good hea hea.
141	grateful good skipping dessert working	I'd like to thank you for the opportunity to skip dessert while you were working.	Thanks for skipping dessert while you were working.	Thanks for skipping dessert while working.
141	habit grateful people	The regulars are thankful people.	Most regulars are grateful people.	Regulars are grateful people.
141	grateful break good hea	Just a thankful, healthy break.	You know, a thankful, healthy break.	A grateful break from good health.
141	whew turkey pardon	Pardon the turkey.	I'm sorry about the turkey.	Sorry about the turkey thing.
141	keeping thanksgiving	Just keep on Thanksgiving.	Go on with Thanksgiving.	I'm gonna keep on Thanksgiving.
141	idea parent teach kid gratitude	A parent who teaches children how to be grateful.	Idea of a parent who teaches gratitude to the children.	A parent who teaches gratitude to children.
141	year round beneficial	Happy year.	This whole year is a good year.	All the year beneficial.
141	create attitude gratitude	Create a grateful attitude.	Create an attitude of gratitude.	To create an attitude of gratitude.
141	habit highly grateful people	I'm sorry, but I don't know what to do.	The habit of very grateful people.	L' very grateful people habit.
142	vinny return play lightning wednesday	Vinny's back in the game, she's playing lightning on Wednesday.	Vinny returns playing lightning on Wednesday.	Vinny back to lightning Wednesday.
142	lecavalier turning tampa	Becoming a buffa horseman.	Knight to become buffa.	Cavalier becomes Cavalier.
142	lecavalier forward tonight homecoming tampa bay	Knight to the Tampa Bay Ball tonight.	Leading man tonight at the Tampa Bay Ball.	Knight forward tonight at the Tampa Bay ball.
142	flyer lecavalier tampa hero	Pilot, Lecavalier, Tampa hero.	Pilot Tampa Lecavalier hero.	Pilot Lecavalier tampa hero.
142	lecavalier hit ice tampa bay	I'm afraid Lecavalier has hit the iceberg of Tampa.	Lecavalier hit the Tampa Ice Bay.	Lecavalier hit Tampa Ice Bay.
142	flyer storyline long streak	History of the Apos; Roaming; Roaming of the Apos; Roaming of the Apos; Roaming of the Apos; Roaming of the Apos; Roaming of the Apos; History of the Apos; History of the Apos; History of the Apos; History of the Apos.	The history of the apo; the history of the apo; the roaming of the apo; the roaming of the apo; the roaming of the apo; the roaming of the apo; the history of the apo; the history of the apo; the history of the apo; the history of the apo; the history of the apo.	The history of the Apos; the history of the Apos; the roaming of the Apos; the roaming of the Apos; the roaming of the Apos; the roaming of the Apos; the roaming of the Apos; the history of the Apos; the history of the Apos; the history of the Apos; the history of the Apos.
142	flyer lightning preview	A glimpse of the lightning strike in the flyers.	A glimpse of lightning in flyers.	A glimpse of flyer lightning.
142	vinny lecavalier ready revisit dig	Vinny Lecavalier ready to revisit, sir.	Vinny Lecavalier ready to revisit excavation.	Vinny lecavalier ready to revisit search.
142	lecavalier excited return tampa	Horny Knight back to Tampa Tampa.	Horny Knight returns Tampa Tampa.	Horny horseman back to tampa tampa.
142	nhl lecavalier effort remembered tampa bay	Nhl Lecavalier remembered Tampa Bay.	Nhl lecavalier effort remembered Tampa Bay at the time.	Nhl lecavalier effort remembered tampa bay.
142	vinny lecavalier buyout worked side	The buyout of Vinny Lecavalier has been successful on the side.	Vinny Lecavalier's buyout worked just fine on the side.	Vinny Lecavalier's buyout worked on the side.
142	lecavalier hero tampa	Tampa-hero horseman hero.	Hero Knight Tampa hero hero.	Buffalo hero stampa hero.
142	lecavalier playing tampa bay special	I'm a knight playing Tampa Bay special.	Knight playing Tampa Bay special.	Knight playing tampa bay special.
142	flyer roster ready rough month	The passenger list has been prepared for a very difficult month.	The passenger manifest is ready for a tough month.	Passenger manifest is ready for a tough month.
142	flyer gameday lightning	Pilots' game of chance lightning.	Lightning games of chance for the drivers.	Games of chance lightning for drivers.
142	flyer philadelphia flyer steal vincent lecavalier	Vincent Lecavalier is being robbed by a Philadelphia pilot.	One Philadelphia pilot steals from Vincent Lecavalier.	Well, a Philadelphia pilot steals from Vincent Lecavalier.
142	lecavalier returning tampa special	Lecavalier returns Tampa Special Tampa.	The Horseman returns Tampa Special Tampa.	Leading man, return to Tampa Special.
142	lecavalier definitely excited going tampa	Definitely excited horseman going to Tampa.	Lecavalier definitely excited to go to Tampa.	Lecavalier definitely excited going to tampa.
142	vincent lecavalier vincent lecavalier return tampa wednesday	Vincent Lecavalier Vincent returns Tampa on Wednesday.	Vincent Lecavalier Vincent Lecavalier returns Tampa Wednesday.	Vincent Lecavalier Vincent Lecavalier will return to Tampa on Wednesday.
142	philadelphia flyer vincent lecavalier forward return tampa bay	Vincent Lecavalier returns to Tampa Bay.	The Philadelphia man Vincent Lecavalier returns to Tampa Bay.	Philadelphia-based aviator Vincent Lecavalier returns to his home in Tampa Bay.
142	flyer lecavalier franchise player tampa	Tampa buffa lecavalier driver.	Lecavalier driver, franchise player Tampa tampa.	The driver lecavalier franchise player Tampa tampa.
142	lecavalier definitely excited going tampa	Definitely excited horseman going to Tampa.	Lecavalier definitely excited to go to Tampa.	Lecavalier definitely excited going to tampa.
142	daily primer nov lecavalier return tampa	Every day, the initiator returns stamp.	Daily l' initiator nov lecavalier returns buffer.	Daily, l' initiator nov lecavalier will return buffa.
142	return tampa special meaning flyer lecavalier	Send back stampa special sense to flyer.	Send back tampa sense special flyer sense to the horseman.	Send back tampa special sense flyer the Horseman.
142	return tampa extra meaning lecavalier	This is the name of the extra tampon that means the horseman.	"Extra buffer return means ""cavalier."""	Extra tampa return meaning the horseman.
142	nhl preview philadelphia flyer visit tampa bay lightning	Nhl before-first Philadelphia flyer to visit Tampa Bay Lightning.	Nhl before-first Philadelphia flyer visit Thunderbolts Tampa Bay.	Before-first Philadelphia flyer visit Tampa Bay lightning bolts.
142	lecavalier prove lightning wrong return tampa	I'm the one who's trying to prove that he's in love with you.	Knight prove lightning strike wrong return to Tampa tampa.	Knight prove lightning wrong return Tampa tampa.
142	ice thing vinny	Oh, the Vinny ice cream thing.	The ice cream thingy, Vinny.	Vinny's ice cream thing.
142	forbes flyer	Forbes flyer.	Forbes, flyer.	Uh, forbes flyer.
142	flyer lecavalier face lightning tampa return	The lecavalier driver facing Tampa Lightning returns to Tampa.	The lecavalier driver facing the Tampa lightning bolt returns to Tampa.	Tampa's lecavalier face lightning back to Tampa.
142	lecavalier excited special return tampa bay	Horny horseman returns to Tampa Bay.	So, excited rider returns to Tampa Bay.	Horny Knight special return to Tampa Bay.
142	qa lecavalier excited return tampa bay	Horny Qua Lecavalier back to Tampa Bay.	Hey, Qua Lecavalier excited back to Tampa Bay.	Qua Lecavalier excited back to tampa bay.
142	lecavalier happy life buyout	The redemption of happy life, Lecavalier.	The redemption of happy life lecavalier.	The lecavalier happy life buyout.
142	tampa bay lightning philadelphia flyer	Tampa Bay Lightning Philadelphia flyer.	Tampa Bay Lightning, Philadelphia flyer.	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
142	flyer face daunting december	The pilot is facing a very intimidating December.	The pilot faces intimidating December.	The pilot faces December as a daunting moment.
142	vinny lecavalier emotional return tampa	Vinny the emotional cavalier, go back to Tampa tampa.	Vinny emotional cavalier flip Tampa tampa.	Vinny Lecavalier emotional return to the Tampa tampa.
143	george loegering observes large spinning circle ice sheyenne river	George loegering is observing large circles of ice turning Sheyenne River.	George loegering observes large circles of ice turning in the River Sheyenne.	George loegering observes large circles turning ice Sheyenne River.
143	unusual ice circle discovered sheyenne river	Unusual ice circles have discovered the Sheyenne River.	Sheyenne River was discovered by an unusual ice circle.	An unusual ice circle discovered the Sheyenne River.
143	unusual ice circle southeast expert cold air river eddy caused	It's been a long time since we've been able to make a difference in the world.	Unusual Southern expert ice circle-is d' cold river swirl air caused.	It's an unusual ice circle expert south-is d' cold air swirling river caused.
143	mysterious spinning ice circle north dakota river	Mysterious circle of ice circling the North Dakota River.	Uh, a mysterious circle of ice circling the North Dakota River.	A mysterious ice circle circling North Dakota River.
143	unusual ice circle form north dakota river deemed unusually large river	There is an unusual circle of ice forming the North Dakota River, which is considered to be an exceptionally large river.	An unusual ice circle forms the North Dakota River, which is considered to be one of the largest rivers in North Dakota.	An unusual ice circle forms the North Dakota River, which is considered an unusually large river.
143	eerie extremely rare ice circle form north dakota river	The North Dakota River is formed by a strange and extremely rare circle of ice.	An extremely rare strange circle of ice forms the North Dakota River.	A strange and extremely rare ice circle forms North Dakota River.
143	rare north dakota ice disk	Rare North Dakota Ice Disk.	This is a rare record of the ice of North Dakota.	North Dakota rare ice record.
143	amazing spinning ice circle spotted river	A breathtaking circle of ice, a mottled river.	A breathtaking circle of ice... a spotted river.	A breathtaking ice circle, spotted river.
143	rare foot wide ice disc spin north dakota sheyenne river video	A record of d&apos ice is filmed on North Dakota's Sheyenne River.	An ice disk from D' a rare foot width is filmed on the North Dakota River Sheyenne.	A d&apos ice disk; a rare foot width video shoots on the North Dakota River Sheyenne.
143	amazing ice circle appears river	An astonishing circle of ice has appeared on the river.	A surprising circle of ice appears on the river.	An amazing ice circle appears on the river.
143	nature answer whirlpool minus bubble extremely rare spinning ice	Nature's response is a whirlwind, less bubble, extremely rare falling ice.	Nature responds vortex less bubble extremely rare icefall.	Nature responds vortex minus bubble extremely rare shooting ice.
143	bizarre ice circle form north dakota lake confusing resident	It's a strange ring of ice formed by a lake called North Dakota, which confuses the residents.	Strange circle of ice formed by Lake North Dakota, which confuses the residents.	Strange ice circle formed by Lake North Dakota, which confuses residents.
143	strange ice circle north dakota river	Strange circle of ice just north of the Dakota River.	Well, that's a strange circle of ice north of the Dakota River.	Strange ice circle north of the Dakota River.
143	unusual ice circle form north dakota river	The North Dakota River is located in the northwest corner of North Dakota.	There is one unusual ice circle that forms the North Dakota River.	An unusual ice circle forms the North Dakota River.
143	watch north dakota man capture rare ice circle phenomenon camera	Watch as the North Dakota man captures a rare ice-circle camera.	Watch as North Dakota man captures a rare ice-circle phenomenon camera.	Watch the North Dakota man capture a rare ice-circle phenomenon camera.
143	beautiful ice circle form north dakota	There's a beautiful North Dakota ice circle.	This is a beautiful ice circle that forms North Dakota.	A beautiful ice circle forms North Dakota.
144	cyberscammers aim black friday cyber monday	Cyberscamp targets Black Friday cyber-Monday.	The cyberscampers are targeting Black Friday cybermayday.	Cybercampers target cyber black Monday cyber Friday.
144	black friday scam shopper watch	I want you to keep an eye on Black Friday scams.	Just keep an eye out for black Friday scams.	Check for black Friday scams.
144	cybercriminals aim black friday cyber monday	Cybercriminals have been targeting the dark cybernetic Friday of Monday.	Cybercriminals are targeting Monday's Dark Cyber Friday.	The cybercriminals are targeting the black Friday cybernetic on Monday.
144	cybergrinches stalking shopper	The buyers are being hunted down by the grinches.	The cyber-grinches are tracking buyers.	The cyber-grinches is tracking down the buyers.
144	scammer aim black friday cyber monday	L' scam artist is targeting Internet Friday-black Wednesday.	L' scam artist targets cyber Friday-black Wednesday.	L' scammer targets Black Wednesday cyber Friday @-@.
145	low cost camera operates speed light	The low-cost camera is the one that operates the speed of light.	The low-cost camera operates the speed of light.	The low-cost camera operates light speed.
145	camera operates speed light	The camera's got the speed lighthouse working.	This camera makes the speed lighthouse work.	The camera operates the speed lighthouse.
145	indian led mit team develops nano camera operates speed light	A team led by l&apos, India, is developing a nano-camera that will operate speed lighthouses.	A team led by l' India is developing a nano-camera that operates speed lighthouses.	India-led team develops a nano-camera that operates speed lighthouses.
145	low cost nano camera developed operate speed light	Speedlights are produced by a low-cost nano-camera.	A low-cost, nano-based-camera has been developed to operate high-speed lights.	A nano-low-cost camera developed operates speed lights.
145	mit microsoft building better kinect	With the best Microsoft Kinect build.	With the best building microsoft kinect.	With the best microsoft kinect build.
145	nano camera speed light capture image	Nano speed camera captures light image capture image.	Nano speed camera capture light image capture image capture.	Nano speed capture light capture image capture camera.
145	mit kinect camera work translucent object	The mit Kinect Camera works with a translucent object.	The camera mit kinect works with a translucent object.	The mit kinect camera uses a translucent object.
145	inexpensive nano camera operate speed light	You can use a high-speed lighthouse to get your hands on an inexpensive nanoscale camera.	With a fast lighthouse, an inexpensive nanometric camera works.	An inexpensive nanoscale camera uses a fast lighthouse.
145	mit developed nano camera work fast speed light priced	The nano-developed camera works at high-cost, high-speed, high-speed light.	The developed nano-camera works at high speed light price.	The nano-developed camera works at fast speed light at a high price.
145	speed light nano camera produce translucent object	Translucent objects are produced by the nano-speed light camera.	The nano-speed camera produces translucent objects.	The nano-camera speed light produces translucent objects.
145	nano camera operates speed light	The speed lighthouse is operated by the nano-camera.	The nano-camera operates the speed lighthouse.	The nano-camera operates speed lighthouse.
145	nanocamera operates speed light	The nanocamer powers the speed of light.	Well, the nanocamer makes the speed of light work.	Nanocamer makes the speed of light work.
145	nano camera operate speed light collision avoidance	The nano-camera allows to avoid collisions at high speed.	The nano-camera allows you to avoid high speed glowing collisions.	The camera nano-allows you to avoid high speed glowing collisions.
145	mit kinect camera work snow rain gloom night	It's a good place to get a good view of the rainy season.	It's nice to have a rainy night.	The rain was dark and the location was perfect.
145	nano camera operates speed light	The speed lighthouse is operated by the nano-camera.	The nano-camera operates the speed lighthouse.	The nano-camera operates speed lighthouse.
145	speed light camera picture	Photo by radiotelephone.	Photo by l' radiotelephone.	Photo of the camera; camera of radio telephone.
145	inexpensive nano camera operate speed light	You can use a high-speed lighthouse to get your hands on an inexpensive nanoscale camera.	With a fast lighthouse, an inexpensive nanometric camera works.	An inexpensive nanoscale camera uses a fast lighthouse.
145	kinect mit nano camera operates speed light	It's a fast-light camera.	I would like to thank you for your time and effort.	It's not a camera, it's a speed camera.
146	weatherford oil field firm pay settle bribe case	The Weatherford Oil Company is paying-pots of-wine.	The Weatherford oil company pays for-pots of-wine.	The Weatherford oil company has been paying-pots of-wine.
146	fine weatherford global corruption charge	Good Weatherford is accused of global bribery and corruption.	Good Weatherford is accused of global corruption.	Good weatherford is accused of global corruption.
146	fine weatherford iran work junket	Good Weatherford Iran works as a junket.	Good Weatherford Iran work junket.	Good weatherford iran work junket.
146	weatherford pay settle probe	Weatherford is paying us to settle the matter of the probe.	Weatherford's paying to settle the probe issue with him.	Weatherford's paying to settle the probe issue.
146	weatherford resolve investigation government	Weatherford is the answer to the government's investigation.	Weatherford solves the problem; government investigation.	Weatherford resolves government investigation.
146	swiss oilfield pay settle bribery case	Swiss Oilfield pay-pots of-wine.	Swiss Oilfield pays for-pots of-wine.	Swiss Oilfield pay for-pots of-wine.
146	swiss firm hit record fine oil sanction violation	A record breaking of oil fines penalties was set by the Swiss firm.	The Swiss firm broke a record for violations of oil fines.	Swiss law firm broke a record for violation of oil fines.
146	commercial bribery	Trade corruption on pain of corruption.	Commercial bribery on pain of bribery.	You know, commercial bribery on pain of bribery.
146	weatherford unit plead gui bribery export pact	In addition, the Department of Foreign Affairs and International Trade (DFAIT) and the Department of Foreign Affairs and International Trade (DFAIT) joined forces.	L' unit of Weatherford pleaded the pact d' export of bribery of mistletoe.	Weatherford unit pleaded a pact to export bribery of mistletoe.
146	weatherford prosecution deferred unit plead gui fcpa charge	The charges were laid on the same day as the charges were laid on the same day.	L' apo unit; charge postponed from Weatherford pleads fcpa charge.	L'apos; unit de l'apos; charge postponed from Weatherford pleads fcpa charge.
146	weatherford international reach settlement fed	Weatherford International reached settlement-fed colonies.	Weatherford International reached the colonies fed by settlement.	Weatherford International reached settlements fed by settlement.
146	update weatherford pay mln sanction violation	Updating of the Weatherford pay mln penalty violation.	Updated Weatherford pay mln penalty violation.	Weatherford update pay mln violation penalty.
146	department treasury treasury announces settlement	The Treasury is announcing a settlement.	The Treasury announces a settlement.	The public treasury announces a settlement.
146	weatherford international pay pena	International Pay Pena weatherford.	Weatherford, International Pay Pena.	Weatherford international pay pena.
146	charge weatherford international fcpa violation	Charge Weatherford with violating FCPA International Law.	I want you to charge Weatherford with violating the FCPA international law.	Charge Weatherford with violation of FCPA international law.
146	weatherford pay settle probe	Weatherford is paying us to settle the matter of the probe.	Weatherford's paying to settle the probe issue with him.	Weatherford's paying to settle the probe issue.
146	swiss firm fined sanction violation	And the Swiss firm had to pay a fine for violating the penalty.	The Swiss firm had to pay a fine for the violation of the sanctions.	The Swiss firm has been fined for violation of the sanction.
146	three subsidiary weatherford international limited agree plead gui	Three of Weatherford International Limited's subsidiaries are now closed; agreement to plead.	Three subsidiaries of Weatherford International Limited are established; agreement to plead.	Three subsidiary companies of Weatherford International Limited have agreed to plead.
146	update fine weatherford mln iran work junket	Update from the Weatherford mln Iran work junket.	Update from Weatherford mln Iran work junket.	Weatherford mln Iran work junket update.
146	fine oilfield company mln usd	Oilfield Company mlnn usd.	Mlnn usd oilfield company.	The oilfield company mlnnn usd.
146	weatherford settle global corruption charge agrees fine	Weatherford settles worldwide accusations of corruption; agreement.	Weatherford settles the charges of corruption all over the world.	Weatherford will settle corruption charges all over the world.
146	texas company pay export violation iran syria cuba	The Texas company is paying the price; export violation of Iran's Syria Cuba violation.	Texas company pays for export violation Iranian syria cuba violation.	Texas company pays export violation Iranian syria cuba violation.
146	subsidiary weatherford international limited agree plead gui fcpa	Weatherford International Limited has agreed to make its case on fcpa gui.	Weatherford International Limited has agreed to plead fcpa gui.	Weatherford International Limited agreed to plead gui fcpa.
146	weatherford international settle foreign bribery probe	Weatherford International will address the issue of corruption abroad.	It's a good thing, but it's a good thing.	The issue of foreign bribery is addressed by Weatherford International.
146	weatherford file regulation fd wft	Weatherford data file regulation fd wft wft.	Weatherford file regulation fd wft wft.	Weatherford file regulation fd wft wft.
146	weatherford settle corruption charge	The charges of bribery are settled by Weatherford.	Weatherford's settling the corruption charges.	Weatherford will settle the corruption charges.
146	fine swiss firm bribery sanction violation	Violation of the corruption penalty by a Swiss firm.	Breach of the penalty for bribing a Swiss firm.	This is a violation of the criminal law.
147	soldier pleads gui sex crime kid	Soldier, pleading for child sexual crime.	Child sex offender pleading soldier.	This is a soldier who pleaded guilty to a sexual crime as a child.
147	twin blaming soldier pleads gui sex crime	Private twin-accuser pleads sexual felony.	Twin, accusing soldier pleads guilty to a felony.	Accusing twin soldier pleads to sexual felony murder.
147	evil twin defense dropped fort carson officer plead gui sex assau	The evil twin's defense has given up on him; Officer Fort Carson pleading sex assau.	The defense of the evil twin has given up; Officer Fort Carson pleads assortment sex.	Officer Fort Carson pledging sex assau to defend the evil twin.
147	sex assau suspect blamed twin pleads gui	Suspect of the crime; sexual assault accused the twin of pleading mistletoe.	The suspect of the sexual assault case accused the twin of pleading mistletoe.	The sexual assault suspect accused the twin of pleading mistletoe.
147	army officer drop evil twin defense pleads gui sex assau	The apo's officer, army, unleashes the evil twin's defense, pleads for sexual assault.	L' officer of the apo; army unleashes the defense of the evil twins, pleads for a sexual assault.	L' officer of l' army unleashes defense of evil twins pleads for sexual assault.
147	aaron lucas pleads gui colorado sexual assau	It's the first time I've heard of a sexual assault of color.	Aaron Lucas pleads for a sexual assault of color.	Aaron lucas pleads in favor of a color sexual assault.
147	army officer drop twin defense sexual assau	Officer of the Apos; double-defense double-deathed army.	Officer of the Apos; unleashed double sexual assault defense.	Officer of the apos; army dropped double defense sexual defense.
147	fort carson soldier blamed twin brother sexual assau pleads gui	The soldiers were also charged with sexual assault by their siblings.	The Fort Carson soldier has accused his twin brother of sexual assault.	Fort Carson soldier accused his twin brother of sexual assault.
147	ft carson soldier pleads gui sex assau child	He is a member of the Canadian Forces and is a member of the Canadian Forces.	Private Carson pleads for child sexual assault.	Private Carson pleads for child victim of sexual assault.
147	admits sexually assau ing three fort carson colorado	Admits that he was the subject of an alleged sexual assault in three Fort Carson Colorado locations.	Admittedly, he was the subject of a sexual assault in three of Fort Carson, Colorado.	Admits to sexual assault in three Fort Carson Colorado.
147	court hears officer blame twin	Court heard the officer accuse the twins.	The court heard the officer accuse the twin.	The court hears the officer accusing the twin sister.
147	army officer blamed twin sexual assau pleads gui	In the meantime, the police found out that he had been shot by a police officer.	An army officer accused two men who had been sexually assaulted by the police.	An army officer charged two sexual assailants with pleading guilty.
147	man pleads gui assau blame twin	Man pleads mistletoe twin-blame.	Man pleads ass guile twin blame.	Man pleads gui assau twin blaming.
147	soldier north alabama tie pleads gui sex assau child	I'm a soldier, I'm a soldier, I'm a soldier, I'm a soldier, I'm a soldier.	Soldier of l'apos; Northern Alabama tie pleads to sexual assortment as a child.	Soldier de l'apos; Alabama North tie pleads child ass ass sex.
147	colorado soldier named twin sex crime suspect pleads gui	Soldier colorado, named double suspect of a sexual crime, pleads mistletoe.	Soldier colorado named double sex-crime suspect pleads mistletoe.	Colorado soldier named double sexual crime suspect pleads mistletoe.
147	army officer blamed crime identical twin pleads gui	It's not a crime, it's a crime, but a crime.	An army officer accused criminals of the same crimes.	An army officer accused the criminals of identical crimes.
147	soldier blamed twin brother sex assau pleads gui	In the case of a soldier, he accused his twin brother of committing a sexual crime.	A soldier accused his twin brother of committing a sexual crime.	A soldier accused his twin brother of committing a sex crime.
148	nanorods regenerate severed polymer gel	Nanorods are regenerating the ruptured polymer gel.	The nanorods will regenerate the ruptured polymer gel.	The nanorods regenerate the sectioned polymer gel.
148	pitt engineer model repairing material	Dapos model; derisory equipment repair engineer.	Model d' derisory engineer repairing the material.	Model d' derisory engineer repairing equipment.
148	polymer regenerates large lizard	The polymer will regenerate the big lizards.	The polymer regenerates the big lizards.	The polymer regenerates large lizards.
148	polymer gel heal thyself university pittsburgh proposes composite	Polymer gel heals you-same University Pittsburgh offers a composite.	The polymer gel heals you at the same University of Pittsburgh.	The polymer gel heals you-same University Pittsburgh offers composite.
149	intact baby dinosaur canada	Baby Canadian dinosaur is intact.	Baby Canadian dinosaur intact.	Canadian dinosaur baby intact.
149	turned fossil baby dinosaur	He has become a baby, fossil dinosaur.	He's become a baby fossil dinosaur.	He became a fossil baby dinosaur.
149	baby dinosaur skeleton intact scientist died	The intact skeleton of a dinosaur baby died a scientist.	The intact baby dinosaur skeleton has died a scientist.	Uninjured baby dinosaur skeleton died a scientist.
149	baby dinosaur skeleton unearthed canada	Baby dinosaur skeleton, unearthed in Canada.	A baby dinosaur skeleton dug up in Canada.	Baby dinosaur skeleton unearthed in Canada.
149	baby dinosaur skeleton unearthed canada photo	Baby dinosaur skeleton, unearthed photo Canada.	Exhumed baby dinosaur skeleton photo Canada.	Baby dinosaur skeleton unearthed photo Canada.
149	cutest dinosaur perfectly preserved skeleton baby	You know, the cutest perfectly preserved dinosaur baby skeleton.	Cuteest dinosaur perfectly preserved baby skeleton.	The cutest dinosaur perfectly preserved skeleton baby.
149	rare baby dinosaur fossil discovered alberta	A rare fossil baby dinosaur discovered Alberta.	Rare baby dinosaur fossil discovered alberta.	A rare baby dinosaur fossil discovered Alberta.
149	exquisite fossil baby dino absolutely heartbreaking	Exquisite little baby dino, absolutely heart-wrenching.	Exquisite baby dino fossil absolutely heart-wrenching.	Exquisite fossil baby dino absolutely heart-wrenching.
150	box acquires dloop enhance security fine grained data analytics	Box acquires dloop to improve the security of the fine analysis of grain data for the analysis of data.	Box acquires dloop to improve fine analysis security of grain-based data analysis.	Box acquires dloop enhance grain fine analysis data security fine data analysis.
150	box buy technology admins better track content	D&apos box; admin technology purchase better follow the content of the content.	D&apos box; purchase technology admins better follow the content of the content.	D&apos box; technology purchase admins better track content content.
150	box acquires dloop boost security data analytics	Box acquires data analysis security dloop boop booster analysis.	Box acquires dloop boop booster analysis security data analysis data.	Box acquires dloop boop booster analysis security data analysis data.
150	box buy dloop boost data analytics tool	This is a tool to help you analyze the data.	Box dloop boop boop tool d' data analysis.	Box boop dloop box tool d' data analysis.
150	california based box acquires dloop enhance cloud storage security	California Box Acquires Dloop Improves Cloud Storage Security.	The California box buys dloop improves security of cloud storage.	The California box buys dloop improves cloud storage security.
150	box acquires analytics firm dloop	Box acquires Analytics, a dloop analytical firm.	Box acquires analytics firm dloop analytics.	Box acquires analytics firm dloop analysis.
151	stomach artery treatment future weight loss tool	Treatment of pain; ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasonics.	Treatment of Lapos; future gastric artery weight loss tool.	Treatment of Lapos; future weight loss tool gastric artery.
151	rsna left gastric artery embolization weight loss	Left rsna gastric artery, embolization of weight loss.	Left left gastric artery rsna embolization weight loss.	Rsna left gastric artery embolization weight loss.
151	embolization procedure aid weight loss	Embolization helps weight loss.	The embolization procedure helps you to lose weight.	The embolization procedure helps weight loss.
151	weight loss surgery ernative method doc blocking gastric artery	L'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-elle.	Older weight loss surgery doc blockage of the lupus; gastric artery.	Weight loss surgery ernative gastric artery blockage doc.
152	wild turkey pennsylvania pen raised wild trapped	Pennsylvania turkey enclosure reared in the wild.	A pennsylvania turkey enclosure raised in the Apos; wild state trapped.	A pennsylvania turkey enclosure; trapped wild state.
152	wild domestic turkey bird feather	Birds of wild turkeys; birds of wild turkeys.	D'apos feather; wild turkey domestic bird.	Feathers; domestic wild turkey bird.
152	wild turkey	Wild turkey.	Wild turkey!	Hey, wild turkey.
152	wild turkey	Wild turkey.	Wild turkey!	Hey, wild turkey.
152	wild turkey plentiful michigan	You know, Michigan is full of wild turkeys.	Michigan's full of wild turkeys, man.	Michigan's full of wild turkeys.
152	wild thanksgiving turkey	Wild Thanksgiving turkeys.	Thanksgiving turkeys.	Thanksgiving wild turkeys.
